<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-376</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEMAUAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910513
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAY 91 / Survey of Cardiff (2): Selling on the road - The financial
sector
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY MORETON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THREE WEEKS ago, Phil Morgan, head of the financial-services initiative at
the Welsh Development Agency, took an exhibition to Bristol, to 'sell' to
that city's business community the attractions of relocating in south-east
Wales.
Although the day-long event was one of a series that will shortly go to
Reading and then to places along the M25 corridor around London, the Bristol
visit touched a raw nerve. Relations have never been good between Bristol
and South Wales, and the English city resented what it saw as the seduction
of one of its own growth industries.
The move illustrates the aggressive policy that is being followed in order
to attract financial-services companies to South Wales.
Cardiff, as the main centre for the sector in south-east Wales, has never
had a particularly strong indigenous financial industry. Before Mr Peter
Walker, then secretary of state for Wales, launched his financial services
initiative to build the city's financial nexus three years ago, effectively
all that the Welsh capital had to offer was: the Bank of Wales, set up in
the 1972; one medium-sized building society, the Principality, 28th in the
societies' pecking order; the venture capital group, 3i; and one major
incomer, Chemical Bank.
Mr Walker's initiative had immediate results. NM Rothschild has been the
five-star name to arrive, but others - including National Provident
Institution, Banque Nationale de Paris, Axa, the French insurance giant,
Willis Wrightson (also in insurance), and stockbrokers Bell, Lawrie, White -
have strengthened the sector.
While this financial muscle has greatly added to the city's commercial
depth, it has not yet turned Cardiff into an important financial centre.
'You still have to look at Cardiff as an emerging financial city,' says
Peter Davies, Rothschild's director of corporate finance in Wales. 'It is
not possible to get institutional support for a major issue, and if a
growing business wants to raise equity capital, it has really only one
choice - 3i.'
Rothschild's own venture fund is based in London, and of two attempts by the
WDA to set up funds, the Cardiff Consortium came to nothing and the Welsh
Venture Capital Fund was eventually closed.
That situation is about to change. Meirion Thomas, an executive director of
the WDA, says that a new fund, Venture Link, is raising Pounds 5m from Welsh
institutions, such as the local-authority pension funds, and expects to be
in business within the next few months.
Venture Link, which has two other funds in Britain, has opened an office in
Cardiff, and will gear its lending to the bottom end of the market, offering
capital between Pounds 25,000 and Pounds 150,000.
'The signs are that people within Wales are looking much more to
institutions within the country for their needs,' says Mr Thomas. 'The Bank
of Wales, for instance, is getting more into the risk-capital business, and
that is encouraging.'
Venture Link is not the only one interested in Cardiff. Credit Lyonnais, the
French bank, having already opened a dozen regional centres in Britain, is
considering an office in Cardiff, which it currently serves from Bristol
through a former WDA official. Other entrants are in the pipeline, according
to Mr Morgan.
At 3i, Nigel Guy, the Cardiff director, says there is plenty of money for
lending, but that the city lacks a large corporate base, such as that of the
West Midlands, to sustain a major financial sector. Last year, 3i completed
Pounds 18m of business in 50 investments, but the 12 months to March 1991
'was not so good. The position in Cardiff reflected what is happening in the
rest of the UK economy.'
Even so, Mr Guy says there is considerable interest in management buy-outs,
boosted by companies drawing back into their core activities and seeking to
sell what they see as peripheral businesses.
'There has been an upsurge in interest in this sector in the past four
months,' he says, 'including a couple of seven-figure deals, such as that at
British Rotatherm, which was bought from its Scandinavian parents.'
This activity encourages Mr Morgan at the financial services initiative, who
says that the 'temperature is still good, despite the recession. The
downturn in the City of London provides us in Cardiff with an opportunity to
attract firms to a location that provides them with a better cost base. Both
wage and salary levels, and property prices, are much more attractive here
than in the south east of England.'
Mr Morgan has been aiming particularly at the insurance companies, such as
Axa, believing that, as the continental concerns grow increasingly larger in
preparation for the single market in 1992, they will want to have national
networks of offices.
'We want them to look at Cardiff and the rest of south-east Wales as a
potential location,' he says, offering the example of DAS, a German concern,
which late last year opened an office in Bedwas, between Cardiff and
Newport.
'A number of overseas banks, such as Credit Agricole and Paribas, of France,
and the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce, have already financed deals in
Wales.
'The electronics-based Gooding Group has Japan's C Itoh and the American
Citibank among its major shareholders; and with this level of interest, I am
convinced we shall be seeing major banks of their standing actually opening
offices in Cardiff before long.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16 Photograph The Bank of Wales was set up in 1972, and moved to
its new building in September (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-377</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEMAUAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910513
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAY 91 / Survey of Cardiff (1): Hard times at bay - The recession has
crept into the service sector, as well as manufacturing. And while the city
waits for an improvement in the economy, a programme to redevelop its
decaying docklands has recently suffered a setback in parliament.
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY MORETON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SINCE THE middle of last week, the centre of Cardiff has been bedecked with
bunting and flags - the blue flag of the European Community, with its 12
yellow stars, vying for place of honour with the red, white and green Welsh
dragon.
It is Europe Week in the Welsh capital, a festival launched to place the
city firmly in the heart of the EC.
Behind the festival, though, lie a number of fears. Cardiff is suffering its
worst economic setback since the early 1980s. Unemployment has been rising,
and the economy has slowed down.
'There was a fundamental shift in business confidence between last August
and the end of the year,' says Nigel Guy, director in Cardiff for 3i, the
venture capital group. 'Cardiff, like South Wales generally, entered the
recession later than the rest of Britain, but then the wheels fell off. This
came as a great surprise to a business community that had experienced five
good years, and didn't quite know how to handle a downturn.'
Mr Guy's opinion is backed by others. Hugh Thomas, senior partner of Price
Waterhouse, says that business has been 'very quiet' since the end of the
year, with many concerns 'fighting to stay alive'. And David Phillips,
director of the Cardiff Chamber of Commerce, who says that after having
ridden the storm better and longer than the rest of the UK, the situation in
the city is now exactly the same as elsewhere in the UK.
'Most worrying, future investment plans are down yet again in both the
manufacturing and service sectors,' observes Dr Phillips. 'I have never seen
such a depressing picture.'
There are tentative signs, according to Mr Guy, that the bottom may have
been reached: 'I don't think it will fall further. But when the upturn will
come is another matter.'
Dr Phillips foresees an upturn 'well within the next 12 months. Confidence
among companies about increased turnover and profitability is evident.'
However, the manner in which the recession has crept into the service
sector, as well as manufacturing, is disturbingly ominous. Cardiff draws
much of its wealth from its offices, shops and administrative services.
Its great strength in recent years has been as a centre of government. A
major government department, with a secretary of state who has a seat in the
cabinet, overlooks Cathays Park in the civic centre. Only Edinburgh, and to
a lesser extent Belfast, outside London enjoy this privilege.
Nearby Bristol, for instance, a regional centre of government and a city
about a third larger than Cardiff, has one under-secretary as its senior
civil servant. Cardiff has not only a secretary of state, a minister of
state and a parliamentary secretary of state, but also a permanent
secretary, two deputy secretaries and 11 under-secretaries, as well as a
raft of assistant secretaries. This is an enormous weight of administrative
fire-power.
Recent years have seen this strength supplemented by the growth of an
important financial-services industry. Since Sir Julian Hodge, in the 1960s,
formed what has now become the Bank of Wales - 75 per cent owned by the Bank
of Scotland, which is bidding for the remaining 25 per cent - there has been
a steady infusion of financial companies into the Welsh capital, and the
workforce in the sector has grown strongly to 18,000.
Though manufacturing industry has declined severely since the mid-1970s, two
highly important new arrivals have been Bosch, making alternators for the
auto industry; and British Airways, which is to service its fleet of Boeing
747s, the jumbo, next to the airport.
BA chose the site in preference to Liverpool and Singapore, and work starts
soon on a building that will be one of the largest in Europe, employing at
least another 1,200 people - the same number as Bosch expects to employ
fairly soon.
The momentum generated by the inflow of investment is being backed
internally by a programme to redevelop 2,700 acres of Cardiff's decaying
docklands. This redevelopment, the estimated cost of which is more than
Pounds 2bn, is the largest urban regeneration programme in Europe after
London's docklands.
The scheme would bolt on to the city a 21st-century addition, and bring work
for over 30,000 jobs in the next 10 to 15 years, according to Geoffrey
Inkin, chairman of Cardiff Bay Development Corporation.
Some Pounds 250m of investment has already been carried out by Tarmac
Beazer, Westbury, Crest Nicholson and Barratt. The proposed centrepiece for
the whole development, though, is an opera house, a home for the Welsh
National Opera Company, costing perhaps Pounds 40m, on the water's edge
within a development being undertaken by Grosvenor Waterside, Associated
British Port's property arm in Cardiff.
'We are virtually ready to go on the Pounds 150m scheme,' says Mr Freddie
Watson, Grosvenor Waterside's director in charge of the project: 'It is now
simply a matter of getting sufficient commitment to ensure a start will be
made soon.'
But the strategy behind the redevelopment of the docklands suffered a
setback last month. A locally-sponsored private parliamentary bill, to allow
a barrage to be built across Cardiff Bay, creating a non-tidal 500-acre
freshwater lake, collapsed on its last stages of a three-year passage. At an
all-night sitting, a group of Labour MPs made long speeches and raised
persistent objections. They oppose the scheme on environmental grounds,
though a number of them would also prefer to see any government money spent
elsewhere in Wales.
The inability of the government to shepherd the private bill through
parliament was a nasty political blow for the Welsh secretary, David Hunt,
and for Mr Inkin, who had failed to neutralise the opposition to it.
Yet the chances of the Pounds 125m barrage (the largest civil-engineering
project in Europe, after the channel tunnel) coming into being may possibly
have been strengthened by its failure as a private bill. The government has
promised to introduce a bill of its own, and get it through quickly.
But can this be achieved in the present session of parliament, or before a
general election? If it cannot, the measure would have to be brought in
again - though another government might not have the same commitment to the
whole scheme.
Meanwhile, the institutional investors who are necessary to fund the huge
projects, having burnt their fingers on the present recession, are sitting
on their hands. They will need rather more certainty about the barrage
project before they commit themselves to positive decisions.
The bay scheme, the developments announced by NFC, Grosvenor Waterside,
Tarmac, Laing, Carla Properties and Charnwood Holdings, the imminent arrival
of other financial institutions, the likelihood of more hotels being built -
all these augur well for Cardiff. First, though, the city must climb out of
the recession. Until that happens, perhaps in nine months to a year's time,
much of the next phase of economic advance will remain on hold.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15 Map (Omitted). Photograph Window on the future, looking
across Cardiff Bay from the visitor centre, which has a scale model of how
the 2,700-acre regeneration project could look in the 21st century. The
scheme suffered a setback last month, with the collapse of a locally
sponsored parliamentary bill (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-378</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / How To Spend It: A cut below the rest
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE ARE those who claim that the suit is England's greatest cultural
offering. I do not think I would go along with that but certainly the suit
is here to stay. If you are a high-profile designer, an actor, a gardener or
a cook you may well get through your professional life without ever having
to don the basic kit, the trousers, jacket and waistcoat that since Beau
Brummell's time have provided a safe and sure uniform in which an Englishman
may hide.
But if the suit and all it has to say about hard work and power will endure,
the bespoke suit shows all the signs of being an endangered species -
falling numbers, rarely spotted, barely recognised. There is now a
generation of men who have no experience of the bespoke suit at all, who buy
their suits and jackets off the peg. The moneyed and design-conscious look
to the new high-priests of design, to Armani, Yohji Yamamoto, Commes des
Garcons or Jean-Paul Gaultier to make their statements while their less
well-heeled contemporaries turn to the likes of Marks &amp; Spencer, Austin
Reed, Simpson's and Horne Brothers. Few have been taking the route to Savile
Row and as the recession deepens the few are becoming fewer.
Lawrence Willcocks of Blades of Savile Row decided that he could not just
sit and watch the hard times getting harder - something had to be done. 'The
bespoke market needed some radical new thinking and if Savile Row couldn't
come up with it it didn't deserve to survive.'
What he came up with was a range of six classic suits which he would make to
measure for any client for just Pounds 395 including VAT. Given that these
days the average price for a bespoke suit in Savile Row is about Pounds
1,250, the value is remarkable. How, I hear you ask, can he do it?
One of the answers is by eliminating some of the choices and therefore some
of the time involved. There are just six fabrics to choose from - grey
pinstripe, blue pinstripe, blue, chalkstripe, grey birdseye and Prince of
Wales - and length of lapel, number of vents, size of flap on the pocket and
all the other details over which a gentleman used to linger for hours with
his tailor have been decided in advance. Any of the six fabrics may be used
for any of the six suits and you can mix and match the details - single-or
double-breasted, vents and pockets - without paying more. Other changes will
cost extra.
Several of the many layers of handwork that the traditional made-to-measure
suit involved can now be done well - although not so sensitively - by
machine. In the old days all the hand-taken measurements were transferred to
paper patterns by hand - these days the patterns are cut by computer. All
this helps reduce costs.
Lawrence Willcocks is the first to admit that his made-to-measure suits are
not identical to the Pounds 1,250 models, either his own or anybody else's.
'Those are pure and utter luxuries and are in a class by themselves. Every
bit of them is made by hand. What our Pounds 395 suits do offer, though, is
a properly fitting suit, made entirely to the measurements of the customer.'
In deciding on the six classic business suits Lawrence Willcocks and Paul
Keers, author of The Gentleman's Wardrobe and former editor of GQ, put their
heads together and refined the choice. Paul Keers feels the very real
benefit the option offers is to reduce the available choices. 'After all,
chaps who haven't grown up man and boy going to a tailor can find all the
decisions to be taken somewhat daunting.
'They are used to seeing what a made-up suit looks on, deciding all the
numerous details is actually quite difficult and time-consuming. The suits
Lawrence Willcocks and I decided on are all very classic - when it came to
the double-breasted chalkstripe, for instance, the fashionable option at the
moment is to have four-buttons with the bottom button done up but we decided
to opt for the more classic, more long-term six-button version.'
Anybody wondering what the suits are actually like can send for a leaflet
which explains it in detail and comes with the six swatches of fabric (all
13 oz Super 80's 100 per cent wool worsted) which they can actually feel.
For Pounds 395 you have to choose one of the designs exactly as it is - you
can ask for different details but they will be extra. Normally the suit will
be ready four weeks from the order date but a quicker service of two weeks
will be on offer for an extra 10 per cent.
For the leaflet write to: Blades of Savile Row, 8 Burlington Gardens, Savile
Row, London W1X 1 LG. Tel: 071-734-8911.
The classic double-breasted chalkstripe, one of the six made-to-measure
business suits Blades is offering for just Pounds 395. 'It is,' says Blades,
'the suit of a confident man, for while a fine chalkstripe is subtle, not
strident, it still demands a certain panache of its owner.'
The Duke of Windsor used to dress down his double-breasted chalkstripes by
wearing them with tan suede brogues.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-379</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / How To Spend It: An old lady of distinction - Lucia van der
Post celebrates a fashionable lady's 75 years and finds bespoke tailoring
that won't cost men a fortune
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LUCIA VAN DER POST
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR SUCH a fashionable lady 75 is quite an age to admit to. But yes, it is
true, Vogue really is 75 years old this year. The first British issue was
published during the First World War, on September 15 1916. Most of the
editorial matter was supplied from New York, although there were some sops
to local British interests. It sold for just a shilling. Wartime
restrictions meant that it carried no advertisements.
Times may be hard now in glossy magazine advertising circles but even so the
current issue sells for Pounds 2.50 and there are at least 89 pages of
glossy advertisements keeping apart the 204 pages of editorial. At the
height of the boom times, in October 1988, the fattest issue of all carried
333 pages of advertisement and 170 of editorial. If Conde Nast himself could
have lived to see it]
For a magazine which sells just 172,387 copies it has always had an
influence that goes way beyond size. As Peter York, that subtle interpreter
of current trends and attitudes puts it: 'It's a big little circulation. It
is the biggest, most glamorous, full-tilt, paid for, glossy there is. It has
a huge pass-on readership and is read by far more people than those who pay
for it. It doesn't appeal to a single class more it unites an attitude
group, people who think clothes and fashion are important.'
Vogue was always intended to be a very classy number. Conde Nast, who
founded one of the world's most famous magazine empires, never started a
magazine himself. He bought them all, from Vanity Fair and House and Garden
through to his flagship Vogue. 'Class not mass' was the company motto and
the culture has hardly changed. Circulation was never of prime importance
but Conde Nast is not in the business of running loss-making operations for
the sake of prestige. Daniel Salem, chairman of Conde Nast Publications,
makes it very clear that 'Vogue is the flagship not just in terms of
prestige but also in terms of profit.'
Nobody is talking precise figures because nobody has to. One Vogue strength
is that Conde Nast is answerable to nobody but itself - Si Newhouse, his
brother Donald and other family members own Advance Publications, the parent
company. There are no outside shareholders, nobody whose opinions they are
obliged to listen to. If the Newhouses want to do something, it is done.
According to a recent Time magazine article, the Advance empire is one of
the largest family fortunes in the US, probably worth Dollars 11bn.
Si Newhouse's father was the man who bought the Conde Nast empire back in
1963 after Conde Nast himself had suffered a series of complicated financial
reversals.
Rather like the man who liked the razor and so bought the company, rumour
has it that in 1959 Si Newhouse's wife Mitzi asked him to go out and buy her
Vogue. Some Dollars 5m poorer he came back with Conde Nast.
Vogue has always generated a mythology of its own. To those whose
journalistic lives were spent outside its glossy environs it always seemed
an infinitely frothy place. It always seemed a centre of happenings, of much
weeping as fearsome editors conducted their reigns of terror, of top editors
hired for mouth-watering sums and, above all, as home of the mysterious
breed universally known as Voguettes. These were the numerous junior
assistants or reporters who followed in the wake of their high priestesses,
the section editors. They were rumoured to be paid a pittance but always had
a way of making everybody else's designer clothes look like last year's
rejects.
Georgina Howell, in her book Sultans of Style, describes how she won Vogue's
annual talent contest and was initiated into the Voguette's code. She was
given 'a small red paper-bound book entitled So You Have Joined Conde Nast.
It told her to 'wear a plain dark costume to the office, not to wear
jewellery other than a string of pearls, and to have a hat and gloves for
the journey to and from the office.' It warned her on no account to discuss
her salary. This, remember, was in the early 1960s when Biba, Mary Quant et
al were just about to burst upon the scene.
Her reward for winning the talent contest was to water the plants and take
messages for Peter Coats, the distinguished garden editor. 'Tell Peter,'
commanded the Duchess of Westminster, 'that I must have my feather boa back
by Saturday.'
But even Vogue has to change. Once upon a time, so legend had it, Vogue had
only to decree that it was a beige and cream year and every shop in town did
its windows in beige and cream and lo and behold the people did wear beige
and cream. These days it does not try to dictate. It edits, refines and
presents a variety of the best options. Or, as Daniel Salem would put it,
'it sets a mood.'
It changes, as all things must, to survive. It has always been primarily a
visual magazine but Vogue and Conde Nast have always nurtured and supported
a range of talented people.
Looking back over the years the list of contributors is impressive. It
ranges from famous photographers such as Cecil Beaton, Bailey, and Snowdon,
writers like Gertrude Stein, Aldous Huxley, DH Lawrence and Colette, and
food stars such as Boulestin, Robert Carrier and Elizabeth David.
Designers like Mary Quant, Ossie Clark, Foale and Tuffin, Zandra Rhodes were
all given spreads and exposure. Most of went on to become household names
but they were unknowns when Vogue spotted them.
There have been times, though, when the opposition has given Vogue quite a
run for its money. Queen under Jocelyn Stevens in the 1960s gave it quite a
fright. The Face and Arena gave it pause for thought and it is no accident
that Conde Nast now owns 40 per cent of them. 'Buying into those magazines
magazines gives us a foothold in the future and access to a hothouse of
talent,' says Daniel Salem.
'There is no doubt that times now are tough - I personally have never known
them so bad in 35 years in publishing but we have the resources to see them
out. Sometimes it is much more interesting to improve the bottom-line than
turnover. The key, above all, is to be number one in your field. There can,
after all, be only one bible.' There Vogue seems secure.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX Photograph A Vogue fashion picture taken in May last year by
Michel Comte,f (Omitted). Photograph Above, A Cecil Beaton picture of four
debutantes from the August 8 1928 issue of Vogue and, right, a September
1955 photograph by Henry Clarke. Copyright, Conde Nast (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-380</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / As they say in Europe; The oracle of Gravesham
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES MORGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE INTEREST which Britain's neighbours sustain in the minutiae of the
country's politics never fails to astound. Even two days before the UK local
elections The Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung carried a big story headlined,
'Great Britain Awaits the Result from Gravesham.'
I had some trouble in finding out what Gravesham was, but it turns out to be
a place composed of Gravesend, to the east of London, and somewhere else.
Anyway, its name is engraved on the hearts of the bankers of Frankfurt as
the place to watch as the 'oracle' for the next general election.
So I awaited commentaries on the results with some interest and was not
disappointed. The other Frankfurt newspaper, the Rundschau wrote: 'John
Major, the softie in Downing Street, who followed the Iron Lady, may have
collected quick points from his European colleagues, but back home in
Britain the voter apparently did not respect the unfamiliar Gentle Wave.'
They still cannot forget Major's origins. The Mannheimer Morgen said he
would have try very hard not to fall from the trapeze. 'The nasty blow of
the local elections has shown up the limitations of the Conservatives; the
aftermath of the Thatcher Era is still not overcome.'
Now try Le Monde: 'The elections constitute a serious reverse for Mr Major.
It was the first serious test of the popularity of the man who succeeded Mrs
Thatcher. The Conservatives got rid of her precisely because it seemed she
would lead them to a crushing defeat at the next parliamentary elections.'
In Europe it is still impossible to talk about Major without citing the
person the Conservatives never mention. And it seems that whatever mishaps
befall Britain's 'ruling party' they will all be laid at Mrs Thatcher's
door. Of course, if the Tories win the next general election it will be
because they will have 'overcome the heritage of Thatcherism.'
Britain's neighbours really did not like her. But they do miss her.
The Madrid daily, El Pais devoted a lot of space to the visit of Felipe
Gonzalez, the Spanish prime minister, to Britain this week - 'the first ever
official visit by a Spanish head of government.' The original event was
scheduled for last November, but was postponed - guess why. The headline
this time was: 'Gonzalez in the United Kingdom - his most delicate visit to
a European country.'
There were many problems - not the least of them Gibraltar. But there was
also the following: 'The Spanish proposal to create a compensatory fund for
the Community to which the UK will contribute as a rich member and which
will benefit the poor among which figures Spain, runs the risk of splitting
the two sides.' And Brian Redhead was telling listeners to the BBC Today
programme on Radio Four the other morning that Spain was about to overtake
Britain in national income per capita. No wonder the Spaniards were livid.
Looking through El Pais, I found an enormous amount of fascinating material.
It sees itself as the equivalent of The Guardian in Britain; leftish and and
usually friendly to the Socialist government, and yet, by reputation, a
little boring. But then it takes a lot to get Spaniards to read a newspaper;
their press has a bad name because of the long years of conformism under
General Franco when vapid, overblown rhetoric was the order of the day. But
El Pais came into being after the demise of that regime and outsells older
papers as a result.
In one issue of the paper I found an astonishing letter from a woman who
gave a direct account of the problems facing those who had been raped,
couched in terms one would not expect to find even on the medical page of
London's The Independent, which seems to specialise in such matters.
Then there was some remarkable coverage of the situation in Yugoslavia, far
better than anything in the French press, for example, where boredom with
the Yugoslav imbroglio has clearly set in. But it is not only a national
Spanish daily which covers the story extensively; regional papers have their
own special envoys in Yugoslavia. It is the echo from their own not too
distant past that has captivated the Spanish. The papers report what they
officially have tried to blot out.
El Pais carried this paragraph in a story from its man in Croatia: 'In the
villages, more than the cities, fear among the Croats is considerable. Armed
civilians, fingers trembling on their triggers, check passers-by and
neighbours. The Croatian press bombards them with 'news' about imminent
attack from Serbian territory. The Serbian press does the same, except that
the aggressors are Croats. For the man in the street, who shares his wealth
and poverty with his neighbour, be he Serb or Croat, the useless
declarations of the Presidency seem far away. They now live in fear of those
who, yesterday, were their friends.'
In the Spanish civil war, there were numbered among General Franco's
supporters an unorthodox group of fanatical royalists, the Carlists, who
proclaimed the slogan, 'Long live Death and down with Intelligence.' It
would not be out of place in Yugoslavia today.
Before leaving El Pais I have to go back to Sr Gonzalez's visit to Britain.
A banal account of the official programme ran as follows: 'The prime
minister will first hold conversations with the foreign secretary and then
be received by Queen Isabel II (my italics) . . . Wednesday begins with a
visit to Kew Gardens, known for its bonsais (their italics).'
Hands up those who knew that the Spanish for Elizabeth is Isabel: just think
who was running England when the Armada sailed. And what on earth is the
Spanish for Isabel?
Fact: There are no bonsais in Kew Gardens.
James Morgan is Economics Correspondent of the BBC World Service.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-381</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / The empire crumbles but the suffering goes on: A look at
what is happening to the people now that socialism has broken down even in
the proletarian heartlands of the Soviet Union
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN LLOYD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BREAKDOWN of socialist society in the Soviet Union, an irreversible and
ugly process, is now evident in the proletarian heartlands. Novokuznetsk,
once called Stalinsk, the mining and metallurgical centre of Western
Siberia, is one example.
Like moneylenders in the temple, the new signs of market behaviour and
individual enrichment display themselves among the icons of a collapsing
power. The slogans of the 1970s, and earlier, (dis)grace every large
building: 'The service of the state is the interest of all' and 'Raising the
people higher is the aim of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union' and
even, interwoven into a socialist realist mural on the side of an apartment
building: 'Land to the peasants]"
The miners' strike, which ended reluctantly three days ago , had its
militant core here in the Kuzbass coalfield. According to Alexander
Aslanidi, the man who emerged with Gregory Malykhin as the most articulate
exponent of their views, one source of their bitterness is that they feel
they cannot trust the government. 'We think it plays political tricks. Even
now, the agreement between Yeltsin and Gorbachev is to benefit them, not
us.'
There is more to it than that, though. The distrust is fuelled by the sheer
oppressiveness of the ideology which surrounds lives oppressed already by
harsh working conditions, poor, cramped apartments and slop food which is,in
any case, available only with coupons.
Vast factories like the Kuznets Metal Combine, the ZapSib (West Siberia)
steel works and the two aluminium plants disgorge sulphurous smoke into the
valley which contains the city. The food in the canteens is greasy:
rissoles, rice or mashed potatoes, tepid soup and dry, crumbling bread. The
flats - a mixture of Stalin-era gothic and slabs from the 1960s and 1970s,
with some fantasy added outside - are typically two or three small rooms,
kitchen and bathroom. The old wooden houses, some mere shacks, mostly have
outside lavatories. At night, you can hear screaming, desperate rows coming
from the stinking stairwells and you walk among stumbling, incoherent drunks
on the streets. 'You see, there is something to strike about,' said
Alexander Romankov, a young mine manager (who was nevertheless against it).
There is, however, another reason for the unrest, which could be the most
powerful. Among the Stalinist ikons, the new motto is the old one - 'enrich
yourself'. Kuzbass is not like the Ukrainian Donbass field - or, for that
matter, South Wales or the Pas de Calais. Many of the mines have rich, thick
seams of high quality coal for which there is international demand. They
have a market future.
But several things have happened simultaneously.
First, the centralised control of the Union coal ministry has, like all
other such controls, been weakening for some time: indeed, the transfer of
control of the Russian mines from Union to Russian Government in the past
week was more of a logical, if large, step in an already evident direction
than a sudden turnabout. This has meant, for example, that the dozen pits
belonging to the Kuznetsugol Combine in Novokuznetsk have been able to trade
coal abroad, under license, for some years.
Second, decentralisation has impoverished central government. Its foreign
debts have ballooned and its exports, especially of oil, have gone down. It
is starved of hard currency and takes whatever is earned by the fledgling
enterprises.
Kuznetsugol, and other combines, have sought to circumvent this by barter -
coal for Japanese goods. The Sonys now appearing in the cramped living rooms
are nominally available at a subsidised price of Rs2000 (and can be bought
on the black market for Rs12,000). The shining new Nissan Patrols and Urvans
and Sunnys which litter the Kuznetsugol car park are even more obvious signs
of the new affluence. The combine ships them in through Vladivostok, hauls
them across Siberia on the railways and sells them to the mines and the
miners at highly subsidised prices (after which, of course, the black market
takes over).
Matters have not stopped here. Some pits have been leased to their workers,
who must fulfil the state's output target but can then sell the excess on
the market. One pit, Polosuxinskaya, 30 kms from Novokuznetsk, is the first
Soviet mine to hand over majority control to a foreign capitalist. It is
relatively new and very rich in coal.
Two years ago, Igor Gladun, now 43, took over as its director. A short,
powerful man of great energy, he saw how the wind was blowing and got rid of
its (full time) Communist Party secretary (most enterprises in the town now
have, according to Romankov, who has worked in several.) Last year, Gladun
sold 55,000 tonnes of his high quality coking coal abroad at Dollars 46 a
tonne: this year he hopes to sell 90,000 tonnes at Dollars 50-55.
Gladun knew he needed access to Western capital and equipment if he was to
make his pit spin real money. At the same time, Morris Cartwright, a British
coal trader in his early 50s, was sniffing about in Moscow looking for a new
challenge. They were brought together by Valentin Aksilenko, a former Soviet
diplomat in Cuba who had set up his own consultancy called Uni-Eko.
Last month, an agreement was signed giving Cartwright's company, Britseco,
and a Swiss partner, Traiko AG, a majority share of the output of
Polosuxinskaya. The deal sets up a new company, valued at Dollars 15m, also
includes Gladun, Aksilenko, Kuznetsugol, the local railway concern and the
regional soviet (council) at Kemerovo.
This company could become very rich. The pit must produce 2.3m tonnes a year
for the state but it can sell everything above that - and Gladun reckons he
can produce 2.5m tonnes this year. And although only two days were lost to
strikes during the wave just ended, he has told his miners they must work
hard now they are under capitalist ownership.
By chance, Cartwright has now played the role of strikebreaker in two
continents: in the British miners' strike of 1984/85, he helped ship coal
into the little ports which were still open on the south coast, beating
Welsh pickets and getting the coal to power stations. Gladun has marked out
a vast area of reserves - 100m tonnes, called Antonov 2  - which is
Britseco's to exploit. The core of the deal is that Cartwright will, over
the following months, invest heavily in (mainly Western) equipment to drive
the roads and set up the faces on Antonov 2.
This machinery will then sheer away the thick seams of coking coal, load it
onto the railways and wait for the profits to roll in. As simple as that?
The infrastructure is bad; and the collective farm beneath whose fields
Antonov 2 waits for exploitation is cutting up rough. Gladun says he needs
Dollars 4.5m worth of investment right away, but that he cannot get it until
Cartwright sees some coal.
If Polosuxinskaya does not fail badly, pits like it will receive the same
attention and investment. Their workers will be much better off than those
around them - who may well become worse off soon, since much of Novokuznetsk
has a technological death sentence hanging over it, with cuts looming in
work forces and production. Most of Aslanidi's pit delegates know of this.
Some may hope to gain others fear to lose.
Finally, although the strikes were a product of political collapse. Not only
have the Gladuns of Novokuznetsk kicked out their Communist Party
secretaries but the party itself, although still in command of the town, is
isolated and disliked, especially by the young. A vast statue of Lenin,
which should have been completed a decade ago, remains barely started and is
hardly likely to swell the mass ranks of its fellows now.
An amateur video shot by some local enthusiasts on their (Japanese) video
shows snatched, jumpy interviews with citizens who responded to questions
about what they thought of the current state of politics. The supporters of
the status quo (or the past) were usually on sticks: the young and middle
aged were dismissive or contemptuous.
On the edge of town, you will find the Preobrazhenie Sobor, or
Transfiguration Cathedral. Here worshipped Dostoyevsky. After the revolution
it was, in turn, a bakery and a warehouse and was to have been made into a
dance hall. The loosening of political control and the rapid rise in the
power of the church has meant that its partly burnt structure is now being
repaired. Services are taking place although the roof is still being
constructed.
On Tuesday, about 12 old women, one old man and a young man with long wild
hair and beard made up the congregation. A small choir of elderly women
chanted the Orthodox service. A youngish priest paraded about with a censer.
The heavy, mystical atmosphere - the opposite of, and the antidote to, the
triumph of will and reason outside - was evident even in the handful of
ageing bodies genuflecting among the sawdust.
The Orthodox Church has not come out of its decades of trial as a liberal
institution: it has also lost generations of potential faithful and might
never recapture future ones in the atomised, urban society. But it, and the
Nissan Patrols and Aslanidi's followers and Cartwright's mine, are the
elements out of which Novokuznetsk is seeking to restore itself.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII Photograph Miners in southern Kuzbass vote for a 24-hour
strike (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-382</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Lift off with sweat and tears: The painful birth of the jet
engine 50 years ago
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILFRED HARPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ON A cloudy wartime evening 50 years ago Britain's first jet-propelled
aeroplane made its maiden flight from RAF Cranwell in Lincolnshire. It was a
pretty little thing and it swooped around smoothly for 17 minutes before
making a perfect landing.
This event, of such vast significance to the the world, was witnessed by
only a handful of people and filmed by a hand-held camera in monochrome.
This was entirely in keeping with the story of how jet propulsion came into
the world.
It was the fruit of 13 years theoretical and experimental work by Sir Frank
Whittle, on a pitifully small budget and in the face of much official
scepticism and wrangling. The wonder is that Whittle did not chuck his hand
in or that the strain, increased by the stress of war, did not cripple him.
Perhaps it did in some ways. A small fraction of the recognition which he
eventually gained would have done him a lot of good in the discouraging
1930s and 1940s.
On Wednesday, 50 years to the day, he is due to stand, if his health permits
upon that same airfield while an array of aircraft from the vast progeny of
his invention will thunder past in salute.
It is, however, a sad irony that the anniversary falls at a time when
Rolls-Royce is in serious difficulties. The aero-engine maker, which used
the original Whittle engine to develop its Wellend, Derwent, Nene and Dart
power plants, announced only last Thursday a sweeping new round of job cuts
because of the recession in the airline and defence markets.
Wednesday's fly past will be followed by a ceremony at Cranwell College
where, as an RAF flight cadet 64 years ago, Whittle wrote the thesis which
fixed his destiny, Future Developments in Aircraft Design.
He was born in Coventry in 1907, less than four years after the Wright
brothers' first powered flight. His father was an inventive mechanic with a
small engineering business who encouraged his son's mechanical abilities.
Aviation was the novelty of the time and the young Frank read everything he
could on the subject.
When he was 15, he applied to join the RAF as an apprentice. Initially
rejected because of his size - he was only five feet tall. After growing
three inches in six months he was accepted as a Cranwell apprentice in 1923,
graduating as a Pilot Officer from Cranwell College five years later.
Whittle's thoughts on aviation's future grew from his conviction that high
speeds and long range necessitated high-altitude flight in the less dense
and therefore less resistant air. RAF fighters in those days had a top speed
of about 150 mph. Whittle was thinking of 500 mph.
The essential requirement was a propulsion system capable of operating in
thin air. The speeds of propellers and reciprocating engines are limited by
tip speeds and air intake.
Whittle considered various possibilities including the newly developed gas
turbine driving a fan. Then it occurred to him that a gas turbine could be
developed to provide an exhaust jet which alone would be sufficient to
propel an aircraft.
He was encouraged by one of his flying instructors to place his ideas before
the Air Ministry. The Ministry considered them impractical. It was biased
against any form of gas turbine because materials which would withstand the
stress and temperatures in an aircraft application did not then exist.
That was in 1929. Although depressed by rejection, Whittle filed a
provisional specification with the Post Office on January 16, 1930. The Air
Ministry said it had no official interest in the patent. This gloomy year
was brightened, however, by marriage to his Coventry fiancee.
Despite rejection by officials and industrialists, the idea of jet
propulsion increased its grip on Whittle. He continued his theoretical
explorations using any relevant data he could find, such as supercharger
performance in the Schneider Trophy aircraft. Meanwhile Whittle's RAF career
prospered. In 1934 he was sent to Peterhouse, Cambridge, to read Mechanical
Sciences.
In 1935 his jet patent fell due for renewal. Astonishingly, neither he nor
the Air Ministry felt it was worth the Pounds 5 fee, so the patent lapsed.
Soon afterwards, tentative support began to gather behind Whittle's idea. A
new company called Power Jets was formed in 1936 with authorised capital of
Pounds 10,000.
Whittle, still an undergraduate, was allowed by the Air Council to act as
Honorary Chief Engineer provided that such work did not interfere with his
RAF duties and that in any case it should not exceed six hours a week. The
engine work and his studies combined to affect his health but nevertheless
he graduated with a first in 1936 and continued as a post-graduate.
Power Jets had neither workshop nor test premises. The engine of its design
was sub-contracted to British Thompson-Houston, the industrial steam turbine
maker, of Rugby. By April 1937 the first crude engine was ready for test.
Good engineering practice required that novel components should be developed
independently. However, money was so short that the engine had to be tested
as a whole.
Whittle himself was at the test controls for the first run. The engine,
mounted on a truck in the turbine factory, was spun up. The flame in the
combustion chamber was ignited and Whittle gradually opened the control
valve. 'For a second or two the engine speed increased slowly,' he recalled.
'Then, with a rising shriek, like an air raid siren, the speed began to rise
rapidly and large patches of red heat became visible on the combustion
chamber casing. The engine was obviously out of control.'
Everyone around ran for their lives. Whittle, badly frightened, immediately
shut down. Speed control was to remain a problem for a long time. British
Thompson-Houston asked Power Jets to take its project elsewhere, eventually
offering part of a dilapidated and disused foundry a few miles away. For
nearly four years that engine, altered as repairs and experimental work went
along, was the only test piece. It was set up in ramshackle premises, the
project was inadequately staffed and funded, and war was looming.
Whittle was listed for special duties with Power Jets, a curious position in
which from time to time he had to choose between the advancement of his more
orthodox career as an RAF officer and his invention. Conflicts of all kinds
arose between Power Jets, BTH and later, Rover, as well as with the Air
Ministry. The Lutterworth outfit became known as 'the Cherry Orchard', after
the play by Chekov in which preoccupied characters wander in and out, making
seemingly irrelevant utterances. Whittle's habit of breaking off to take pot
shots at rabbits with his .22 rifle doubtless helped foster the allusion.
In 1938 the Air Ministry at last ordered an engine to power an aircraft. A
year later, on the brink of war, it ordered a fast, single seat aircraft,
the G28/39 Pioneer, in which to fit the engine from the Gloster Aircraft
Company. Then designs for a twin jet fighter were put in hand. A second
experimental engine was tested at Lutterworth, much to the pleasure of the
cows in the adjacent field, which gathered in the warm jet stream.
In keeping with many of the bizarre aspects of the project the first jet
aeroplane, with its 29 foot wing span was assembled in a former 19th century
horse emporium in the middle of fashionable Cheltenham, a location chosen
because of the risk of an air raid on the main factory.
The completed aircraft was taken to Brockworth and on April 7, 1941 it made
200-yard six-feet hops over the grass airfield, Whittle piloting some of the
runs. Then it was fitted with the latest engine and taken to Cranwell which
has a long runway, for light tests.
Gloster's chief test pilot, Flight Lieutenant Gerry Sayer, made the first
flights and was charmed by the aircraft's smoothness and by the lack of
noise and vibration associated with propellers. It was about as fast as
current Spitfires but it was very thirsty. 'It's the first time I've flown
an aeroplane where you can actually see a fuel gauge moving,' said one
pilot. Another took his eye off the gauge for too long and ran the aeroplane
dry, then having to make a risky landing on a dead engine.
The aeroplane was used to gather test data for the proposed twin-engined
fighter. It was retired in 1944 and now hangs in the Science Museum.
The Gloster Meteor fighter entered squadron service in 1944, the first jet
aeroplane in the world to do so. Shortly afterwards a German equivalent also
entered squadron service - the Germans had been working along similar lines
and actually had a jet plane, the Heinkel 178, in the air 21 months before
the Pioneer. Fortunately for Britain they failed to take full advantage of
their lead.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII Photograph Sir Frank Whittle (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-383</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Arts: Faces over the last hundred years - The Royal Society
of Portrait Painters' exhibition at the Mall Gallery
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICIA MORISON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
QUITE POSSIBLY Louise, Duchess of Connaught, was simply a stout middle-aged
lady with a double-chin. Then she sat to Sir John Singer Sargent and was
transformed in a three-quarters length portrait. The haughty duchess was
immortalised with her excess inches skillfully vanished away, swelling
upwards but not outwards from black satin and puffs of white chiffon.
Sargent and dozens of other celebrated Edwardian portraitists can be seen at
the Mall Gallery where the Royal Society of Portrait Painters holds its
centenary exhibition (until May 31).
The exhibition honours many past members of the Society, starting with the
bravura and opulent vision of the 1880s and 1890s generation of Lavery,
Orchardson, Guthrie, Shannon, Solomon, and the Victorian old-timer, GF
Watts. Strange that no portrait appears by Archibald Wortley, who therefore
remains just a name although it was he was responsible for calling into
being a society dedicated to giving portraiture higher status and an
exhibition base broader than that offered by the Royal Academy.
The second generation around 1910 brought in the very different approaches
of painters such as Rothenstein, Strang, Orpen and Nicholson. The Strang
portrait is particularly fine, a beautifully poised study of a gentleman
which is strongly influenced by Degas. Quite one of the most remarkable
portraits, however, is Harold Speed's powerful image of a surgeon operating
for cataract. A difficult subject, one might think, brilliantly handled by a
composition which focusses the viewer's gaze not on Dr Little's down-tilted
face, but on his hands as he inserts scalpels into the horridly shining eye
of his patient. This painting normally hangs in the Manchester Royal Eye
Hospital, so this is a rare chance to see it.
Sir Gerald Kelly's famous and exuberant portrait of Vaughan Williams and
Brockhust's bewitching 'Clytie' should stop you in your tracks. So, no
doubt, will 'Juanita Forbes', a preposterous Annigoni temptress who cradles
an hour-glass in a surrealist landscape. There is a fine clutch of inter-war
society ladies of the boneless, chiffon-wrapped variety. One of them by
Cowan Dobson is actually called 'Chiffon'. Lipstick had become now quite the
done thing for ladies but even so, this lady's lips are not for the
squeamish.
And so it continues, a crammed miscellany of portraits familiar and mostly
unfamiliar. At the end is a small but interesting selection of work by
present-day members. This is a large exhibition but it is not, alas, a
generous one. The public pays for admission, which in the circumstances is
perfectly reasonable. But what should an entry-fee buy you?
This exhibition has no labels so some 90 per cent of the exhibits are
anonymous. You have to buy the catalogue to find out even who the artists
and sitters are. Now that smacks of sharp practice, the more so as the
catalogue entries are quite remarkably uninformative - just a few lines from
each artist's curriculum vitae and nothing about the paintings. As half the
pleasure of portraits is as documents to social history, this is a fairly
disastrous omission. These may be lean times for the Society, but even so I
am surprised that in its centenary year it chose to go before its public in
quite such a threadbare dress.
My colleague William Packer has already written about the important
exhibition of Canadian landscape-painting, The True North now at the
Barbican Art Gallery. Our Home and Native Land is a pendant exhibition which
has now moved to Canada House, Trafalgar Square from a previous, rather
larger showing at Sheffield's Mappin Art Gallery.
Arthur Lismer and Frederick Varley, two of the most famous and influential
figures in the history of Canadian art, emigrated from Sheffield. So did a
number of other artists, most notably Stanley Royle and Elizabeth Nutt,
although Royle eventually returned to England. The exhibition explores the
early influences on this generation of artists who, in an artistic
environment subtly permeated by Ruskin's values, trained at the Sheffield
School of Art for jobs in the commercial art world. Interestingly, these
young artists' commitment to landscape-painting is placed within the context
of the political movement to win greater access to the countryside for the
urban proletariat.
It is fascinating to see how that exceptionally gifted pair, Lismer and
Varley, responded to the raw colours, the vastness, of the Canadian
landscape. Equally, it is almost uncanny to find their late work turning
back to close-focus Ruskinian studies of their youth. This is an exhibition
Sheffield can be proud of. It shows the energy and passion for research
which, funds permitting, flourishes in our provincial public collections.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIX Picture Lips not for the squeamish belonging to an inter-war
society lady, detail from Chiffon, a portrait by Cowan Dobson (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-384</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Arts: Mehta in concert
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD FAIRMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHILE ZUBIN Mehta is in London conducting Carmen at Covent Garden he has
found time to take on a few concerts as well, giving us an opportunity to
judge his form on the platform when he is not in the company of a visiting
international orchestra on a prestige tour.
To date the conductor's most notable successes here have been at the
opera-house. He led a splendid, wide-screen sound production of Puccini's La
fanciulla del West, for which he reportedly re-seated the orchestra. There
was a Tristan und Isolde, too, no less luscious sonically, though doubts
began to creep in there; and it was unfortunately the Wagner opera that
rather came to mind at his concert on Thursday with the London Philharmonic
at the Royal Festival Hall.
The evening made an unexciting start with Mozart's Symphony No 41, the
'Jupiter'. This was a typically euphonious performance, well played, keen
not to offend, though it found a more positive attitude in the finale. As
the 18th-century repertoire brings forth a new breed of conductors, it is
increasingly clear that the maestros of the big symphony orchestras, such as
Mehta, find it difficult to articulate this music. Too often it just sounds
vague.
To say that Bruckner requires the same insight is not as improbable as it
might sound. When Jochum came with the Vienna Philharmonic to perform the
Seventh Symphony, he inflected the opening statement in such a way as to
presage all the underlying tensions he felt in the music. Under Mehta the
same phrases were broad, spacious, unfolded with rapturous beauty of tone,
but otherwise featureless. And that, no less, anticipated his performance as
a whole.
Time and again one registered passages that sounded more beautiful than ever
before - orchestral textures so lusciously blended, violin lines that soared
so radiantly, that one momentarily forgot that a symphonic argument should
also be going on. In this awesome symphony there is a great journey to be
undertaken, from self-doubt and loss to hard-won triumph. But the only
significant movement here was up to one blazing climax and down again.
The London Philharmonic played for Mehta at near the top of its present high
standards. The conductor evidently enjoys a rapport with the players and it
is disappointing that the results are not as impressive as one feels, by
right, they ought to be.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-385</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Outdoors: Violets, lovely violets - An almost-forgotten
flower variety
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ARTHUR HELLYER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SOME YEARS ago a friend gave me a violet which he called Wellsiana and told
me he regarded it as the best variety he knew for growing in the garden.
At first I thought the name must be wrong because this was clearly not a
wild species but a garden plant, a selection of the sweet violet, Viola
odorata, and it is unusual - indeed against present rules of plant
nomenclature - to use names in this botanical style for garden varieties.
However, it did not take me long to establish that Wellsiana was a valid
name for it is used by Roy E. Coombs in his authoritative book Violets
published by Croom Helm in 1981.
It was given this name by its raiser, Mr Wells of Fern Hill, Windsor, and in
1884 he was awarded a first class certificate for it by the Royal
Horticultural Society, the highest award it has to give to a garden plant
and one sparingly used.
Clearly Wellsiana must have been special. It was predicted then that it
would become the most widely cultivated of all violets grown from cut
flowers.
Yet despite this triumphant start Wellsiana now seems to have almost faded
away, in fact I cannot recollect ever having heard of it until my friend
showed it to me. So what went wrong? Was it not as good as at first appeared
or did it develop some fatal fault along the way and is my friend wrong in
still rating it so highly?
It is even possible that the plant he has acquired under this name is not
the original Wellsiana. Mistakes when propagating free-growing plants can
occur and unless there are other correctly named stocks around for
comparison, memory can fade and it can become impossible to recollect the
subtle differences that distinguish one garden variety from another.
This is one reason for establishing national collections of ornamental plant
varieties and for taking urgent steps to see that the plant names in these
collections are checked while there are still people living able to
recollect them clearly.
All I can say with certainty is that the plant I am growing as Wellsiana is
a good one. It was particularly attractive this spring, filling the air with
its perfume and covering the ground rapidly and densely with healthy green
leaves so making a fine carpet to smother weed seedlings.
The flowers are fairly large, their colour deep violet blue, their scent
strong and sweet and widely spread. The plant is sturdy and easy to
propagate simply by pulling it apart at almost any time of the year.
In fact it is weather more than season than matters most as it is best
divided when conditions are moist and likely to remain so for a few weeks.
However, that is a difficulty that can be overcome by watering and shading.
This violet has never been attacked by red-spider mites in my garden, often
the most troublesome pest of these plants, living on the undersides of the
leaves in vast numbers and sucking the sap from them so that they turn from
green to dull bronzy yellow.
However, that may be due partly to the moistness of my soil and air for
these mites thrive where it is hot and dry and frequent syringing with plain
water is often the most effective, and certainly the cheapest, way of
keeping them away. However, I suspect that the vigour with which that
Wellsiana grows would give it considerable resistance.
So what did go wrong? I do not know for certain, but just about the time
that Mr Wells was raising his Wellsiana the great 19th century French violet
breeder Armand Millet of Bourg-la-Reine near Paris, was breaking what had
until that time been the top limits of violet flower size and flower stem
length.
At that period violets were in great demand as cut flowers and many
thousands of small commercial growers were employed in supplying them to the
flower markets.
Not only are large, long-stemmed violets more effective when cut but it is
easier and quicker to pick and bunch them. So it is natural that varieties
such as Princesse de Galles - always known in Britain as Princess of Wales -
which has larger flowers and longer flower stems than those of The Tsar,
captured this market before the newly arrived Wellsiana had a chance to
establish itself even in the private side.
What does alarm me is that it seems to have become so much forgotten that I
cannot find it listed in The Plant Finder, the latest edition of which has
just come to hand. It is enlarged to include 50,000 garden varieties and is
available through any bookshop, for Pounds 9.99, published by Headmain.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII Picture Violets, a British favourite (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-386</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Finance &amp; the Family (Briefcase): Taxing the inspector
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
I NEED some information in writing from my tax inspector who seems unable or
unwilling to answer my questions ie. does not reply to my letters.
Is there a superior being to whom I can write to ask that I be sent the
information I require.
As a first step, write to the District Inspector at your tax office -
marking both the letter and the envelope: 'For the attention of the District
Inspector'.
Whether you can insist upon being given the information depends upon what it
is that you want. Statement of Practice F1 (Limitations on Revenue advice to
taxpayers) stresses that 'the primary duty of the Revenue towards the
taxpayer . . . is to assess his liability after the end of the year'.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-387</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Finance &amp; the Family (Briefcase): A lost account
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MY MOTHER died in 1970 (nine days before my father) aged 80 and I cleared
her small estate of around Pounds 2,500.
A National Provincial Bank Deposit account book has now been found by my
sister showing a balance of Pounds 61 in December 1967. I did not know of
the existence of the account when I cleared the estate - the book was with
my sister and my mother was a semi-invalid and had probably not been in the
bank for many years. Bank records should show that the account was dormant
for upwards of 20 years. The book states 'Personal application must be made,
and this book produced at the bank when any money is withdrawn'.
NatWest state that they cannot find any trace of the account. Surely, as the
book clearly shows the balance, the onus is on the bank to produce evidence
that the account had been closed.
If you are in agreement, then could I pursue the matter through the small
claims court? The amount is small, but I consider that as executor or
administrator it is my responsibility to see that the matter is resolved.
You may care to write to the Bank's area manager pointing out that there is
no reason to think that the account can have been validly closed, and that
the amount involved, even with an accumulated interest, is so small that the
Bank could and should honour its obligation. If you do not receive
satisfaction try the Banking Ombudsman before resorting to the County Court.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-388</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Finance &amp; the Family (Briefcase): Mirror wills
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN WE both retired and sold up in 1989, because of the impending changes
in taxation, we split our purchases of securities in half and registered
half in each name. Our only other income is my wife's state retirement
pension and my state invalidity pension.
We are thinking of the time when one of us dies and the possible problems of
half the income stopping until the estate has been processed; I would add
that we have made mirror wills making each other the only beneficiary.
Should we leave a minimum amount in individual names and re-register the
rest in our joint names or have we already taken the best course of action?
It would be possible to have joint holdings of securities and still be
treated as each being in receipt of half the dividend income. On the other
hand if the survivor is the named executor in the will there should be no
serious cash flow problem over dividends. The real question is whether it is
necessary to have wills if you are able and willing to have all the assets
in joint ownership.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-389</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Finance &amp; the Family (Briefcase): Queries for neighbours
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ABOUT 18 years ago neighbours agreed orally to dig into the hillside to
widen the public right of way, now a footpath, to make room for parking and
turning vehicles. The Land Registry shows, dotted, both the original site
boundary lines and the newer cliff face with hedge on top.
The question is: do the new neighbours have a right to reclaim their part of
the communal land, for building? Footpath width would be retained but the
turning and parking of vehicles would be restricted. The only deed refers to
the right to use and duty to help maintain the feeder road which has been
used for vehicles since the original right of way was degraded from lane to
path because of its dangerous junction on the bend of a main road.
The neighbours can reclaim the land up top the original boundary unless the
segment used to widen the way has been used by someone (such as yourself) to
the exclusion of all others including the neighbours. A change in the
identity of the neighbours makes no difference.
IN 1979 I bought from British Rail part of their railway cutting adjoining
my garden, part of this land I purchased is also next to my neighbours
garden. The land is clearly defined by the usual BR star posts every 4 yards
with strong wire between. My neighbour has painted the post next to his
garden and attended the grass on the other side of the posts, my land.
This is OK by me as it is an improvement but he has not mentioned it or
asked me about it. I am concerned that eventually he may try to make a take
over bid. Is this a possibility and if so how do you think I can avoid it
without upsetting what is a friendly relationship?
Your only safe course is to discuss the matter with your neighbour and try
to agree that you should give him a licence to tidy the land as he has been
doing, and to record this in writing.
It is questionable whether the activities which your neighbour has so far
been performing are sufficient to give him a possessory claim (after 12
years' continuance) but you should try to ensure that not even a faint case
for possessory title can be built up. Certainly, if activity were to be more
intense you should take steps to prevent any period of 12 years continuance
of it.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-390</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Finance &amp; the Family (Briefcase): The costs of a house that
was never home
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ABOUT TWO years ago I was unwell and we decided to sell our fairly large
house and buy a cottage. My wife bought a derelict cottage in Henley and we
paid on a tender a very high price. An architect and structural engineer
prepared plans for modernisation which were put out to competitive tender.
The property market had fallen, the tenders were at least 50 per cent higher
than we expected, I had got better and, in any event, our house would have
proved difficult to sell, so we decided to stay where we were and accept a
considerable loss on the property we had bought. Our accountant tells us
that:
(a) The Revenue may take the view that my wife was dealing in property (she
owns our home jointly with me and has never dealt in other property during
her life). This would involve her being treated as a trader and the loss
could only to be set off against income during the current year and the
indexation would be lost.
(b) While the capital loss might be allowable on the indexed sale price of
the property, architect's and structural engineer's fees would not be
allowed.
I asked the local tax office and they expressed the view that such charges
would be allowable but, as might be expected, they would not put anything in
writing. What would be your view? The fees even on an aborted project basis
amount to some Pounds 20,000 so the matter is of some importance to us.
(a) We think it unlikely that your wife's tax inspector would regard her
purchase of the derelict cottage as the commencement of an adventure in the
nature of trade, leading to a schedule D case I loss. Similarly, we doubt
whether the Appeal Commissioners would.
(b) The architect's and structural engineer's fees are indeed disallowed by
section 32 (1)(b) of the Capital Gains Tax Act 1979, because that
expenditure was not 'reflected in the state . . . of the asset at the time
of the disposal'.
The counter staff at tax offices are generally fairly junior and lacking in
experience and detailed knowledge. While they do their best to help the
public, therefore, their opinions should always be treated with caution.
Your accountant's opinions carry more weight than those of the counter staff
at your local tax office, as you will now understand.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-391</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Take care, volatile funds at large - A
look at the ground broken by new investment rules for unit trusts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON LONDON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEW INVESTMENT rules for unit trusts unveiled by the Securities and
Investments Board earlier this month have opened the way for mutual funds
which concentrate on futures and options.
Investors should tread carefully, because the rules are sure to prompt the
launch of some highly geared and volatile funds. For example, a fund which
invested 20 per cent of its assets (the maximum which can be invested in
futures and options under the SIB rules) in the FT-SE 100 futures contract
would be geared to around 700 per cent. This means that the assets of the
fund would be completely wiped-out by just a 15 per cent fall in the UK
equity market.
However, the mainstream of the UK unit trust industry is taking a cautious
approach. Many funds to be launched later this year are likely to maintain
relatively low gearing and to spread their investment in futures and options
across markets.
Unlike the US, where futures funds play a whole range of financial and
commodity markets, most UK fund managers said that they will concentrate on
areas they know - equities, bonds and currencies.
While the SIB rules allow funds geared up to 800 per cent or more, few funds
are likely to maintain such high levels of leverage.
'Gearing for the sake of gearing does not offer optimal investment returns,'
said Alan Wren, chief executive of Prudential Holborn.
Prudential Holborn expects to have its first fund ready for launch by
September. Wren envisages a fund with average gearing of perhaps 20 per
cent, moving up to 50 per cent on some occasions and down to zero gearing at
other times.
This is comparable to the level of gearing offered by investment trusts. The
difference is that investment trusts take on gearing by borrowing, rather
than by buying futures and options.
While the details have yet to be finalised, Prudential Holborn's favoured
fund strategy concentrates on an international portfolio of equities.
Futures and options would be used to adjust the exposure of the fund to
different markets at lower cost than buying or selling actual shares.
This sentiment is echoed by Trevor Robinson of Fidelity Investments, which
also favours an equity-based investment strategy.
In addition to new funds, a number of the off-shore futures funds already
run by UK institutions will move on-shore once the new rules are in force.
For example, John Govett already runs three open-ended off-shore futures
funds, which are highly geared investments. For example, the company's
dollar bond fund and dollar currency fund are geared at 800 per cent.
The company plans to seek a UK listing for its lower risk Managed Futures
Fund, which is geared to about 400 per cent. For the UK, however, it plans
only a low-risk futures fund without gearing.
However, while the bigger players are initially cautious, some new highly
geared funds are certain to be launched. Investors are advised to look
closely at what they are buying.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-392</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Gilts may be boring, but they have an
edge
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INDEX-LINKED gilts are often dismissed by stock market professionals as
unexciting investments. But those planning for their retirement should find
a niche for them in their portfolios.
The capital value of such a gilt will be repaid on maturity in line with the
increase in the Retail Price Index over the lifetime of the bond. The
coupon, initially set at either 2 or 2.5 per cent of the original face value
is also increased in line with inflation.
At the moment, the trading price of index-linked gilts lags behind their
repayment price, and as a result the real yield on offer is around 4 per
cent, provided you hold the bond till maturity and assuming inflation
averages 5 per cent.
That is a very respectable return by historical standards. Most personal
pensions are invested in equity-based funds, on the grounds that equities
are the best vehicle for long-term growth. The real returns from shares are
good but variable. Figures from Barclays de Zoete Wedd show that the real
return on equities between 1968 and 1990 was just 4.2 per cent a year,
although it was as much as 14.1 per cent between 1974 and 1990.
But the BZW figures only show the returns available if you match the index.
Most fund managers do not do so. Take for comparison, the BZW figures for
the ten years to end 1990, which show growth with income reinvested of 395
per cent. The average UK equity general unit trust rose by 365 per cent over
the same period, on an offer-to-bid basis.
On an annual basis, that means the return was around 1 per cent lower than
provided by the index. The average UK balanced trust underperformed by
around 2 per cent a year.
Assume, for argument's sake, that a conventional personal pension will
underperform the index by 1.5 per cent a year. Then for an equity-based
personal pension to beat an index-linked gilt, where the real return is
effectively guaranteed, equities need to produce a real return of 5.5 per
cent a year.
The startling result from the BZW figures is that in 13 of the 26 20-year
periods since the Second World War (1945-65, 1946-66 etc) equities have
failed to produce a real return of more than 5.5 per cent.
Those figures make index-linked gilts look a better bet. Some managers will
allow you to set up your own personal plan, saving on commissions and
financial adviser's fees. You can invest in index-linked gilts directly and
as with a conventional personal pension, such investment will be tax
deductible and gains within the fund will be tax-free.
Index-linked gilts are not the perfect answer for everybody, or for all your
long-term savings. But investing in index-linked for your retirement would
save you from several worries:
your pension fund is guaranteed to outpace inflation,
you cannot be let down by a poorly performing fund,
you cannot suffer from a plunge in the stock market,
your credit risk - the government - is unimpeachable.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-393</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Surveyors prefer caution
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HEATHER FARMBROUGH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
YOUR HOUSE purchase is proceeding smoothly until the surveyor's valuation
report lands at the building society where you have applied for a mortgage
loan. The surveyor says that the agreed price of the property is 5 per cent
too high. At once, you start to worry that you will not get the mortgage
loan The nagging suspicion creeps in that you are being ripped off.
The answer may not necessarily be yes. Surveyors have always erred on the
side of caution in preparing valuation reports since they are acting for
building societies or banks, advising whether the provision of the loan to
buy the property is a reasonable commercial risk. In other words, they have
to judge whether, in the event of a repossession the house could be sold at
a reasonable price. Although the surveyor's client is the lender rather than
the purchaser, they are in the invidious position of potentially being held
responsible by both parties should a serious structural problem be missed.
After two years of falling house prices across much of the country and a
rise in the number of repossessions, surveyors are understandably showing
even greater caution and a growing reluctance to accept market valuations,
particularly in the south where prices have fallen most.
As Peter Hutchins of Lawson and Daughters, a London estate agency, says:
'During 1987 and 1988, surveyors were very relaxed about valuing the
property at the price agreed. But we are finding that they are more cautious
nowadays, and recommending more and more retentions. This means they will
suggest, for instance, that the price is only fair if a damp proof course is
put in, and that some of the loan should be held back until satisfactory
structural work is carried out by a given date.'
This is probably enough to put all but the keenest purchasers off and to
send shivers down the vendors' backs.
'The first step I'd take is to go up the road to another firm of estate
agents and ask how much a property like the one I was buying was worth,'
said Tony Copping Joyce of the Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors
(RICS). 'If the price seems reasonable, and there are no other problems, go
ahead.'
If it seems high, you have to weigh how much you want the house and how keen
you are to sell your present one quickly. If you try to renegotiate you may
jeopardise the transaction.
If a great deal of structural work is needed, such as dry rot treatment or
underpinning the purchaser is in a strong position to renegotiate. But if
all that is required is the replacement of a metre of guttering you probably
will not get far. If you are considering carrying out building repairs after
you have moved in, it is essential to get a full structural survey from a
chartered surveyor who is a member of the RICS  - a good idea in any case.
Although most surveyors will be unwilling to give an exact estimate of the
likely cost of building work, they should be able to provide a guide.
Unless there is serious structural work to be undertaken, the deciding
factor is often the attitude of the lender. This will depend on the
condition of the house and the estimated creditworthiness of the person
applying for the mortgage loan. If you are not borrowing more than 70 per
cent of the original agreed price, the lender may not worry if the valuation
is 5 per cent less than the agreed price. But if you want to borrow 100 per
cent, you will only be able to borrow 100 per cent of the valuation price
instead. Building societies are not allowed to lend more than the valuation
says the property is worth. If the building society agrees to lend you the
amount on condition you carry out specified structural work, it will
probably hold back a sum equivalent to their estimate of the cost of the
work. This may also mean that the insurance company covering the mortgage
loan will not grant full insurance on the property until the work is
completed.
Bear in mind, says Hutchins, that the surveyor is likely to think
cautiously. If vendors are caught unprepared, all they can do is play it by
ear.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-394</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Arsenal launches debenture bond
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Champions of the English Football League on Monday, would-be champions in
the money-raising stakes yesterday. Arsenal launched a Pounds 16.5m
debenture bond to make its London stadium all-seater and to install a creche
and museum. Manager George Graham (above) hopes the issue will protect his
resources for buying players. Details, Page 10
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-395</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAFAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Accountancy firm to shed 225 jobs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WALLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
KPMG PEAT Marwick McLintock, the UK's second largest accountancy firm, is
making 225 qualified staff redundant, mainly in London and south-east
England - probably the largest single batch of redundancies made by a UK
accountancy firm.
Since December last year, Ernst &amp; Young, the UK's third biggest accountancy
firm, has made about 100 qualified staff redundant, and Coopers &amp; Lybrand
Deloitte, the largest firm, has said that at least 200 staff will go in the
next few months.
Other large firms have been discreetly 'counselling out' unwanted staff and
many medium-size firms have also been cutting employees.
Such redundancies were unheard of in the 1980s when the big firms grew
between 20 and 40 per cent a year in terms of fees and staff. The firms are
now being squeezed by increasing costs and falling revenues.
Mr Jim Butler, a senior partner in Peat Marwick, said the reason for the
redundancies was that young, newly qualified staff were failing to leave for
jobs in industry and the City and that as a result the firm had become
marginally overstaffed.
'In the past our problem was retaining people, but now we have the opposite
problem. There is virtually no movement at all.'
He said the redundancies should be seen in the context of Peat Marwick's
total professional staff of about 7,000.
The redundancies affect people with up to three years' post-qualification
experience, and will not change the firm's plans to recruit 850 graduate
trainees later this year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-396</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAE9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Dhaka sets need for aid at Dollars 1.5bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REAZUDDIN AHMED and KK SHARMA
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   DHAKA, NEW DELHI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Bangladesh government estimates it will need Dollars 1.5bn (Pounds 800m)
in aid and 2m tonnes of rice in coming months to rescue the victims of last
month's cyclone and to rebuild the battered economy.
Storms and floods continue to ravage the country. Voluntary agencies said
that diarrhoea had broken out in 16 coastal districts where people were
drinking contaminated water.
The immediate need is said to be about Dollars 600m. So far about Dollars
450m has been pledged, but no funds had been disbursed by yesterday. Relief
operations, however, are moving more smoothly after 12 days of near
confusion.
Apart from the efforts by the army, which is the main agency in the country
providing food, water and medical supplies to about 10m survivors in the
coastal areas and islands, international aid has finally started flowing in.
About a dozen aircraft carrying medicines and other relief material landed
yesterday in Dhaka, the capital, and this pace is expected to be maintained
in the next few days.
Ships carrying food from Australia and Canada have anchored off Chittagong.
The logistics of delivering the supplies to the survivors are still to be
improved, but more helicopters have arrived from India and Thailand.
Differences between the acting president, Mr Justice Shahabuddin Ahmed, and
the prime minister, Mrs Khaleda Zia, are said to have been resolved and Mrs
Zia has taken over the relief co-ordination committee from him.
Disaster relief, Page 3
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-397</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAE8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Meeting fails to end Ulster deadlock: Pessimism deepens over
'round-table' talks about province's political future
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS and KIERAN COOKE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, DUBLIN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TALKS ON Northern Ireland's political future have descended into a fractious
row, bordering on the farcical, over the venue for negotiations involving
the Irish government.
Mr Peter Brooke, Northern Ireland secretary, met Mr Gerry Collins, Irish
foreign minister, for four hours in London yesterday to consider how to end
the deadlock. Neither commented afterwards.
Pessimism about the progress of 'round-table' talks has deepened to a new
low, with goodwill rapidly disappearing. After two weeks out of the 11 set
aside for negotiations, participants are stuck at the 'talks about talks'
stage.
One course appears to be for Mr Brooke to issue an ultimatum when the
province's four constitutional parties reconvene on Monday with the threat
of the talks collapsing if the participants do not accept his proposals.
Unionists refuse to travel to Dublin for the talks about relations between
the two parts of Ireland as long as the Irish Republic has a constitutional
claim on the north. They have also blocked Belfast. Nationalists want talks
held somewhere in Ireland.
Mr Brooke has called on the nationalist and unionist leaders to 'reflect on
their positions over the weekend'. He will be hoping the potential
embarrassment of talks folding on a logistical detail, and the encouragement
it would give terrorists, will concentrate minds.
The question of who will chair discussions once the Dublin government
becomes involved has raised further difficulties. It is believed unionists
have objected to Mr Brooke and Mr Collins acting as co-chairmen.
Unionists and the nationalist Social Democratic and Labour Party provoked
more antagonism yesterday by breaking the confidentiality which has so far
surrounded the talks.
Mr James Molyneaux and the Rev Ian Paisley, the Unionist leaders, published
five alternative venues acceptable to them, including London, a 'neutral
venue' outside the British Isles, and combinations of locations.
'While we will continue to seek a reasonable accommodation, the community
will understand that we cannot indefinitely be expected to alter our
position in the absence of a reciprocal measure of flexibility by others,'
they said.
Mr Seamus Mallon, deputy leader of the SDLP, said he could not understand
why the unionists would not negotiate within Northern Ireland. 'They are
showing their weakness, their inability to stand on their own two feet,
their absolute fear,' he said.
Mr John Hume, SDLP leader, said on BBC radio: 'It is the first time in 16
years that people have had to come near a table, never mind get around it. I
hope it is no more than a hiccup.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-398</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAE7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Pirelli in resumed talks on merger
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FISHER and HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT, MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CONTINENTAL and Pirelli, the two European tyre companies which have been at
each others' throats for the past few months, yesterday agreed that the
crisis in the industry was so severe that merger talks should be resumed.
At the same time Continental, based in Germany, confirmed that Mr Horst
Urban had agreed to step down as chief executive after strong disagreement
with the supervisory board over the talks' direction.
His departure, which was greeted with relief by Pirelli, opens the way to a
possible amalgamation. Mr Urban, 54, had defended Continental's independence
against Pirelli's approaches.
Pirelli, however, claimed the support of more than half of Continental's
shareholders and used its backing to help overturn a voting rights curb at
an extraordinary general meeting of the German company in Hanover in March.
This was regarded as a moral defeat for Continental. Since then the Italian
company has held out for renewed talks.
Yesterday, Continental said the management of both companies had agreed to
hold 'round-table' talks. Both sides regard the outcome of the talks as
open. They will be kept secret and no further comment will be made until
results have been reached. This is in line with the previously expressed
desire of Mr Ulrich Weiss, the chairman of Continental's supervisory board,
that contacts with Pirelli should be pursued in private.
Mr Weiss, an executive of Deutsche Bank, is thought to have taken a tough
line with Mr Urban at the supervisory board meeting. Mr Urban is succeeded
by Mr Wilhelm Winterstein, 60, the purchasing and logistics director. The
more placatory Mr Winterstein will lead Continental in its talks with
Pirelli.
Pirelli results; Horst Urban background, Page 12
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-399</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAE6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / World Stock Markets (America): Dow follows bonds lower after
Thursday's rally
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
A BRIEF SPURT in equities faded quickly yesterday morning as stock prices
reeled under the influence of a plunging bond market, writes Karen Zagor in
New York.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average fell 50.98 to 2,920.17 on moderately heavy
volume of 175m shares, after climbing 40.25 to 2,971.15 on Thursday in a
rally which was propelled by computer-driven program trading. Declining
issues led those advancing by 1,123 to 462. The broadly based Standard &amp;
Poor's 500 was off 7.51 at 375.74.
The weight of new supply in the Treasury market, accumulated during the
refunding week, depressed bond prices and the Treasury's 30-year bond
tumbled 1 9/32 in late trading to 97 27/32 , yielding 8.32 per cent.
There was little reaction to April's producer price index, which rose by 0.2
per cent, even after stripping out food and energy.
Westinghouse was one of the most active issues, following a 19m share
offering of the stock priced at Dollars 26 1/2 on Thursday. The stock slid
1/8 to Dollars 26 5/8 yesterday.
An initial public offering of 6m shares in Haemonetics, a manufacturer of
blood processing systems, prompted heavy trading in the stock, which was
quoted at Dollars 23 3/4 .
Fairchild jumped Dollars 1 1/8 to Dollars 9 3/8 in heavy trading on reports
that a bid for the aerospace products company was imminent. In April,
Fairchild turned down an unsolicited bid of Dollars 14 a share from the UK's
Mountleigh Group.
American Express dropped Dollars  3/4 to Dollars 24 amid concern about the
impact of the company's First Capital Holdings life insurance unit on group
earnings. American Express said it would take a second quarter pretax charge
to earnings of about Dollars 144m related to its investment in First Capital
after California insurance department yesterday issued a cease and desist
order limiting First Capital's activities.
American Express has reduced its stake in First Capital to 28 per cent from
44 per cent.
Duracell, the battery manufacturer whose shares were floated at Dollars 15
on May 8, eased Dollars  3/8 to Dollars 21 in active trading after the
company reduced its first-quarter net loss.
The secondary market was unable to withstand the sell-off and in late
trading the Nasdaq composite was off 4.39 at 493.42 after advancing more
than 1 point in the morning.
Cisco Systems dropped Dollars 1 to Dollars 30 3/4 in unusually active
trading after the company turned in third-quarter net income of 37 cents a
share against 13 cents a year ago on higher sales.
Apple Computer rose Dollars  1/2 to Dollars 51 1/2 in anticipation of a new
version of its operating system software for its Macintosh computers which
is expected to be unveiled on Monday.
Repligen slid Dollars  7/8 to Dollars 12 1/8 in heavy volume. An issue of 2m
shares was priced at Dollars 12 1/2 on Thursday.
Canada
TORONTO stocks followed a steep slide in the Dow and US bonds. The composite
index ended off 14.73 points at 3,489.79. Declines led advances 257 to 253
on volume of 23.3m shares.
Canadian companies listed on Wall Street were among the heaviest hit.
Seagram fell CDollars  7/8 to CDollars 112 7/8 , Northern Telecom lost
CDollars  5/8 to CDollars 42, Canadian Pacific eased CDollars  1/8 to
CDollars 20.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-400</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAE5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Appointments: Senior posts at HTV Group
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
HTV GROUP has made changes in its senior management. Mr Huw Davies ceases to
be chief executive of HTV Cymru/Wales to concentrate on his duties as group
director of television. Mr Emyr Daniel has been appointed managing director
of HTV Cymru/Wales, and to the group board. He continues as director of
programmes for HTV Cymru/Wales. Mr Ted George, a main board director,
succeeds Mr Ron Evans on his retirement as managing director of HTV West. Mr
Steve Matthews becomes director of programmes, HTV West, when Mr Derek Clark
retires next year. Mr John Elfed Jones has been appointed group deputy
chairman. He is chairman of Welsh Water, and will succeed Mr Idwal Symonds
when he retires as chairman of HTV Cymru/Wales at the end of next year.
Joining the board of HTV Cymru/Wales is Professor Lord Griffiths of
Fforestfach, chairman of the Centre of Policy Studies. Mr Colin Atkinson and
Mr Symonds have resigned as joint vice-chairman of the group but remain as
directors.
*****
Sir Timothy Harford has been appointed deputy chairman of WAGON INDUSTRIAL
HOLDINGS, Telford. He is chairman of KwikSave group, and deputy chairman of
both Wolseley, and Wesleyan Assurance Society.
*****
Mr Michael Munro has been appointed a non-executive director of FIFE INDMAR,
Edinburgh. He is an executive director of Quayle Munro merchant bank, and a
director of The Life Association of Scotland, Shanks &amp; McEwan Group, and
Pittencrieff.
*****
SWISS BANK CORPORATION has appointed Miss Marta Rokosova as head of the
property finance group, merchant banking division, London office.
*****
RAMCO OIL SERVICES, Aberdeen, has appointed Mr Steven Bertram as financial
director. He was financial controller and company secretary.
*****
Mr David Heywood (pictured) has been elected a non-executive director of
RENTOKIL GROUP following the retirement of Mr Michael Carr. Mr Heywood is
executive deputy chairman of British-American Tobacco Co.
*****
ASSOCIATED BRITISH PORTS HOLDINGS has appointed Mr James Shaw as managing
director of its subsidiary, Grosvenor Square Properties. He was managing
director of Thorn High Street Properties, part of Thorn EMI.
*****
The first management committee of the LONDON PLATINUM AND PALLADIUM MARKET
has been elected: Mr Colin A. Griffith, Credit Suisse; Mr Richard M. Lowish,
Engelhard Metals; Mr David N. Saunders, Mase Westpac; Mr Philip
Clewes-Garner, NM Rothschild &amp; Sons; Mr Alan Austin, Johnson Matthey; and Mr
Ernest C. Watkins, Sumitomo Corporation (UK).
*****
FAMILY GUARANTEE CORPORATION, Brighton, has appointed Mr Martin Fielding as
managing director. He was a senior manager, corporate finance division,
Deloitte Haskins &amp; Sells.
*****
Mr Peter Yates has been appointed divisional executive director of SMURFIT
UK print and packaging division, Windsor. He was chief executive of Smurfit
Cartons (Witham).
*****
Mr Michael Wilmot, global business unit director, UK, for ALEXANDER
STENHOUSE, has additionally taken on responsibility for City branch business
development. Mr Henry Koszarek has been appointed national marketing
director. He continues as director responsible for major accounts, captive
and technical operations.
*****
Sir Greville Spratt has been appointed chairman of NATIONAL WESTMINSTER
BANK'S City and West End regional advisory board, succeeding Mr Alan
McLintock who has retired. Sir Greville has been on the board since 1989, is
a former Lord Mayor of London, and a non-executive director of The Williams
Lea Group.
*****
TESTECH, Poole, has appointed Mr Tony Davies to its board.
*****
BANK OF IRELAND has appointed Mr Michael Connolly as executive
vice-president and head of commercial banking at First NH Bank, New
Hampshire. He is managing director of Bank of Ireland Finance, and joined
the bank in 1968.
*****
NOP posters division, part of the MAI Information Group, has appointed Mr
Richard Hearn as managing director. He was director of marketing at Arthur
Maiden.
*****
Sir John Wickerson (pictured) has been appointed non-executive deputy
chairman of R. MANSELL, Croydon. He is managing partner of Ormerod
Wilkinson, and replaces Mr Leon Hill who has retired.
*****
Mr John Morris succeeds Mr Bill Havers as refinery manager at ELF OIL's
Milford Haven refinery from June 1.
*****
BET has appointed Mr Andrew Mills as director of corporate affairs. He has
been with BET for a year, and previously was an associate director with
Barclays de Zoete Wedd.
*****
Mr David Poole, managing director of AMAG Aluteam UK, has been appointed
vice-chairman of the ALUMINIUM STOCKHOLDERS ASSOCIATION.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15 Photograph (Omitted). Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-401</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAE4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / London Stock Exchange: Granada fears realised
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Weeks of uncertainty surrounding the top management and immediate policy of
leisure group Granada, were ended yesterday when the company unveiled a
package involving a series of cash raising exercises, management changes and
exceptionally bad trading figures.
The market gave the package a very rough ride and Granada shares, under
pressure for some considerable time, dropped 27 to 184p after 13m shares
changed hands.
At their worst, the shares were quoted at 183 1/2 p, with the majority of
the turnover of 13m, generated at that level.
The group confirmed persistent market stories that Mr Derek Lewis, chief
executive, was leaving and it launched a one-for-three rights issue at a
deeply discounted 140p a share to raise Pounds 163m . Additionally, it said
interim profits were sharply lower and chopped the interim dividend from
4.4p to 2.5p. The sale of its bingo business to Bass, the brewing giant,
will raise an additional Pounds 147m.
Mr Roy Owens at Smith New Court said he saw no reason, after this news, why
Granada shares should sell at a premium to the leisure sector. He has
pencilled in a current year forecast of Pounds 88m, down from Pounds 120.6m
and expects a figure of Pounds 118m for 1992. Bass rose 12 to 973p on 1.4m,
and said it has appointed J. Henry Schroder Wagg to advise on the sale of
its bookmaking subsidiary Corals. Rank Organisation was immediately put
forward as a possible bidder for Corals while a management buy-out at Corals
was also spoken of. Rank lost 9 to 713p.
Gloomy meetings
Warnings of lower profits and slower trading from four leading groups across
a range of industries which held their annual meetings yesterday depressed
the London market.
Bowater posted a 23 fall to 600p as Mr Norman Ireland, chairman, said the
recession, which began in the third quarter of last year, would lead to
lower profits in the first six months of this year.
Hawker Siddeley eased 7 to 579p after saying January and February had been
'very poor, while P&amp;O dropped 14 at 585p after reporting slower trading.
Pearson eased 9 to 759p.
A reversal of the strong run by Trafalgar House followed the P&amp;O warning.
The stock was now overvalued, according to a broking house, which advised
clients to sell in special ex-dividend form. It ended 14 down at 257p.
Oil shares drifted easier with turnover contracting markedly. British Gas
opened a shade firmer at 246p after some optimistic press treatment of
recent unlikely stories that Hanson may be lining up a bid. The shares
quickly retreated however, with traders taking profits and selling the stock
down to a closing level of 239 1/2 p, a net decline of 4 1/2 . Turnover was
5.5m shares.
BP edged up to 348p but subsided to 341p prior to closing 2 off on balance
at 344p as marketmakers resurrected the oft-repeated tale that the Kuwait
Investment Office may well be considering the sale of its 9.9 per cent stake
in the UK oil group. Several London-based analysts thought such a move
unlikely but it was also pointed out that there would be a considerable US
and Japanese appetite for such a large amount of top quality stock;
'Unlikely but certainly feasible,' said one specialist. Shell, scheduled to
announce first quarter figures next week, fell 3 to 523p, on 2m.
Enterprise ran into a flurry of selling pressure, as fund managers continued
to assess the effect of the joint venture deal with Elf to acquire
Occidental's North Sea interests. Heavy support from one broking house
involved in the deal failed to sustain Enterprise shares which settled a net
7 off at 543p.
Ranger Oil ran up strongly to close 19 higher at 425p ahead of a company
presentation on May 22.
The strong possibility of Ford UK reporting a loss next week re-directed
attention to the problems of automotive component manufacturers. Smith New
Court is ultra-negative on the sector, believing it will probably be
1993-1994 before the market for cars and trucks recovers to 1989 levels.
Salomon Brothers International also downgraded many UK car component stocks
yesterday because of the decline in automotive markets.
Lucas Industries, which showed determined resilience on Thursday, wilted on
a rush of selling to close 5 lower at 157p. SNC has changed stance on the
stock from hold to sell but admits good civil aerospace exposure gives it a
long-term order book. The stock was one of the most heavily traded, with a
volume of 5.6m shares.
SNC accords a similar rating to three of the remaining four leading
component stocks. Following Thursday's warning about interim profits, GKN
slipped back 8 more to 341p while Laird Group eased 2 further to 227p. BBA
Group, noticeably weaker the previous day on the cash call for Pounds 79.1m.
steadied at 128p.
London International Group, the consumer products and services company,
advanced strongly amid talk that Genting of Malaysia was keen to boost its
stake. The shares settled 13 1/2 higher at 268 1/2 p after turnover of 2.8m.
United Biscuits fell 8 to 370p as another broker was said to have cut its
current year forecast by Pounds 7m to Pounds 208m, making it the lowest of
the estimates so far. Lower sales volumes and consumers buying cheaper
brands have contributed to the estimates of lower profits.
Hillsdown was off 6 at 246p on suggestions that a line of stock had been on
offer. Unilever eased 6 to 733p on continuing nervousness ahead of its first
quarter results on Friday. Analysts expect about Pounds 355m against Pounds
369m last time. Sainsbury added 2 to 392p before final results on Wednesday.
Profits of Pounds 500-520m are expected against Pounds 420m last time.
Sainsbury's habit of delivering just above analysts' forecasts is unlikely
to be broken this time around.
Share placings featured prominently in the engineering sector. William Cook
issued 1.67m new shares, representing some 7.7 per cent of the enlarged
equity capital, and these were placed at 252p per share to raise the funds
required for a Pounds 4.2m acquisition. William Cook shares closed 4 off at
269p.
Rotork, which is hoping to benefit from the reconstruction of the Gulf
oilfields, remained at 228p as 860,000 shares were placed at that level with
a range of UK institutional investors. The placement represents 3 per cent
of the company's ordinary share capital.
An approach which might lead to a bid for Quotient, the computer software
and services company, pushed the shares 28 higher to 118p. Last month ACT
Group, a fellow computer and software house, raised its shareholding from
less than 1 per cent to over 13 per cent. ACT ended 2 off yesterday at 106p.
Rosehaugh fell 2 to 62p as 1.5m shares were placed at 63p late in the
previous session.
Utilities continued to outperform the wider market with institutions looking
to increase weightings ahead of the flotation of the Scottish generators,
which is thought to be going well. There was more heavy turnover in National
Power (8.1m) and PowerGen (7m), the latter edging ahead to 142 1/2 p and the
former to 137 1/2 p.
The Electricity Package rose 33 to Pounds 2158, boosted by individual
performances such as Midland Electricity, up 6 at 208p and South West 4 up
at 252p.
The Water Package retreated a further 30 to Pounds 3053 on talk of more
unravelling.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1991
NEW HIGHS (157).
BRITISH FUNDS (8) Treas. 10 1/2 pc Cv. '92, Treas. 10pc '92, Treas. 3pc '92,
Treas. 8pc '92, Exch. 3pc Gas '90-95, Treas. 2pc I-L '92, Treas. 2pc I-L
'94, Treas. 2pc I-L '96, AMERICANS (8) Amdahl, BankAmerica, Beth. Steel,
Contl. Bank, FPL, Gen Host, Houston Inds., PHH, CANADIANS (5) BCE, Bk. Nova
Scot., Brascan, Can. Imp. Bank, Tarn Pure Tech., BANKS (5) Dai Ichi,
Espirito Santo Fin., Fuji, Secure Tst., Sumitomo, BREWERS (3) Devenish 4 1/2
pc Pf., Guinness, Whitbread A, BUILDINGS (5) Ball (AH), Berkeley, Boot
(Henry), Gleeson (MJ), Smart (J), CHEMICALS (2) Hickson, ICI, STORES (10)
Amber Day, Argos, Coles Myer, Dunhill, Fine Art Devs., Hartstone, Pentos,
QS, S &amp; U 31 1/2 pc Pf., T &amp; S Stores, ELECTRICALS (6) Brit. Telecom, Kewill
Systems, MTL Instruments, Nth. Telecom, Polar, Volex, ELECTRICITY (11) East
Midlands, Eastern, London, Manweb, Midlands, Northern, Norweb, Seeboard,
Southern, Sth. Western, Yorkshire, ENGINEERING (4) Cook (Wm), Fairey, Morris
Ashby, Wagon Indl., FOODS (13) BSN, Geest, Greggs, Iceland Frozen, M &amp; W,
Merchant Retail, Morison (Wm), Do. 5 1/4 pc Pf., Nichols (Vimto), Pokphand
(CP), Shoprite, Watson &amp; Philip, Wessanen, INDUSTRIALS (20) Airsprung
Furniture, Astra B, Betterware, Channel Express, Community Hospitals,
Cornwell Parker A, Cowan de Groot, Electrolux, Granada 7 1/2 p Pf., Hafslund
Nycomed A, Do. B, Huntleigh Tech., London Intl., Nobo, Pathfinders,
Quotient, Security Archives, Sinclair (Wm), UniChem, Wolseley, INSURANCE (2)
USLIFE, Utd. Friendly B, LEISURE (5) Airtours, Central ITV, Euro Disney.,
Radio Clyde, Scottish TV, NEWSPAPERS (2) Bristol Eve. Post, Johnston Press,
PAPERS (4) Abbott Mead Vickers, Bemrose, CIA, Repola, PROPERTY (3) London &amp;
Met., New England, Regalian, SOUTH AFRICANS (1) SASOL, TEXTILES (1)
Yorklyde, TRANSPORT (3) Bergesen A, CSX, Hays, TRUSTS (27) Aberforth Smaller
Co's, American, Do. B, Baillie Gifford Shin Nippon, Biotech Pf., Dartmoor,
Dunedin Worldwide, Exmoor Dual Zero Pf., F &amp; C Pacific, Do. Wrrnts., Fleming
O'seas., Law Debenture, Leveraged Opp., Martin Currie Pacific Wrrnts.,
Mexico Fd., Monks, New Zealand, O'seas., Pacific Assets, Rights &amp; Issues,
Scottish Cities, Do. A, Scottish Eastern, Scottish Inv., Second Alliance, TR
Tech Stpd. Pf., Templeton Em. Mkts., OILS (6) Crusader, NZ Oil &amp; Gas, Norsk
Hydro, Occidental, Ranger, Royal Dutch, MINES (3) Delta Gold, Mount Burgess,
Precious Metal Aust.
NEW LOWS (19).
BUILDINGS (1) BMSS, STORES (1) Usher (Frank), INDUSTRIALS (7) BLP, Brompton,
Chillington, GCF, GR, Rentaminster, Spear (JW), LEISURE (1) Swanyard, PAPERS
(1) Unit, PROPERTY (1) Merchant Manuf., TRUSTS (4) Aberdeen, Babcock Prebon,
Drayton Eng. &amp; Intl. Wrnts., Hungarian, MINES (3) Cluff Res., Gold &amp; Base,
Waverley Min Fin.
Other market statistics, including the FT-Actuaries Share Indices and London
Traded Options, Page 9.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-402</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / International Company News: Banesto near to insurance deal
with French group
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER BRUCE and GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MADRID, PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BANCO Espanol de Credito (Banesto), Spain's third largest commercial bank,
is close to selling a large minority share of its insurance division, La
Union y El Fenix, to the French insurance group, Assurances Generales de
France (AGF).
The deal is also expected to include a possible exchange of shareholdings
between the two parent groups, as well as broader co-operation in insurance
marketing.
Trading in La Union y El Fenix shares was briefly suspended in Madrid
yesterday as the stock market commission announced negotiations to construct
a holding company in which Banesto, through its industrial corporation,
would hold a majority.
La Union y El Fenix is Spain's fifth largest insurer, with premium income of
Pta68bn (Dollars 660m) in 1989, while AGF's Spanish operation ranked 17,
with Pta22bn in premiums.
Banesto would not comment on the talks yesterday, but it has been expected
for some time that the bank would need to dispose of assets this year to
make up for heavy provisions forced on it by the Gulf crisis.
This week it confirmed it was selling its Catalan banking affiliate, Banc
Catala, to the Italian bank, San Paulo di Torini. It is also understood to
be contemplating the sale of part of its oil refiner, Petromed.
A merger of AGF's Spanish operations with Union y Fenix would open up large
parts of the country - western Europe's fastest-growing life insurance
market - to the French group. Not only would it be able to use Union y
Fenix's branch network, but, possibly, Banesto's network of almost 2,000
bank branches as well.
AGF has been among the most cautious of France's insurers in expanding
abroad.
Its French rival, Union des Assurances de Paris, has already bought a 3 per
cent stake in Banesto's closest Spanish banking competitor, Banco Central,
and is forming a holding company with one of Central's insurance companies,
Vasco Navarra, to sell policies through Central's regional banking
affiliates.
Allianz, the big West German insurance group, has a stake in Banco Popular,
whose branch network it also hopes to use to sell insurance.
Many Spanish banks see linking up with foreign insurance companies as a way
of increasing profitability at their branches.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-403</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / International Company News: Californian regulator moves
against insurer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN Garamendi, the rec-ently-appointed Californian insurance
commissioner, yesterday issued a 'cease and desist' order against First
Capital Life Insurance Company, a San Diego-based insurer whose parent
company is 28 per cent-owned by Shearson Lehman Brothers.
The order prohibits First Capital from making payments to its parent
company, First Capital Holdings, or to its affiliates without the
Commissioner's permission, and from writing new business.
It also places a moratorium on surrenders by First Capital policyholders and
on life insurance policy loans.
Announcing the order, Mr Garamendi said First Capital was in a 'hazardous'
financial condition. Concern about the company's position had triggered a
wave of surrenders in recent days, thus compounding its problems, he said.
First Capital is not large - its assets are Dollars 4.5bn and it has 190,000
policyholders - but the authorities' intervention comes at a sensitive time.
Last month, a much bigger Californian insurer, First Executive, was seized
by the regulators after concerns about its heavy junk bond portfolio
prompted a similar wave of surrenders and a collapse of its marketing
network.
Like First Executive, much of First Capital problems stem from sizeable junk
bond exposure.
The Commissioner has been putting pressure on Shearson to help shore up the
insurer, but no deal has emerged.
Shearson Lehman last night said it will take a Dollars 144m second quarter
pre-tax charge related to its investment in First Capital, Dow Jones reports
from New York.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-404</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Sacrifice to woo the franchise gods -
Granada's awkwardness over its departing chief
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR ALEX Bernstein, chairman of Granada Group, seemed ill at ease yesterday
despite announcing that the financial problems facing the group had been
dealt with - at least for the time being.
Granada has sold its bingo business to Bass for Pounds 147m and is launching
a 1-for-3 rights issue at 140p a share to raise Pounds 163m net.
Mr Bernstein was quite prepared to talk about other planned disposals
expected to bring in a further Pounds 60m. He was happy to talk about the
bingo sale and the company's hopes for retaining the emotional heart of its
business - the ITV franchise for the north-west.
What he was not prepared to talk about was the last paragraph in the
company's press release and, specifically, the sentence that read: 'Derek
Lewis is announcing his intention to resign from the board.'
Mr Lewis will stay on as chief executive until a replacement has been
appointed from outside the company and, for someone on their way out, he
seemed cheerful and reconciled to his fate at yesterday's briefing.
Thanks to a series of leaks, it is now common knowledge that the departure
of Mr Lewis was the price for the completion of the rights issue. With
considerable neatness of timing, the complex financial package was completed
just before Wednesday's deadline for bids for the new 10-year ITV
franchises. It is less clear who was responsible for exacting the human
sacrifice.
Fingers have been pointed at SG Warburg, Granada's financial adviser, and,
furthermore, questions have been asked about the relationship between
financial advisers and the management of public companies.
Warburg's argument would be that as financial adviser it merely reflects the
reality of the market place, the worries of institutional shareholders and
the impact of disappointing results.
It is believed that Hoare Govett, one of Granada's advisers, the other being
Warburg Securities, holds the same view of the company.
The crisis at Granada came to a head because of businesses that went wrong,
as well as the increasing levels of debt flowing from the commitment to
British Sky Broadcasting and the Pounds 200m move into computer servicing.
Events began to move faster when an institutional shareholder contacted Mr
Peter Davis, a non-executive director of Granada. He and another
non-executive, Mr Alan Clements, then contacted between six and eight
institutional investors.
That the institutions were unhappy and wanted changes at the top came
through loud and clear. Some said Mr Lewis should go, others that the
chairman should carry the can. And some just wanted change without being
very sure what form it should take.
Against such a background, the clear advice from the City was that someone
would have to go if the company's financial future was to be secured.
Granada revealed yesterday that its debts stood at Pounds 634m  - higher
than expected.
The imminence of the franchise bids, was, it is believed, a factor. As a
member of Granada's founding family and with his close links with Granada
Television, Mr Bernstein stood for continuity. Mr Lewis was hardly involved
with television at all.
Despite the fact that the strategy decisions of the past few years had been
taken by the whole board, the view was that Mr Lewis would have to go.
He wanted to challenge the views of the institutions and call in Barclays de
Zoete Wedd, another financial adviser, for a second opinion. But events
moved too fast for that.
Yesterday Mr Bernstein did maintain: 'We are pretty clear what our strategy
is at the moment.' But he would not answer the questions that many will now
ask about Granada.
If there was agreement about the strategy of the company why had there to be
a scapegoat, and why was it the chief executive?
Had Mr Bernstein considered resigning or should he have considered resigning
as chairman? What had been the role of Warburg in the affair?
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10 Photograph Alex Bernstein, avoiding questions others will now
ask (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-405</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: CPU Computers in second-half loss
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A setback for CPU Computers in its second half means it will only be close
to break-even for the whole of 1990.
The result for the half is well below expectation, the directors said,
particularly after a first-half profit of Pounds 484,000. For the year 1989
the figure was Pounds 534,000.
They explain there were operating losses in the second half, essentially
from the Austrian subsidiary where trading difficulties were experienced.
But the group's principal shareholder, Scoa SA, has provided a cash
injection and enabled CPU to recapitalise the troubled subsidiary by Pounds
700,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-406</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Fractional rise at James Smith Estates
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
James Smith Estates, the USM-quoted property group, reported a fractional
rise in pre-tax profits, from Pounds 1.14m to Pounds 1.16m in the year to
March 24, and this, said Mr Stephen Mulliner, chairman, was achieved
'despite the difficult conditions experienced by the property sector,
including the high level of interest rates'.
He ascribed the 'satisfactory year' to the company's low gearing and the
high quality of the commercial property portfolio. With more shares in issue
this time earnings were slightly down at 5p (5.07p) per share and the final
dividend is lifted 0.2p to a proposed 2.2p for a total of 3.3p (3p).
Gross rental income rose to Pounds 1.62m (Pounds 1.45m).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-407</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: BMSS declines sharply to Pounds 1.02m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Profits of BMSS, the USM-quoted timber and building materials merchant, fell
from Pounds 1.73m to Pounds 1.02m pre-tax for the year to January 31.
Turnover improved to Pounds 22.51m (Pounds 13.1m). However, sales volume
fell sharply in the latter months of the year from the already depressed
levels of the opening six months.
The cost of sales doubled to Pounds 16m as did distribution costs to Pounds
4.16m. Earnings per share emerged at 11.3p (16.2p) but a final dividend of
2.7p (2.5p) makes a 4.7p (4.375p) total.
Group debt at year-end totalled Pounds 1.9m (Pounds 3.6m), representing 21
per cent of shareholders' funds. The shares closed 4p lower at 110p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-408</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: 50% expansion for Cambridge Group
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mainly as a result of organic growth, Cambridge Group, the Dublin-based
financial services organisation, pushed up pre-tax profit by 50 per cent for
the year ended February 28 1991.
Mr Colm Menton, chairman, said the fact that all aspects of the group's
business were still at an early stage of development indicated that 'there
was considerable upside potential for earnings'.
Profit was up from IPounds 3.02m to IPounds 4.53m, or Pounds 4.1m. Earnings
were 6.25p (4.57p) after allowing for the shares issued to acquire control
of Xtra-Vision, the video rental group. The final proposed dividend is 0.5p
for a total of 0.9p (0.27p).
The chairman said the performance in the UK was particularly encouraging
given the sharp fall off in the economy and the poor performance of many
competitors.
Leasing and confirming accounted for some 80 per cent of the group's
profits, underlying the strength of those two the core businesses.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-409</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Radamec benefits from Gulf war
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A good performance by its equipment in the Gulf war contributed to
confidence in the future at Radamec Group, the electronics and mechanical
engineering concern. The number of orders received towards the end of the
year improved and there was a high level of inquiries.
Mr Len Whittaker, chairman, said that Radamec Defence Systems' own equipment
and that incorporated into other companies' products performed well in the
Gulf. 'Electro-optic surveillance systems with passive day and night
operating capability were seen to provide a new dimension to military
operations.'
In 1990 the company cut its taxable loss from Pounds 3.39m to Pounds 396,000
by improved sales and increased efficiency. The company was said to have
been trading profitably since the beginning of the present year.
Operating profit for the year under review was Pounds 153,000 (Pounds 1.84m
losses) before interest charges down to Pounds 549,000 (Pounds 711,000).
Turnover was Pounds 12.1m (Pounds 9.69m) and losses per share were 1.8p
(17.4p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-410</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: P &amp; 0 chief repeats warning on results
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
At the annual meeting of Peninsular &amp; Oriental Steam Navigation, Lord
Sterling, the chairman, repeated his warning that the 1991 results could not
be 'anything but disappointing, especially in the first half.' While the
company's weekly indicators were not showing a worsening position, there was
little more than a suspicion of a recovery.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-411</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Seafield incurs Pounds 11.48m deficit
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Seafield, the property and transport group, ran up losses of Pounds 11.48m
at the pre-tax level for the 1990 year, compared with previous profits of
Pounds 3.41m.
The deficit, however, was struck after taking account of exceptional items
of Pounds 18.65m which principally related to a property revaluation
deficit.
An improvement in turnover to Pounds 30.7m (Pounds 13m) reflected a full 12
months' contribution from Charterhall and the transport companies. Losses
per share worked through at 15.8p (earnings 9.8p).
There is no dividend for the year - shareholders received a total of 2.4p
for 1989. Net assets per share totalled 73p (92p) and year-end gearing stood
at 78.7 (38.4) per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-412</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Pearson warns on first half
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
LORD BLAKENHAM, chairman of Pearson, the publishing, banking and industrial
group which owns the Financial Times, warned that first half results would
be well down on the comparative period of 1990, when pre-tax profit came to
almost Pounds 98m.
Speaking at the annual meeting yesterday, he said trading conditions in the
first quarter had been tough for the majority of the businesses. Consumer
confidence was at a low ebb and, despite an increase in market share,
revenue available from advertising was significantly lower than last year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-413</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Letter: Dealing with the Arab boycott
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr MARTIN LEVER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, The removal of Coca-Cola and other American companies from the Arab
League blacklist of companies dealing with Israel ('Things go better for
Coca-Cola in Arab world', May 6) is to be welcomed, if only because it
recognises that these companies have had no intention of succumbing to the
Arab boycott and have continued trading with Israel. The move also
underlines the ability of companies to trade successfully with both Arab
countries and Israel.
American companies expanding in Middle East markets are encouraged by US
laws to ignore the boycott.
Indeed, many European companies also manage a growing business in both Arab
and Israeli markets, primarily because of commercial good sense and a
dislike of commercial blackmail, but increasingly because of the
encouragement given by European governments through the introduction of
anti-boycott legislation.
It is regrettable, however, that, against this background, the UK government
still steadfastly refuses to encourage, through legislation, British
companies to ignore the boycott. A recent survey by one of the DTI's own
export advisory boards suggests that British companies were annually losing
to their competitors more than Pounds 350m worth of non-military business
with Israel.
The effects of the Arab boycott, such as they are, do not prevent Israel
obtaining the products it requires in world markets. What it has done is to
demonstrate a lack of moral fibre by the British government and many British
companies which is resulting in a valuable and growing overseas market being
lost increasingly to overseas competition.
Martin Lever,
executive director,
British-Israel
Chamber of Commerce,
14/15 Rodmarton Street, London
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-414</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Will the price be right?: The ITV companies and their
franchise bids
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A strict Methodist upbringing has left Mr Leslie Hill, chairman and chief
executive of Central Independent Television, with a distaste for gambling.
It was only three years ago that he placed his first bet, a few pounds on a
horse at the Cheltenham Gold Cup - and won.
Early next week Mr Hill will have to make the biggest gamble of his life
with a bet that could go as high as Pounds 300m or Pounds 400m. Whether he
chooses correctly will determine whether the UK's second-largest ITV
company, covering the Midlands and responsible for programmes such as
Spitting Image and Inspector Morse, will survive. Livelihoods and
shareholders' funds are about to go on the line.
Central, together with Britain's other 15 commercial broadcasting companies,
have to deliver their bids for new 10-year licences to the Independent
Television Commission in London's Brompton Road by noon on Wednesday.
The enormity of the choice they face is coming home to some companies in the
final weekend before they must put the number that will determine their
future in a brown envelope.
'There is a seething maelstrom of emotions out there,' says the chief
executive of a company bidding to unseat an ITV incumbent. The executive,
who asked not to be named, said that until this weekend, drawing up business
plans and applications had appeared to be proceeding in a rational way. All
that, he fears, is now changing. 'The panic and fear that is gripping some
incumbents now is likely to lead them to add 1 or 2 per cent to compound
growth rates of advertising revenue,' he added. And that could lead to
significantly larger bids than expected.
There is no outward sign that Mr Hill is starting to panic. He plans to
spend the weekend reading the proofs of the bid application for the eleventh
time and thinking quietly about the decision he will take with his board.
At Thames Television, Mr Richard Dunn, the chief executive, has had his
decision made for him. He cannot make the minimum Pounds 1,000-a-year bid
because he is fighting for his life against at least two serious rivals - Mr
Michael Green's Carlton Communications and the David Frost-Richard Branson
consortium.
Mr Hill's problem, shared by several other ITV companies such as Granada and
Scottish, is that he does have a choice. No serious bidders have publicly
declared themselves against Central though there have been hints that East
Midlands Electricity, through the Midlands Development Corporation, is
attracted to the bright lights of television. Has the Severn Trent Water
Company been talking with leading continental European media companies? And
is Mr Bruce Gyngell, chief executive of TV-am, the breakfast television
company, planning a coup against the inheritor of his old company, ATV?
Mr Hill does not know for sure. So he can choose to make the minimum bid to
retain his franchise or, if he thinks he faces serious opposition, the
Pounds 30m to Pounds 40m a year over 10 years that would probably be needed
to be sure of success.
'You have got to be the highest bidder if someone else gets over the quality
threshold,' he says emphatically. The quality threshold is the first stage
of the bidding process. Only those with high-quality programme proposals and
business plans will be allowed to get through to the second round. The
envelopes will then be opened, and unless exceptional circumstances arise,
the highest bid will win.
But the question being asked in the boardrooms of ITV, is what if there are
no rival bidders out there after all, or none capable of getting over the
quality threshold?
'Those who bid high could look pretty silly, but you can't help that,' says
Mr Hill, a relatively recent arrival in the television industry. He has
worked in publishing, the record business, industrial services and
construction, but he has never faced anything like this before - a decision
that will profoundly affect his business and his employees.
Coopers &amp; Lybrand Deloitte, the consultancy firm representing seven of what
will probably be 35 to 40 bidders, believes the money committed on Wednesday
to be paid over the 10 years could total Pounds 3bn to Pounds 4bn. Such huge
sums have never been at stake before in the history of broadcasting.
Even at Central, the strain was starting to show on Thursday during an
all-day board meeting where the broad parameters of the company's bid were
being thrashed out.
Mr Michael Green owns 20 per cent of Central and in recent months he has
been an assiduous attender of board meetings. On Thursday he did not turn
up. A feeling of panic and worry descended. Was Mr Green going to use his
inside knowledge of the company to make a last-minute bid? A few telephone
calls established that his sights were still set on Thames and TVS, and
Central was able to return to wrestling with numbers again.
The general suspicion permeating the industry in the run-up to bidding has
led to a boom in business for companies which specialise in sweeping offices
for hidden electronic bugging devices.
Mr Greg Dyke, managing director of London Weekend Television, who is
believed to be facing a bid of uncertain provenance from a consortium led by
Polygram, the international record company, got very excited recently when
the sweepers' anti-bugging device went haywire in the St Paul's room where
franchise discussions were held.
'At last somebody was interested enough to bug the room,' says Mr Dyke. But
it turned out to be a false alarm, only a loose wire in the ceiling.
The only partially documented example of what may have been attempted
industrial espionage came outside the offices of MAI, the marketing and
financial services company leading a consortium against TVS. A red car was
seen outside the offices. Photographs were taken and the registration number
was traced to a private detective agency. There the trail went cold.
Different strategies and equally different attitudes to brinkmanship are
emerging as the countdown begins.
Granada Television, which may or may not face a bid from Mr Phil Redmond's
Mersey Television, will not decide how much to bid until late Tuesday or
possibly early Wednesday.
Mr Charles Romaine, chief executive of the HTV group, which faces at least
two contenders, decided his bid in an eight-hour session with his chairman,
Mr Louis Sherwood, on Wednesday. 'We are happy with the bid. If anyone wants
to bid more, good luck to them,' Mr Romaine says.
Mr Gus Macdonald, managing director of Scottish Television, is quietly
confident. Over the past five years investment in both regional and national
network programmes such as Taggart has been increased and programme deals
signed with 20 of Scotland's independent production companies.
A competing consortium that would have included Mr Conrad Black and the
Daily Telegraph went away after they encountered what Macdonald describes as
his 'great rampart of thistles'. Staff at Scottish are now asking only one
question. 'Has Gus the guts to bid low.'
After the bids are submitted on Wednesday there will be no rest for
Britain's ITV companies. The losers will immediately have to start work on
their doomsday scenarios - how much of the company can be saved if they lose
their broadcasting licences.
But how will the whole process of awarding franchises be seen once the dust
has settled? 'It will either go down as the most brilliant thing in history
or an example of how not to do something - probably the latter,' predicts Mr
Hill.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9 Photograph (Omitted). Photograph (Omitted). Photograph Waiting
for the bidding, LWT's Greg Dyke, left, Central's Leslie Hill, right, and
Coronation Street, a mainstay of Granada TV (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-415</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Letter: M and S: recession not behind restructuring
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr CLINTON SILVER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Following Mr A L Dowding's letter ('Marks and Spencer and a question of
philosophy', 4/5 May), I hope that you will allow me the opportunity to
respond.
The recent redundancies at Marks and Spencer were not motivated by the
current recession. It had been decided some months ago during Lord Rayner's
chairmanship to make an investigation into head office, with a view to
restructuring where it had become unwieldy and pruning management layers
which had become over extended. The intention was to improve efficiency and
stimulate the growth of the company. This investigation was executed with
great care, taking some six months, and was led by Mr David Sieff.
The redundancies in stores were necessitated by the fact that we have not
experienced the normal rate of labour turnover in the past two years.
Therefore, we needed to relieve the congestion at this level as we had too
many trainees to train and too many junior managers for reasonable prospects
of promotion.
I also regret the use of the phrase 'a lot of dead wood' in the press, and
much of the other intemperate language. It was not our phrase; we have never
used it. We are saddened by the number of uninformed comments accusing us of
changing the culture of the company and, in particular, crediting the change
to the new chairman. The board was unanimous, together with the divisional
directors and executives (ie, the top 100 managers of our business) on the
necessity for the structures review.
The majority of the executive board have spent their working lives in this
business. I have served 39 years and am imbued with its culture, which I
have been fortunate to learn first-hand from the great men under whose
chairmanship I have served - Simon Marks, Israel Sieff, Teddy Sieff, Marcus
Sieff and Derek Rayner; and, I should add, Richard Greenbury, who has served
Marks and Spencer since leaving school over 38 years ago, is an integral
part of our culture and takes his rightful place alongside his predecessors.
It would be a mistake to imagine that this is the first time that we have
taken a good look at ourselves and made changes to respond to the needs of
the business. A company with our sustained record of commercial success and
investment in technology and systems could not have managed over the years
without facing the need from time to time to rectify overstaffing. Our
current policy is, in fact, explicitly supported by Lord Sieff, the honorary
president, who some years ago personally took charge of a 'good
housekeeping' exercise.
Our regard for good human relations is demonstrated in the care we have
taken with individuals; the generous compensation to those who are leaving
and the after-care service we have installed to help them to be placed in
new jobs.
Marks and Spencer remains under Richard Greenbury's chairmanship a company
of the highest standards in respect of its customers, its goods, its
suppliers, its staff and the community in which it trades.
Clinton V Silver,
deputy chairman
and managing director,
Marks and Spencer,
Michael House,
Baker Street, W1
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-416</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Letter: Encouraging the private investor
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From A PORTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Mr Douglas Dale (Letters, May 8) suggests short term penal capital
gains tax will encourage long term investment. Many companies have found the
best long term shareholders are private individuals.
May I suggest a better answer would be to encourage the private investor by
equalising the tax treatment on direct and indirect investment. If
capitalism is to work we must have a tax system that penalises us if we
delegate our responsibilities to institutions not prepared to accept them.
A Porter,
The Pines,
19 Chantry Rise,
Penarth,
South Glamorgan
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-417</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Leading Article: To buy or not to buy
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MILLIONS of individual decisions will be taken today, and over the coming
months, in shopping malls and estate agents across Britain. The aggregate
effect of these will determine both the timing of economic recovery in the
UK, and the electoral chances of the Conservative party. Will consumers buy
now or save for a little longer? Worryingly for the government, and for the
economic forecasters, the answer is anyone's guess.
The uncharacteristically erratic behaviour of British consumers over the
past few years accounts in large part for the poor track-record of recent
economic forecasts. Back in 1985, economists failed to foresee the sharp
fall in saving and rise in borrowing and consumption that followed financial
deregulation.
Economists were caught out again last summer. Despite buoyant growth in real
personal income, an unexpectedly sharp and unforeseen rise in the portion
devoted to savings turned a mild downturn into what will be the second-worst
recession since the Second World War. The combination of high interest
rates, rising inflation and accelerating unemployment provoked consumers to
increase their savings as a percentage of disposable income to 10.8 per cent
by the end of last year, from a low of 4.5 per cent in 1988.
Undeterred, the Treasury has forecast a recovery beginning in the second
half of this year. It expects this to be driven by a recovery in consumer
spending, which is forecast to rise by 2 1/4 per cent in the first half of
next year.
Will the Treasury's optimism prove misplaced? There are signs that a
recovery in consumer confidence and business confidence has followed the end
of the Gulf war, though spring's arrival usually does boost confidence. The
rise in the Confederation of British Industry's quarterly confidence
indicator suggests recovery will arrive some time in the next six months.
Depressing picture
Mr Norman Lamont insists that people should focus on these forward-looking
confidence indicators. But his advice may reflect less on their reliability
than on the depressing picture painted by indicators of the economy's
current performance.
Such indicators provide scanty support for the chancellor's claim that an
economic recovery is 'just round the corner'. Such a recovery will not come
from a rise in business investment, as answers to the CBI's question on
investment intentions shows. Nor is an export-led recovery in prospect.
Companies have been unable to switch production away from the depressed home
market, with non-oil export volumes (excluding erratic items) up by only 0.1
per cent in the six months to March 1991, compared with the previous six.
Only the personal sector can add something significant to the modest rise in
government spending expected this year. Recent signs are not encouraging.
New car registrations in April were 24.2 per cent down from last year, while
growth in the monetary aggregates remains very low. The rise in retail sales
in March was distorted by a rush of durable goods purchases before the
budget's increase in VAT took effect, but sales in the previous three months
were depressed.
Little impact
Recent falls in interest rates and in headline inflation will undoubtedly
spark some rise in consumer spending. Yet the lags are long. Four rate cuts
this year have had little impact so far on the housing market.
Nor is next week's fall in headline inflation likely to prompt further
interest rate cuts. This is at least what Mr Robin Leigh-Pemberton, the
governor of the Bank of England, was saying this week when he warned against
perceiving 'false dawns' in the fight against inflation. This warning is
presumably addressed as much to Downing Street as to the public.
Mr Leigh-Pemberton is right to warn. Any significant further cut in interest
rates would be unwise until there is clear evidence that average wage
settlements and the annual rate of underlying inflation are on a downward
path. With UK rates of increase in unit labour costs more than twice as high
as in most of continental Europe, further increases in unemployment are also
inevitable.
A sustained rise in consumer spending is unlikely while unemployment is
still rising, especially if it continues to rise particularly rapidly in the
south. The borrowing classes are likely to be too frightened.
Despite the chancellor's optimism, the UK economy remains in a deep
recession, while the prospects for anything better than a limp recovery this
year remain poor. The Conservative party may take heart from the fact that
its popular support has held up remarkably well. Perhaps the electorate
believes Mr Lamont's predictions. He must hope so. For by persuading a
nervous public that recovery is, indeed, around the corner, he may turn out
to be right after all.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-418</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Man in the News: Survivor out to settle an old score -
Franjo Tudjman
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JUDY DEMPSEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
It was known as the silent republic. For nearly two decades, Croatia nursed
its humiliation and injured pride after Tito crushed the Maspok, the
Croatian mass nationalist movement, in 1971.
The movement, backed by Croatia's Communist party and Matica Hravtska, the
nationalist cultural organisation, had tried to gain greater political and
cultural freedom for the republic from the federal/central authorities. But
Tito's tolerance level for nationalism which harboured the slightest hint of
autonomy was low.
He imprisoned scores of students, academics and journalists, and purged
Croatia's Communist party. The republic was closely controlled by the secret
police until last year, when each of Yugoslavia's six republics finally went
to the free ballot box. Franjo Tudjman's moment had come.
For the Croatian president, now 68, thrives on reawakening Croat
nationalism. It is an easy sentiment to tap.
In the neighbouring republic of Serbia, Mr Slobodan Milosevic, the staunch
nationalist Communist president, provided the perfect excuse for Croats to
revive thoughts about settling old scores with Serbia in their quest for
revenge and autonomy from the centre.
For Croats, the federal authorities are perceived to be dominated by Serbia,
a republic antithetical to Croat aspirations and outlook. Serbia is
communist, Orthodox by religion, Cyrillic in script, steeped in the Ottoman
tradition, and centralist. Croatia is Catholic, right-wing, uses the Latin
script and is influenced by the western tradition.
Croats also saw how Milosevic's uncompromising nationalist rhetoric directly
challenged their own quest for sovereignty. Who better to defend the Croats
from the Serbian leader's centralising goals than Tudjman? He has risen
magnificently to the occasion.
His election campaign in April 1990 was wrapped in the paraphernalia of
Croat nationalist symbols. The republic's citizens proudly draped the
once-banned chequered red-and-white flag on the city's 19th-century
buildings, which were modelled on Habsburg architecture.
The Croatian diaspora from Canada, the US, Australia, and the UK had finally
found a personality for its cause. It poured more than Dollars 4m into the
Croatian Democratic Union (CDU), Tudjman's right-wing Catholic party. For
emigres, and indigenous Croatians alike, Tudjman would make Croatia a proud,
free and independent republic.
But more circumspect Croats were worried by the overt, nationalist rhetoric
of Tudjman. Mr Drazen Colic, the editor of Danas, the republic's weekly
magazine, called him 'Croatia's le Pen', (a reference to France's demagogic
right-wing politician) because of his fiery denunciations of Serbs, who make
up 11 per cent of the republic's 4.6m population.
Tudjman, used to enduring criticism over the years, shrugged off attempts at
character assassination. He had waited a long time for the moment when
Croatia's Catholic bourgeoisie could find its voice.
Born in 1922, Tudjman joined Tito's communist Partisans during the second
world war. There seemed no going back for this fervent Marxist. Tito
rewarded him by putting him in charge of cadre policy in the Yugoslav
Peoples' Army. In 1961 he became the country's youngest general.
But a stint by Tudjman at the War History Institute in Zagreb, the capital
of Croatia, destroyed his ideological convictions and transformed him into
an ardent nationalist intent on setting Croatia's historical record
straight.
He set out to re-interpret what is the historical event which poisons
relations between Serbs and Croats: namely to suggest that the murder during
the second world war of tens of thousands of Serbs, Jews and gypsies by the
Ustasha, Croatia's Nazi-backed fascist government, was carried out by just a
handful of Croats; and that many Croats had been killed by the Cetniks, or
royalist Serbs.
Tito, a Croat, resented Tudjman's metamorphosis from Yugoslav ideologist to
Croat nationalist. He was sacked from the army in 1967, and imprisoned after
'Croatia's Spring' in 1971. His election as president last year revealed his
great capacity to survive. But his critics are beginning to think he might
be weakening.
If Tudjman is vulnerable, it is because - like Milosevic - his nationalist
constituency is becoming more radical and his authoritarian style of
governing is alienating liberals.
'Tudjman likes to control the political agenda - and this includes the
nationalist agenda as well,' explained a Croat academic who has worked
closely with the president.
'The problem is that he is obsessed with creating a cult of personality
which is embedded in nationalist rhetoric, symbolism and patronage at the
expense of tackling other issues. After a year in office, the CDU has done
nothing to reform the economy or, for that matter, the political
institutions in the republic,' he added. Tudjman's record in the economy has
undoubtedly disappointed the republic's reformers. Instead of introducing
property, ownership rights, and a privatisation programme, he has placed the
republic's five largest enterprises directly in the hands of the state.
'We have seen no signs of a programme aimed at decentralising the economy,'
explained an economist from Zagreb.
His supporters try to defend this poor record. 'Tudjman has had no time to
think about the economy because Serb nationalism will not allow him to focus
on other issues,' said an official from the republic's foreign ministry.
His aides are also quick to dismiss criticism that Tudjman has created his
own nomenklatura from the ranks of the party and nationalist opposition
which was quashed in 1971.
But what Croat liberal intellectuals are increasingly concerned about is
that Tudjman is losing control of the very constituency that catapulted him
into power.
'Croat nationalists are angry with this week's agreement by the presidency
to send in the army to disarm Croats and Serbs in our republic,' commented a
journalist from Zagreb.
'Tudjman does not seem to realise that nationalism has its own momentum.
Other political parties in Croatia will try and get on the nationalist
bandwagon and weaken the CDU. I don't think he will be able to control all
these Croatian hotheads who want independence tomorrow, and whose
nationalism is directed against decent, non-militant Serbs in the republic.'
If Tudjman panders to these elements, he will play into the hands of
Milosevic's nationalist supporters who want to believe that the Serb
minority is being persecuted in Croatia.
If Tudjman tries to temper the very constituency which created him, he will
be accused of betraying Croatia to pressure from Serbia. Milosevic is caught
in the same dilemma.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8 Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-419</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Scottish Conservative Party Conference: Major pledges Pounds
15m aid for Ravenscraig area
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON, Scottish Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN MAJOR last night delighted Scottish Tories with a rallying speech in
which he promised immediate financial aid for Lanarkshire, which is
suffering from the closure of two British Steel plants.
He also announced that the European Community summit in December 1992, when
Britain will hold the presidency, will be staged in Edinburgh.
Mr Major said the government is to spend an initial Pounds 15m to help
Lanarkshire, where British Steel recently closed the strip mill at its
Ravenscraig plant and the Clydesdale tube mill.
Scottish Enterprise, the new official economic development body, will spend
the money immediately on site clearance and environmental improvements to
'green over the worst areas of industrial dereliction', he said.
Mr Major said the Scottish Office would shortly receive a study of projects
for the long term revival of the area.
'We will take the necessary steps to help Lanarkshire become once again an
area that will be attractive to new investment and new jobs,' he said.
Referring to the choice of Edinburgh for the European council, or summit, he
said: 'I want Scotland to play a leading role in international affairs. I
want it to be in Edinburgh that Europe signals the final completion of the
single market.'
Mr Major spelt out his opposition to creating a devolved Scottish assembly
with the power to raise taxes, as is demanded by Labour and the Liberal
Democrats, but he did not rule out the idea of Scotland having an assembly
without tax raising powers.
'I know that there is sometimes a feeling, not just in Scotland but in Wales
and England too, that Westminster can be too remote. I believe that
government should be - must be - more receptive to the aspirations of people
throughout the United Kingdom,' he said.
The prime minister's speech rounded off a conference in which the Scottish
Conservatives' mood steadily improved, as they contemplated the approaching
general election and the rise in their standing in the Scottish opinion
polls since Mr Major replaced Mrs Margaret Thatcher.
The audience, which gave him an 8-minute standing ovation at the end of the
speech, appeared genuinely delighted with the new prime minister who, unlike
his predecessor on occasions, did not appear to patronise Scotland.
Mr Tom King, defence secretary, disappointed conference delegates by not
ruling out the closure of the Rosyth naval base in Fife, which employs 2,300
civilians and 1,000 naval personnel.
No decision had been taken to close Rosyth, he said, but the government had
to look at all the possibilities for making savings.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-420</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / High noon for R-R's high flyer: Sir Ralph Robins explains
his company's strategy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SIR Ralph Robins, the urbane chief executive of Rolls-Royce, yesterday
echoed the classic western line when he said that 'one has to do what one
has to do'.
It is high noon at Rolls-Royce. Hit like the rest of the defence and
aerospace industry by the decline in military spending and the recession in
air travel, the aero-engine maker this week announced plans to double its
job cuts this year to 6,000. It also warned it could be forced to make
compulsory redundancies for the first time since its bankruptcy 20 years
ago.
'I read that General Dynamics is laying off 30,000 people, and they are one
of the recent winners of the big US advan-ced tactical fighter contract,'
Sir Ralph said. 'If the winners are having to do that, what are the losers
going to do?'
Barely 18 months ago, Sir Ralph was brimming with confidence on the future
prospects of his company. Airlines were still ordering new aircraft and
engines in record numbers. The defence business was flat, but at least it
was not declining. After the bankruptcy of 1971, Rolls-Royce had
successfully expanded its family of aero-engines, increased its market share
in the civil-engine market to 20 per cent and built up a strong balance
sheet and healthy profits.
An engineer turned super-salesman, who has spent all his working life with
Rolls-Royce, Sir Ralph still appeared his old, confident self yesterday. 'We
can push ourselves in a very strong competitive position into the civil
business. We've started a five-year plan to improve efficiency. The latest
job cuts are an acceleration of that process,' he explained.
Job cuts are not new at Rolls-Royce, although enforced redundancies would
be. In the past 10 years the company has shed 26,000 jobs, or about one
third of its workforce. The newly-announced reductions not only reflect the
current difficulties of the market but are also part of a long consolidation
of the UK aero-engine and aerospace industry. 'We have sites all over the
country,' Sir Ralph said. 'We must reduce the number of sites. The same
thing is happening at British Aerospace. We are simply in too many places.'
The company plans to close its Leavesden, Hertfordshire, helicopter engine
factory by the end of next year and to concentrate Leavesden's activities at
its Bristol military engine plant. The Parkside industrial and marine engine
plant in Coventry will also be closed, with these activities regrouped at
the nearby Ansty factory. 'It's difficult to justify two sites in Coventry,'
Sir Ralph explained.
He insisted that the dramatic changes in both the defence and civil aircraft
markets had not altered the company's fundamental strategy. 'It is very
straightforward,' he explained. 'It is to become the leading supplier of
high-integrity power systems. That is our mission. It's a long term strategy
which simply doesn't happen overnight.'
But he conceded that this strategy made sense only as long as the company
was competitive. 'We are reacting to changed market forces,' Sir Ralph said.
'We are being more rigorous in the analysis and restructuring of all our
business processes. Our aim is to take out all non-value-added activities in
what we do. We started with our manufacturing processes three years ago. We
are now extending this approach to our business and management processes.'
As the smallest of the 'big three' aero-engine makers, Rolls-Royce has
always been regarded as more vulnerable to a downturn than its two larger US
rivals, General Electric and Pratt &amp; Whitney. Indeed, both US companies have
often said there is not room for three big manufacturers in the fiercely
competitive market.
'They would say that,' said Sir Ralph. 'Over the next 15 years we are
looking at a commercial jet market of some Pounds 120bn and even the
depressed military market is expected to provide about Pounds 100bn of
business. There's plenty of room for three companies.'
Sir Ralph acknowledged that, on the basis of output per man, the Americans
'are better than us'. But he emphasised it was very difficult to measure
productivity. 'How do you put the exchange rate in the formula? We were very
concerned when the pound was at Dollars 2 since 22 per cent of our turnover
is dollar-exposed.'
One way of reducing this exposure was to source more business in dollars.
'More capacity is currently available in the US because of the downturn. If
we find good suppliers , we will tend to use them. But we are not making a
drive to neutralise the dollar effect by sourcing in the US. What we are
seeking is the lowest net cost of supplies.'
Sir Ralph believed Rolls-Royce was closing the gap with GE and Pratt &amp;
Whitney. 'We took 20 per cent of the civil market last year. Pratt took 27
per cent and GE 25 per cent. This says we must be competitive.' But the US
companies are moving all the time, aggressively cutting costs. 'We can't
afford to be left behind,' Sir Ralph stressed.
Rolls-Royce is not worried by its relatively smaller size compared with the
two US companies. But Sir Ralph said he was still worried by the heavy
dependence of the group on the aero-engine business. To expand its business
base, Rolls-Royce acquired two years ago NEI, the power engineering company.
However, aero-engines still account for 60 per cent of turnover. 'I would be
more comfortable with a 50-50 split. A personal ambition is to get our
industrial group the same size as the aero-engine group.'
Sir Ralph also said Rolls-Royce planned to build up its new relationship
with BMW of Germany and this would include building a greenfield engine
plant in east Germany, probably in Berlin.
Rolls-Royce will continue to look for partnerships and joint-ventures with
other companies, but Sir Ralph could not see any chance of a broad alliance
with one of the two big US manufacturers, except on specific projects. He
had no regrets over the decision to break off seven years ago the
short-lived alliance with GE: 'If we had gone with GE, we would have been
squeezed out of the civil business.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6 Photograph Sir Ralph Robins, 'We must reduce the number of
sites' (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-421</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Teachers' jobs cut
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
TORY-controlled Warwickshire County Council is to cut 200 teachers' jobs,
blaming the losses on the 'vagaries' of government policies. The council has
been told to cut Pounds 6m from its planned Pounds 278m budget.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-422</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Chance of poll boost seen for Labour
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
LABOUR would sharply improve its chances of winning the coming general
election if it gave public backing to electoral reform, according to new
opinion poll findings.
The policy shift could lift Labour's support by 3 percentage points
nationally and provoke a 4.5 per cent swing in the Conservatives' southern
heartlands.
Detailed poll results, gathered by Mori for the Electoral Reform Society,
show that Labour would also pick up one in five Liberal Democrat votes.
The survey, conducted in April with 1,992 people, showed Labour turning a
deficit of 2 percentage points into a 1-point lead over the Tories if the
policy commitment was made.
Labour's new face, Page 8
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-423</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Fines over water workers' deaths
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THAMES WATER Authority and Davy Mining, a tunnelling company, were fined a
total of Pounds 30,000 yesterday after two workers died of lack of oxygen
during an inspection of the London Water Ring Main works at Stoke Newington.
Thames Water Authority and Davy, of Rotherham, South Yorks, admitted two
counts each of failing to ensure the safety of the men in 1988. Thames Water
Authority was fined Pounds 10,000 on each count and ordered to pay Pounds
4,200 costs. Davy Mining was fined Pounds 5,000 on each count with Pounds
2,078 costs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-424</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Trial for Channel tunnel companies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FIVE member companies of TML, the Channel tunnel consortium, were committed
for trial yesterday charged with failing to ensure the safety of employees.
Balfour Beatty Construction, Costain Civil Engineering, Tarmac Construction,
Taylor Woodrow Construction and Wimpey Major Projects are accused by the
Health and Safety Executive that between December 12 1989 and January 10
1990 they failed to ensure the safety of employees concerning the movement
of trains.
The charge follows the death in January last year of Mr Keith Lynch, who was
hit underground by wagons pushed by a locomotive at the Shakespeare Cliff
site near Dover.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-425</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Govan shipyard workers start strike
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
WORKERS at the Norwegian-owned Kvaerner Govan shipyard in Glasgow yesterday
began an indefinite strike against a pay and conditions offer which their
union leaders had advised them to accept.
Industrial workers at the yard, which employs 2,200 people, recently
rejected by 932 votes to 647 a 21-month offer which involved changes in
shift patterns and improvements in productivity.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-426</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Greenpeace reports submarine problems
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ROYAL NAVY is having difficulty maintaining continuous patrols by
submarines that provide the UK's Polaris nuclear deterrent, according to
Greenpeace, the environmental pressure group.
Greenpeace said one of the four submarines has had to double the normal
eight-week length of its patrols and has been on patrol for 10 of the last
16 months. Another, HMS Revenge, has been in service for a record 8 1/2
years since its last refit.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-427</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / RAF will scrap three squadrons in Germany
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THREE squadrons of frontline RAF jets based in Germany are to be scrapped
and a further squadron redeployed to Britain, the Ministry of Defence
announced yesterday.
The decision will reduce the number of operational strike Tornado GR1s by
about 36. All four squadrons are based at RAF Laarbruch.
The cuts come on top of government plans under the defence review, Options
for Change, to close two of the four RAF bases in Germany. Options for
Change also proposed reducing the number of Tornado GR1 squadrons with
nuclear and conventional roles in Europe from 11 to six.
The ministry said the cuts would pave the way for re-deployment to RAF
Laarbruch of Harrier jets and support helicopter units now based at RAF
Gutersloh.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-428</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / High Court overruled on Bank demand
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND HUGHES, Law Courts Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A BANK OF England notice requiring production of documents overrides a High
Court injunction that the documents must not be disclosed, a High Court
judge ruled yesterday.
Mr Justice Hirst said the documents were relevant to an investigation by the
US Federal Reserve Board and he described as 'unreal in the banking world of
the 1990s' a suggestion that it was not part of the Bank of England's
function to act as an information-collecting agency for a foreign regulatory
authority.
'In the world of international banking today supervisory authorities can,
should, and no doubt do, regularly co-operate on matters of mutual
supervisory concern,' he said. There was clear evidence, he said, that the
Bank required the documents for its own supervisory functions.
The judge's ruling was in a case in which the plaintiffs were referred to as
'A and others', and the defendant, an institution authorised under the
Banking Act, as 'B bank'.
He said a New York grand jury had issued a subpoena requiring 'B' to produce
documents relating to the accounts of 'A and others'. Last August the
plaintiffs obtained a High Court injunction restraining 'B' from complying
with the subpoena or disclosing the documents to any third party.
On April 26 the Bank of England served a notice under section 39 of the
Banking Act requiring 'B' to produce documents covered by the injunction.
The Bank of England said it required the documents, which related to the
acquisition of three US banks by a US bank holding company, for the
performance of its supervisory function.
The plaintiffs and 'B' opposed the Bank of England's contention on the basis
that its notice overrode the injunction. The plaintiffs also contended that
the notice had not been issued for the purpose of the Bank of England's
supervisory function but to enable the Federal Reserve Board to pursue its
own inquiries.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-429</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Scottish Conservative Party Conference: Leaders step up
pressure on Saddam
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN MAJOR yesterday stepped up the pressure on President Saddam Hussein
of Iraq with a threat to veto any lifting of United Nations sanctions as
long as the present regime held power in Iraq.
His announcement, at the conference in Perth, was designed to emphasise that
Britain is not prepared to see President Saddam re-admitted to the
international community even if Iraq complies fully with the UN ceasefire
agreement.
Mr Major also reaffirmed his determination to secure agreement at the UN by
the end of this year on an international arms register, which would require
every country to spell out what arms they sold, to whom they were sold and
in what quantity.
His warning to Iraq came as Mr Douglas Hurd, the foreign secretary, warned
that Britain's relations with Iran will remain difficult as long as British
hostages are held in Lebanon.
Mr Hurd insisted that the government was determined to push ahead with its
plan for a UN police force to protect Kurdish refugees in northern Iraq.
His decision to focus on the plight of the three British hostages still held
in Lebanon - Mr Terry Waite, Mr John McCarthy and Mr Jack Mann - reflected
his concern to emphasise that the Foreign Office had not given up hope of
securing their release.
The foreign secretary said he was also demanding the release by Baghdad of
two Britons held in Iraqi jails.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-430</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Carsberg signals competition for local telecoms
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL ABRAHAMS and HUGO DIXON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A SWITCH towards promoting competition in local telecommunications was
signalled yesterday by Sir Bryan Carsberg, director-general of Oftel, the
industry watchdog. Previous government policy favoured competition in the
long-distance market.
The change in policy was announced as Sir Bryan defended his controversial
proposals to introduce access charges for competitors using BT lines.
The strength of opposition to the introduction of access charges has forced
him to delay completing the details until next month. 'Changes can still be
made if the need is established,' said Sir Bryan.
Sir Bryan denied allegations that the introduction of access charges was
linked to political pressure from the government in the run-up to its
planned sale of more shares in BT.
'Not once has the secretary of state raised the issue of flotation with me,'
he said. 'The decisions made have resulted from the financial analysis I
have made. Selling shares has had nothing to do with it.'
The controversy comes only two months after the publication of the white
paper on telecommunications policy. This proposed the abolition of the
duopoly of BT and Mercury Communications.
BT's rivals have criticised the access charge proposals, saying they would
pay so much to BT that they would not be able to compete.
But Sir Bryan argued that access charges - which compensate BT for its
obligation to operate uneconomical telephone lines - would encourage
Mercury, cable television companies and other groups to build local
networks. He said they would only pay BT if they used BT's lines.
'At present, most competition is in the high-volume, long-distance market,
rather than in the local arena,' said Sir Bryan. 'Over the last few years,
we have been assisting a particular type of entry - the long distance
business of Mercury's. This will help even up the balance in the local
loop.'
Sir Bryan said if new competitors did not pay a fair share of BT's costs,
this would encourage inefficient competition and costs might rise.
He emphasised that the access charge arrangements would be reviewed next
year when BT's main pricing regime is due to be re-examined.
Lex, Page 24
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-431</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Rifkind acts on truck speeds
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD TOMKINS, Transport Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OLD TRUCKS as well as new ones will be fitted with devices limiting their
speed to the 60mph legal maximum, Mr Malcolm Rifkind, transport secretary,
told the Scottish Conservative party conference in Perth yesterday.
The Department of Transport said retrospective fitting of the devices would
be confined to articulated trucks up to four years old - less than 12 per
cent of the UK heavy goods vehicle fleet.
Yesterday's move follows the announcement in February that all new trucks
were to be fitted with devices to stop them exceeding the 60mph limit on
heavy goods vehicles.
Mr Rifkind said he was extending the requirement because he wanted speed
limiters fitted to a greater proportion of the truck fleet.
Mr Rifkind said many truck drivers were causing danger by flouting speed
limits. Speed limiters would also cut fuel consumption and carbon dioxide
emissions.
Retrospective fitting has been targeted at articulated vehicles because they
are the heaviest and fastest trucks.
The Freight Transport Association criticised the measure. It said most
accidents were caused by error or irresponsible behaviour, not by speeding,
and the Pounds 500 cost of the devices would be incurred without
compensating benefits.
The Department of Transport estimated that the measure would save 26 deaths
and 400 injuries a year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-432</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Threat increases of Post Office strike
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DIANE SUMMERS, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE THREAT of Post Offices throughout the UK being hit by industrial action
increased yesterday as the Union of Communication Workers said there were
early signs from a ballot that its members had voted for strike action over
pay.
The ballot of 14,500 Post Office counter and clerical employees followed
rejection by UCW negotiators of a 6.8 per cent pay offer.
A strong vote in favour of action would strengthen the union's hand in
further talks with management.
Mr Alan Tuffin, UCW general secretary, said: 'The im-proved finances and
productivity of the Post Office Counters business allows them to make a much
better offer than that.'
Voting on industrial action does not finish until today, and the full ballot
result is not due to be announced until the start of the union's annual
conference in Blackpool tomorrow. However, the UCW said early reports from
branches indicated a 'substantial 'yes' vote' from members.
Separately, the union claimed it had achieved a victory in the High Court by
getting an injunction lifted in a dispute in Liverpool involving postal
engineers. Individual UCW members had refused to cross National
Communications Union picket lines and Royal Mail management claimed the UCW
had taken industrial action without holding a ballot.
The UCW claimed throughout that it had taken no part in stopping members of
the union attending work and now says it wants to see the issue dealt with
fully in open court.
The dispute itself, which arose after the dismissal of two engineers
employed by Royal Mail Engineering and Construction, who went home early
after completing a job, has been concluded with both sides agreeing to abide
by the decision of an industrial tribunal.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-433</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / A fight for power in the generation game: The row over rules
governing companies producing their own electricity
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JULIET SYCHRAVA
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A GARDENER who sold a few extra tomatoes to his local shop would be upset if
the government set up an Office of Tomato Regulation which compelled him to
register as a tomato producer, sell all his tomatoes to a central Tomato
Pool, and buy back at a higher price any he wanted to eat.
It sounds absurd. But, according to Mr David Green, director of the Combined
Heat and Power Association, electricity generators might face just this
situation by January.
Mr Green's fears relate to the long dispute over the rules governing
industrial companies which generate their own electricity on site.
If some lobbyists, notably the 12 regional electricity companies in England
and Wales, have their way, a chemical plant generating its own power and
selling its surplus could be forced to sell all its electricity to the pool,
or spot market. It would have to buy its own needs back at a higher price
even though the electricity would never leave the site.
The lobbyists argue that such sites receive all the benefits of being
connected to the national grid, such as back-up if their own generators
fail. These benefits are paid for by other electricity buyers, when they buy
electricity from the pool, through 'uplift'. That is a margin on top of what
is received by generators selling into the pool.
The lobbyists say that industrialists wishing to sell their surplus should
also pay uplift by putting all their power through the pool. Otherwise, they
will ride on the backs of small consumers who ultimately pay for uplift
through their electricity bills. The electricity industry representatives on
the Pool Executive Committee (PEC), which runs the pool, must decide on a
rule for on-site generators by July. If they cannot, the decision will pass
to Mr John Wakeham, energy secretary.
'You can disconnect from the system,' says the representative of one
regional company. 'But don't expect to stay connected and not pay.' He
points out, however, that if everyone disconnected 'there would be a smaller
number of people supporting the grid system, which could ultimately fall
apart'.
Mr Green replies that 'the regional companies want to discourage people from
on-site generation because they lose out; they lose their wires business'.
It is certainly true that on-site generation was one of the regional
companies' anxieties at the time of privatisation.
Industrialists considering on-site generation may admit that they should pay
something for access to the grid - a flat charge is one possibility being
discussed at the PEC. But their grievance runs deeper than the question of
'uplift'.
Any company that generates power now for its own consumption, but buys or
sells more than 10MW from the grid, counts as a generator under the new
electricity regulations. It has to belong to the pool, and that does not
just mean paying pool fees.
'We don't want a generation licence, and we don't want to be a generator -
we don't want to be pool members,' says Mr Alan Belk, general energy systems
manager at Air Products, which supplies on-site oxygen and other gases to
companies such as British Steel. It would like to provide electricity, too,
as part of an integrated process. But it would then count as a generator.
It is not just a matter of costs, which could be around Pounds 1m extra on
the Pounds 80m combined-heat-and-power (CHP) generator Air Products wants to
build on-site at British Steel - a highly efficient system that would cut
on-site energy costs considerably. If it generated enough electricity to
count as a national generator 'we could be called on by the grid to stop
generating if the national system was overloaded,' Mr Belk says. 'Or we
could be called on to supply the grid.' Clearly, British Steel would be
unhappy with on-site power with those risks attached.
British Steel has produced a strongly worded submission to the PEC on the
subject. It argues that regulations should not place at a disadvantage
industrial users, who already bear the second-highest electrical energy
costs in Europe.
It seems unlikely that the regional electricity companies will win the
debate over 'uplift', especially as Offer, the electricity watchdog, seems
inclined to believe that their interpretation of the regulation is
far-fetched, and is proposing a compromise fee for on-site generators.
Even if the question of the fee is settled, other more vexing issues remain
for companies such as Air Products.
The CHP system Mr Belk plans could double generating efficiency at the
British Steel site. In the Netherlands, where Air Products has a CHP scheme
on a Rotterdam refinery site, it attracts a 25 per cent capital grant from
the Dutch government.
The UK government has also recognised CHP's environmental and energy
efficiency benefits, and is committed to promoting its development at 120
identified industrial sites.
But if on-site generators are forced to pay high charges and run high risks
for their connection to the grid, the incentives for building such systems
will be seriously diminished.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5 Photograph Looking for agreement, John Wakeham will step in if
the industry cannot decide by July (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-434</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / DTI to appeal against ruling on bus mergers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT RICE, Legal Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GOVERNMENT is to appeal against a recent High Court ruling in a
Sheffield bus merger case.
At the end of March, the court overturned a recommendation by the Monopolies
and Mergers Commission that a Sheffield bus operator should be forced to
sell four rival companies it had bought in 1989. The ruling was a setback to
government attempts to slow the pace of takeover activity among bus
companies.
The commission concluded in a report last year on the acquisitions by South
Yorkshire Transport of Sheffield and District Transport, Sheafline (PSV),
Michael Groves and SUT that each merger might be expected to operate against
the public interest.
The appeal has been lodged by the Department of Trade and Industry and the
commission. The government is concerned that the 1986 de-regulation of bus
services outside London has failed to produce the amount of competition
expected.
Unless the court decision is overturned on appeal it will be very difficult
for the government to refer local bus mergers to the commission for
investigation without a change to the 1973 Fair Trading Act.
The court ruled that the area of operation looked at by the commission when
considering the four acquisitions was not 'a substantial part of the UK'
within the meaning of the market-share test set out in the 1973 act.
Until the case is resolved, the only effective way for the government to
challenge local bus mergers is to ask the commission to carry out a monopoly
investigation of bus services in a particular part of the UK.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-435</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Waldegrave accuses BMA of Labour alliance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMMA TUCKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR William Waldegrave, health secretary, yesterday accused the British
Medical Association of joining an 'unholy alliance with Labour' in opposing
government reforms of the National Health Service.
'It is a matter for great regret that the BMA has chosen this moment to
jettison the more responsible approach it had adopted recently and jump on
the political bandwagon,' Mr Waldegrave told Bridgwater Conservative
Association. He said the NHS was too important to be a political football
'either kicked by the Labour party or by the BMA'.
Mr Robin Cook, Labour's health spokesman, called on the government to
explain alleged 'queue-jumping' for non-urgent operations by patients of
fund-holding GPs. He said a promise by Mr John Major, the prime minister,
that all patients would be treated on the basis of clinical priority had
been broken by Mr Waldegrave.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-436</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / SIB wins Pounds 3.6m judgment in investment case
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND HUGHES, Law Courts Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Securities and Investments Board has obtained a Pounds 3.6m judgment
against a man it alleged was the 'moving spirit' behind a scheme which
resulted in UK investors losing Pounds 3m. The money had been put into
Hamilton House Associates, a Birkenhead-based investment business.
The High Court granted SIB an indefinite extension of an order freezing the
assets of Mr Neil Bradshaw, who was said to have fled to the US.
Mr Craig Orr, for SIB, told Mr Justice Mummery that the new order was needed
to help SIB enforce the Pounds 3.6m judgment, which included interest on the
lost funds. He said none of the money, which had been transferred to the US,
had been repaid.
Fimbra ordered Hamilton House Associates to stop trading in February last
year. About 300 investors had invested in what were marketed as fully
secured and guaranteed bonds.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-437</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / PowerGen may halve order from British Coal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JULIET SYCHRAVA
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
POWERGEN, the electricity generator, is expected to cut its order from
British Coal from 26m tonnes of coal to between 10m tonnes and 15m tonnes.
National Power, the other generator, also wants to cut orders in the current
round of negotiations with British Coal.
One of the generators also said it expected British Coal to cut its prices
to match cheaper imports. Meanwhile Mr Neil Clarke, British Coal chairman,
insisted at yesterday's annual British Association of Colliery Management
conference that the price struck with the generators should reflect 'the
true value of a large, reliable and consistent supplier'.
The generator added that if British Coal was prepared to cut volumes
substantially, it might secure a better price.
The value of UK coal varied, the generator added. Coal supplied inland was
more valuable than coal supplied on the coast, where imports were more
competitive. At least one of the generators may use the difference in value
to try to negotiate a range of contracts at different prices - in spite of
resistance from British Coal.
Talks between British Coal and the generators have begun informally. The
existing contracts expire in March 1993 but British Coal will want advance
warning if the new contracts are for much smaller volumes.
British Coal has suggested that the generators were unwilling to hold formal
negotiations before the end of the year. British Coal said that would give
it a tough year.
The two generators said yesterday they were willing to talk. 'We are already
talking to coal producers overseas, and are happy to talk to British Coal
when they want to,' said one generator.
Britain's coal industry must improve its productivity to compete with
competitors in countries in which productivity was often four times higher,
Mr David Heathcoat-Amory, energy minister, said at the British Association
for Colliery Management's conference.
Mr John Northard, British Coal's deputy chairman, said at the conference
that productivity in British Coal had increased by almost 9 per cent in the
year to March 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-438</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / International Disaster Relief: Civil war and nightmare
logistics plague valiant relief effort - The Horn of Africa has proved a
graveyard for some of the world's best and brightest aid workers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JULIAN OZANNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NO AREA in the world is as inhospitable to relief efforts or as difficult to
operate in as the Horn of Africa.
Some of the most valiant efforts ever undertaken to reach starving people
have had to face impossible odds in Sudan, Ethiopia and Somalia, countries
wracked by civil war, and crippled by weak to non-existent infrastructure.
Lengthy negotiations with rebels and governments - who frequently use food
aid as a political weapon - together with debilitated economies, decrepit
transport systems and red tape, have often frustrated attempts to bring food
to millions of starving people in the Horn and elsewhere in Africa.
Inexperienced aid personnel, poor information about conditions on the ground
 -particularly in the battle zones of countries afflicted by civil war - and
inappropriate, unco-ordinated donations by the scores of aid agencies
responding to Africa's disasters, have compounded the problem.
Laxatives and anti-indigestion remedies, for example, have on occasions been
included among famine supplies. And according to one author, those starving
in sweltering Somalia in the 1987 famine were given frost bite medicine
shipped from Minnesota, electric blankets and consignments of Go-Slim soup,
and chocolate-flavoured diet drinks.
At the same time, requests for more practical help sometimes go unmet.
Recently Somali rebels in the country's northern Hargeisa region received an
unsympathetic response from donors to appeals for barbed wire to fence off
mined areas, and donkeys and carts to remove refuse and distribute water.
'Most aid workers laugh at that and ask what kind of a stupid request is
that. They say 'We don't supply barbed wire, we supply food and blankets,''
said Mr Bob Koepp of the Nairobi office of the Lutheran World Federation,
which operates an aid programme for the region.
'But it is the little things, the grass roots things that are really
important. You can bring in all the food you want, but it is the small
things that people want that count.'
Nevertheless, many lessons were learnt during the famine-stricken decade of
the 1980s.
Most of the food now donated is through the United Nations World Food
Programme, which tries to ensure the quality and arrange transport.
Distribution, however, can be a nightmare.
Nothing illustrates this better than the the case of southern Sudan where in
1988, half a million people starved to death.
Civil war has raged in the south since 1983. Communications networks have
been destroyed. Roads are almost non-existent. Some are passable between
January and April, but soon get washed away with the onset of rains in
April.
Both rebels and government have used 'security' considerations to delay food
deliveries to the other side, and even attacked relief operations.
The result has been the effective crippling of vital supply routes, such as
the railway between Murglad and Aweil, in south-east Sudan. In 1989 only
four trains moved down the single-line track distributing food for civilians
in both government- and rebel-held areas. The first train, carrying 1,500
tons of food, was stopped by gunmen from an Arab militia, who robbed UN
staff personnel and threatened to execute them.
The second train was looted by hungry people.
No train has moved on the line in the last 18 months. Efforts to get it
going again have proved impossible. The government claims the tracks have
been removed in three areas and the surrounding areas mined.
Barges which used to ply the Nile river have been prevented from being used
because of government objections.
In Mozambique, where nearly 2m people are at risk of starvation, transport
problems are equally daunting.
Oxfam, the British charity, said this week that half the government's lorry
fleet was out of order and urged donors to support the government's
logistics operations.
In Ethiopia a critical shortage of fuel last month almost brought relief
operations to a standstill.
Here the World Food Programme is trying to reach up to 5.5m people, 1m of
them in the arid and almost inaccessible Ogaden and Harege region.
Ironically, the recent rains have made the situation worse - a recent
journey of 90 kilometres took 10 days.
Civil wars make a difficult situation well-nigh impossible, and often both
sides are to blame.
In northern Sudan, for example, one logistical problem, according to an aid
official, was the government itself, which commandeered private transporters
carring relief supplies, and forced them to go back to Port Sudan, unload
and then re-load government goods.
In southern Sudan, stronghold of the Sudan Peoples Liberation Army (SPLA),
the rebels are persisting in their refusal of permission for the UN to
establish a safe-passage road corridor into Juba, the besieged southern
capital, or to send in an assessment team to the southern town of Yei, where
help is urgently needed.
In Somalia, conditions are as bad, if not worse. Almost every aid agency has
had its trucks, offices and warehouses destroyed and looted. Continuing
insecurity and gunfire in the capital has prevented many aid agencies,
including the United Nations, from returning to the country.
Some aid workers in Somalia believe these concerns have been exaggerated.
'If people say it is too difficult to operate in Somalia it means they
haven't looked at the situation carefully,' said Mr Stewart Elms of the aid
agency SOS International, which has operated in Mogadishu throughout the
civil war. Government bureaucracy can also be a formidable obstacle.
This year, aid workers in northern Sudan, where 7.7m people are at risk,
faced lengthy delays over permits to travel into the interior, or to clear
goods through customs.
Constant turnover of aid personnel, and the conditions of life in the
capitals of the Horn of Africa, also compounds the problem.
'The Horn of Africa, and particularly Sudan, is so difficult to work in that
it has become the graveyard of some of the best and brightest aid workers in
the world,' said Mr Abdul Mohamed, a specialist in relief operations in the
Horn.
Yet at the end of this tale of woe, the most remarkable thing is the fact
that most of the aid eventually gets through.
The role of non-governmental organisations (NGOs) is fundamental to famine
relief operations in Africa: 'NGOs can fill the gaps until the big boys,
such as the UN agencies, come in,' says one aid worker. 'The problems may be
enormous, but they have to be tackled, and we can operate more efficiently
without the bureaucratic delays or the political complications.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3 Photograph (Omitted). Photograph (Omitted). Photograph Waiting
for a lifeline, refugees in Ethiopia (left), Bangladesh (centre) and Turkey
struggle to maintain a ray of hope (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-439</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / International Disaster Relief: Remoteness hinders Kurdish
and Bangladeshi operations
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MURRAY BROWN and KK SHARMA
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ANKARA, NEW DELHI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
OVERCOMING 'aid fatigue' in donor countries may be a demanding task for
western charity officials but an even greater challenge is ensuring the
urgent delivery of life-saving supplies under atrocious working conditions
to remote areas.
The experiences of aid workers in northern Iraq and Bangladesh illustrate
the range of immense problems faced, including, in the case of the Kurds,
the political sensitivities of the Turkish government.
From the start, the international relief effort in Iraq was hampered by
Ankara's insistence on keeping the Kurds close to the border. The sites in
the remote south east corner of Turkey where some 400,000 Iraqi refugees
fled in early April were often inaccessible by road and suffered from water
shortages as well as severe night temperatures.
Within a week wood around the camp sites had been stripped. In early April,
the death count was rising. Children were dying of gastroenteritis, the old
from hypothermia. 'This is the worst mission I think we've ever had,' said
Patrick Baudry logistics expert with Medecins sans Frontieres (MSF), the
French agency.
Notwithstanding the international publicity given to the Kurds' plight, the
relief operation is underfunded. Before the crisis, donors were asked for
Dollars 175m (Pounds 103.5m) for all UN agencies. 'We got Dollars 38m.' says
Dr Claudio Sepulveda, of the UN Children's Fund.
Fortunately the relief operation has been able to call on massive air
support. At the height of the crisis, officials at Incirlik, the joint US
Turkish base 300 miles from the Iraqi border, said a C-130 was leaving every
30 minutes. To date the US has made more than 3,000 helicopter relief drops.
The Bangladeshi cyclone disaster area is equally inaccessible but there has
been no comparable level of air support. This problem has been compounded by
the slowness of Dhaka to react to the crisis.
It took about three days for the authorities to appreciate the magnitude of
the disaster and relief arrangements were seriously delayed. With a new,
inexperienced government under Prime Minister Mrs Khaleda Zia - she has been
in power just 45 days - and a notoriously inefficient bureaucracy, further
delays occurred as the authorities debated what needed to be done.
It took five days before it was decided that the government should start
sending 'dry' food and bottled drinking water. Then the government realised
it had only six serviceable helicopters to drop the supplies.
This meant that only an insignificant percentage of the 10m survivors could
get relief supplies and even that belatedly.
A full week after the disaster the civilian government realised it could not
cope and the relief operations were handed over to the army, which has ruled
Bangladesh for most of its 20-year history.
Work was also been hampered by lack of co-ordination among the various
agencies involved.
The aid issue has also been politicised. Leaders are busy making capital
from what they call the 'failure' of the government to handle the situation,
deflecting attention from the relief work.
Meanwhile outside aid has been slow to arrive. The total in the first few
days came to roughly Dollars 20m or about Dollars 2 for each victim.
Total aid committed has now reached Dollars 450m, and more is being pledged
but little of this has yet reached Bangladesh. What the country needed was
immediate help on a gigantic scale for a disaster in which half a million
are thought to have died and 10m to have been made homeless.
The food and medicine urgently needed is also taking a long time to arrive.
Even then Bangladesh lacks the infrastructure and the capacity to deliver
the aid to the victims. Skilled teams need to be flown in on a large scale
to help the local authorities. These are nowhere in evidence.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-440</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Talks on Hong Kong airport to resume
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN ELLIOTT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TALKS between Britain and China on Hong Kong's proposed HKDollars 100bn
(Pounds 7.5bn) international airport are to resume in Peking next Saturday
nearly a month after a deadlock over the degree of control China should have
over the project.
No new initiative has emerged for the talks, and British officials say the
UK and Hong Kong governments are not prepared to change their basic offer of
consultation.
They hope China will be prepared to soften its demand for a virtual right of
veto, which the UK rejects. This would open the way for talks on details of
consultation and project financing.
China has been criticising the size and cost of the project for about a
year. It has also been demanding a big say over the planning and execution
in the run-up to 1997, when it regains sovereignty over Hong Kong.
Mr Douglas Hurd, British foreign secretary, warned at the start of last
month's talks that the project might be shelved if the political price of
the control being demanded by China was too great. That possibility will be
considered if next week's talks do not succeed, although at that stage Hong
Kong's private sector might propose an alternative.
Although China has not indicated any definite willingness to compromise,
British diplomats say there have been some signs that it wants to clear the
way for the airport to go ahead. It could then have separate discussions on
its demands for increased consultation, verging on control, over a wide
range of government issues in the run up to 1997.
Britain said last night the talks would end after five days on May 22. This
has been arranged to fit in with other commitments of Mr Andrew Burns, a
senior diplomat from London who will lead the British team. But it serves
the dual purpose of demonstrating that the UK is not prepared for extended
talks if China refuses to compromise.
Hong Kong legislators warned last night that they were not prepared to
sanction finance for the construction of new accommodation for Vietnamese
boat-people. The warning, made by the security committee of the executive
and legislative councils, reflects concern about a sharp increase in the
number of Vietnamese arriving in the colony.
Mr Kwan Cheong Yiu, a 58-year-old broker who runs Golden Harvest Stock
Investment, was yesterday elected senior vice chairman of the Hong Kong
Stock Exchange council. He succeeds Mr Philip Wong, who resigned this week
after a row with the government and the Securities and Futures Commission
involving stock exchange reforms.
Mr Kwan now becomes a front runner to succeed Sir QW Li, chairman, who is to
retire in October.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-441</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Martens on move to the heart of Europe: The Belgian PM's
plan to change constituencies
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IF you're the European Community's longest-serving premier, it's a little
bit undignified to be accused of running scared.
Nobody would have dared level such a charge at Margaret ('I fight, I fight
on to win') Thatcher; as an interview revealed this week, Britain's
ex-leader comforts herself with the knowledge that she was 'never defeated
by the people'.
But Belgium's premier, Mr Wilfried Martens - Mrs Thatcher's successor as the
EC's longest-serving PM - suffered the ignominy of coming second in his
constituency at the last election. In the UK he might have been denied an
eighth term; under Belgium's electoral system he retained his seat.
Political opponents and commentators say fear of defeat was the real reason
why Mr Martens announced yesterday that he would switch constituencies for
the next election, due on January 19 1992. He will head the candidate list
for the Flemish Christian Democrats (CVP) in Brussels, ending 17 years as
member for Ghent in the Belgian chamber of representatives.
'These insinuations show that some politicians will do everything in their
power to dissuade me from my task and to put my decision in the wrong
light,' griped Mr Martens, announcing his candidature for Brussels' elected
upper chamber, the Senate.
Mr Martens wants another four-year term so he can complete the third phase
of Belgian constitutional reform. However, as a committed Europhile, his
'deeper motivation' is that he wants to spearhead efforts to bring all the
EC institutions to Brussels, most notably the European Parliament, which
Strasbourg and the Belgian capital are squabbling over.
Hence his choice of constituency, and his decision not to be tempted into
the race for next president of the European Commission. 'If we don't win
this fight over the site of the Parliament then it goes without saying that
the other political institutions (the Commission and the Council of
Ministers) will leave Brussels,' he warned yesterday.
This clearly cuts no ice with Mr Guy Verhofstadt, the young leader of the
Flemish Liberals, who pipped Mr Martens to the post in Ghent four years ago.
'Le wonder boy' told Flemish television this week that he considered these
were 'phoney arguments' aimed at veiling Mr Martens' retreat from Ghent's
Flemish electorate.
In fact, by standing in Brussels, Mr Martens should increase CVP support in
the bilingual, bicultural capital. But an interesting campaign is still in
prospect.
The constituency chosen is equally divided between Flemings and
French-speaking Walloons, and although Brussels natives seem indifferent to
the festering issue of where the European Parliament should sit, there is
nothing they enjoy more than a nice helping of Fleming-Walloon friction.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-442</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Rise in US wholesale prices
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A MODERATE increase in wholesale prices in April, disclosed by the US
government yesterday, helped reduce fears that recent monetary easing by the
Federal Reserve would undermine the inflation outlook.
The producer price index for finished goods rose 0.2 per cent last month,
taking the annual rate of wholesale price inflation to 3.2 per cent. The
increase followed four successive monthly declines in producer prices -
declines, however, that were driven principally by sharply falling energy
prices.
The improving inflation trend was most noticeable in the widely watched
'core' producer price index, which excludes the volatile food and energy
components.
Core producer prices rose 0.2 per cent in April, taking the underlying
annual rate of wholesale price inflation to 3.7 per cent.
This was the second small monthly rise in core prices, a sharp improvement
on monthly increases of about 0.5 per cent at the start of the year.
Prices for crude industrial inputs and goods at an intermediate stage of
production - forward indicators of prices for finished goods - both declined
last month, having fallen most months since recession began to bite hard
last November. The annual rate of inflation for crude and intermediate goods
is running at minus 1.7 per cent and 1.1 per cent respectively.
The latest Blue Chip consensus forecast is for consumer price inflation of
4.5 per cent this year, a full point lower than last year. Inflation is
forecast to fall to 3.9 per cent next year, giving the Fed more scope to
pursue expansionary policies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-443</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Mexican inflation rate falls
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MEXICO CITY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Mexico's monthly inflation rate fell for the fourth consecutive month in
April to reach 1 per cent, the lowest figure since September 1989, writes
Damian Fraser in Mexico City.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-444</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Three-year Oslo growth plan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Norway's minority Labour government unveiled yesterday a three year NKr10bn
(Pounds 870m) infrastructure plan to revive economic growth in the country's
mainland private industries as part of its revised budget, Robert Taylor
writes from Stockholm. Higher priority is to be given to the creation of
jobs, improved social benefits for children and young people, and
cost-effective measures to clean up the environment.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-445</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Consortium wins Spanish rail deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TOM BURNS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MADRID
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
An international consortium formed by Anglo-French engineering group
GEC-Alsthom, Germany's Asea Brown-Boveri, Mitsubishi of Japan and the
Spanish rolling stock maker CAF has won a Pta33.9bn (Pounds 185.24m)
contract to deliver 70 commuter train units in 10 months to Renfe, the
Spanish national railways, Tom Burns writes from Madrid.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-446</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Menem reopens corruption probe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BARHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUENOS AIRES
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Argentina's President Carlos Menem, under fire again for corruption in his
government, has ordered the reopening of investigations into the first of a
series of corruption scandals that have rocked his government all year,
writes John Barham in Buenos Aires. Inquiries were halted last week for
'lack of evidence'.
Mr Menem ordered an independent watchdog agency to reopen the case of
Swift-Armour SA, an American-owned meatpacker. In January, the press
published a letter from the American embassy protesting that an unnamed
official had asked Swift for a bribe.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-447</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / US plans increased access to phone lines
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Federal Communications Commission (FCC) has taken a big step towards
stimulating competition in the monopolistic local telephone system with a
proposal which would force service providers to allow rivals to plug into
their networks, writes Martin Dickson in New York.
The FCC, which oversees the US telecommunications industry, would like to
see the plan adopted within the next year.
It would primarily benefit independent telephone companies which have sprung
up in cities and which use new fibre optic lines to link businesses and
long-distance telephone carriers.
The independents allow customers to connect to long distance networks much
more cheaply that the local monopolies, which rely on long distance charges
for much of their revenues.
The plan will initially cover private, or 'special access" lines used by
companies to connect their own buildings.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-448</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Soldier dies following attack in Armenia
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A Soviet officer confronts an Armenian woman during an argument in the
Armenian town of Artzvashan, surrounded by tanks as residents handed over
their weapons. Armenian militants attacked interior ministry troops in
Azerbaijan with machine guns and grenades yesterday, killing one soldier and
wounding eight, the Azerbaijani press agency Assa-Irada said. It said the
attack took place at dawn on a road between the villages of Kehne Gishlak
and Tatli in Akstafa province, 1 1/2 miles from the Armenian border.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2 Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-449</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Brazil in interest backlog accord
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN FIDLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Brazil should be able to finalise within a few days an accord with its
leading commercial banks on the settlement of an Dollars 8bn interest
backlog, according to Mr William Rhodes, the senior Citicorp executive who
leads bank negotiations with the country, Stephen Fidler writes. If this
happens, negotiations on its medium- and long-term bank debt could begin
next month, he told a conference in London. The agreement on interest
arrears will need ratification of Brazil's senate and 95 per cent of
creditor banks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-450</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Moreira gives stability pledge: Brazil's economy minister
installed amid chaos
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINA LAMB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Marcilio Marques Moreira, Brazil's new economy minister, took office
yesterday promising stability, amid organisational chaos after the
resignation of about 50 government officials.
Those who quit included the entire directorate of the Central Bank and all
those responsible for monetary policy, debt negotiations and the
privatisation programme.
Their departure followed that of Ms Zelia Cardoso de Mello, who had been
criticised for her confrontational approach and accumulation of too much
interventionist power in all aspects of the economy.
The only person to remain of Ms Cardoso's original team is Mr Joao Santana,
who yesterday became head of the powerful infrastructure ministry.
President Fernando Collor de Mello was said to be surprised at the avalanche
of resignations, losing Mr Ibrahim Eris, the central bank governor, Mr
Antonio Kandir, chief economic policy maker, and Mr Eduardo Teixeira, the
infrastructure minister, who had held the job only six weeks.
Others included the head of the Bank of Brazil, the biggest state bank, and
the president ion.
The appointment of Mr Moreira, the sixth economy minister in as many years,
indicates a shift to the right for the Collor government.
The team Mr Moreira brings with him, such as Mr Francisco Gros, the new
central bank governor, represents an older, more experienced generation than
the youthful figures who surrounded Ms Cardoso. The 47-year-old Mr Gros
previously held the post for 78 days between February and April 1987 during
Brazil's debt moratorium. He is the eighth central bank chief in six years.
In the handover ceremony Ms Cardoso launched a bitter attack on the
country's elite.
Her eyes fixed on politicians and businessmen at the ceremony, she said: 'I
am worried by the incapacity of our elites to discuss objectively the
country we want and need to construct, and who criticise without presenting
alternatives.'
The 37-year-old former minister spoke of 'violent attacks' on her personal
life and concluded: 'In view of the growing controversies surrounding my
actions and incompatibilities in the public domain I had no choice but to
offer my resignation.'
She was praised by an unusually emotional President Collor, who had earlier
told politicians her removal represented 'a shifting of gear in the
economy'.
Mr Moreira for his part promised to continue the war against inflation but
emphasised that intervention would be replaced by negotiation. In a
television interview he said: 'My economic policy will stay as that
determined by President Collor, but each minister has its own style.'
He added that a policy of austerity need not prevent a return to economic
growth.
Mr Moreira said he intended to accelerate on three fronts: escaping from the
current price freeze; reaching an agreement on Brazil's foreign debt by the
end of this year and normalising relations with the international financial
community; and negotiating with the Congress to push through economic
reforms.
He stressed a 'deepening of the liberalisation and modernisation process'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2 Photograph Marcilio Marques Moreira, 'Good opportunity'
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-451</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Drexel settlement plan agreed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE future of Drexel Burnham Lambert, the controversial investment bank
which filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection just over a year ago,
became clearer yesterday after its main creditors reached agreement in
principle on a settlement plan.
This would resolve all outstanding securities litigation against the bank,
which sprang to prominence in the 1980s largely because of its role in
developing the US 'junk bond' market. It should also allow a relatively
small, reorganised company to emerge from the ashes of the former investment
bank.
The next step will be for a full 'plan of reorganisation' to be drawn up.
This would then be subject to a favourable vote by Drexel's 14,000
creditors, and would also need the approval of the bankruptcy courts. An
agreement acceptable to the creditors also has to be struck with the
Internal Revenue Service, which has a large tax claim against Drexel.
Yesterday's announcement suggested that, assuming such approvals are
forthcoming, a reorganisation plan could be implemented by the end of 1991.
Under the settlement scheme filed with the Manhattan courts yesterday, the
bulk of Drexel's assets - which stood at Dollars 3.6bn (Pounds 2.13bn) when
it filed for bankruptcy protection - would be placed in a 'liquidating
trust'. The owners of this would be Drexel's fixed creditors and the
securities litigation claimants.
Drexel's interests in investment and business partnerships would be held in
separate entities, with the same beneficial ownership.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-452</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Stock and Currency Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
STERLING
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
New York:
Dollars 1.7245 (1.719)
London:
Dollars 1.719 (1.704)
DM  2.965 (2.97)
FFr  10.04 (same)
SFr  2.5075 (2.51)
Y  238.50 (237.25)
Pounds index 91.6 (91.5)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
GOLD
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
New York: Comex Jun
Dollars 358.3 (359.3)
London:
Dollars 357.00 (356.75)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
N SEA OIL (Argus)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Brent Jun
Dollars 19.575 (20.175)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
DOLLAR
New York
DM  1.7225 (1.7305)
FFr  5.8225 (5.855)
SFr  1.4545 (1.462)
Y  138.65 (138.05)
London:
DM  1.7255 (1.743)
FFr  5.84 (5.8925)
SFr  1.458 (1.4725)
Y  138.75 (139.25)
Dollars index   66.4 (66.7)
Tokyo close: Y138.58
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
US CLOSING RATES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Fed Funds 5 1/2% (5)
3-mo Treasury Bills:
yield: 5.59% (5.63)
Long Bond:
97 31/32 (96 3/16)
yield: 8.30% (8.21)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
STOCK INDICES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE 100:
2,524.3 (-17.5)
FT Ordinary:
1,974.5 (-21.7)
FT-A All-Share:
1,219.38 (-0.5%)
FT-A World Index:
143.96 (-0.3%)
New York
DJ Ind. Av.
2,920.17 (-50.98)
S&amp;P Comp
375.74 (-9.51)
Tokyo: Nikkei
26,274.29 (-164.21)
LONDON MONEY
3-month interbank:
closing 11 1/2% (11 17/32)
Liffe long gilt future:
Jun 91 3/4 (91 31/32)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-453</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / World News in Brief: Heavenly body
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The first recorded meteorite to land in Britain for 26 years may be 4.5bn
years old, say scientists.
The 1 1/2 lb rock landed in the back garden of 80-year-old Arthur Pettifer
in Glatton, near Peterborough, Cambridgeshire.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-454</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / World News in Brief: Kohl gets egg on face
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Chancellor Helmut Kohl turned on demonstrators who pelted him with eggs and
had to be restrained by his security men from fighting the protesters in
Halle, near Leipzig.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-455</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / World News in Brief: ANC intruder shot dead
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A white intruder was shot dead by an African National Congress security
guard at the movement's headquarters in Johannesburg, the organisation said.
ANC ultimatum, Page 2; Push for peace, Page 9
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-456</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / World News in Brief: Hunt for war criminals
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A team of Scotland Yard detectives was preparing to begin investigations
which could result in alleged war criminals facing trial in Britain after
the War Crimes Act received Royal Assent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-457</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / World News in Brief: Cannon Street crash
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
No prosecution will be brought in connection with the crash on January 8 at
Cannon Street station in London in which two people were killed and more
than 250 injured.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-458</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Granada lowers dividend and strives to reduce debt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GRANADA, the UK leisure and television group, unveiled a financial package
yesterday designed to reduce debt and secure its future.
At the same time it announced a cut in the final dividend of just over 40
per cent which contributed to a 27p fall in the share price to 184p.
A proposed one-for-three rights issue at 140p a share is expected to raise
Pounds 163m and Granada's bingo clubs will be sold to Bass, the brewing and
leisure group, for Pounds 147m - Pounds 56m in cash and the assumption of
Pounds 91m in debt.
The moves follow several weeks of speculation and uncertainty about the
company and its top management.
Mr Derek Lewis, the chief executive, announced his intention to resign and
he will leave as soon as a successor has been appointed.
The resignation was widely seen as linked to the disappointing performance
of the company in recent months and the chances of completing the rights
issue. Mr Peter Davis, chairman and chief executive of Reed International
and a critic of Mr Lewis, also announced his intention to resign as a
non-executive director when the rights issue has been completed.
Granada estimated pre-tax profits of Pounds 38m for the 28 weeks to April 13
compared with Pounds 63.3m for the same period last year. The sharp drop in
earnings, in line with City expectations, reflects the effects of recession
on the company's consumer related businesses.
Earnings per share are expected to be 6.4p compared with 11.7p and the board
is planning a hefty dividend cut from 4.4p to 2.5p, making a total for the
year of 7p down from 12.3p last time.
The company said: 'The combination of the rights issue, the sale of Granada
Clubs and the reduction in the dividend will significantly improve the
strength of the group's finances and provide a base for dividend growth when
trading conditions and the group's results improve.'
Granada appears to have had a narrow window of opportunity to create the
package.
The rights issue could not be launched until a Pounds 200m refinancing of
British Sky Broadcasting, the satellite venture in which Pearson, publisher
of the Financial Times, is a significant shareholder. The deal, bringing
Granada's BSkyB commitment to Pounds 237m, was signed last week.
Uncertainty about Granada's future had to be dispelled before Wednesday when
Granada Television has to submit its bid for a 10-year commercial
broadcasting licence which would run from the beginning of 1993.
Background Page 10
London Stocks Page 15
Franchises Page 9
Lex Page 24
Markets Weekend II
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-459</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Peace move rejected by Croats and Serbs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURA SILBER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BELGRADE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Yugoslav state presidency's attempt to avert a civil war between Croatia
and Serbia threatened to collapse yesterday following growing criticism from
the republics' political parties.
There was no sign that Croats or Serbs were planning to hand over their arms
to either the republic or federal authorities as ordered after an agreement
was hammered out by the country's collective presidency on Thursday.
A statement from Croatia's main opposition parties said: 'Croatia is at war,
and the defence of the republic is the duty of all it citizens. The
authorities must use all means to defend the republic.'
In Serbia Mr Mirko Jovic, head of the Serbian National Defence, an
ultra-nationalist opposition party, called on volunteers to fight to defend
Serbs in Croatia. He said Serbs would 'not recognise any decisions made by
Yugoslavia's puppet presidency'.
The agreement ordered the disarming of citizens and the demobilisation of
Croatia's police reservists in areas of ethnic turmoil in the western
republic.
The accord also gave the federal army and police authority over the
predominantly Serbian province of Krajina, which has declared independence
from Croatia.
Croats regard the army as pro-Serbian and have criticised the presidency's
decision to give the military sweeping powers.
Yesterday's statement by Croatia's 12 opposition parties said the
presidency's plan 'threatens the sovereignty and integrity of the republic.'
It also called for the resignation of Mr Stipe Mesic, Croatia's
representative to the eight-member state presidency.
Mr Mesic, a moderate, is scheduled to become federal president next
Wednesday as part of the annual rotation among the republics of the post.
Serb extremists and army hardliners have wanted to prevent him from assuming
the presidency.
Mr Frane Golem, the foreign minister of Croatia, said in an interview in
Austria and reported in Vjesnik, Croatia's newspaper: 'We (Croats) are ready
to fight, to use any occasion to become independent.'
Western diplomats are pessimistic about the prospects for any long-term
peace between Croats and the Serbian minority in the western republic in
which 18 people were killed in clashes last week.
Man in the News, Page 8
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-460</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Major pledge on public services
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN MAJOR sought to set out his personal agenda for the general election
campaign yesterday with a pledge to unveil this summer the most
comprehensive initiative ever launched to improve the quality of public
services.
Addressing a packed rally to end the Scottish Conservative conference in
Perth, the prime minister discouraged speculation that the election could
come as early as next month. Earlier, he gently chided journalists for being
in a 'hurry' for the election campaign.
Senior ministers said it was 'touch and go' whether the Tories would hold
Monmouth in next week's by-election. A poor performance at the seat, where
the party is defending a majority of more than 9,500, would confirm the
cabinet's view that the autumn is the earliest possible time for Mr Major to
seek a fresh mandate.
Mr Major's speech, building on his proposals earlier this year for a
Citizens' Charter to underpin a more efficient public sector, came at the
end of week which has seen government and opposition locked in a bitter
pre-election battle.
Attempts by the Tories to push Labour on to the defensive over its tax and
spending - emphasised again by Mr Major yesterday - have been hampered by
the continuing political row about the impact of the health service reforms.
Even as Mr Major was speaking, Mr Neil Kinnock was completing a week of
assaults on the Tories' health service reforms at a rally in the Monmouth
constituency.
Calling on voters to signal their dissent by voting 'no' to the government,
the opposition leader launched a fierce personal attack on the prime
minister for his part in formulating Tory policy during his time in
government.
Mr Major, in a move designed to put in place one of the central building
blocks of his election manifesto, said he would publish later this summer a
white paper on the Citizens' Charter. It will include a mixture of
incentives for public sector workers to deliver better services and measures
to compensate consumers who receive poor treatment.
Mr Major cited the regulatory framework for the performance of privatised
industries such as telecommunications and gas supply as a model for services
which remain in the public sector.
The charter programme would have four main strands: more competition and
privatisation; improved incentives and penalties to improve performance; new
inspectorates; and, where possible, mechanisms for direct compensation to
consumers.
If the general election date is pushed back further into 1992, Mr Major
plans to introduce legislation in the autumn to implement the charter.
In a reference to the furore over the health service, the prime minister
said he remained determined to push ahead with reforms which provided better
patient care by ensuring that NHS resources were properly spent.
He said Labour's plans on public spending and National Insurance
contributions could add as much as 10p to the present 25p basic rate of tax.
He sought to build on the Tories' recent modest recovery in Scotland by
announcing plans to inject a further Pounds 15m aid into the depressed
region of Lanarkshire.
Conference reports, Page 6
Putting on a new face, Page 8
Long View, Weekend I
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1 Photograph John Major in Perth flanked by his wife Norma and
Ian Lang, Scottish secretary (left), and Lord Sanderson, Scottish
Conservative chairman (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-461</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Bank damps hopes of rate cut
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RACHEL JOHNSON, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BANK of England yesterday moved to stamp out speculation of an early cut
in interest rates - but left the markets half expecting one next week.
Hopes of a cut have been building strongly ahead of the sharp fall in
inflation likely to be announced next Friday, the day after the Monmouth
by-election. The government has, in cutting base rates four times since
mid-February, twice done so on the same day as it announced falls in the
retail prices index.
In a deliberate squeeze on the market which it agreed with the Treasury in
advance, the Bank damped speculation of a cut by lending Pounds 965m at the
current base rate of 12 per cent for a period of 14 days.
As it had declined to buy Treasury bills yielding 11 1/2 per cent from the
market earlier in the day, this tightened monetary conditions and underlined
its desire to see the 12 per cent base rate stick.
It is thought the Bank took tough action after earlier signals failed to
take effect. On Thursday it was forced to keep the market short of funds the
day after Mr Robin Leigh-Pemberton, the governor, cautioned against reading
too much into the predicted fall in inflation to 6.2 per cent.
He warned then that the headline rate's fall from 8.2 per cent would reveal
'no more' than the effect of last year's imposition of the community charge
dropping out of the 12-month figures, aided by recent interest rate
reductions.
However, as next week is expected to bring a fresh crop of recessionary data
as well as a sharp fall in inflation, hopes of a  1/2 percentage point cut
remain alive.
In the City, analysts pointed out a recent precedent for a cut in interest
rates during a period of central bank lending at the current base rate. In
late February, the rate was cut to 13 per cent just five days after the Bank
lent to the market at 13 1/2 per cent for seven days.
Sterling rates are already discounting a cut, while the pound is firm on the
foreign exchanges. It closed yesterday in London at DM2.9650 from DM2.9700,
well above its European exchange rate mechanism rate. The three-month
interbank rate was unchanged from Thursday's closing level of around 11 1/2
per cent.
In a market survey yesterday, MMS International, the financial research
company, suggested that the authorities may 'sneak in' a cut before the
Monmouth poll.
Money Markets, Page 13
Lex, Page 24
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-462</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Clocks, Watches &amp; Jewellery: Double about-turn at auction -
Richard Garnier picks his way through the sales and the different sectors of
the market
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
YOU might be forgiven for thinking a watch is a watch is a . . . until you
come to buy, or sell, or collect them at auction, that is. For the market
divides several ways into decorative, early and precision for pocket
watches, which have recently been joined by wristwatches.
The most serious section of the market is decorative - watches, mostly
dating from the 18th and 19th centuries, whose chief attraction is the style
and decoration of the case and dial.
These are to be distinguished from early watches, that is those from before
the 1680s. Early watches were always abysmal timekeepers and should not have
been altered to improve performance. They were created as expensive toys for
courtiers; as a result, they have some of the most sumptuously decorated
cases ever made.
Precision watches are the youngest sector of the pocket watch market. They
include complicated watches with multitudinous features, such as
minute-repeating, perpetual calendar work allowing for leap years and double
or triple split second-hands for timing two or three runners in tandem, as
well as those which are just very accurate timekeepers.
Decorative watches had been the staple of sales until the 1970s, when early
watches shot to prominence, soon followed by precision.
In the early to mid-1980s, however, wristwatches came into play, and the
term 'estate watches' was coined to cover quality wristwatches from the
1950s to 1970s which were not strictly vintage. It was all so easy, as long
as you stuck to the six big names of Patek Philippe, Vacheron and
Constantin, Rolex, Audemars Piguet, Cartier, and Breguet.
It is a story that has parallels in the Impressionist and Post-Impressionist
art market. The signs were all there in a recent April sale at Christie's in
London. The sale was 66 per cent sold overall, but that was held up by the
90 per cent success rate in the clocks section of the sale. Christie's Tim
Bourne admits that estimates will have to be revised downwards next time.
A similar trend was evident at Phillips' Bond Street sale earlier this
month, where wristwatches took a severe knocking and accounted for the
majority of unsolds. Rachel Cameron at Phillips cites estimates that were
very reasonable in terms of past market levels, yet which failed to excite
much interest. This was particularly true of Patek but less so with Rolex,
which has a more rugged appeal.
Early Rolexes in octagonal or cushion cases, many in 9 carat, held up quite
well at Phillips, but these are less significant, being down market. More
upbeat models, including the Rolex Submariner (still in production), are in
very short supply, being all the rage for Italians as beachwear. With the
majority of other marques it is hit and miss, so the reorientation of the
market may not have completely run its course.
However, it is not all gloom in the wristwatch sector. Tina Millar of
Sotheby's points out that an octagonal arrow-dial wristwatch made Dollars
209,000 this February in New York, in the middle of the Gulf crisis. It is,
of course, a very rare watch and a similarly dialled pocket watch commonly
sells for around Dollars 10,000 at auction.
Similarly, at Christie's in Geneva, Ruth Zandberg has hopes for a 1924
Audemars Piguet square dialled wristwatch in a white gold case. In itself,
that would not be exceptional, but its minute repeating facility makes the
difference - and also explains the bullish pre-sale estimate.
Patek Philippe watches are generally not so rare, whether perpetual calendar
or less complicated examples. Gone are the days when the prices realised in
one auction established the benchmark for the low estimates in the next
sale, which was then left far behind. The market has changed from those
halcyon days of 1989, when Habsburg held their themed sale of Pateks.
Habsburg repeated the formula with the House of Breguet in mid-April.
Projected to total FFr15m (Pounds 1.49m), the final result of some FFr12.34m
was only partially satisfactory as nearly 25 per cent of lots remained
unsold. Nevertheless, the sold total shows that those that did sell
performed well, particularly when mechanically interesting or associated
with a good historical prominence.
For instance, a watch picked up at a Phillips London sale in 1989 for a song
at Pounds 1,500 or so as an unrecognised Breguet, once reunited with its
English Royal prominence, was resold at the theme sale for FFr36,000.
Christie's gets in on the act with a theme sale of Swatch watches in 178
lots on June 15, preceded by a talk by Ernest Thomke, president of S. M. H,
the manufacturers. This Swatch classics sale is an attempt to follow the 100
per cent sell-out success of Sotheby's similar sale in Milan of September
last year.
The June sale includes such low number production models as the chronographs
(stopwatches) and the Mimmo Paladino, estimated at SFr40,000 plus and made
in a limited edition of 120. The Mimmo Paladino was given as a prize in the
1989 'Draw Your Swatch' competition, and presented to leading figures in
politics, finance, sport, the arts and show business.
Meanwhile, Crott of Germany have offered 144 lots by the German precision
makers Lange &amp; Sohne of Dresden, ranging from published literature, through
wristwatches, to grande complication and tourbillon pocket watches.
The Crott sale was dominated by pocket watches, which seems to be the
healthiest sector of the market at the moment. Lange is principally a German
(and to a lesser extent American) market, but both they and other superb
precision watches had performed well against the general run of pocket
watches over the last five or six years.
Most other pocket watches have been so lacklustre since the mid-1980s that
not only had many become less valuable in market terms since then but were
even making less in real terms.
That was until this spring. The first signs were evident last summer. To
start with, the number of unsold decorative pocket watches at auction fell.
Now a definite price advance is in progress.
Rachel Cameron at Phillips is delighted by the prices achieved for enamel
watches in its sale - many with damage. One such, dating from the early 19th
century, seemingly correctly estimated at Pounds 400 to Pounds 600, realised
Pounds 1,700: another similarly estimated made Pounds 1,150.
The exception in this sale was Patek, which followed its own house form, as
Gondolo models were down to about half their previous level of around Pounds
2,000. Tina Millar's May 30 sale at Sotheby's London includes an 1857
hallmarked Parkinson &amp; Frodsham watch in a diamond set gold case
attractively enamelled with portraits of unidentified sitters. There must be
a premium for the buyer who can solve their identity on a pre-sale estimate
of Pounds 3,500-Pounds 5,000.
A stunning ladies pendant watch by Cartier set with rubies and with a black
enamelled mosaic pattern (Pounds 5,000-Pounds 7,000 estimate) is also
included. If this bears out the delight Tina Millar expresses for it, along
with a Dittisheim Chronometre de Bord watch (for surveying purposes,
estimate Pounds 3,000-Pounds 4,000), it should mean the heart is back in
watches for collecting, to be appreciated for what they are, rather than to
be used as an adjunct to a social trend. Genuine collectors must always be
best for the market.
Richard Garnier is Head of the Antique Clock Department at Garrard
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-463</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Clocks, Watches &amp; Jewellery: The ultimate in accuracy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARILYN BENTLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR TELLING the time with style and status, you can't beat that gold Rolex.
When it comes to measuring the age of a spot of Jurassic silt or the
life-span of a quark, it takes instrumentation on a more cosmic scale.
In the last 30 years, science has provided techniques to measure time with
impressive accuracy. For example, precise dating of pottery shards can give
invaluable information to archaeologists. Using the phenomenon known as
thermoluminescence, a specially designed oven unit linked to a standard
personal computer and a printer can produce a glow curve from which a
reliable dating can be made.
Thermoluminescence builds up over the years as a result of environmental
radiation, and the energy is stored in the crystal lattice. When samples of
the pottery are heated in the oven unit, the energy is given off in the form
of light, which can be measured to show how long the pottery has been
absorbing radiation.
Although the principle of dating pottery by measuring thermoluminescence was
first proposed in 1953, a practical method has only been developed since
about 1960, at Oxford University's Research Laboratory for Archaeology and
the History of Art. The laboratory is able to offer the service commercially
to academic institutions, museums, and auction houses such as Sotheby's. It
is, in the opinion of Professor Edward Hall, former head of the laboratory,
one of the few entirely reliable scientific tests for dating material.
Organic matter contains minute quantities - one part in a million million -
of carbon 14, a radioactive isotope of carbon which decays at a known and
constant rate. By measuring the quantities of carbon 14 present, it is
possible to determine the age of ancient remains. Carbon 14 dating has been
possible for about 30 years, but the old technique required 10 grammes of
material - an impractically large amount when attempting to determine the
age of potentially priceless artefacts. Professor Hall's contribution was
the accelerator mass spectrometer, which could produce accurate results with
a sample 10,000 times smaller.
The Oxford laboratory now tests up to 1,000 samples a year, originating in
environmental studies and oceanography, archaeology and fine art. The most
publicised artefact ever tested at Oxford was the Turin Shroud.
When measuring time in the present, as opposed to the past, it is the
caesium clock which is now the ultimate reference. Dependent on the
vibration of the caesium atom, the frequency of which is extremely stable,
atomic clocks are so accurate that, were they to be set at the birth of
Christ, they would still be correct today to within 15 decimal places.
Dr Denis Vaughan, of the Science Museum, London, showed me an early example
of a caesium clock - an imposing installation. Present day instruments are
more compact, about the size of a suitcase. Hewlett Packard produced the
first portable caesium standard atomic clock in the late 1950s, and are
still world leaders in their production.
Developments now enable you to have atomic time in your own home. In 1988,
the German company Junghans introduced a clock with a radio receiver inside
it.
Similar in principle is a quartz watch, also produced by Junghans, which
works off a transmitter in Frankfurt. It has an aerial built into the watch
strap, and, at night, when laid flat on a bedside table, it will receive a
radio signal from the atomic clock, automatically adjusting the time.
And the next step? 'This is the ultimate, as far as accuracy is concerned',
says Dr Vaughan. 'It's difficult to visualise anything further.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-464</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Clocks, Watches &amp; Jewellery: Craftsman on a knife-edge
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GARNIER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT WAS a burning childhood ambition of Bill Galbraith's to have his own
clockmaking workshop. This ambition was doubtless fired by the fact that he
was bred to clockmaking, but was born not long before his grandfather's
clock shop was a casualty of that infamous recession of the early 1930s.
On demob from the Second World War, Galbraith headed for London and now has
his own business, with workshops in both London and Fowey, Cornwall. It has
taken time to get this far, and not without the assistance of Bill's silver
tongue to placate the bank manager. The economic climate has not been kind.
When he arrived in London, clock and watchmaking concerns abounded,
including such old names as Dent, Frodsham, Camerer Cuss, Asprey, Garrard,
and others. Of these, only Asprey and Garrard still maintain workshops - the
others are all gone.
In an unexpected way, Bill has benefited (if not profited) from this trend.
Cornwall was originally just for holidays, but one day a gas repair man fell
to talking over a job and showed a surprising understanding of the
intricacies of rebuilding a clock movement.
Not only was the gas man a former clockmaker, but he knew others in Cornwall
who were fellow cast-offs from the shrinkage of horological workshops in
London. The result is that Bill has set up a second workshop in Fowey, which
helps to reduce overall costs as the overheads are lower.
Bill's London workshop has provided a sound practical training ground for
commercial clockmakers and restorers. Many of his workmen have gone on to
set up their own workshops, having benefited from the quality of clocks
(many by Knibb and Tompion and Quare) entrusted to his care.
Such a grounding in commercial restoration is of inestimable good for the
trade as a whole. It cannot be gained at horological college where students,
rather than gaining specialist skill experience, are of necessity taught in
a somewhat uncommercial and academic environment and trained to cover all
three aspects of the modern craft - clocks, mechanical and quartz watches.
Bill's first clockmaking experience was gained in polishing nests of bells
for musical clocks. Done after school, his father, in true Scottish spirit,
paid him sixpence for each set: only recently he discovered his father was
actually receiving nine shillings for each set]
On arrival in London, an employment bureau got him a job at a small
clockshop off Liverpool Street. A rapid move to Bravington's (of 'make sure
its a Br-Br-Bravington's' fame) enabled him to cast round for the best
workshop to join.
Thus Bill came to Camerer Cuss in New Oxford Street, still run by the
descendants of a Black Forest clockmaker who emigrated in the 1780s. Terence
Camerer Cuss keeps the name going with an antique clock business in St
James's. But Bill set up on his own in 1969; fortunately, just before the
gaffer died, otherwise he would have felt obliged to stay on and help run
the business.
By then Bill was workshop manager at Camerer Cuss and had seen the
assimilation of the old precision watchmaking firm of Usher &amp; Cole. With
them came contracts for maintaining the marine chronometers of shipping
lines, so work had been specialist but varied.
There were departments for chronometers, cuckoo clocks, a timing division
for stopwatches, two separate clockshops and a watchshop. The cuckoo clock
produced was a specifically English model in the form of a Tudor house, the
first of which went to Prince Charles's nursery.
A couple of relocations later, Galbraith's London workshop is in Britton
St., Clerkenwell, the heart of the traditional clock and watchmaking
quarter.
Both these moves were forced on him by developers - the first, working next
door, having demolished the party wall, then proceeded to buy the freehold
over Bill's head.
The next shop was really a stop-gap, but he managed to get the old gas
turbine overhead belt-drive for the bench lathes going again. That was a
practical move, whereas occasionally using the gas bench lights was less
serious. In reality, no-one could see a thing, but what a marvellous draw it
made for American owners of clocks that needed working on]
Bill was always brought up to believe that a clockmaker should also be
capable of attending to clock cases. From this has arisen the fine art
division of his business. Freshly washed ormolu and gilt cases once returned
to a dealer's shop suddenly showed up all the other stock, which in turn
promptly arrived at Galbraith's for cleaning and repair. This side has
expanded so that while much is done in-house, some 23 skilled outworkers are
also called upon.
Singing bird boxes and other automata are specialities. A typical story is
of an elaborate early 19th century model tree with a singing bird automaton
that was promptly damaged again by its owner while stepping over it on the
floor. The decision was made to do extra work that had been held back on
first time round, and it's not kept on the floor any more.
A recent project has been true to Bill's origins - the production of a
series of 12 longcase regulators in fine mahogany cases. It's at moments
like this that Bill wishes that he could rip up an uncle's old loft floor
back in Glasgow, if it's still there, because the remaining stock of fine
Honduran mahogany from his grandfather's clockshop was used up there.
Making precision clocks by hand today does not really make economic sense,
as the full cost of man hours involved cannot be charged out to the
customer. But a clockmaker's lifeblood is not in bread alone.
Bill enthuses about the little details that go into making these clocks,
like jewelled pivot bearings and a knife-edge suspension for the pendulum.
There is not quite the same joy in his face when talking about an
alternative but necessary area of clockmaking to keep the coffers from
running dry.
New clocks for public locations involve such enticing tasks as working from
a hoist 45 feet up in the air in a blizzard last winter to link up the drive
work behind the clockface for the hands.
Public clocks can have a better side, when they are designed, as in a recent
clock, to have a triple tiered automaton of medieval soldiers, swans and
fish.
The mechanism may have to be electric, but the final result is rewarding.
Notwithstanding this new work, Bill's workshops hold together eight
clockmakers within a staff of 12, split between London and Cornwall. He
feels it is a great pity that 95 per cent of business comes from within 25
miles of Clerkenwell(including Heathrow). Where are all those clocks in the
West Country?
Bill Galbraith, workshops in London and Cornwall
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXIII Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-465</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Clocks, Watches &amp; Jewellery: Hard times ahead - The antique
clock market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A SUFFOLK dealer had a pleasant surprise the other week. He sold an antique
clock, his first transaction in eight months. During that period he had been
forced to give up his shop and he now deals from home. It is a familiar
story as the recession has further reduced business in a sector of the art
market which is traditionally quiet.
Private buyers are scared of buying antique clocks at auction and almost as
nervous shopping from a dealer. They are worried about how much of the clock
is genuine and how much restoration; they are concerned about the interior
mechanics and the costs of putting faults right; they wonder whether they
want a ticking, striking, object in their homes.
All this makes things hard for those in the antique clock trade, who can
offer some of the finest antiques of their kind at extremely modest prices
when compared with other objects of furniture.
One problem is that there are few rich international collectors for English
clocks. The Japanese have shown no interest and the state of the US economy
has reduced American buying.
There are a few keen native buyers, but since longcase clocks in particular
are space consuming objects, an auction house or dealer is lucky to see even
a committed clock customer three times in a lifetime - as he, or she,
purchases his longcase, his bracket, and his carriage clock.
At every specialist auction - Sotheby's, Christie's and Phillips all hold at
least four each year - fine Georgian longcase clocks are on offer at Pounds
2,000 or even less, with bracket clocks of the same period fetching roughly
the same. Carriage clocks are usually under Pounds 1,000. To restore a
decorative longcase to pristine condition should not cost more than Pounds
700, or you can buy a perfect, guaranteed, specimen from a knowledgable
dealer at up to twice the auction house price.
A grandfather clock is an extra large longcase which earned the soubriquet
in the late 19th century in tune with a popular song of the day. As it
happens late Victorian longcases did reach monumental sizes and are one of
the most over-looked (in a collecting sense) - and cheapest - sectors of the
market, mainly because they are ill-suited to modern homes.
Not all clocks are cheap but most, perhaps especially the finest, are
bargains. The English clockmakers of the late 17th century, in particular
Thomas Tompion, pioneered the longcase clock after the invention of the
pendulum, and a very fine specimen of his work can fetches more than Pounds
200,000. Indeed, a rare blond wood Tompion set an auction clock record of
Pounds 880,000 at Christie's in 1989, only to be beaten a few weeks ago by
an art deco 'Egyptian' clock made by Cartier in the 1920s, which sold for
Dollars 1.5m.
Christie's is offering a Tompion ebony bracket at its July 3 auction, with
an estimate of Pounds 100,000. A year ago it would have been valued at twice
this sum, but the clock market has shared in the general antique depression
and in order to attract potential bidders Christie's has gone for an
enticingly low guide price.
Recent auctions have been encouraging. The trade is well stocked, but
private buyers are becoming aware of the bargains on offer and although
estimates have generally been fixed 25 per cent down on a year ago, take up
has been good. If anything, there has been a swing away from longcase
towards the smaller bracket clocks. It is a good idea to make a bid on an
unsold lot after the sale: often the vendor will let it go cheaply.
The problem has been to persuade sellers to risk their clocks on an
uncertain market. For them the alternative is to go to the specialist
dealers. Charles Lee, of R. A. Lee, reports more enquiries from owners
wanting the assurance of a private sale to avoid the vagaries of the
saleroom. He is currently nursing a rather nice Joseph Knibb of the 1660s
which carries a price tag of around Pounds 150,000.
Joseph Knibb, George Graham and David Delander make up the second rank of
English clock makers, but their prices are a fathom below those of Tompion
and rarely break the Pounds 100,000 barrier. Tompion is a name known and
revered by the very rich who collect the finest antiques by the acknowledged
masters. Although he was prolific, with his workshop producing at least 500
numbered clocks, he is a safe investment.
The hunt is on among dealers and auction houses to promote equally
prestigious names. The best on offer at Sotheby's on May 30 is a George II
walnut longcase of around 1752 by Samuel Barkley and Thomas Colley, which
carries an estimate up to Pounds 45,000. Clocks of this period usually go
cheaply, but these two makers were pupils of Graham who in turn learned his
skills from Tompion, so Sotheby's is suggesting a continuing tradition of
excellence. Sotheby's also has a longcase by one of the later Vulliamy
generations, dated 1820 and estimated at up to Pounds 30,000.
For its part, Christie's, apart from the Tompion, has a carriage clock by
James Fergusson Cole which is billed as the earliest English carriage clock,
dated to 1823, estimated at up to Pounds 70,000. Regarded as the equal, or
better, of anything produced by the celebrated Swiss innovator, Breguet, it
is an enthusiast's clock but should find a buyer. However the auction houses
are keeping back their best Tompions until the autumn, when they expect the
economic clouds to have been dispersed. Sotheby's will then be offering six
clocks from the celebrated collection of Lord Hereford.
The dealers cannot enjoy such delays and although their prices will be
higher than those prevailing in the saleroom you will have a guaranteed
clock in fine working order. Anthony Woodburn of Tunbridge Wells has access
to clocks as good as any passing through the auctions. At next month's
Olympia Antiques Fair, you will find Strike One of Islington, which
specialises in lantern and chinoisserie lacquered longcase clocks, and
Gerard Campbell, who deals mainly in early 19th century Viennese regulator
clocks. The Clock Clinic, which restores clocks, is also taking space at
Olympia.
At the even grander Grosvenor House Fair, R. A. Lee will be showing
furniture as well as clocks. It is a sad postscript to the clock market that
while the best 18th century and Regency English furniture thrives during a
recession, clocks of the period are regarded as different and difficult. In
the past, the best furniture dealers embraced clocks. A little knowledge and
the advice of an expert can open up the mysterious world of clocks and
owners can enjoy a useful decorative, and appreciating, domestic friend.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXII Photograph Louis XIV alarm clock, to be auctioned at
Sotheby's, May 30 (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-466</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Clocks, Watches &amp; Jewellery: The jewellery that packs a
punch - The creativity of the younger designers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LUCIA VAN DER POST
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LONG ago, when our mothers were young, the only jewellery to be seen out in
was real jewellery. Those were the days when all life's great rites of
passage - the 18th birthday, the engagement, the marriage, the first child,
the anniversaries - were marked by judicious visits to the family jeweller
to find suitable offerings with which to celebrate the day.
It wasn't until the 1920s, when Coco Chanel imbued her loops of artificial
'pearls' with a chic beyond price, that costume jewellery began to take off.
While the design of the conventional 'haut jouallerie' remained static,
relying on the inherent value of the materials and the size of the stones to
do the selling, costume jewellery took off, appealing to those for whom
design was more important than worth.
While costume jewellery flourished, there were other tastes that needed
satisfying, and in the 1960s it became clear that the role of jewellery was
changing. Chanel had intuitively sensed that the days when jewellery was
primarily a means of displaying wealth and power were over, and cleverly
tapped the desire for some highly fashionable, modish women to cock a snook
at accepted values with her outrageous fakes, but there was now a role for
jewellery with high artistic content. Jewellery didn't need to convey wealth
or status; it could be an outlet for serious creative talent.
We began to see a blossoming of talent among young designers whose work was
genuinely creative, even innovative, part art, part craft, part technical
skill. Whereas much high street jewellery used to be churned out by
manufacturers content to produce designs that machines could handle, the
artist jeweller was much more concerned with the excitements of genuine
innovation than with the intrinsic worth of the materials used. Young
designers began to turn to semi-precious stones, to materials like wood and
stone, rubber and paper, excited by new shapes and forms.
The Goldsmiths' Company, sensing that things were changing fast, began to
foster exhibitions in which the work of young jewellers could be seen and
bought. The work was often astonishing value for money - young designers
working from home or small workshops, usually ill-informed on matters of
time sheets and overheads, sold wonderfully creative, innovative work for
very low sums.
Over the years, the Goldsmiths' Company's annual touring exhibitions and the
host of art/craft galleries that sprang up all over the country have done a
great deal both to find a market for the artists' work and to introduce the
public to these new and sometimes intriguing jewellery forms.
Galleries such as Electrum, in London's South Molton Street, were the
pioneers of this movement, providing a platform for the most creative and
avant-garde talents. Today, jewellers like Gerda Flockinger, Jane Allen,
Karl Bartosik and Wendy Ramshaw have international reputations and have
opened the eyes of many to the potential excitement of truly innovative
jewellery.
The establishment jewellers, too, have had to adapt to changing times.
Modern-minded jewellers have needed to create affordable lines for the
growing legion of working women. At Tiffany's, Rosa Monckton says they
always have a line of jewellery that the working woman can buy when she
feels she deserves a reward. 'When she gets promoted or lands a new job, she
will spend anything up to about Pounds 1,000 on a piece by Paloma Picasso or
an Elsa Peretti to add a spark to her designer suit.'
At Garrard and Mappin &amp; Webb, they began to notice that the call for tiaras
and diamond pendants was no longer pressing enough to sustain a modern
business. They have introduced lines that might tempt a woman out
window-shopping or a chap who wants to woo but doesn't have a trust fund to
back him. As more women than ever are going out to work, the demand for real
jewellery that packs something of a fashionable punch has grown - they need
pieces that can take through from the school-run first thing in the morning,
to the boardroom meeting and on to dinner in a restaurant.
Even the grandest of grand Bond Street names have found the last few months
tough going, and there is an increasing realisation that though the very
rich will always be with us (and at Boucheron, interestingly, they have
found that sales of the very high-priced items have suffered less than sales
lower down the scale), there may well not be enough of them to keep them in
the style to which they have grown accustomed.
Changing times need changing attitudes, and the challenge for the big
jewellers is to make sure that the women who feels in need of a little
'retail therapy' chooses to find it with them rather than in among the
designer jackets. Not only does she now have the confidence to buy her
jewellery for herself rather than waiting for her lover or her husband to do
it for her, but she makes a much more demanding buyer - value alone is not
enough to bring the credit cards out, what she wants is something that
speaks of her discerning taste, her wit, her chic as well.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXII Photograph Gold beetle and bug bracelet by Paul Preston
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-467</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Clocks, Watches &amp; Jewellery: Bright spot in the gloom - In
spite of the recession, prices for antique jewellery are holding up well and
sales seem little affected
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LUCIA VAN DER POST
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The jewellery business is one of the few bright spots in an otherwise gloomy
economic scene. Right at the top of the market, in that world where rising
mortgage interest rates hold no fear, and right at the bottom, where a pair
of earrings can do wonders for a woman's morale, sales seem little affected.
In the sale rooms, the main bar to ever-increasing volume is not the lack of
willing buyers but the fact that supplies, far from rising, are strictly
limited.
In times like these there is something infinitely reassuring about antique
jewellery. Prices for signed pieces by the great French jewellers -
Boucheron, Cartier, Van Cleef &amp; Arpels, La Cloche - have held their own and
more through the months of war and recession, while truly remarkable pieces
 -such as the huge, beautiful sapphire brooch that Christie's sells next
week in Geneva, or the Van Cleef &amp; Arpels mutli-gem set brooch that Phillips
sold, again in Geneva, last November  - continue to command the sort of
attention and prices that made the 1980s boom.
At the less extravagant end of the market, Georgian rings, Victorian
brooches and turn-of-the-century necklaces not only have considerable charm
and are a delight to wear but, most important, their value is tried and
tested. Buying modern may be exciting, but it is usually a much less secure
investment.
There is a salutory tale told of what happened when one of London's leading
modern jewellers needed to sell most of his wares. In spite of a
high-profile name and a reputation for exciting design, the auction house
charged with the sale only managed to realise, on average, some 10 per cent
of the listed retail price - in other words, his rent, mark-up and
manufacturing costs were so high that some 90 per cent of the price of each
piece was attributable to things unrelated to its intrinsic value.
At auction, for example, although each house charges commission, there are
no high retail mark-ups, no long line of people who all need to take their
cut. All this means that it is still possible to find a good Georgian or
early Victorian piece for anything between Pounds 800 and Pounds 1,000;
those with up to Pounds 2,000 to spend are almost spoiled for choice. On top
of that, if ever the owner needs to sell, he or she stands a fair chance of
getting their money back.
To the would-be buyer the best advice is the oldest - choose pieces that
give you real pleasure, for then you will always have a bargain, no matter
what you paid. Go, if possible, for a piece with a designer's name. The
collector's market for named pieces is increasing daily: Mark Twain's
memorable remark about land - 'they aren't making any more of it' - applies
just as surely to antique jewellery. An instantly recognisable piece by a
known designer can do nothing but become more sought-after.
As antique real jewellery becomes more scarce, a new market has recently
opened up - costume jewellery. The craze for the costume jewellery of
certain distinguished houses started in the US, but in the last few years it
has spread to this country. Christie's, for instance, now holds regular
sales at its South Kensington auction rooms. It all started about two years
ago when an elderly woman with a large personal collection came in wanting
to know if they could sell it. They could and they did, proving that here
was yet another market to explore.
Costume jewellery from before the Second World War and the late 1940s and
early 1950s is usually of high quality, but when it comes to collecting, a
certain lineage is everything. Trifari, Chanel, Christian Dior, Schiaparelli
are the golden names at the top of collectors' lists but look out, too, for
Mazer, Jomaz and Boucher.
However, some auction houses (Phillips, for instance) have found that
whereas a year or two ago old costume jewellery was a hot seller, the market
has since settled down and only the best, the really wearable, finely-made
pieces are reaching the prices their sellers hope for.
If you are looking for single pieces to wear and enjoy, you may well find
dealers a better bet than sale-rooms. For instance, Christie's now has a
minimum commission charge of Pounds 20, so only the larger and more valuable
pieces are sold individually - the less distinguished or less expensive
pieces are grouped in lots ranging from Pounds 150 upwards.
Rooting around an individual dealer's collection can still bring its rewards
 -there are some who were buying individual pre-war pieces by Miriam Haskell
for well under Pounds 40 just last year. There are less distinguished pieces
of costume jewellery (often only in the sense that they are of unknown
provenance, not of inherently less charm) lurking in stalls at Gray's
Antique Market, at Alfie's and all the usual marketplaces that represent
wonderful value for money compared with the offerings in the costume
jewellery departments of most stores.
As with any jewellery, the golden rule is to buy the highest quality you can
afford. There are few undiscovered bargains to be had. Everybody seems
agreed that buyers are becoming more knowledgeable - about stones, settings
and designs - so anybody risking their own taste at an auction had better do
their homework first.
Serious collectors need to know whether the piece is good for its type, how
its setting or workmanship relates to similar pieces, how its designer is
rated and just how fine the intrinsic materials are before investing their
hard-earned cash in a valuable piece. Some auction houses (Phillips, for
instance) have found that whereas a year or two ago, old costume jewellery
was a hot seller, the market has settled down and only the best, the really
wearable, the finely-made pieces are reaching the prices their sellers hope
for.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXII Photograph The largest sapphire ever to be auctioned, the
337 carat sapphire mounted by Cartier, to be auctioned at Christie's in
Geneva next week. It is expected to fetch more than Pounds 1m (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-468</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Clocks, Watches &amp; Jewellery: Luxury route out of recession -
The renewed interest in mechanical watches
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GOODALL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Like every other industry, the watch market is in recession - but recession
for some watch manufacturers would be the envy of their counterparts in
other trades.
Take, for example, Cartier and its sister brands, Piaget and Baume &amp;
Mercier. Just days before April's European Watch Clock and Jewellery Fair in
Basle - generally considered the most important of its type in the world -
they organised their own break-away up-market trade exhibition in Geneva.
The Cartier brands invited only their most important customers so that they
could buy in luxurious, dignified surroundings, without the noise, crowds
and bustle of the very much larger Basle Fair: yes, even in recession, the
watch halls of the Basle Fair were bustling.
Imagine the expense of flying 2,500 guests from around the globe to Geneva
for a few days. Add the cost of luxury accommodation, meals and
entertainment, not to mention limousines to collect guests from the airport
and shuttle them between hotels, entertainment and, not least, the
exhibition. What results would be needed for such an exercise to be judged a
success?
Speaking for the three Cartier group companies and the two top independent
brands (Gerald Genta and Daniel Roth) which joined the new show, Cartier
president Alain Perrin said they were very happy: the number of buyers
greatly exceeded expectations and sales for the five brands in the first two
days of the five-day exhibition totalled Dollars 166m.
Compared with the first two days of the Basle Fair last year, before
recession had begun to bite and before the Gulf war had savaged demand from
the Middle East, sales by the five watch companies in the Geneva show were
up almost 18 per cent. On top of this awesome performance, the same brands
were also exhibiting in Basle and no doubt picked up further orders from
those customers who were not invited to Geneva and from those unable to
visit the new luxury show.
Mr Perrin has already confirmed that the International Salon of Fine
Watchmaking will take place next year and the organising committee will be
prepared to consider accepting up to four more participants. However, any
expansion of the Geneva venture would cause considerable political upheaval
in Switzerland's normally tranquil industry and no major company will make
such a move lightly.
Mr Perrin and his associates undoubtedly want to attract Rolex and Patek
Philippe to join them in the sophisticated surroundings they have created
for their new exhibition, but it seems that neither company is likely to
fulfil his dream - at least until the new salon is firmly established.
In Geneva and in Basle, it was clear that interest in mechanical watches is
returning, but it would be wrong to suggest that quartz timepieces have had
their day. As Cartier's managing director, Pierre Hacquet, explains, some of
his clients want a watch only as a piece of jewellery. They do not care
about the technical side; but others are now more concerned about what is
inside a watch.
'We could not ignore the evolution of technology. Demand for some years has
been for more precise watches. Today, the trend is towards mechanical
movements. I would now like clients to recognise that the movement of a
watch is as important as the case', he says.
Quartz watches are certainly far more precise than mechanical watches will
ever be, but buyers are beginning to rediscover the satisfaction of knowing
that inside their watch is a marvel of mechanical engineering, often
decorated and polished by hand to make it almost a work of art.
Perhaps such buyers also realise that whereas spare parts for many quartz
watches will not be available in 10, 20 or 30 years' time, a good watchmaker
should still be able to produce a single spare part for a mechanical watch
in 200 or 300 years' time. Quartz watches do not have built-in obsolescence,
but with such rapid progress in electronics, it is evolution which will make
quartz watches obsolete as each model is superseded by a more advanced
replacement.
At the moment, mechanical watches account for only 10,000 of the 300,000
watches sold by Cartier each year. Pierre Hacquet now anticipates expansion
of Cartier's mechanical watch production at the rate of 25 per cent a year
until it reaches 25,000 pieces - far higher than is achieved by any of the
top firms which specialise in fine mechanical timepieces.
This year's other trend, also noticeable in Geneva, was towards the
production of limited editions of special watches. This year, for the first
time, Cartier are producing four, including a reversible version of the
classic 'tank' design.
Philippe Leopold-Metzger, Cartier's managing director in the UK, says that
Cartier now plans to produce three or four limited editions of mechanical
watches every year. Each series will be limited to between 250 and 350
pieces.
The author is Editor of International WristWatch
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-469</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Clocks, Watches &amp; Jewellery: The Swiss makers fight back -
Fashion and tradition dominate the top end of the market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FRANCES WASTENEYS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE watch industry has undergone considerable change over the past 15 years.
Production has more than doubled to around 730m units, with digital quartz
(LCD display) and analogue quartz (hands display) taking the lion's share.
But the centre of production has switched from Switzerland to Hong Kong and
Japan, which between them account for two-thirds of output. All is not lost
for Switzerland, however; increasing demand for luxury watches led its sales
to rise by 10 per cent last year, to capture half the market by value.
The most significant change has been the sharp decline in the production of
middle and low-priced mechanical watches following the introduction of the
battery-powered quartz timepiece. Quartz destroyed the theory that more
expensive equals more accurate. Cheap, stylish and reliable Japanese quartz
watches forced the Swiss to re-think strategy.
They countered with the Swatch, which re-defined consumer perception by
producing multi-coloured, fashionable and affordable watches. Some of the
earlier models are now collectors' items. Swatch is also believed to be
introducing a mechanical watch which will be launched next year.
However, there has been a renewal of interest in the more traditional
mechanical timepiece, particularly in Japan, where Swiss makes such as
Blancpain and Audemars Piquet are extremely popular. Production of luxury
and mechanical timepieces is very profitable and Japanese makers are keen to
compete.
But Swiss manufacturers still dominate the luxury watch market, through
companies such as Piaget with traditional jewelled watches and Breguet with
fine timepieces. As John Lloyd Morgan, sales director of Chaumet, the main
Breguet stockist, explains: 'Fashion does not play a significant role.
Breguet watches are the rarest of hand made watches and so are not perceived
as items of jewellery, but as fine time pieces'. This year's worldwide
Breguet exhibition and the relatively successful auction of more than 200
Breguet watches and clocks going back over two centuries has made antique
watches more highly sought after.
Geofrey Ashworth, managing director of International Watch Company UK,
explains the swing back to mechanical watches.
'People have this constant search for the finer things in life. Men can't
wear jewellery so watches are an area where they can indulge themselves'.
Fashion continues to influence design in the middle range of the market.
Raymond Weil started quartz watch production 14 years ago and now claims to
be the fourth biggest producer in Switzerland. His marketing strategy is to
place the emphasis on fashion. With a shape and a style for everyone, the
new line offers round cases with diamond bezels in steel or 18 carat gold,
with corresponding bracelet links.
Corum is also at the forefront of fashion and is marketing an unexpected
combination of circle and rectangle in its recently-launched Symbiose quartz
model. It has also just produced 'Meteorite Mars', a platinum watch with a
dial carved in rock from Mars.
Other manufacturers respond to nostalgia. Jaeger-leCoultre celebrated the
60th anniversary of its Reverso watch, with its skeleton back, by
reproducing the watch in a rose-gold case. TAG-Heuer has created its own
niche in sports watches, and has enjoyed a substantial growth in sales.
According to Neil Duckworth, managing director of Duval, its distributors,
TAG-Heuer last year accounted for 700,000 units worldwide. In the first
three months of this year it recorded a 47 per cent increase in growth in
the UK alone.
But the most prominent trend is the chronograph. As Susanne MacDonald of
London's Watch Gallery explains, 'almost all the show cases here house a
chronograph with one or more representing each brand'.
Where a brand is unable to incorporate a chronograph, it often positions the
date and second hand in dials to resemble one. Even Swatch has its own
chronograph, which reached something approaching cult status in Italy and
produced excellent sales.
As Julia Ogilvy at Garrard points out, 'in Italy they are chronograph mad -
even ladies wear them. The watch has become an essential part of their
wardrobes.'
There has been a trend away from steel and gold to other metals, such as
platinum and titanium. Alfred Dunhill last year launched the Dunhill
platinum elite, and is developing an exclusive dress range with a skeleton
watch: its clear sapphire glass front and its back reveal the intricate,
hand-engraved automatic movement. Even something as technical and practical
as Breitling's 'Old Navitimer', a mechanical watch used by pilots as a
precision instrument, is now made in platinum.
Blancpain, which has produced mechanical watches since 1735, combines
platinum and the watchmaker's art in a presentation case containing a six
horological masterpieces - the ultra-slim watch, the moon face calendar, the
perpetual calendar, the split second chronograph, the eight-day tourbillon
and the minute repeater.
The six masterpieces of watchmaking epitomise the achievement for a master
watchmaker; to produce all six in one presentation case is a collector's
dream. Also included are two individual world firsts - the automatic
split-second chronograph and the tourbillon with eight-day power reserve.
The ultimate in watchmaking is a Grande Complication, combining all six
complications. Jean Claude Biver, president of Blancpain, realised his dream
in December by combining the six traditional masterpieces within one case,
in the Blancpain '1735' - a true complication wristwatch and the first of
its kind. Each watch costs Pounds 400,000; only 30 will be made, and all
have been sold.
Audemars Piquet has been making one Grande Complication pocket watch each
year since 1889. The company is in the Guiness Book of Records for the
world's most complicated pocket watch without precious metals. Patek
Philippe started its rival version in 1908, and since 1947 has been
manufacturing a series of Grande Complication pocket watches, of which there
will be 17. Number 14 can be seen in this year's London salon and costs
Pounds 450,000. It is unique in that its bezel has a barley-corn patterned
engine-turning and inside the back, the cuvette, is set in sapphire crystal
in which the mechanism can be seen working.
IWC has just launched its Grande Complication with a platinum case. Although
it does not incorporate all six complications, it does have unique features
such as a perpetual calendar which is programmed indefinitely. IWC is making
50 a year and already has orders for 350. Each watch costs Pounds 85,000,
and is 30mm in diameter and 11mm thick.
The Swiss are aware that the Japanese are eagerly eyeing the profitable
niche in expensive mechanical watches. As John Keeping, an industry
consultant, explains: 'Until the Japanese swamped the market in the 1980s
the Swiss believed that no-one could design a watch as well as themselves'.
A year later Seiko was the first foreign company to take the Grand Prix de
Geneve.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXI Photograph Forefront of fashion, Corum's Symbiose is an
unexpected combination of circle and rectangle (Omitted). Photograph The
Pounds 85,000 Grande Complication by IWC, which is making 50 a year and
already has orders for 350 (Omitted). Photograph Alfred Dunhill's skeleton
dress watch, revealing the intricate hand-engraved movement (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-470</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Clocks, Watches &amp; Jewellery: Basle shows the collectable
face of watches - The latest trends and recent developments at the European
Watch, Clock and Jewellery Fair
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GOODALL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR nine days every April, the Musternesse in picturesque Basle,
Switzerland's equivalent of the National Exhibition Centre, becomes the
Mecca of the watch world. Attracting professional watch buyers (and
collectors and enthusiasts) from all over the world, the European Watch,
Clock and Jewellery Fair is considered by many to be the world's most
important trade exhibition; it is also open to the public.
Each year, thousands make the annual pilgrimage to Basle to try to pinpoint
the latest trends and to catch up on the latest developments - not only in
the Swiss watch industry, but also in other parts of the world, now that
Japanese and other manufacturers are admitted to what was once a strictly
European fair.
There is little doubt that in many countries, watches are becoming more
collectable than ever before. The last two or three years have seen the
start of a new industry: publishing consumer magazines for watch
enthusiasts. These, in turn, have stimulated interest, awareness and
understanding. They have enabled people to appreciate watches more for their
beauty and for the immense technical skills and creativity which go into the
production of fine mechanical watches.
To some extent, this is a chicken and egg situation: watch magazines have
given readers the information necessary to be able to appreciate watches to
the full, but at the same time growing levels of interest in watches have
stimulated the appearance of such publications.
To a growing and appreciative audience, the watch is much more than merely
functional. Wristwatch sales in the auction rooms over the last two or three
years have seen prices rise sharply. Time and time again, new world record
prices have been established, some of them during the worldwide recession.
At the Basle Fair, where some of the exhibitors' stands cost Pounds 1m or
more to build, there was mood of relief that the buyers were back. A few
months ago, during the Gulf war, many feared the show would prove to be a
disaster for the watch industry, but with worst of the crisis over, business
was better than might have been expected.
It would be wrong to imply that order books were bulging, but many
exhibitors claimed they could see light at the end of the tunnel of
recession. Times have been tough for most manufacturers, but a few of the
most prestigious brands still admit with some embarrassment that there is a
waiting list of three or four years for some of their finest  - and most
expensive - models.
This year, soft, curved lines are the order of the day and complicated dials
are still popular in both quartz and mechanical watches. Moon phase dials
have been very popular for several years, but their popularity is beginning
to wane. The craze for chronographs - watches which incorporate stop watches
 -continues, but this fashion may have peaked. At the moment, it is the
designers of the finest mechanical watch movements who are being put to the
greatest test as public demand for ever more complicated watches continues
to grow.
Another clear trend has been the announcement of limited editions. There has
long been a tradition among the top houses to produce limited editions of
some important pieces, but the last 12 months have seen manufacturers at
every level of the industry jumping on the limited edition bandwagon.
Undoubtedly, consumer interest in limited editions has been spurred on by
thoughts of higher values at auction, in years to come, for a numbered
specimen of special watch. This belief was perhaps boosted by the remarkable
prices paid at an auction in Milan last autumn of Swatch watches, where some
limited editions attracted spectacular and totally unexpected prices.
However, as more and more companies join in the fray, the importance of a
limited edition may be devalued.
Patek Philippe, as always, attracted attention for the remarkable design and
workmanship in their complicated watches, but they also produce designs
whose attraction lies in their classical simplicity. At the other extreme,
they offer lavishly gemset creations. They are one of the companies still
embarrassed by the length of the waiting lists for a few of their most
complicated models.
Girard-Perregaux commemorated their bicentenary by producing a new version
of their famous Tourbillon with three golden bridges. Only two editions have
been made before - one in the 19th century and the other at the beginning of
the 1980s - but both were pocket watches. (A tourbillon is a watch in which
the entire escapement is fitted into a cage which constantly revolves, a
device invented by A. L. Breguet). Girard-Perregaux have spent the last
three years creating a superb wristwatch version. The first was completed in
January and about 20 specimens will be made this year. Production will
continue over a period of five years. Girard-Perregaux will also mark their
bicentenary with a limited series of watches, called Anno 1991 and produced
in two sizes.
Ebel announced limited editions of their Voyager self-winding world time
watch in 18 carat gold, which they have called Atlas. The dial features a
map of the world, enamelled either with the continents in various colours
or, for the sports-minded, in the five Olympic colours. On a strap, the
price is Pounds 6,285; on a gold bracelet, Pounds 11,840. There are four
series - combinations of the dial variations and strap or bracelets, each
numbered from one to 80, and all water resistant to 30m.
The other new design from Ebel is named after one of the finest wines: the
attributes of a truly distinguished Bordeaux wine, a Grand Cru Classe called
Lichine, provided the inspiration for this new model, the pride of the
Beluga range which was already the company's flagship collection. In perfect
harmony with today's watch fashions, it has generously rounded lines and
adds a distinctively masculine accent to the Beluga line. Like its namesake,
the Lichine is expected to attract connoisseurs. Interestingly, it is
available not only with an Ebel-designed quartz movement, but also with a
twin-barrel self-winding movement.
This year, many of the top houses are incorporating power reserve indicators
(to show the amount of power remaining in the mainspring) in some of their
finest models. Ebel's Lichine is a good example, with the power reserve
display featured on one of three subsidiary dials on one of the more
complicated executions of this important new design.
Jaeger-leCoultre are perhaps best known for their Reverso design, the body
of which can be flipped over, with the dial innermost, for added protection.
This well-established classic is 60 years old this year, and to mark the
occasion Jaeger-leCoultre have produced a special version with a power
reserve indicator in the top left hand corner of the oblong dial. The case
is slightly larger than that of the classic Reverso, but in the same
proportions. Its 37 components are cut out of a block of rose-coloured gold
and polished, decorated and assembled by hand. The beautiful hand-wound
movement can be admired through the transparent sapphire crystal case-back.
The rose-gold version is being produced in a limited edition of just 500
pieces. From May next year, yellow and grey versions will be produced in an
unlimited series with traditional rhodium-plated movements.
Breitling offered an interesting new selection in their Astromat collection.
Of particular interest was the Astromat Chron Longitude. This chronograph
provides a permanent second time zone indication by means of a second hour
hand which, when not needed, can be concealed beneath the first one at the
touch of a button. A self-winding, high frequency mechanical movement
provides a small seconds hand and date indication, and it also has a
short-term time measurement function by means of the centre seconds hand, as
well as 30-minute and 12-hour totalizers.
A limited series of 38 watches with dials carved out of rock from Mars has
been introduced this year by Corum. For several years they have been making
meteorite watches whose dials are thin slices of meteorite, but the dials of
this latest series are produced from fragments of Martian rock which landed
on Earth in 1962. Proof that the meteorites came from Mars was provided by
analysis of the planet's surface carried out by the Viking Mars probe in
1976. These watches have cases in platinum and red gold, as well as a
certificate of origin for the unique dials.
A new name is about to appear in the British market and first recations
suggest that it will prove very successful. Sector is a collection of sports
watches which combine Italian design with Swiss technology. Following
tremendous success in the Italian market, one of the most important in
Europe, Sector watches will soon be appearing in British shops. Although the
brand is quite young, worldwide sales are expected to reach 450,000 units
this year and to double in 1994.
For those seeking the ultimate in precision, there are radio controlled
watches by Junghans. Radio controlled clocks have been available for three
or four years, and now Junghans have miniaturised the same technology for
use in a wristwatch. Last year they produced a digital version, but this
year they have introduced the much more acceptable analogue version.
Radio controlled watches never need adjustment: they receive time signals
from the world's most accurate clock, and should be accurate to within about
one second in one million years. Each watch has a quartz movement which is
regulated every few minutes, if necessary, by the radio time signal. As a
result, the watch will set itself to the correct time after a new battery
has been put in, and will change from summer to winter time and vice versa.
The eternal problems of showing the day of the week, the date and the month
are also handled automatically.
Technically advanced electronic watches are not, of course, the exclusive
preserve of European manufactures. In Basle, Seiko introduced the world's
first perpetual calendar watch which shows the right date for 1,100 years.
Most perpetual calendar watches will face problems in the year 2100, when it
will be necessary to lose one day. Most pre-programmed mechanical and quartz
perpetual calendar watches will no longer show the correct date, but Seiko's
latest technology overcomes this problem. As a bonus, this model also
incorporates an alarm which can be set as much as one month in advance.
For the fast-growing band of watch enthusiasts from top sports personalities
to musicians, politicians, financiers and advertising agency executives, the
choice is enormous and manufacturers are responding quickly to changing
demand. The last few years have shown the finest examples to be excellent
investments, but a wise adviser is always likely to point out that, like
most other investments, values may go down as well as up.
The author is Editor of International WristWatch
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX Photograph Ebel chronograph with perpetual calendar and
moonphase. This 18 ct gold watch is self-winding, and comes on a leather
strap (Pounds 14,320) or on a gold band (Pounds 21,490). It is
water-resistant to 30m (Omitted). Photograph Blancpain chronograph - but has
the craze peaked? (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-471</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Hawks &amp; Handsaws: How to survive an interview
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL THOMPSON-NOEL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE LATEST market research shows that 97.5 per cent of those who read Hawks
&amp; Handsaws regularly are rich and growing richer; are leaders in their
fields, or rising swiftly; are svelte and fit, as well as personable and
deeply charming; hate bloodsports; admire all Russian composers; wonder why
Martin Amis has not yet won the Booker prize - and are generally admired,
envied and fussed over.
It stands to reason, then, that H&amp;H readers are more likely than most to
attract the eye of those Sadducees of the modern newspaper scene, the
hot-shot interviewers - the Lynn Barbers, Valerie Groves and Christian
Tylers of this world.
To hold your own against vivisectionists of this calibre takes nerve,
intellect and ingenuity, just what you would expect of H&amp;H readers. However,
at the risk of teaching anyone to suck eggs, I thought it would be helpful
to jot down 10 golden rules for handling interviewers like this, should they
happen to wave their scalpels in your direction:
1) Keep your knees together but use plenty of eye contact and body language.
You want them to like you.
2) Although they are admired by other journalists, interviewers of this
class are touchy and insecure, so flatter and woo them, make them feel
attractive.
3) Imply that you are as familiar with their work as they are with yours.
4) Never lie.
5) Never contradict them.
6) Do not perspire. Even if you are frantic, appear super-languid. They
admire self-confidence above all else.
7) When they bowl you a googly, admire their technique - then smack it away
elegantly.
8) Use long words occasionally, but keep your sentences short. These people
are quote-vultures: far too busy and important to tolerate inchoate
rambling.
9) If the going gets tough, imply that you know their editors a shade better
than they do (this may not be difficult).
10) At the end of the interview pay all bills, order them a taxi and suggest
that you meet them for dinner (Tuscany: late October) so as to further the
acquaintance.
To show how it is done, here is a fragment of an interview I gave this week
to Penelope Powdermaker, a rising young star with a poisonous technique.
Observe how her questions are beautifully non-sequential, not that I fell
for it:
Penelope P: 'Some people say you are raffish and attractive. Especially to
women. Has that ever held you back?'
Michael T-N: 'It's hard to say, Penelope. But we are all of us, I feel, more
than the sum of our parts. Looks like yours, for example, matched to wit and
intelligence, must have been a handicap initially. But look at you now,
Penelope. You have risen far above the crowd.'
Penelope P: 'Do you like yourself?'
MT-N: 'Not all the time. I expect it would be a bore. There has to be room
in our lives for an element of doubt and self-questioning.'
Penelope P: 'How much are you paid? '
MT-N: 'That is a grey area, Penelope. A mite controversial.'
Penelope P: 'Why are you running away? It is a perfectly fair question, so
give me a straight answer.'
MT-N: 'All right, Penelope. I happen to know your editor. He plays at my
club. Big, booming forehand though suspect on the cross-court volley.
Splendid sort of fellow. So here is what you do. Think of your own salary,
Penelope, then multiply it by seven and divide by 0.8. That is what I am
paid.'
Penelope P: 'Do you name-drop constantly?'
MT-N: 'It is a habit from my childhood. I wish I could shake it off but we
are prisoners of our nurturing. Although I strive with every sinew to hold
myself in check, I am also a bit of a rah-rah, though I stop short of
twitdom.
'Some years ago, in the winner's enclosure at Ascot, I was chatting to the
Dowager Lady Beaverbrook and lobbed her a question she rather objected to.
''Lady Beaverbrook,' I said. 'You have paid uncounted millions for your
racehorses and enjoyed only glancing success. How do you relate what you
spend to what you get back?'
'She smiled winsomely, Penelope, and told me confidingly: 'That is an
over-complex question. What you are asking me is whether I enjoy my racing.
The answer is Yes, I enjoy it enormously.'
'That taught me a lesson, Penelope - not to be pompous when confronted by
enormous wealth. But neither to be intimidated. It is an extremely difficult
balancing act for which people like you and me - the best sort of
professional, with by-lines in 24-point, such a great responsibility - are
seldom given credit for.
'When Lady Beaverbrook won the 2,000 Guineas at Newmarket last Saturday with
a horse called Mystiko at 6 1/2 -1 - I had been alerted to its qualities by
a friend of mine, Jack Hillbrooke, and passed the tip on: all part of the
service - my heart went out to the dowager in no uncertain style.'
Penelope P: 'Are you religious?'
MT-N: 'No.'
Penelope P: 'You don't believe in a god?'
MT-N: 'Only in the hydrogen atom.'
Penelope P: 'They say that facetiousness is often a camouflage for an
unimaginative mind.'
MT-N: 'Often they are right, Penelope. But as Brahms said when people told
him that his first symphony sounded like Beethoven's ninth: 'Any fool could
say that, and every fool has]''
And so the interview progressed. At the end of it I paid for our meal,
called a taxi for Penelope, helped her get into it, said I would buy a copy
of her paper when the interview came out and promised to meet her in the
Uffizi, on October 27 (I shall be on sabbatical), in front of The Birth of
Venus.
It was as easy as shelling peas.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-472</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Opinion formers - what do they know?: Dominic Lawson wonders
why the professional pollsters are always picking on him
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DOMINIC LAWSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
I DON'T know if anyone did actually say that 'opinions are free, but facts
are sacred' but if anyone did he must have died in penury. The market in
opinions is one of the few areas of growth in an otherwise stagnant economy
and those opinions are not free but very expensive.
One of the largest items on any newspaper's budget is the money set aside to
pay for opinion polls by the likes of Gallup, NOP and Mori.
Yesterday's Gallup Poll in the Daily Telegraph showed on the basis of 10,863
'face-to-face' interviews that 23.9 per cent of respondents felt that Paddy
Ashdown is not proving a good leader of the Liberal Democrats and we are
told that this is a 0.3 per cent increase in his disapproval rating.
Does this collection of opinions add up to a fact? And if so, how much is it
worth now that an alchemic transformation has been wrought turning an
aggregation of free and worthless opinions into one sacred marketable
report?
Even worse than to have an opinion, is to be seen as an opinion-former. Then
the collectors of opinions never let you go; because there are not so many
of us, the pollsters can very quickly package these opinions and sell them
to companies on the bogus assumption that these really important opinions
add up to a truly indispensable fact.
But I find it strangely difficult to turn these companies down, even though
I would cross the street to avoid a man with a clipboard, who would probably
waste much less of my time.
It is all to do with vanity. I somehow want to prove to the pollsters that
they are right in supposing that I am an opinion former even though I know
privately that I can barely form my own opinions, let alone those of others.
Naturally, I do not get any money for this display of vanity so the
pollsters keep all the cheques paid to them by their gullible corporate
clients.
I have one such questionnaire in my briefcase at the moment, from the Pan
European Opinion Panel, based in France. 'Dear Madam' it begins (that is
their opinion, not a fact, but they are not interested whether I am (a) very
sure, (b) sure, (c) not at all sure what sex I am).
They wish to know whether, on a scale of one to four, I know very well,
rather well, not very well, or not at all the following companies: Peugeot
SA, Michelin Paribas, Suez, CCF, Wagons-lits, Havas, L'Oreal, Elf Aquitaine,
Rhone Poulenc, Aerospatiale, Alcatel-Alsthom (ex CGE), Saint Gobain,
Pechiney and Lyonnaise des Eaux-Dumez.
I have a problem here, as I had with a similar questionnaire sent out on
behalf of similarly introspective English companies. What do I think I mean
when I say that I think I know a company well?
I once told one of the corporate pollsters when they came round in person to
make sure I answered all their questions, that I would like to answer 'don't
know' to the question 'how well do you know the London Electricity Board?'
The question is, of course, impossible to answer. But 'don't know' is not
allowed to the so-called opinion formers. They must have a confident view on
everything, even their own ignorance.
The penultimate question on the Pan European Panel's latest missive is 'is
Peugeot SA's stock in your opinion (1) over-evaluated (2) under-evaluated or
(3) at its correctly-evaluated price?' I am sure that Peugeot SA will find
to its great relief that 99 per cent of Pan European Opinion formers
believed that the market has got Peugeot SA exactly right. For those who
replied (1) or (2) then have to answer the tedious 'could you please specify
exactly why you feel that this stock is not at its correctly-evaluated
price?'
I am tempted to launch a poll of my own to ask all opinion formers one
simple question: 'do you think that business opinion polls of opinion
formers are: (a) a complete waste of your time and corporate money or (b)
extremely worthwhile and useful.' I wonder whether the polling companies
would regard an overwhelming (a) response as statistically significant.
Dominic Lawson is the editor of the Spectator.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-473</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Two lives dedicated to child's play: Iona Opie, the
self-appointed guardian of our childhood songs and games
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JACKIE WULLSCHLAGGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LIKE Humpty Dumpty or Peter Piper, the name Iona Opie is catchy, has rhythm,
and is remembered by many people who are English-speaking and under 35 along
with their early nursery rhyme characters.
Since the 1950s, she has collected the songs and games of childhood -
jointly with her husband, Peter, until his death in 1982 - and written a
series of unlikely bestsellers about these discoveries. The Oxford Book of
Nursery Rhymes, published in 1955 is the first book many people remember
reading. If you are a parent, a dip into The Lore and Language of
Schoolchildren (1959) still tells you more about what happens to your
offspring once they pass through the school gates than any number of
meetings with teacher.
For the past 14 years, Iona Opie has been visiting the playground of her
local junior school at Liss, in Hampshire, each week to track such
developments as seasonal variations in games and the rise of sexually
explicit and scatological verses. The results will appear next year in The
People and the Playground.
The Opies were the first to realise that anthropology was as authentic in
the English playground as in the tropics. There has been criticism of them
for being timorous but, as she says: 'In 1959, you didn't publish anything
worse than the word knickers. Now, in the name of science, I'm going to
publish everything.'
'We make jokes about anything we're frightened of. Children worry about
death and joke about gruesome coffins; we worry about the troubles in
Ireland and make jokes about silly Irishmen. Children have the same need as
adults to cope with their social life.'
The nursery rhyme is uniquely British, she says: 'It's all part of being
frightfully tough and not minding the weather. We're nourished with
nonsense, and it does us a lot of good. When you're feeling downhearted, you
recite a nonsense rhyme to yourself . . . All the best people use them:
Lewis Carroll, Dickens, there are echoes in Louis MacNeice and Benjamin
Britten. They haven't got the same fantastical nursery rhymes anywhere else
in the world.
'Every other nation seems to believe that the British national character is
reflected in nursery rhymes. They're all busy studying them; Japan is very
serious about it and in Russia the translations have never gone out of
print.'
With her breezy, down-to-earth manner, English rose complexion, and
expression flitting between mockery and romantic fancy, Iona Opie looks
rather like a robust and elegant nursery rhyme herself. Although the most
eminent scholar in her field, when talking about her work, she is as
light-hearted and frothy as the verses and songs that are her raw material.
She and Peter managed to keep a spark in their anthropological writings, she
says, by remembering exactly what it was like to be a child, going out if
you were the seeker to look for people already hiding and feeling the danger
as if you were going through the jungle.
'The happiness a child can find in books and toys and games is more intense
than almost any he will experience in adult life, and the treasures of
childhood which often exist only in the memory are among our most precious
possessions.'
Her home at Westerfield House in Hampshire is a late Victorian farmhouse
shaped like a couple of Noah's arks tagged together and given over to the
rescue and preservation of children's books and toys. In 1989, she donated
half the books to Oxford University. The Opie Appeal, to acquire the other
half for the university, exceeded its target easily. Some 20,000 volumes,
worth Pounds 1m, went to the Bodleian Library, but Westerfield continues to
fill up; a set of early skipping ropes, some 1950s jumping jacks, a
collection of picture books.
She sees herself and her husband as the custodians of everybody else's
childhood, and there is a glint of obsessive, sarcastic pleasure as she
describes a punitive regime of working all hours in a self-imposed car-free,
television-free world which gave the time to catalogue thousands of verses
and singing games. 'We were both Puritans; we liked hurting ourselves.
Neither of us liked luxury. Today, I've softened a great deal. I bought the
first new car after Peter died . . .
'We once wondered why no one else had done the work we had, and the truth
came in a great light; it's economically complete suicide. Between us, we
earned the same per annum as a London police constable.
'We were terribly badly qualified. We had no academic training but we
realised this was our great advantage. Caught in the war, neither of us went
to university. We felt that if we had done we would, firstly, have known
that we were not qualified to do the job and, secondly, we would have put it
in an academic form and it would never have had the effect it did.'
By nature if not by training, though, the anthropologist was early in the
making. Her father was a doctor in Sudan and Khartoum. Peter's father was
also a doctor, in India. She had a cosy and cossetted childhood in the 1920s
and 1930s but says: 'I was a completely silent child. It didn't occur to me
that one was supposed to speak. One of my maids accused me of being sly
because, she said 'I don't know what you're thinking, ever'. Nobody told me
I ought to talk, so my whole attention was given to noticing and taking
things in.'
She married Peter 'because we were the same sort of people; we both liked
reference books.' They met when she was in the meteorological section of the
Women's Auxiliary Air Force and had run out of books. She was loaned one
written by a young man called Peter Opie and liked his personality so much
that she wrote to him.
As a young couple in the 1950s and 1960s, they had a band of helpers and
talked to more than 5,000 children, looking for evidence of a traditional
culture they were told was already dead. Instead, in schools up and down the
country they found rhymes, games and customs stretching back centuries,
passed on by oral tradition, in different but clearly related versions.
'Children, we now know, have their own code of oral legislation for testing,
betting, swapping, keeping secrets; they have tricks to inflict pain or
embarassment (Adam and Eve and Pinchme); jeers and torments for crawlers and
cheats and dunces and clever dicks; nicknames of approval and disapproval
for thinnies and fatties and greedyguts; codes for playing truant and
keeping a lookout. Riddles and witticisms and spooky tales help them fend
for themselves in the playground, nonsense rhymes fill awkward moments, mock
danger, underlines the absurdity of the adult world'.
No one before the Opies had put any of these snippets together in context,
not shown the speed at which children's oral lore spreads, like an
advertiser's dream-come-true, across the country faster than the printed
word or the slogan heard on television. The results, as VS Pritchett pointed
out in an early review, take you deeply into British life.
So what now? 'In my dotage I'll potter on with a very big book, Games with
Things. I recall a skipping game with giant elastic bands hooked round
schoolmates' ankles.' She tells me its history - 'Shanghai 1930; via Chinese
grandmothers to American children; to Holy Loch in Scotland, with US
servicemen's families, in 1960, to the derivative French skipping today' -
and instantly sets to work questioning me on my memories. 'If any of your
readers can give me more details, I'll be fascinated.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXVI Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-474</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Books: Bodily rituals
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL DRIVER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN PRAISE OF THE STEPMOTHER by Mario Vargas Llosa Faber Pounds 13.99, 149
pages
THE PERUVIAN Mario Vargas Llosa's new novel is a book of intimacies and
fantasies. Seldom have I encountered such a sensorily immediate piece of
writing, one which better evokes bodily odours or summons up what might be
called the body's organ music. Not since Joyce's Ulysses has the act of
human excretion been so crisply and vividly rendered in prose.
Daily ablutions, rituals of personal hygiene and far-flung exotica of the
marriage-bed make up Llosa's chief subject-matter; though he also sustains a
plot about the corruption by - rather than of - innocence, and builds a
fancy novelistic structure whereby the chapters of the main narrative are
interspersed with fantasy elaborations of (mostly) famous paintings, here
reproduced on colour plates.
The narrative concerns the second marriage of Don Rigoberto, cultivated
manager of a Peruvian insurance company, and the complex reaction of his
schoolboy son to the presence of his 40-year old stepmother Dona Lucrecia.
The 'structure' focusses on the mythological prototypes, as represented in
paintings, that lie behind the modern action and its psychology. Thus Don
Rigoberto's delight in Dona Lucrecia's rump gives rise to Llosa's
dramatisation of Jacob Jordaens's 1648 canvas, Candaules, King of Lydia,
showing his wife to Prime Minister Gyges. Dona Lucrecia's feelings of
attraction to her stepson are developed in a commentary on a Francois
Boucher bower of bliss. A Francis Bacon elephant man becomes the mouthpiece
for Don Rigoberto's feelings of monstrosity; and an abstract painting (1977)
by one Fernando de Szyszlo is seen by young Alfonso as depicting his
stepmother in all the fullness of her eroticism.
The method, like Llosa's approach in general, may recall the work of Julian
Barnes, whose History of the World in 10 1/2 Chapters contains a fold-out
colour reproduction of Gericault's Raft of the Medusa. Here it makes, not
illogically, for an essentially decorative sort of novel. Serious themes, it
is true, are adumbrated: for instance, Don Rigoberto's attention to the
minutiae of lavation and love-making is repeatedly seen as his 'personal way
of bringing about a utopia' and even an apotheosis; while Dona Lucrecia's
sexual entanglement with a minor is a fairly momentous issue.
But the tone is ultimately light and exquisite. The language (in what seems
a brilliant translation by Helen Lane) is fastidious, graceful, and
sprinkled with scent. It is an audacious caprice of a book, most memorable
for the accuracy and humour of its corporeal descriptions. The chapter
devoted to Don Rigoberto's cleaning of his ears is a writerly tour de force.
(A collection of Vargas Llosa's early short fiction is published
simultaneously: The Cubs and Other Stories, Faber paperback Pounds 4.99, 139
pages.)
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXIV Photograph Llosa, an audacious caprice (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-475</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Books: Of virgins, money, death and danger
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ISABEL QUIGLY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR WROE'S VIRGINS by Jane Rogers Faber Pounds 13.99, 273 pages
FAMILY MONEY by Nina Bawden Gollancz Pounds 13.99, 250 pages THE
DESIRED EFFECT by Andrew Gimson Chapmans Pounds 13.99, 202 pages
IN 1830 Prophet Wroe, founder of the Christian Israelites, ugly but
electrifying, with a voice of honey and thunder, asked his congregation for
seven virgins to work in his house. Fathers and other relatives handed them
over gladly. Domestic drudgery was a come-down for some, a blessed release
for others. Nine months later the Prophet was charged with indecency and
tried: the virginal household collapsed.
Wroe existed, preaching the imminent end of the world, and the mansion he
built near Wakefield was lived in by his descendants until 1956, a tribute
to the gullibility of his followers. But nothing is known of his virgins and
Jane Rogers has used them to tell their story in interior monologues. These
vary. Martha, who has been treated as an animal all her life, at first uses
a kind of grunt language, which gradually develops into speech; Hannah is
educated and ambitious and will go far; Joanna, soft, ignorant and good, is
the most cruelly exploited because the most innocent; and Leah, bitchiest
and most experienced (she brings her baby disguised as a foundling into the
household), turns on the Prophet when he rejects her advances.
The details of housework, cooking, washing, dress and finally a cholera
epidemic are wholly convincing and put across with great liveliness; so are
the covert sexuality of the household, the girls' rivalries and what would
now be called the hunchback Wroe's charismatic presence. Mainly the virgins'
lives are hard and humdrum but despite this the writing sings.
Jane Rogers has enormous imaginative power and a denseness of vision that
includes humour and realism. It seems suitable that she has won both the
Samuel Beckett and the Somerset Maugham awards, for both writers,
artistically inimical though they may seem, would surely have applauded the
way she interweaves the mysterious and the mundane.
Family Money is about something seldom discussed or even faced: the link
between love and money. Today, anyone with a house bought 30 years ago has
riches undreamed of in the past, except by the self-made or the already
rich. And whose is this wealth? The house's owner or the heir's? Fanny's
husband bought their north London house in the 1950s for Pounds 1,500 and it
is now worth half a million. Is it right for her to give chunks - large
chunks - of it away, or to halve its value by installing sitting tenants,
when she has children and grand-children?
That is the theme: now for the plot. One evening Fanny sees a man murdered
in the street. She is knocked out, and never remembers what happened. Is she
becoming senile, or just odd and frightened? And what has this to do with
her plan for the house? Is the young man on the nearby houseboat the
murderer, and if he recognises her as the witness is he likely to murder her
too? Or - perhaps more likely in both cases  - not?
Nina Bawden is here at her best: highly intelligent, good on relationships,
affective and social, and with a briskness that saves every situation from
what you might expect of it. The murder victim is a poisonous creature, his
possible killer beautiful and, perhaps, touching and innocent; the young who
seem to be after Fanny's money are loving and kind to her, concerned for
their own children, not themselves. The people may be familiar but
everything about them is unexpected. Above all the eye that watches them,
though sympathetic, is never taken in by any of them; the weather of
relationships keeps changing; and money, death and danger take the whole
thing beyond the limitations of its official genre, social comedy.
The people in The Desired Effect, a first novel of remarkable poise, are in
an even smaller social group: one of Sloanes and yuppies, not the same thing
but overlapping. Yuppies, being based on money, are less conspicuous in
these hard times than they used to be; Sloanes, being perennials not
annuals, are more permanently planted in English fiction.
Belinda's interest lies in her amazing beauty; but because she is a
romantic, seeking true love, at 34 she is still unmarried. When she falls
heavily for Tom, it disrupts all well-laid plans: at 24, he is impossible, a
sponger and certainly unmanageable. Her flat declines into squalor,
neglected friends forget her, the bank writes sharp letters. A Tory
parliamentary candidate, a Guards officer out of his depth in today's world,
an ugly, sexy girl ('the right age to be a bimbo but not pretty enough'),
assorted parents, chums who are on the same network and constituency helpers
who are not, work through a well-paced plot. And what might have been
over-familiar set pieces - the dinner party of young couples, the Tory
selection meeting - are freshly observed and sharply judged. Just the right
balance is held between the raised eyebrow and the tender touch: wit and
feeling coexist.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-476</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Books: Magic from the mundane - Fiction
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY CURTIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BURN: STORIES by James Kelman Secker &amp; Warburg Pounds 13.99, 244 pages
HARDIE AND BAIRD AND OTHER PLAYS by James Kelman Secker &amp; Warburg Pounds
14.99, 180 pages
WHENEVER A new novel or volume of stories by James Kelman appears Scottish
reviewers say 'brilliant' in chorus. South of the border most of us haven't
taken heed. Kelman has now published 11 books, and it is high time we did.
Kelman's fame started to spread a couple of years ago when the Booker judges
put A Disaffection, Kelman's novel about a Glasgow schoolmaster, among their
last six novels. It didn't win the prize, which was given that year (1989)
to Kazuo Ishiguro, but the short-listing of Kelman's work prompted many
people to read him for the first time and some even to compare him with
Beckett. Jeremy Beadle, a reader who entered for our FT Booker Prize
competition, took another view:
'What Kelman has achieved (he wrote) is to work outwards from the ordinary
and the everyday in the manner of the great 19th century British and French
novelists - to reveal the extraordinary in the human condition. Not for him
the imposition of 'magical' or symbolic events. Patrick Doyle his hero tries
to wrest magic from the mundane - a pair of ordinary pipes, a pointless
romantic lust - and his failure provides an illumination which speaks
directly to more people than any other novel this year.'
The two books just published are an easier point of entry into Kelmanland
for the first-time reader than that long novel. The Burn contains stories
varying in length from one to 40 pages, the other book scripts of three
plays produced on the Fringe at Edinburgh, on Radio Scotland and at the
Traverse Theatre. The constraints imposed by the small-cast play and the
short-story suit Kelman, and he handles them with great variety.
The most substantial story in The Burn - 'events in yer life' - traces the
career of one of Kelman's lame dogs with typical precision. The basic theme
is that of a prodigal son - a Glasgow artist who returns home after a long
absence for his mother's funeral. He tries to pick up the forgotten threads
in conversation with his sister and his former mate. In his talk with both
he suffers from a crushing sense of displacement, and gradually we see that
his alienation is just as strong when he is away from Scotland. He now
belongs nowhere. Continual intake of alcohol breaks down initial
embarrassment and reserve to reveal how the fissures of the present are even
greater than the traumas of the past, and all the while Kelman's dialogue
crackles with insights. What should have assuaged his outsider-hero's guilt
only serves to heighten it.
An equal load of guilt - often far too much for any one person to bear  -
afflicts all Kelman's chief characters. Sometimes it is inexplicable,
Kafka-like as in 'Naval History' where a man is mysteriously framed for
theft in the innocuous setting of a high street bookshop. In a longer story,
'A Situation', a young man has slept with his fiancee's sister. Here, as in
'Pictures' where a boy remembers a homosexual encounter in a public
lavatory, the un-atonable moment is plainly identified.
Both these, like many of Kelman's stories, are virtual monologues, peppered
with the four-letter expletive that is Kelman's trade-mark. But the
language, however demotic, is always disciplined. The local words like
'greet' for 'weep', 'wouldni' for 'wouldn't', are carefully placed
indicators. One brief violent story is written entirely in dialect. And as
is clear from Hardie and Baird, a moving play set in the 18th century,
Kelman can when he wishes elevate his diction. Here, in occasional soaring
flights of grandiloquence, he reconstructs the last days in prison of two
weavers before they were hanged for insurrection.
In a recent interview Kelman has described himself as an existentialist,
citing authors such as James Hogg, Dostoevsky, Camus as his forebears. After
reading these fables of unresolved guilt the label stands, but he might more
accurately be described as an existential Jansenist, someone who believes
that most of us are doomed to damnation however hard we try to avoid it. A
bleak message, but one that is indelible in Kelman's work.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-477</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Books: A domestic minister - The man from middle England
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MALCOLM RUTHERFORD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MINISTERS DECIDE by Norman Fowler Chapmans Pounds 18, 372 pages
NORMAN FOWLER has always seen himself in politics as the man from middle
England. He represents a Midlands seat, Sutton Coldfield, where in the 1979
general election when Mrs Thatcher became prime minister he had the highest
Tory majority in the country. As a former journalist - he was the home
affairs correspondent of The Times - and one of the very few cabinet
ministers to serve almost throughout Thatcher's administrations, he is well
qualified to write about the experience. Perhaps not surprisingly, he has
produced a middling sort of book.
Some of it is very interesting, especially the parts about before he held
senior office. Fowler is grammar school/Cambridge, part of what he describes
as the Cambridge mafia which has held so many seats in recent Conservative
governments. It was between school and university, during his officer's
training course for national service, that he says that he discovered that
the Britain of the 1950s was 'still a class-ridden society'. The less-well
educated boys from the public schools looked down on the better educated
products of the grammar schools.
That is a revealing comment, which helps to explain what some of modern
Toryism has been about. Politicians like Fowler, and indeed Thatcher, wanted
greater equality of opportunity, and they wanted it within a competitive,
efficient system. They had little to do with the old Tory paternalism, which
too often went hand-in-glove with the paternalism of the trades unions.
Nevertheless, the new Toryism had its limitations. Fowler records Thatcher
saying as early as 1975 that she had spent all her time in home departments
and now needed to learn about foreign affairs. Some of the new Tories left
the learning process even later. Fowler spent his entire ministerial career
in domestic ministries and never really caught up with Europe. At heart and
in his head, he is a middle English nationalist.
Curiously, that was what led to one of his most decisive interventions in
government. By threatening to resign from the cabinet, he helped to stop the
sale of the former British Leyland to an American company. In a way, he was
right. The cabinet committee system had never thought to consult the member
who sat in the heart of the motor industry. Fowler says that Thatcher
promised at once that never again would regional and constituency interests
of a cabinet member be so overlooked.
By any but the very highest standards, Fowler had a successful ministerial
career. He helped to bring about the management buy-out in the National
Freight Corporation, one of the first of the privatisations. He pushed
through the electrification of British Rail against the opposition of Sir
Alan Walters. He was a prime mover in bringing in portable pensions. Mrs
Thatcher must have been genuinely sorry to see him go when he decided that
he wanted to spend more time with his children.
Probably he should have been made party chairman. He understood the Tory
party in the country, and he probably understood what makes middle England
tick. He records that he did not vote for Thatcher in the fateful party
leadership election in 1975, but along with Norman Lamont was instrumental
in seeking to persuade Sir Keith Joseph to run. When that enterprise failed,
he supported Sir Geoffrey Howe, but came quickly to admire the winner.
In the leadership election last year, he voted for Thatcher in the first
ballot and Michael Heseltine in the second. He thinks that Thatcher could
have won on the first if only she had been in the country at the time and
had bothered to campaign properly.
As a former journalist, Fowler should be mildly ashamed about the length of
his book. The more personal parts are the best. No-one would accuse him of
using a ghost-writer and it is rather courageous of him to seek to remain in
the House of Commons rather than accepting the peerage that would
automatically come his way if he were to step down at the next election.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXIV Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-478</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Books: Murky Vichy water - Britain's murderous involvement
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   BY ZARA STEINER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ASSASSINATION IN ALGIERS by Anthony Verrier Macmillan Pounds 20, 302 pages
ON CHRISTMAS Eve, 1942, 21-year-old Fernand Bonnier fired two shots into the
stomach of Jean-Francois Darlan, the Vichy leader in North Africa. Two hours
later Admiral Darlan died. The assassin, who had expected to escape, was
shot after a court martial in Algiers. Behind this assassination was a
complex and tangled story which Anthony Verrier has tried to unravel using
British and American secret service papers and interviews with informed
British and French respondents to compensate for the lack of officially
available documents.
The Darlan saga was part of a series of conflicts not easy to explore in a
short book. The most important was the growing divergence between the
pro-Vichy and savagely anti-Gaullist Roosevelt, who believed Darlan could
deliver North Africa into Allied hands, and Winston Churchill, favourably
disposed towards de Gaulle despite moments of irritation bordering on fury
and with a far more realistic view of the Vichy gamble. Having persuaded the
Americans to invade North Africa, Churchill found it necessary to propitiate
Roosevelt by acquiescing in the president's pro-Vichy line without
abandoning his preferred alternative.
The divisions between Frenchmen were even more complicated. The situation in
North Africa differed markedly from that in France. The main contenders for
control in Algiers, Darlan, Giraud and de Gaulle, each had wider political
ambitions which made control of North Africa pertinent to the French
situation. In France, the London-backed Resistance looked to de Gaulle, and
by 1942 the British were pledged to the Gaullists though many had strong
doubts about their leader.
In the overwhelmingly pro-Vichy North Africa, the Gaullist element
represented a tiny minority. Time and circumstance determined local
loyalties; supporters hedged their bets and changed sides. Roosevelt's
political emissary, Robert Murphy, was lost in this quagmire of shifting
political alliance. He ultimately opted for Darlan who, as Verrier confirms,
ran circles around the American. The British had no equivalent political
figure in Algiers until Harold Macmillan in 1943, but they had two SOE
missions in place, 'Brandon' and 'Massingham', building up an anti-Vichy
front.
The real Anglo-American divide came with the bargain struck in November,
1942 between Darlan and General Mark Clark confirming the former's authority
over North Africa in return for a French ceasefire. Eisenhower, in command
of 'Torch', was to remain loyal to this bargain despite growing doubts about
Darlan's loyalty. On the British side, after months of equivocation in
London, it was agreed that Darlan was an impossible choice. The British were
committed to de Gaulle and the Free French.
Diplomatic pressure from the British and Gaullists failed to move the
Americans. In this unequal contest, the British felt forced to turn to
clandestine operations. It is at this point that Verrier's account is of
gripping interest and where his reconstruction of events, if accurate, makes
for fascinating reading. All the tangled threads are brought together. If,
as the author argues, there was no concerted plan to eliminate Darlan, the
measures taken by British Intelligence described in this chapter made his
assassination inevitable.
Desmond Morton, Churchill's chief intelligence adviser, was involved, and
Colonel Keswick, second in command of 'Massingham', began new operations in
the murky world of Algiers. There was a key meeting in Gibraltar, on
December 4, with Morton present, for those to be involved in Darlan's
removal. Henri d'Astier, an equivocal figure serving on Darlan's staff, was
recruited to operate covertly with the British and given funds by OSS; his
brothers, Jean Bernard and General Francoise d'Astier, were with de Gaulle;
the latter was sent to Algiers for discussions with an unwelcoming
Eisenhower but also to warn Henri that the Gaullists should lie low,
The final role was played by Bonnier, one of a small group of young
anti-Darlan Frenchmen, who had been given uniforms, rations and pay by
'Brandon'. On November 18, Bonnier to his horror drew the short straw.
Verrier cannot say what or who finally pushed Bonnier over the edge. Giraud,
though absent from Algiers at the time, took power, wasting little sympathy
on Darlan but demanding that Bonnier be tried. At his court martial the
young man claimed to have acted alone. It was decided by d'Astier that he
was not to be rescued. The Darlanites had a victim; the anti-Vichyites a
youthful martyr. Verrier provides vivid descriptions of the clean-up
operations in Algiers and the subsequent contest between Giraud and de
Gaulle.
There is much new material here and the discriminating reader will be richly
rewarded. The difficulty is that this book falls between two stools. Despite
Verrier's efforts and simplification, the general reader will find this a
tangled trail to follow. The better informed will bridle at some of the
author's unqualified generalisations and at the lack of any but the most
perfunctory scholarly apparatus.
The author has shown in previous studies that he has special access to
intelligence sources. Many of his most startling disclosures have been
confirmed by papers that have come into the public domain. In this account,
however, references to open sources are unacceptably sparse, irregular, and
incomplete. The notes are tantalisingly brief. No one is helped by the fact
that this book is badly written. One cannot help but feel that Verrier had a
different book in mind. The result is everyone's loss.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-479</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Arts: Gregynog comes to London
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN PITT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE ARE books and then there are beautiful books which combine graceful
typography, sumptuous illustration with superlative printing technique.
Among the world's greatest publishers of limited edition, hand-crafted books
was the Welsh-based Gregynog Press which flourished between 1922 and 1940,
producing 42 books in that time. An exhibition currently showing in London
offers a rare opportunity to view some of them, as well as those of its
successor, Gwasg Gregynog (Gwasg is Welsh for press) established in the late
1970s and still in business.
Gregynog, located in Newtown, Powys, was the inspiration of two sisters,
Gwendoline and Margaret Davis, who purchased the hall, from which the press
takes its name, and 750 acres of land just after the end of the First World
War. The family wealth had been accumulated from the south Wales coalfields
and the sisters, wishing to be philanthropic, decided to create an arts and
crafts centre for Wales.
The press was to be an integral part of this enterprise and in 1922 Robert
Maynard was appointed the first controller, with Walter Bray as resident
artist, who curiously enough knew nothing about wood engraving and had to
learn the technique from Maynard.
But it wasn't until the 1930s, with the appointment of Blair Hughes-Stanton
as resident artist and William MacCance as controller, that Gregynog entered
a phase establishing it as one of the finest private presses in the world.
In the space of three years some magnificent books were printed, each
edition numbering rarely more than a couple of hundred copies, many
illustrated with wood engravings by Hughes-Stanton ('The Lamentations of
Jeremiah', 'Erewhom' and 'The Revelations of St John the Divine', being
among the best) and others by Agnes Miller Parker, MacCance's wife, and
Gertrude Hermes, married to Hughes-Stanton.
While the artistic quality during this period was superlative human
relations were less than harmonious and both Hughes-Stanton and MacCance
left the press in 1933. Seven years later Gregynog was wound up.
The University of Wales re-opened the press in the late 1970s, reusing the
same workshops and some of the original printing equipment, the first book
to be published being R. S. Thomas's Laboratories of the Spirit. Since then
other notable limited editions have been poems by Dylan Thomas, illustrated
by John Piper, and the Mountains of Wales, designed by John Ryder.
The early Gregynog Press books are now highly collectable and fetch many
thousands of pounds at auction. Those printed by Gwasg Gregynog are more
affordable (many of those currently in print can be purchased for under
Pounds 100, some for much less) and undoubtedly will become prized by
bibliophiles in the future.
The exhibition of continues at the Lethaby Gallery, Central St Martins
College of Art and Design, Southampton Row, London until May 16.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-480</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Arts: Heavenly choirs - Records
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD CRICHTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WILLIAM BOYCE was a chorister at St. Paul's who later became Master of the
King's Musick and organist to the Chapel Royal. He edited an important
collection of English cathedral music and was a prolific composer of
masques, anthems, chamber music and symphonies. He was one of our 18th
century masters, sturdy, clean-cut and spruce. He wrote too little for the
theatre. As his music for Dryden's The Secular Masque and the score put
together by Constant Lambert for the ballet The Prospect before us show he
had the genuine dramatic spark.
That spark is present in the Serenata Solomon (1743), a setting of words by
the Dublin writer Edward Moore based on the Song of Songs but falling on the
profane side of the fence. This is a delightful work in the vein of Handel's
Acis and Galatea, with amorous airs for He and She (as the lovers are
called) with occasional choruses. Don't be put off by the initial
nervousness of the soprano Bronwen Mills. She recovers in time to prove a
worthy partner for the stylish tenor Howard Crook. Good support from choir
and orchestra of The Parley of Instruments under Roy Goodman.
Sir John Stainer, Eminent Victorian musician par excellence, was also a St
Paul's chorister and later organist to the cathedral for many years. Like
Boyce he did valuable musicological work. As a composer he was less
productive and, to judge from The Crucifixion (1887), less rewarding. This
'Meditation' on the Passion was hugely popular in its time and still, it
seems, has loyal admirers.
The present Cathedral Choir is joined by the Special Service Choir founded
by Stainer. The recording has just enough of Wren's echo. Andrew Lucas is
the organist, John Scott conducts. They do their predecessor proud. In the
narrations the two soloists, while sounding totally sincere, manage to skirt
mawkishness. The baritone David Wilson-Johnson is more successful than the
tenor Maldwyn Davies in avoiding the genteel pronunciation (guilt-ee,
glor-ee) once thought seemly for religious texts. Did I hear someone sing
'Here in a basement'? Perhaps it was the echo.
The form of The Crucifixion, with hymns doing duty for chorales, owes
something to the Bach Passions, yet it is depressing to realise that the
style, five years after Parsifal, 40 years after Elijah, is still
mini-Mendelssohn. Yet Ethel Smyth's powerful Mass in D and Elgar's Gerontius
were only a decade or so over the horizon. Meanwhile, go back to Boyce for
comfort and still better to Purcell. A splendid bunch of his canticles and
verse anthem (with the Funeral Sentences for the Death of Queen Mary),
recorded by Decca during the 1970s with the choir of St John's College
Cambridge under George Guest, is now available on CD. These works, blazing
with vitality and originality, should restore anyone's faith in English
music.
Rossini's sanguine Stabat Mater (1842), gives a very different view of the
crucifixion to Stainer's, as ebulliently Latin as the other is piously
Anglo-Saxon. The new Philips recording from Bavarian Radio under the
enlivening direction of Semyon Bychkov sweeps all before it - the concluding
Amen chorus (does anybody still believe Rossini couldn't write a fugue?) has
tremendous drive. The male soloists (Araiza and Furlanetto) are good, the
women (Vaness and Bartoli) are outstanding (listen to the two latter in the
duet 'Quis est homo'). But I hope the soprano won't admit any more vibrato
into her tone.
The EMI L'Enfance du Christ made in the chapel of King's College Cambridge
by the Choir under Stephen Cleobury is decent but too soft-focussed. The boy
angels are faultless, the men's unison recitatives in the soothsayer's scene
unimpressive, the Choir as a whole is as expert as one would expect. Ann
Murray's Mary is vividly human. Likewise the Herod of David Wilson-Johnson.
The final, unaccompanied number threatens to go flaccid.
Nothing flaccid about the Erato recording of 1988 under John Eliot Gardiner,
made in the medieval church at Perouges near Lyons, and now available on CD.
This conductor's acute understanding of Berliozian colour and accent,
clearly conveyed by the Lyons Opera orchestra, provides exactly the sharp
focus the music requires. The Monteverdi Choir is its usual excellent self,
never more so than when they nobly sustain a slowish speed for the
Shepherds' Farewell. Jose Van Dam gives an account of Herod's scene which
one can hardly hope to hear surpassed for perfect legato suffused with
expressive shading. Both narrators are British. Tear (EMI) and Rolfe-Johnson
(Erato) are intelligent, musical and deeply committed artists. I recall
years ago a Columbia 78 by the French tenor Jean Planel, whose serene
objectivity seems in retrospect more appropriate than the modern singers'
involvement.
Boyce: Solomon (a serenata). Mills, Crook/Parley of Instruments/Goodman.
Hyperion CDA 66378 (2 CDs).
Stainer: The Crucifixion. Davies, Wilson-Johnson/St. Paul's Cathedral
Choir/Lucas/Scott. Conifer CDCF 193, cassette MCFC 193.
Purcell: Canticles, Funeral Music, Anthems. Choir of St. John's College
Cambridge/ various soloists and instruments/Guest. Decca 430 263-2, cassette
MC 430 262 4.
Rossini: Stabat Mater. Vaness, Bartoli, Araiza, Furlanetto/Bavarian Radio SO
and Choir/Bychkov. Philips 436 312-2.
Berlioz: L'Enfance du Christ. Murray, Tear, Allen, Wilson-Johnson/Choir of
King's College Cambridge/RPO/Cleobury. EMI CDS 7 49935 2 (2 CDs).
Berlioz: L'Enfance du Christ. Von Otter, Cachemaille, Van Dam, Bastin,
Rolfe-Johnson/Monteverdi Choir/Lyons Opera Orch./ Gardiner. Erato
2292-45275-2 (2 CDs).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-481</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Arts: The British Museum holds its breath .. - The runners
for the top job at the BM
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CHOICE has been made; the successful candidate has been informed; and it
only awaits the approval of the Prime Minister before the world knows the
name of the holder of the most important job in the British museum world -
the new director of the British Museum, who presides over a staff of 1,000,
more than 7m artifacts, and a budget in excess of Pounds 30m.
The abysmal salary for such responsibility, not much more than Pounds
50,000, shows the low regard in which the heritage is held in the UK, but
the prestige and influence of the position are enormous. It earned the
retiring incumbent, David Wilson, a knighthood and the respect of his
profession.
He will be a hard act to follow, one of the strongest upholders of the old
fashioned virtues of scholarship and service to the public among museum
directors. He progressed through the Museum, with archaeology and the
Vikings his specialities, and he has strenuously opposed admission charges
and the pressure to make museums amusement parks and profit centres. He did
his bit chatting up sponsors, and the Museum has new galleries to prove it,
but he was totally opposed to aiming at the lowest common denominator to
boost admissions.
There are eight known runners for his job and they present the Trustees with
a straight choice between an insider and an outsider. Among the BM staff who
are thought to have been interviewed are Jean Rankine, the deputy director;
Ian Longwirth, Keeper of Pre-History and Roman British; and Jessica Rawson,
44, who runs the Oriental Antiquities department.
There are no mavericks here. Under Thatcher the new directors of the leading
galleries and museums tended to be young, energetic but not notably
Thatcherite. Neil MacGregor at the National Gallery and Nick Serota at the
Tate face renewals of their contracts but seem set to run their galleries in
a sensible scholarly way for most of the next two decades. They are
defenders of traditional values and opposed to admission charges. Elizabeth
Esteve-Coll at the V&amp;A has most of the next ten years to prove that a museum
can widen its popular appeal without sacrificing its standards - if she can
put up with the backbiting.
The outside candidates for the BM also include no Young Turks. The obvious
front runner must be Alan Borg, 49, of the Imperial War Museum. He has
introduced charges but has also expanded and revitalised the institution. He
would be a safe choice, and did himself no harm by escorting John Major
around his museum while the interviews were proceeding.
Richard Marks, 45, has worked at the BM, made his name at the Burrell in
Glasgow, but has not done much as director of the Brighton Museum. Robert
Anderson, 46, of the Royal Museum of Scotland, is the dark horse, a low
profile career museum man who gets things done with little ostentation.
Another outsider is David Phillipson, who runs the museum of archaeology and
anthropology at Cambridge. Sir David learned his archaeology at Cambridge.
The joker in the pack is Jessica Rawson, who runs the oriental antiquities
department of the BM. Sir David was a BM insider who rose to the top and the
Museum likes to think itself impervious to outside political and economic
pressures. If the Trustees think that with John Major as PM they can choose
their own man they might go for the woman. If they want a sympathetic
outsider they will go for Anderson. If they want the Establishment choice it
will be Borg.
But one other candidate was apparently interviewed despite denials - Timothy
Clifford, 45, of the National Galleries of Scotland. Clifford has thoroughly
enjoyed himself becoming more Scottish than the Scots, but he has cherished
ambitions to run the BM since he was a humble assistant keeper there in the
1970s, and he has now given Edinburgh seven years. Clifford arouses strong
emotions. He puts up backs but he gets things done, and there is little
doubting his scholar's eye. If the Trustees want a re-charged BM he would be
the man: but tradition suggests that they will go for a more cautious
director.
No one plays market forces better than Sir George Christie, the Glyndebourne
supremo. He is building the first commercial opera house in the UK for
almost 60 years (the last actually was Glyndebourne) by threatening to
deprive businessmen of their tickets unless they pay for the Pounds 33m new
auditorium, due to open on May 28th 1994.
To stay a corporate friend companies have to pay up to Pounds 90,000. This
enables them to buy 120 tickets a season (but no more than eight a night)
for 20 years. No cheque, no guaranteed tickets. Most old friends have paid
up and Sir George has raised Pounds 24m even before foreign companies are
allowed to join the club.
Now the offer you can't refuse has been applied to the 10,000 on the list to
become individual friends of Glyndebourne. To continue as an opera lover in
waiting you must pay Pounds 50. It's a hard nosed approach that has worked
for other popular clubs, like MCC, and almost half the wannabees have forked
out.
Money apart, the extra 320 seats in the new theatre should reduce a
membership wait which currently exceeds 15 years even though more tickets
will be taken up by companies - and by the general public who, for the first
time, will be guaranteed some seats each night, plus 40 standing places.
The death of Graham Greene has profoundly changed the life of his nephew,
Graham Greene. He was also in the books business as a publisher with
Jonathan Cape, and to avoid any confusion was always known as Graham C.
Greene. Now he has dropped the 'C'. At the same time he has added another
job, as chairman of the Trustees of the Museums and Galleries Commission in
succession to the ebullient Lord Morris. The loquacious Welshman raised the
profile of the MGC several notches; Greene intends to continue the process.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-482</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Arts: Penelope rediscovered - Faure's neglected masterpiece
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAX LOPPERT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OPERA DE Nantes, one of the strongest of the French regional companies, has
revived Penelope (Monte Carlo, 1913), Gabriel Faure's only opera. It is a
work I have loved with a passion since getting to know it from the score
half a lifetime ago; later encounters via radio broadcasts and then via
recordings with Regine Crespin and Jessye Norman only increased the
enthusiasm.
Penelope is very seldom done (the 1970 production at the Royal Academy of
Music, which I unfortunately missed, is the only one mentioned in the annals
over last two decades). Seeing it a first time in the theatre fulfilled a
wish that lasted, unfulfilled, even longer than Ulysses's absence from
Ithaca. Often, first encounters of this kind contain an element of
disappointment: one comes to understand that there are sound (if not
necessarily admirable) reasons for the absence from the schedules of this or
that favourite rarity.
Not here: after last Friday's performance I insist more forcefully than ever
that this is a crazily neglected masterpiece. Exactly like The Trojans
before it was widely seen, Penelope is an opera enshrouded in critical myth.
Most of the textbooks tell us that it is worthy but undramatic, the late
fruit of a composer who was essentially a miniaturist, a chamber-music
thinker, and above all not a man of the theatre.
In the actual experience none of this is borne out - least of all the
untheatrical charge - but it is easy to work out how such misunderstandings
could come about. Throughout his life Faure's tastes in opera (he was a
committed Gluckian and Mozartian, a clear-eyed but not idolatrous Wagnerian,
and a foe of Italian verismo) and his distaste for obvious effects might be
taken for those of an artistic monk, incapable of even contemplating, let
alone producing, a properly effective (in all senses) theatre composition.
Yet, as Andrew Porter pointed out on this page after that 1970 RAM
production, on those very few occasions when rediscovery has been permitted,
it is exactly the work's reserves of theatrical power, its culmination in
climaxes of elevated grandeur, that can so enthral the newcomer. In truth,
it is a 'quiet' opera (analogously, Faure's is a 'quiet' Requiem). The pace
is moderate - but has Parsifal ever been deemed undramatic on that account?
To begin with, the musical motifs out of which each act is woven seem
undemonstrative, the scoring (which, according to false legend, the composer
left entirely to other hands) discreet, the mood elusive.
In fact, the dramatic pull soon proves inexorable. The late-Faure musical
language elicits an atmosphere of chaste, classical decorum - which in all
three acts is then broken into, fierily, by the incursion of the disguised
dramatic-tenor Ulysses. Penelope is not lacking in 'moments'; indeed, it is
studded with airs, melodic units in the style of late-Faure songs, expanded
in scale and emotional range until the whole opera becomes a tissue of
song-turned-into-opera of ineffable radiance.
The characters are sharply defined: not just the glorious dramatic soprano
(or high-mezzo) title role, or Ulysses, but all of the smaller parts -
nurse, shepherd, quintets of serving-maids and suitors. In spite of his
criticisms of Rene Fauchois's libretto (directed at its wordiness, and the
difficulty of keeping a disguised Ulysses credible for three acts), Faure
reached to its core. As Martin Cooper once wrote, 'In Penelope the
much-vaunted affinity of the French and the Hellenic genius does appear and
finds what may be its classic expression'. What proves so theatrically
unexpected about this affinity is the revelation of the Dionysiac as well as
the Apollonian aspects of Faure's classicism: the fire burning within the
noble edifice.
Penelope is unfashionable: perhaps, like Gluck's mature operas, it always
will be. In presentation it demands focus on the music, on the words (the
intimacy of the Nantes opera house was ideal), on the 'moral' ethos of the
whole dramatic treatment. Any staging that takes a modish 'critical' slant,
that substitutes production tricks for concentration on the performing
powers of the leading players, will surely collapse in ignominy.
The Nantes production had got its values right. It was not an entirely
gimmick-free piece of stagecraft - the producer, Christian Gangneron, put
Penelope and her maids in ancient Greek costume and the suitors in modern
European - but by current French standards its modesty of style was
otherwise startling, and its ensemble was admirably cast. Neither the
Orchestre des Pays de la Loire nor the house chorus is of the front rank;
under the patient, profoundly musical guidance of the veteran French
conductor Jean Perisson, the achievement surpassed all built-in limitations.
The most impressive feat was to find two convincing exponents of Penelope
and Ulysses. Isabelle Vernet, whose song recital at last year's Aix Festival
I praised so highly, is Regine Crespin's star pupil. All who love French
opera must pray that she continues to develop out of the limelight: for in
potential she is the French soprano the world is waiting for.
The voice is not yet 'finished'. Its use is not always free of breathy
impurity. But in warm, tender utterance of words, in unforced stage command,
in emotional shades and nuances, Miss Vernet surpassed all hopes. Mark
Baker, the young American whose Florestan was last year shown to
Glyndebourne Touring audiences, needs to work on his French words, which
were clear but sometimes bluntly accented. The youthful power and freshness
of the tone lent the chastely sculpted phrases a thrilling lift.
The final-curtain cheers, bravos and foot-stamping of the Nantes audience
suggest that the promise of the house brochure had been kept: this was
indeed 'the highlight of the season'. Now it's time for a British house to
take on Penelope.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIX Photograph Scene from Act 3 of Faure's only opera, Isabelle
Vernet and (left) Jocelyne Taillon in the Nantes production (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-483</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Arts: Satire opts for easy game
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ST GEORGE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
KIT AND the Widow have brought sporadic hilarity to The Ambassadors with a
patchy show by turns sophisticated and infantile. The performance is slick
and the material current, but at the moment it only occasionally finds an
authentic voice.
Musical satire has always been derivative and nostalgic about its own past,
and is usually parasitic on contemporary shows; so while the form of Kit and
the Widow looks back to Flanders &amp; Swan and to Lehrer, the content looks to
Lloyd-Webber and Sondheim. At times the West End jokes at the expense of
Bonnie Langford or Stephanie Powers seem pointlessly inward; but the musical
wit of 'People Who Like . . . Sondheim' and the steady stream of quotations
from classical opera keep the cultural side of the satire alive.
However, spots of immaturity threaten to spoil an otherwise wickedly funny
evening. The social satire is narrowly class based, wanting in judgment and
happy with easy game: the holiday maker on the Costa del Sol, the Bank
Holiday picnickers. And the evening becomes increasingly and distractingly
encumbered with costumes. In a show which provides such genuine delights as
'My War', a vicious attack on Margaret Thatcher sung with a hint of
Lincolnshire patois, it is disappointing to be subjected to a number in
which Kit Hesketh-Harvey dons a veil, picked up a violin and played (after
Nigel Kennedy) at Rimsky-Korsakov's 'Bumblebee'; why is this supposed to be
funny?
Hesketh-Harvey and pianist Richard Sisson were most creative when they
stepped off the pastiche trail and presented songs which worked by being
unexpected: the quiet 'Casablanca' about movie dreamers; or the angry 'Le
Cygne' about a swan dying in the flotsam of industrial waste.
The show keeps afloat with buoyant if predictable material linked by sharp
jokes: 'Ben Elton has sold out in so many ways' or 'Never go back for drinks
with a Kennedy.' The evening was never dull, but Hesketh-Harvey is better as
a serious lyricist, as he showed with the improving Yusupov in Oxford,
written under the aegis and influence of Sondheim.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-484</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Arts: Dramatic hot potatoes in Berlin - This year for the
first time the Theatre Festival has opened to a united Germany
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JACKIE WULLSCHLAGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE NATIONAL Theatre, One; Glasgow Citz, Three, the Royal Shakespeare
Company, Nil. Imagine an annual scoreboard like this and you get a sense of
the fevered response to Germany's Booker Prize of the stage, the
'Theatertreffen' ('Theatre Meeting'), in which the 12 'top' German-speaking
productions of the season are elected by jury and invited to Berlin for a
festival jamboree.
Who's in, who's out, which theatre has squeezed most productions into the
flurried three weeks (May 1-20) of full houses, roaring crowds and smoky
seminars about the future of drama? For the first time in its 28-year
history, the Festival opened last week in a united city, focussing the
familiar annual post-mortems on Berlin's bid for cultural dominance as part
of the fight to become the new German capital. Only one of the nine-critic
jury comes from Berlin - Dieter Kranz from the east - yet cultural centrism
has already taken root.
An unprecedented six of the Festival's dozen offerings are home-grown,
though the jury - unpaid and unloved - scrutinised some 400 new productions
across Germany, Austria and Switzerland. Outside Berlin, directors like the
Vienna Burgtheater's Claus Peymann huff about attempts to manufacture Berlin
as 'metropolis of the theatre', while Festival director Torsten Mass is
adamant: 'Since unification Berlin is the theatre capital of Germany'.
The hot potatoes this year are two works which turn on the nature of the
unified state, by Germany's best known living dramatists, Heiner Muller and
Botho Strauss. Teutonic heavyweights both, they are political allegories
whose painful topicality makes them recommended viewing for anyone trying to
fathom the divided background of the new Germany.
At the Deutsches Theater in the east of the city, Heiner Muller directs a
mammoth uncut Hamlet with his own contemporary postscript Hamletmachine
added on to make a seven-hour-plus show. 'We thought about what was topical
and really only found Hamlet to be so', says Muller. Erich Wonder's set
dramatises the shock of a literally changing climate - ice blocks melt and
drip into a pool of water - and Ulrich Muhe plays Hamlet as helpless
individual caught between two epochs. His 'To be or not to be' fumes with
dashed hopes, guilty impotence in a corrupt world, the certain knowledge of
crimes committed in an unaccountable past. Horatio (Jorg-Michael Korbl)
scrutinises the audience for fellow-travellers, and the murdered king
crosses the stage to the commentary from Stalin's funeral.
The ghost, says Muller 'is at once Stalin and the Deutsche Bank, the ghost
of communism and the phantom of an anti-social market economy'. His
Hamletmachine heralds the repression of the new order: Hamlet rises from the
deathfield and declares Denmark a prison - for which a better prison system
must be invented.
Muller has an Ophelia in flames; Botho Strauss's Schlusschor (Final Chorus)
 -in Dieter Dorn's production from the Munich Kammerspiele, has the German
national eagle released from the zoo by a woman who wants to copulate with
it, then destroys it because it is impotent. But where Muller turns drama to
up-to-the-minute metaphor, Strauss's theatre topples into symbol-heavy
indulgence.
Strauss was writing the play when the Wall came down and was then inspired
by Bernstein conducting Beethoven's Ninth in the uniting Berlin. The
symphony chants through the work along with Bach, folk songs and a
stereotyped portrayal of shabbily dressed 'Ossies'. Following a shriek of
'Germany's disappeared', a mirror (self-revelation) and a camera (preserver
of the historical moment) dominate the early acts before the wretched bird
proves so unserviceable in the final 'chorus'.
I shall return next week to two exceptional Festival Shakespeare
productions, the Schaubuhne's Winter's Tale and Timon of Athens from Bochum,
which also dally with contemporary metaphor but are much more besides.
Shakespeare, with three plays, tops the Festival bill; with Ibsen, Schiller,
Chekhov, the selection is representative of the strong classical bias of
theatres across Germany.
The two quirkiest choices come from Berlin. My schedule excluded the
Schiller Theater's Tales from Grimm, a one-man show by the Big Daddy of the
Berlin theatre, Bernhard Minetti, which opened on his 86th birthday. But I
did catch the Schaubuhne's Mothers and Sons, translated from the Spanish,
about two Mummy's boys which comedians Udo Samel and Gerd Wameling (the
Winter's Tale's clown) play as absurdist duet.
The piece is the interview between bank manager Krugger and 30-year-old Juan
D who lives with his mother and is applying for his first job, as the bank's
night watchman. But the bank doesn't come into it: through asides, farcical
gestures, crawls across partners' desks, hypochondriac fits, they argue
about maternal cooking, toy trains, tastes in women - hypothetical, as
neither has ever talked to one other than Mother.
Obsessions are mirrored by surrealist events - a frog crosses the plush
carpet and is wordlessly squashed, a thunderstorm breaks out within the
office - which Tomeo suggests are no odder than corporate life: daily
electronic renderings of Eine Kleine Nachtmusik before the 5pm announcement
wishing all employees a happy evening with their families, for example.
Berlin audiences have poured into this off-beat critique of work and the
adult world since it opened. Such eccentricities are as much part of the
Berlin culture as doughnuts and drunks and gallows humour and gruff
greetings. But will they last? Midseason, the Schaubuhne's budget was cut by
DM2.4m, aborting new productions and throwing the future of west Berlin's
most famous theatre into doubt. And as the festival opened last week, the
four directors of the west's super-tech Schiller Theater, the biggest
theatre complex in Germany, threatened to resign over financial problems.
In the east, Max Reinhardt's Deutsches Theater stands in preserved
fin-de-siecle splendour in the run-down Friedrichstrasse. Outside, the
Mercedes and BMWs parked along with the Trabbies suggest that the stage is
one of the few places where East and West Berliners are looking one another
in the face. Eighty per cent of Deutsches Theater audiences now come from
the west, and directors like Thomas Langhoff, the intendant elect, have
emphasised the political role of the Berlin theatres in this respect. But
Langhoff is also refusing to take up his post until adequate funding is
agreed: Deutsches Theater subsidies are currently DM12m against the Schiller
Theater's DM36-40m a year.
Another row bubbles away over the resignation of Manfred Wekwerth, intendant
of Brecht's Berliner Ensemble, ordered by Berlin's Senator for Culture,
Ulrich Roloff-Momin. Wekwerth was a member of the repressive SED Central
Committee which had curtailed artistic freedom in the city; he had also
worked with Brecht in the 1950s. Last week, Roloff-Momin was discussing the
rights to the plays with Brecht's heirs; should they now withhold them,
Brecht, staple diet of the Berliner Ensemble, will be suddenly off the
repertoire. And trouble also in the east for Heiner Muller's Akademie der
Kunste, which is to close at the end of the year. As Andrew Clark reported
on these pages about German musical life after reunification, so it is for
drama. Too many good theatres now offer too much at too high state
subsidies. There will be cuts all round and some of Berlin's most historic
stages may not survive. The offerings from Berlin in the Festival this year
are of the finest quality, but behind the scenes, the joke is to read 'To be
or not to be' as a dilemma off rather than onstage, while Langhoff, waiting
to sign his contract, is said to have recast The Sorcerer's Apprentrice as
his favourite villain - a bungling wizard in Bonn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII Photograph Political allegory, Heiner Muller's
Hamletmachine (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-485</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Arts: Words and connections - Radio
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BA YOUNG
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHO WOULD ever have expected to hear a reporter on the use of words? Radio 3
has been giving us little Sunday talks on Words for a time now, but from a
literary or academic standpoint. Now for a month they have Kate Adie, a
reporter, a woman reporter at that, and her choice of words is not only that
of a reporter but of a television reporter, not quite the same creature.
'Hello' was her first word study - a greeting increasingly common with us. I
don't think it matters how you spell it, as Ms Adie devoted her time to its
adjuncts ('How are you?') and its alternatives ('Good day, morning,
afternoon, evening'). She was likeable and interesting, and evidently as
able on radio as she is on vision. Tomorrow, hear her on 'belief', with its
chief connections, fairies, God and ghosts.
One word she is not to assess is 'apartheid'. No doubt there are people in
Britain as well as in South Africa who believe in that, but they are likely
to find public approval as easily as rapists. In Radio 1's Unbroken Spirit
on Monday we heard occasional white South African voices insisting that the
country belonged to them - because, for example, they had fought for it,
though I don't think they meant that they fought the British forces in 1899.
But the programme was intended as an impartial argument, not even between
the ANC and the Nkatha. It was an hour-long feature built around a poem
written and performed by a black South African poet, Mzwakhe Mbuli of
Soweto.
The poem used simple, saddening phrases repeated again and again, with
archives from recent South African history inserted as counterpoints -
'Imagine what life could have been like]' 'What a shame, Africa]', the
'shame' being such matters as the death of Steve Biko, the imprisonment of
Sisulu and Mandela, and so on. We heard Archbishop Tutu, and we heard
Verwoerd, Botha and de Klerk. I hope it won't sound as if I am on the wrong
side if I say that 'what life could have been like' was life over the border
in Botswana, or up north in Kenya (to which Mzwakhe gave its long 'e', bless
him.)
The feature might well have kept a black South African audience rapt, but I
should be surprised if many listeners to Radio 1 stayed with it for long,
certainly not for its full hour. All the same, I think it was right to have
scheduled it, especially at two o'clock on a Monday afternoon. Now how about
anti-apartheid promotion of the kind that average Radio 1 listeners would
stick with, like its information about Aids?
And since I am with Radio 1, I have to apologise that Paul Simon, about to
be celebrated in seven programmes, is not my cup of tea, though I used
sometimes to listen to Simon and Garfunkel in the 1960s.
Radio 3's Sunday play, Kingdom of Crows and Carrion, was adapted from
stories in the Mabinogion by David Calcutt. The Mabinogion, Welsh mythical
tales from the 14th century, is described by BBC publicity as 'an
unbreakable cycle of murders, curses and revenge', and this is just what
Calcutt has made it. 'It will take a long time,' says Gwydion the magician,
and so it does.
King Pwyll, who lives under his mother's curse, swops a year of his life
with Arawn, king of the underworld, on condition that his wife Rhiannon is
not touched. But of course she is, so Pwyll casts her adrift in a boat. She
curses him and has two children, son Pryderi and daughter Aranrhed. Pwyll is
killed hunting a white hart (really Rhiannon) and Pryderi becomes king.
Aranrhed curses him, never to have a wife, but he takes up with Blodeuedd.
Her brother Math tricks Pryderi into war, and kills him (by magic) in single
combat. When Math dies he is succeeded by his son Lleu (whom we met earlier
disguised as an eagle).
There is more yet, more of the murders and curses. Blodeuedd ends up as an
owl. I think the play should have been done as a serial, so the director,
Nigel Bryant, and the singers could have infused extra freshness. It is too
repetitious, too much on the one note, to stay charming for an hour and
three-quarters.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-486</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Arts: Mean Miser on the South Bank
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MALCOLM RUTHERFORD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE NEW production of The Miser at the Olivier Theatre establishes one point
beyond reasonable doubt: Moliere can be played just as well in English as he
can in French. That is not only a tribute to the new translation by Jeremy
Sams, which contains some striking use of the vernacular and is sometimes in
verse where Moliere is in prose. It is also a compliment to the entire
production. This is the first time that I have seen Moliere in English
without being unduly conscious of the original in the background.
Apart from that, the production is interesting rather than brilliant.
Although it is played more as a comedy than a tragedy, it contains some
gratuitous streaks of violence, notably when Valere - who, on any normal
reading, is one of the good guys - beats up the coachman. There is a further
unnecessary vicious streak at the end when the miser's gold is tipped out of
its box. Since he is already isolated and humiliated, it might be better to
leave him alone with his treasure.
There's not a lot to be said either for the women in the play, though I
suppose that is Moliere's doing as much as anyone's. Eleanor Bron has her
moments as Frosine, the go-between, early on, but gradually falls out of the
plot.
The real stars are the men. Best of all is David Ross as Master Jacques, the
coachman and cook who adjusts his dress in accordance with the role in which
he is being addressed. His versatility extends to running dangerously up and
down a set of rather rickety steps on the Olivier stage. I think that the
accent is Lancashire; anyway, Ross turns the character into a gem of a part.
Some of the other male servants, who have fewer lines, are also outstanding.
Harpagon, the miser, is played by Charles Kay as an introverted figure,
almost a psychological case. If that is the way you want to do it, there is
no fault with the performance. Personally I would have preferred a bit more
show of miserliness and avarice on the grand scale. This man is just mean:
more an autocratic father than a huge tragi-comic figure.
There is no need to carp, however. Steven Pimlott's direction shows that
there is room for more than one interpretation. The play in general is a
delight. Watch the way the plot unfolds with the appearance of Anselme, the
deus ex machina. You will be inevitably reminded of Twelfth Night. The
audience, no doubt noticing the similarities, loved the denouement, which
was perhaps the first time that the full comedy came through.
We have had two recent performances of Corneille comedies at the Old Vic,
and they went down very well. One hopes that the arrival of The Miser in
this form will help to establish French 17th century drama as a staple part
of the English diet.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII Photograph Eleanor Bron as Frosine and Charles Kay as
Harpagon in Steven Pimlott's production at the Olivier Theatre (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-487</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Gardening: The menace of tunnel vision - Two perils at the
nursery
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBIN LANE-FOX
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THIS unusually cold spring has widened the gap between town and country.
Towns already have buds on their roses, leaves on their mountain ashes and
flowers on wild peonies. Country gardens have roses with yellow young
leaves, retarded sycamores and a late flush of flowers on white magnolias.
The winds have tested young plants' stamina and reminded us of some sharp
lessons. They concern two modern menaces: plants in peat composts and plants
which are sold from plastic tunnels.
First, a word about a third menace which I put to you two weeks ago. The
flowers on wild fritillaries are being eaten by lily beetles.
In July, 1989, lily beetles hit the headlines in the RHS magazine, The
Garden: we were warned that they were 'very destructive to Lilium species,
while fritillaries are also at risk.' A map showed sightings of this scarlet
beetle in a 25-mile radius round Chobham in Surrey.
By August, 1990, either the beetles or the beetle watchers had extended
their travels; a second article warned that this handsome little pest had
turned up in Aylesbury, Salisbury and even Oxford, the wild fritillary's
home. Dozens of you have written, saying you have found this
beautifully-coloured pest on lilies and fritillaries, both wild and
cultivated. I have failed to find it on the fritillaries now withering in
Oxford, but it must be the reason why the flowers appeared half-eaten.
According to the Daily Telegraph, it should be killed on sight. I can see
why they are worried: it is bright red; it originated in Europe and it has
begun to infect the Tory heartlands.
The other two menaces are best met by patience and timing. They are at their
most dangerous at the moment. Every year, I vow that I will not be caught
again, but I succumb to temptation. The main cause is competitive shopping.
In March the sap is rising in all acquisitive gardeners; stocks of the best
plants are low and naturally you and I want to get in before each other. As
a result, I start my shopping in early March.
Most nurserymen bring on their plants in polythene tunnels so they will look
all too fresh and green for the public during the Easter trade. It appears
to be almost impossible to sell dormant plants with bare roots on the
general market. If the nurseries are in a hurry or if they are transporting
plants in bulk, they grow them in light, peat composts in which the plants
make a thin cocoon of tiny white roots.
I have to buy them before you do but they are quite unfit for the garden.
Two things then happen in the cycle, both of which are good for the nursery
trade but highly annoying to me. Anything left outside on a coldish night
before June is likely to go brown because it is missing the shelter of its
polythene tunnel. Anything transferred directly from a peat compost to
ordinary garden soil stands a high chance of refusing to face the struggle
and going quietly into reverse.
Sometimes, the label tells you to add more peat round the plant when you put
it in: I resent this, because the nurserymen introduced peat in the first
place and whatever we may feel about its ecology, the fact is that few of us
garden on it. The thin, white roots which have twined round the compost are
not keen to battle with an average garden's earth. I have decided to treat
plants in peat mixtures from nursery-centres as if they are glorified
cuttings which are not fit for normal life. They need a season's adjustment
in a nursery bed of friendly compost. By then, they will be fit for proper
life outdoors.
At Pounds 1.80 each, these rooted cuttings are expensive enough. However,
delay has its advantages and allows you to take revenge. During the trainee
year in the nursery bed, this year's young plants will toughen up and allow
you to split each one into four or five when you transplant them. With
patience, you can turn one into five, instead of buying three replacements
for those which fizzled out in their first summer.
The tunnel problem needs particular caution this month, but the answer is
patience. When the young plants come home treat them as if they were no
safer than young bedding plants. Fresh from a tunnel, they need to stand in
a cold frame, an unheated greenhouse or shed, until the nights warm up. If
not, they too, will die with amazing rapidity.
I have just set a record for tunnel deaths. On the Friday before last, I
planted a young Escholtzia stauntonii which had been bought at Pounds 3.50
in Wiltshire: the well-informed owner assured me that the plant was hardy.
It came from a batch on display outdoors, but evidently it was on temporary
leave from the tunnel. No exit could have been quicker. Admittedly, the
plant was also in peat, but it was stone dead by Saturday morning, even
though I had remembered to water it and nobody had gone near it with the
dog.
Be warned: young, fresh shrubs may look inviting in garden-centres under
cover, but weather is strongly against them in the next three weeks. I have
some scorched deutzias, a 'hardy' penstemon reduced to two twigs and some
white-flowered Bleeding Heart which has gone black on the tips of its
overdeveloped green leaves. Do not be deceived: what looks best is least fit
for use.
These complaints are not the result of throwing Pounds 3.50 on to a
peat-based rubbish-heap. Keen amateurs seem to share the grievances.
Patient, traditional nurseries share them too, especially when the owners
are worried about turnover, not least because of compulsory registration for
VAT.
Last weekend, the sun was setting on a veteran nursery's peonies as the
owner told me that she doubted whether two thirds of the plants sold in peat
to the public survived their first year: personally she grows and sells
everything in proper earth.
During the winter, a grower asked me to see his system: it takes perennial
plants from the seedling stage to a peat-based pot in about as much time as
it takes me to weed the main flower beds. The poor little things are
force-fed fertiliser from a drip. You and I then buy them for Pounds 1.80.
Be sceptical, be patient: what you buy with a label may be a young
alcoholic, not fit to be weaned from the bottle and exposed to hard reality.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-488</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Motoring: User friendly
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STUART MARSHALL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AS I held a steady, relaxed and almost silent 200 kph (125 mph) on the
rainswept autobahn in the latest VW Passat, the days when Volkswagens really
were people's cars seemed a long way away.
Nothing could have been more different from the five VW Beetles I owned, one
after the other, in the late 1950s and 1960s, than this 174 horsepower
alternative to the likes of BMW, Mercedes and, of course, Audi.
Heart of the VR6 Passat is a compact new 2.8 litre engine with six cylinders
set in so narrow a V-shaped block that superficially, it could be taken for
a four-cylinder unit.
Power delivery is as smooth as it is vigorous over a wide speed range and a
catalytic converter is standard.
Users should see an average fuel consumption of 28-30 miles per gallon,
although not if they put two miles - or more than three kilometres - into
each minute.
If fuel economy and reduced pollution are more important than performance,
VW offers the same cars with a 1.9 litre, 4-cylinder turbocharged diesel
engine.
It has a simple kind of catalyser and an exhaust gas recirculation system.
So clean is it environmentally that it qualifies for the provisional German
tax exemption scheme which saves buyers DM550, or about Pounds 180.
The turbocharger is not fitted to boost performance. It feeds excess air
into the cylinders and makes combustion so complete that particulates
(microscopic bits of carbon seen as smoke) are below 0.08 of a gramme per
kilometre.
With only 75 horsepower, of just 10 per cent more than the naturally
aspirated VW 1.9 litre diesel delivers, the environmentally friendly Passat
has a fairly leisurely performance.
It does not feel as lively or even quite as refined as, say, a 1.9 litre
Peugeot 405 or Citroen BX turbo-diesel. But its average 44 mpg (6.4 l/100
km) makes it very economical for a roomy and solidly built 5-seat saloon.
The new V6 and umwelt (environment) diesels will not arrive in Britain until
VW's 1992 model year starts in the autumn.
Specifications will be high. Although prices have not been finalised, the V6
saloon is expected to cost around Pounds 21,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII Photograph The VR6 Passat with a new 2.8 litre engine. Power
delivery is as smooth as it is vigorous (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-489</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Archaeology: Buried memories
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GERALD CADOGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE OTHER day as I climbed the steep hill on the south coast of Crete
memories flooded back of my first excavation which followed a discovery on
the island 29 years ago.
In 1962 Sinclair Hood, Peter Warren and I came on the place when travelling
around to look for ancient sites, following old Turkish roads that took us
to out-of-the-way places. At Myrtos village on the edge of the fertile
valley of the river Myrtos we camped on the beach. Next morning the
villagers urged us to go and see the collection of local antiquities in the
school.
Little did I know that this would lead to uncovering a surprisingly rich
Minoan village, with a 1,200 year lifespan, a huge quantity of finds, a
communal tomb that was at the heart of the religious life of the village, a
tower and cisterns that alter the conventional view that the Minoans were
always at peace and a grand country house which, while not a palace like
Knossos and Phaistos, was a local centre of the economy, administration and
society with architecture to rival the palaces.
A short look at the schoolmaster's collection from the hill of Pyrgos across
the valley had us climbing it immediately. First, we saw fantastic views
along the coast and up the valley to mountains that encircled the horizon.
Then we came on the walls of a Minoan settlement. Pot shards on the ground
told us at once that it had been inhabited for more than 1,000 years. We
found ten stone vases in half an hour and sniffed a big discovery.
In 1970 I was given a permit to start a dig. It is hard to believe now, but
for the first fortnight we found nothing except a bare paved yard. We were
amazed and disappointed. The team grew gloomy. So we had a party, which was
an undertaking in the days when there was no electricity and an awful road
to town and the village got meat only on Friday when the cafe owner killed a
pig. But it did the trick. The next day at five past six, when some
celebrants were still stumbling up the hill, we found a clay tablet written
in the Minoan Linear A script recording 90 units of wine, probably as a tax
return. These tablets are rare, restricted to first and second rank centres.
It confirmed that Pyrgos was important.
After that finds never stopped. We dug two more seasons and three short
sessions and have found enough that is new and of good quality so that, 20
years and thousands of vases later, I am still studying the finds and
learning more of the rich life of an early Cretan village. This past month I
have been again at Knossos where the finds are stored to study them.
The first settlement at Pyrgos belongs to the time before Crete had made the
jump to a hierarchical society and the palaces built to enshrine it. It was
founded around 2700 BC and burnt down around 2200, probably in war.
Our earliest substantial buildings are of the second settlement (2100-1850),
the period when the first palaces were built. People returned to Pyrgos and
terraced the debris of the earlier fire to make a street along the west side
of the hill. One of the oldest roads in Europe, it leads to a yard and two
storey building which was a tomb, although it looks like a house. Such a
formal approach means it was an important public monument, perhaps a
memorial to the dead of that first destruction.
For 600 years bodies were put in the tomb in a semi-basement burial chamber
and offerings in an upper room at the level of the yard.
The third settlement (1850-1650 BC) dates from the heyday of the first
palaces. In an anteroom in the tomb a stack of 46 bowls, which may have been
for soup for the dead, had slipped off a plaster shelf.
In the chamber were male burials. (We do not know where the women went). A
layer of white lime and charcoal separated them from the last burials, again
male, which belong to the fourth settlement. The charcoal suggests
fumigation, and the lime either that the dead were buried in quicklime to
hasten decomposition and allow the bones to be taken up after three years
and put in the next door ossuary (as happens in Greece today), or that the
tomb was, as the Bible says, a whited sepulchre.
The village also acquired a plastered cistern 3 metres deep and 5 metres in
diameter to hold 90 tonnes of water, and from a tower overlooking it the
villagers could have shot arrows when enemies attacked their water supply.
On the top of the hill was another cistern, holding 22 tonnes and perhaps
belonging to a ruler's mansion. Cisterns and towers, rare in Minoan Crete,
point to war; a likely scenario as a fire also wrecked this settlement.
Down the slopes were vast amounts of pottery. Putting the pots together was
a giant jigsaw puzzle, as we found joins across 200 baskets of shards with
500-750 shards in each. But it has been worthwhile. Their close links with
the pottery not of Knossos but of the Mallia palace along the north coast,
as we and the French excavators of Mallia both discovered, point to a
separate state in first-palace times centred on Mallia and including Pyrgos.
Thus the broken pots reveal that Crete was not a political unity at the
time.
Pyrgos prospered most in its fourth phase, 1650-1450 BC, until fire and
havoc struck again. Crete was then united under Knossos and the island was
rich. A thousand vases and stone vases, daggers and conch shells covered the
last burials in the tomb. A grand country house built of fine masonry and
coloured stones ruled the village. It lived off the farming in the valley,
keeping the produce in its storerooms and listing it on Linear A tablets,
before sending some on to the palaces as tribute.
I imagine a master builder was brought from Knossos to build this last and
most splendid of the public buildings of Pyrgos, aligning it for the best
view up the valley and laying out a courtyard in front of the house, where
we found nothing in the first weeks. I should like to have met him and the
other craftsmen in the 1,200 years of Pyrgos, to thank them for polished
gypsum steps and tomb and cups and cisterns and all we have been fortunate
to find 3,500 years later. They deserve all the time it takes to reveal
their remarkable village.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-490</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Travel: The happy isles - Snapshot
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGELA WIGGLESWORTH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Isles of Scilly are a group of 100 tiny islands clustered in a deep blue
sea with white sand on their long curving beaches, palm trees in cottage
gardens, fields of daffodils in November, wild orchids in the hedgerows in
summer.
Huge rocks hewn into primeval shapes jut from the sea where seals and
dolphins swim and the grass on the coastal paths is springy underfoot.
Winters are mild, summers generally sunny and visitors return year after
year not just for walking, boating, fishing and bird-watching but for the
peace and friendliness they find.
The islands lie 28 miles south-west of Land's End, the most southerly point
of the British mainland. Only five are inhabited (pop: 2,000) and there is
accommodation on all five. St Mary's, three miles by two, is the largest and
the only place where private cars are allowed . With its shops, restaurants,
pubs, cafes, hotels and guest houses, it has a bustle that is noticeably
absent from the other islands.
Tresco has sub-tropical gardens. St Martin's, with a population of 84, has
recently acquired a 24-bedroomed luxury hotel. On St Agnes you can hunt for
beads buried in the sand from a 17th century wreck and have delicious
pasties at The Turks Head. On Bryher, waves crash spectacularly on to the
gigantic rocks of Hell Bay.
The great pleasures of the Scillies include inter-island boat trips, with St
Mary's boatmen visiting hotels and guest houses at breakfast to announce
their programmes for the day. Other islands have their own boats and,
weather permitting, visit most places most days.
An old poem still seems to sum up the Scillies: 'Rocks and sand and barren
land, a church without a steeple. Houses made of ship-wrecked wood, full of
happy people.'
Tourist Information Centre, St Mary's, Isles of Scilly, tel: 0720-22536.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-491</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Travel: A slowly crumbling Norman heritage
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL BURTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CITY centre of Caen in Normandy is hardly picture postcard country, but
there is one carte postale I found irresistible. It shows two views side by
side. One is of present-day Caen: an unremarkable skyline of rooftops and
church steeples. The other is of exactly the same scene in 1944, after
allied and German bombing had reduced 75 per cent of the city to rubble.
You can hardly see the joins in modern Caen, which in its pristine
restoration is a monument to its craftsmen. The French have lovingly
recreated the city centre in the famous local stone and made a tourist
industry out of other D-Day sights, from the Normandy landing points to the
Museum of Peace, on the edge of the city.
It is a shame, then, that while so brilliantly restoring their immediate
past, the local authorities in Normandy appear overwhelmed by the task of
maintaining their more distant heritage. Disintegrating chateaux, bulging
barn walls, peeling country houses and collapsed floors bear witness to the
pathetic decay of many rural buildings.
As is not the case in England, the immense burden of restoring the huge
number of historic sights in Normandy falls largely on private owners. In
many cases they are achieving wonders, but the battle against time and the
elements is visibly still not won.
Normandy's weather is wet, its fields fertile; its old castles still have a
fairy-tale air about them. Away from the thundering Caen-Paris autoroute,
the morning mist swirls over a countryside of one-storey timbered cottages
their rustic dereliction a reminder of rural life as it used to be in the
English home counties.
It is lovely to behold, but a closer look shows much of it decaying at a
fast rate as I began to realise when visiting the Eure, one of Normandy's
five departements. Outside one chateau I noticed that part of the medieval
wall around the grounds was collapsing and that its original wattle and daub
was bulging out for all to see. I thought this extraordinary, never having
seen such a sight in England without archaeologists' barriers keeping the
sticky-fingered public at bay. Here, I could have prodded and pulled to my
heart's content. There was not a soul around, let alone a barrier.
Inside, the chateau had its top rooms shut to the public because the roof
was disintegrating. On the way back to my rented gite I passed a classic
medieval timbered Normandy barn, its wall collapsing into the road. In its
death throes the barn showed us its innards - the wattle, daub and beams
used several centuries previously. It was a gem that in England would be
meticulously preserved; in Normandy it was falling to bits.
When I later visited the former abbey church in the market town of Bernay I
was first aghast and then annoyed to find it given over to a sale of antique
and expensively-priced wardrobes. A later trip to the 17th century chateau
of Beaumesnil near Evreux revealed upper floors closed to the public with
cracks in the ceiling and wall plaster. Ditto for the nearby chateau of
Harcourt, erected in the 12th century by a Crusades companion of England's
King Richard the Lionheart and later rebuilt in the 17th century.
Its current owner, an agricultural institute, has obviously done sterling
resurrection work to what 20 years ago was a ruin. But the decay on the
upper floors suggests the scale of the task still to be completed. Even the
home of Claude Monet in Giverny, now a must on most tourists' schedules (it
is only 90 minutes from Paris), has been restored largely with US money.
In Britain, numerous great houses have been handed to the National Trust to
maintain, but in Normandy the fact that so many mansions are privately owned
is both charming and worrying. It gives an individual character to many
properties but means that potential income which could be used on
maintenance is being lost through poor or non-existent marketing.
Part of the problem is the sheer number of historic sights in Normandy. The
excellent and locally-published guide, Chateaux and Gardens of Normandy, by
Philippe Seydoux lists 47 historic properties in east Normandy and 57 in
west Normandy open to the public - virtually all privately owned. Many have
been beautifully restored; at others, the efforts at maintenance are
excellent. But these are the ones whose owners have renovated them and are
prepared to take visitors. It excludes countless others that are abandoned
or simply closed to public view.
Even with those which are open, Seydoux advises visitors to check conditions
of entry first. This is wise since the listed sights are not, like most of
those in England, regularly open to the public. The owner of the fine 17th
century chateau of Boiset-les-Prevances, for example, near Evreux, will only
receive groups of visitors by advance appointment.
Normandy is a wonderful area for gentle touring. It would be a pity if much
more of it crumbled and fell.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-492</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Travel News: Cheaply to France
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID CHURCHILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FRENCH holidays, as we reported in this column last week, are increasingly
popular this summer - helped not only by Peter Mayle's idyllic view of rural
French life in his books but also because France offers good value for money
for recession-weary travellers.
But finding the cheapest way across the Channel can be a daunting prospect,
especially as ferry operators gear up for the challenge of the Channel
Tunnel by offering a confusing array of special deals.
With a nice sense of timing Holiday Which? magazine has this week
investigated (with all the determination of a truffle-hunting pig in
Provence) the best fares to the continent.
Based on four adults travelling in a medium-sized car on a peak-time
crossing in August, the cheapest return fare on a short crossing to France
is Sally Line's Pounds 259 deal on its Ramsgate-Dunkirk route.
For the longer crossing to France, Sealink has a Pounds 215 Apex return on
its Newhaven-Dieppe route for which you have to book and pay at least 28
days in advance. Otherwise, the best long-route deal is with Brittany
Ferries' Truckline: Pounds 329 Poole-Cherbourg return.
For Benelux countries a Pounds 200 return fare with Olau Line on its
Sheerness-Vlissingen route was the the cheapest.
The magazine points out that the shortest crossings are not necessarily the
cheapest: the Dover-Calais crossings operated by P &amp; O and Sealink may be an
hour shorter than the Sally Line Sheerness-Dunkirk route, but cost up to 27
per cent more.
Sally Line, Hoverspeed and Brittany Ferries to Spain have cheaper fares for
cars under four metres in length.
Harry Goodman, former head of the collapsed International Leisure Group, has
wasted no time in getting back into the travel business - even though
creditors of the company are likely to recover only a few pence in the pound
when the company is finally wound up with debts of Pounds 400m or so and few
assets.
Goodman is acting as adviser to a new travel company, Riva Travel, being set
up by some former ILG managers and is already rumoured to be talking to
investment banks about forming a new airline once the recession is over.
Other executives of ILG have also bounced back: former Intasun managers have
started a mass-market tour operation called Sunworld, backed by the Spanish
company Iberotravel, and are selling Mediterranean holidays for this summer.
Club 18-30, another failed ILG company, has sprung back under the same
management, but called The Club because of travel industry rules forbidding
failed companies to start up again under the same name.
But the speed with which Goodman and his ex-colleagues have returned to the
travel scene is causing some disquiet in travel circles: the chaos caused by
the ILG collapse has left a bitter taste.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-493</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Travel: Almost the key to all mythologies - Unpredictable
Key West, Florida
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS WOODSWORTH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ON THE long string of islands stretching southwards into the Gulf Stream
from the Florida mainland, most wildlife is, at 2am fast asleep. On the
docks of Key Largo pelicans perch motionless in the moonlight on timber
pilings. On Big Pine Key miniature deer drowse in dark thickets. At water's
edge all along the keys, fiddler crabs have stopped fiddling and spoonbills
have stopped spooning. Even the fish, eyes lidless and gills pumping
rhythmically, sleep peacefully suspended in the gentle ebb and surge of
underwater reefs.
But there is one place where a bountiful collection of wildlife rarely
sleeps at all. On Key West, at the extreme southern tip of the islands, you
can count on finding a noisy, neon-lit circus every night of the week. From
sunset into the small hours, Duval Street is the haunt of a variety of
exotic creatures, some attractive, some repellant, gathered from all over
the US.
Out on the brightly-lit street, tattooed bikers on Harley Davidsons vie for
space with yuppy-driven Mercedes and hippy-powered bicycles. On sidewalks
overhung by palm and fragrant frangipani trees, a hundred bars, pizza
joints, souvenir shops and clothing boutiques suck in and disgorge crowds
voraciously seeking distraction.
Here trim and trendy Long Islanders struggle past obese Iowans. Would-be
novelists bump into one-time painters. Drifters beg spare change from
drunks. Philosophers argue with plumbers. Men pursue women. Women pursue
men. Men pursue men.
Somewhere along the 160 miles of keys and bridges that separate Miami from
Key West, the established rules seem to have fallen by the wayside. Losers
and winners, the dull, the witty, the elegant, the vulgar, the eccentric and
the desperate are all on the prowl together. Without a big top, without
protective bars, this is one of the gaudiest shows in America.
But Key West, as any aspiring student of literature is aware, is also touted
as one of the great cradles of American high culture. In the 1920s it was
the hideout of novelist John Dos Passos and poet Wallace Stevens; in the
'30s, home to Ernest Hemingway; in the '40s and '50s, a retreat for Tennesee
Williams. Stephen Crane, Robert Frost, Elizabeth Bishop, Truman Capote, John
Hersey, John Ciardi and many other prominent American writers lived and
worked here.
All this I discover in my Key West Reader, a book I have brought along with
the intention of whiling away long afternoons under some shady tree. Writers
have gathered in large numbers in Key West for over a century, I read,
because it represents 'a unique confluence of factors of history, climate,
physical beauty, cultural diversity, and unabashed romantic appeal.' This
tiny patch of coral only four miles long by one mile wide, I learn, is 'a
rare place in the geography of the American consciousness.'
High praise, indeed. It is a piece of information I take some time to ponder
as I sit in Rick's Bar one Thursday evening watching Rick's wet T-shirt
contest, one of the more celebrated events along Duval Street.
As iced water is poured over squealing female flesh, as puckered anatomies
reveal themselves beneath thin, soaked cotton, as the crowd roars its
approval and several young men jump up and attempt to rip the shirts
entirely off the contestants, I consider such lofty concepts as physical
beauty, cultural diversity and unabashed romantic appeal.
Well, yes, they are all here, in a way. But in such a way as to make Key
West a rare place in the American conciousness? Couldn't I see the same
goosebumps rise in Philadelphia? What has happened to the picturesque and
isolated retreat of the literati? What are the rowdy philistines of the
American hinterland doing to Key West? Is the artistic legend of the past
even now being pushed off its island perch and into deep water beyond the
reef?
The answer, in short, is no.
Ever since Spanish explorers came across it in the 16th century, the island
has been a place of unconventional activity and extremes of behaviour.
Physically detached and far from the suasion of middle America, this has
always been a refuge for individualists and eccentrics.
The list of colourful originals who have adopted Key West is long and
varied. War-like Indians and Spanish conquistadors were followed by pirates
who used the island to attack shipping. Hard on their heels came the
American Navy, and the base and seaport town that grew around it attracted a
drifting population of itinerants, adventurers and sea-going desperados. All
worked at building Key West's reputation as a place that played hard and
drank hard.
The island's 'wreckers' did nothing to decrease that reputation. Making
fortunes from the many ships wrecked along the dangerous reefs of the keys,
island salvagers had, by the 1830's, transformed tiny Key West into the
richest city per capita in the entire US.
In thin times, with the islands of the Caribbean just a fast boat ride away,
rum-running, gun-running and drug-smuggling have proved highly popular
activities. More than once Key West has seen itself revert to its early
existence as a neglected fishing village.
All this makes Key West the end of the line, a place that operates outside
the mainframe of conventional, middle-class American life. Back in the
1940's, Tony Tarracino, on the run from New Jersey gangsters, hitched a ride
into Key West on a milk truck and marvelled at its gambling, drinking,
womanising ways.
Of that day he now says: 'I knew as soon as I got off that milk truck that
Key West didn't belong to the United States.' He liked it and stayed,
opening his own bar. Today Tarracino, gambler, drinker, womaniser and
outsider extraordinaire is mayor of Key West.
Against this background, what kind of dent could any amount of high culture,
literary or otherwise, make? None whatsoever.
Like everyone else here, American writers in fact came to get away from that
kind of culture, and engaged in some fairly Key-West-like behaviour
themselves. The elderly and retiring Wallace Stevens became involved in the
one and only fist-fight of his life on Key West. The man who blackened his
eye, Ernest Hemingway, came to Key West to fish and liked to spend days
drinking at Sloppy Joe's Bar on Duval Street with a 300lb bartender named
Big Skinner.
Key West today remains a tolerant place where most kinds of people and
behaviour are accepted. And if today the island is coming under ever greater
pressure from commercial and property interests, it is being resisted by
Mayor Tarracino and by residents who a few years ago, and only half
jokingly, declared Key West an independent republic.
Nor should the unpredictability of Key West life be forgotten. As one old
island adage warns, perhaps just a little bit nostalgically, one good
hurricane and the whole place will be a quiet fishing village once again.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII Photograph A shrimp boat works off Key West, historically
the home of wreckers and pirates (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-494</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Wine: Consumers can call the tune - Is this the time to buy
the 1990 clarets?
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EDMUND PENNING-ROWSELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UNTIL last month's devastating frost, the excellent, record-size 1990
Bordeaux vintage had the disadvantage of being the third such in as many
years and the fifth of the past six. Although this would have presented no
problem for the generic reds and the dry whites in moderate supply, there is
not an unlimited demand for clarets of the higher appellations, from cru
bourgeois upwards, nor for Sauternes and other sweet whites which have had a
third fine vintage in succession. There can be too much of a good thing.
So, whereas the 1989 clarets met with near-hysterical reception almost
before the grapes were picked, those of 1990 arrived in a publicity silence
that persisted until after Easter when the wines could be tasted. Yet the
omens were highly favourable although, after an early budding, varying
weather led to protracted vine flowering, irregular ripening and harvesting.
What marked out the vintage was the exceptionally hot period from July 21 to
August 31.
An important factor in a Bordeaux summer is the number of days when the
temperature exceeds 30 degrees C (86 degrees F). Last summer there were 25,
compared with 11 in 1989 but with almost no rain. This resulted in a
precociously ripe Merlot, picked rapidly early in September, but a
Cabernet-Sauvignon (vital in the Medoc) that lacked juice and ripeness until
revived and swollen by a weekend of rain two-thirds through the month.
Those who had the courage to wait until the end of September and picked late
made the best wine, combined with those who thinned the grapes in July
(vendange verte) which more estates did than ever before. Otherwise, the
quantity of grapes could not support sufficient juice.
The Sauternes were exceptionally rich and concentrated and, unusually, the
vintage there was more or less complete before that of the reds began in the
Medoc. Whether '88, '89 or '90 will turn out the finest vintage in the
Sauternes could become a matter of enjoyable, consumable controversy.
Immediately after Easter - under the aegis of the Union des Grands Crus,
headed by Peter Sichel of Palmer and Angludet - 120 of the new wines could
be tasted and the fine quality of the vintage was confirmed. The clarets are
notable for their very deep colour: some, such as Pichon-Lalande, are almost
black. They have great concentration and are long in the taste.
The Medocs and red Graves are very tannic, although these tannins are
claimed to be 'soft' and not aggressive like the '86s and '88s. The
Merlot-dominated St Emilions are less tannic, and I found some excessively
oaky. The '90 Medocs are probably less regular than the '89s, but some
growers have the reverse view - and the wines are only six months old.
Unfortunately, the first growths are not members of the Union (although
Cheval-Blanc was available for tasting) but I was able to visit all the
others separately except Petrus which, like other Moueix-owned or managed
properties, was not shown. Nor did M Delon open his Leoville-Las-Cases or
Podensac, M Prats his Cos d'Estournel, or M Borie his Ducru-Beaucaillou,
Grand-Puy-Lacoste or Haut-Batailley, although I was able to taste these at
Ducru-Beaucaillou.
Of the first growths, Cheval-Blanc did not have exceptionally deep colour
nor, at the moment, a big aroma, but there was considerable flavour and
length. The Haut-Brion seemed less concentrated than the very rich '89 but
was fruity, elegant and typically Graves, with a certain reserve.
Ch Margaux was bigger and more tannic, with high colour and, compared with
the '89, very concentrated. Mouton-Rothschild, put into cask immediately
after the fermentation instead of being retained in vat for the second,
malolactic fermentation, was more difficult to taste but proved rich, ripe,
herbaceous and more oaky than the others.
The Lafite had a better structure and more acidity than the elegant '89.
Latour had a markedly deep colour and was very tannic but with great depth
of flavour. A typical Latour.
Tasting notes are not possible here, but the opportunities afforded for
comparison in the Union des Grands Crus tastings were very instructive. All,
of course, were cask samples which often are subject to variation. So I
mention only those which appealed particularly to me.
Red Graves: Dom de Chevaliere, Fieuzal, Haut-Bailly, La Louviere,
Larrivet-Haut-Brion, La Mission-Haut-Brion, La Tour-Martillac, Pape Clement,
Clos Fourtet.
St Emilion: L'Angelus, Balestard la Tournelle, Canon-La Gaffeliere, Figeac,
Pavie, Troplong-Mondot.
Pomerol: La Conseillante, L'Evangile, Gazin, La Pointe, Petit Village,
Trotanoy, View-Ch Certan.
Margaux: I missed most in order to visit the first-growths but I sampled
Palmer and Angludet, both big-coloured and fruity wines, with the former
more elegant. Growths spoken of particularly well included Rausan-Segla,
Issan and Monbrison.
St Julien: Beychevelle, Ducru-Beaucaillou, Granaud-Larose, Leoville and
Langoa-Barton.
Pauillac: Clerec-Milon, Grand-Puy-Lacoste, Haut-Batailley, Lynch-Bages,
Pichon-Longueville, Pichon-Lalande.
St. Estephe: Cos Labory, Montrose.
Haut-Medoc: Beaumont, La Tour-Carnet.
Medoc: La Tour-de-By.
White Graves: Chantegrive, Dom de Chevalier, La Louviere,
Larrivet-Haut-Brion, La Tour-Martillac.
Sauternes: Climens, Doisy-Vedrines, Rayne-Vigneau, Suduiraut.
We will soon be flooded with 'opening offers' of these '90 clarets.
Obviously, this is not a vintage to pass by, but should we buy them now? No,
if you hope to make a profit.
Since the much-publicised '82s, investment in wine has been played out. For
example, a typical duty-paid/delivered opening price for the excellent Chx
Margaux and Mouton-Rothschild '83s, was Pounds 365 a case apiece, and Pounds
465 for their '85s. The most recent top prices at Christie's were Pounds 480
and Pounds 360 for the '83s, and Pounds 340 and Pounds 380 for the '85s.
This does not allow for considerable inflation, and later vintages and
rather lesser classed-growths may fare little better.
There is, though, always a good case for prompt buying of petits chateaux
and clarets at Pounds 40-Pounds 70 a dozen in bond for, once sold out on
merchants' lists, they are unlikely to reappear.
For what may be designated as the Grands Crus, had it not been for the frost
there would have been little reason to buy now, especially for those who
have reserves of fine vintages. It is different, of course, for those
entering the opening offer market for the first time.
That the chateaux owners were nervous about selling their crops was shown by
the 10-15 per cent drop in prices, compared with the '89s. Some typical
examples per bottle with the '89 prices in brackets are: Mouton-Rothschild
(and other first growths) FFr205 (230), Pichon-Lalande 100 (125),
Duhart-Milon 60 (72), Haut-Bailly 66 (70), Clerc-Milon 57 (62), La Lagune 56
(62), Haut-Batailley 50 (57), and Chasse-Spleen 50 (57).
The Bordeaux merchants, anxious to hold no stocks, cut their margins except
for the first growths where they took their usual 25 per cent for a mere
book-keeping transaction.
Obviously, the frost has changed the situation. It is unlikely that the fine
'90s will be cheaper in a few years. But there is a great deal of unsold,
unconsumed claret all over the wine-drinking world and, in real terms, they
may not be more expensive - remembering that claret, or even other French
reds, are not the only wines in the bin these days.
There is, though, no call for panic buying. It is not the prolific '90s that
have been hit but the '91s that - good or bad - no one will want except for
a very small quantity of exceptional quality wine, as in '45.
Before choosing classed-growth '90 'futures', existing reserves, liquid
resources and likely demand 10 years hence should be taken into account; and
those apparently giving the best quality/price value should be considered
first. For this is the first year in 10 in which the consumer can call at
least part of the tune.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-495</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Food: Capital need for chocolate
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GILES MACDONOGH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALMOST two years ago to the day I was in Angers in the Loire Valley and was
taken on a tour of the city chocolate shops. It was hard not to be impressed
by the sheer dedication of these provincial chocolatiers, upholders of a
150-year tradition of quality chocolate making.
Like many French cities, Angers has its speciality which is available from
shops like La Petite Marquise in the rue des Lices: quernoux d'Angers are
nougatines dipped in blue-tinted white chocolate and fashioned to resemble
local slates.
In Galloyer in the rue Lenepveu there were fantastic arrays of hand-made
chocolates, some of them with Cointreau liqueur (which is made in the
suburbs) to give them a typically Angevin flavour.
Angers is just one town or city in a hundred. Virtually everywhere in France
you will find specialist chocolate makers in the same way as you would
expect to find a superlative pork butcher, baker or wine-merchant. Quality
thrives because Frenchmen care about what they eat.
The British are gluttons for chocolate. It is impossible to stray 100 yards
from your door without encountering someone crumpling a chocolate wrapper
after wolfing the contents. The big difference between the English and the
French, however, is that the Quaker families who started up chocolate making
in the UK addressed their main thrust to the mass market and, having won its
undivided loyalty, continued to smother it in Mars bars, Topics, Flakes and
Maltesers.
Apart from a handful of artisan chocolate makers selling in the West End of
London, the top of the British market is represented by firms such as
Thorntons and Bendicks. I visited Bendicks in Winchester, where the company
moved when Mr Benson and Mr Dickson sold out to the Hampshire company of
Cox. Having been variously owned by biscuit makers and cigarette
manufacturers, they are now owned by the Storck group of Berlin.
Seventy per cent of Bendicks' production is in the form of chocolate mints
such as their famous bittermint invented, it is said, by Mr Benson's
sister-in-law. Bendicks maintains its mints are the best in the world, which
is easy enough to say since only the British make this sort of chocolate and
the competition in the UK is not exactly fierce.
Still, Bendicks uses high quality chocolate - as I learned on my tour of its
factory - and it was interesting to taste the two elements of the
bittermint: the peppermint-flavoured fondant centre and the virtually pure,
unsweetened couverture which englobes it; by itself the chocolate is too
bitter and the fondant too fiery to be pleasant.
Bendicks' mints are good, but their chocolate boxes contain too many
synthetic flavours for my liking. Everything is made for a long shelf-life
with no perishable products being used. When I returned to London I asked
Paul Gayler, a chef noted for his chocolate, whom I should see. He put me in
touch with John Huber, the Swiss born chocolatier who heads the department
at the Thames Valley College in Slough.
Going from Winchester to Slough is a bit like descending from the sublime to
the ridiculous, but there was nothing foolish about Mr Huber who runs
Britain's only professional chocolate-making school. Huber had no illusions
about Britain. He pulled out piles of French, German and Swiss chocolate
making magazines: 'Look,' he said, 'every month they get these, and all this
equipment here, you can't get that in Britain, I have to go France once a
year to buy it.'
Huber took me into the workshop where some of his students were preparing
for exams. Any chef who wants to be able to master the fine art of tempering
chocolate has to pass through his hands.
'You can find decent chocolates here,' Huber told me, 'but for the time
being mostly in hotels: the general public aren't prepared to pay for
quality.' I suppose that it is good news but it will be a long time before
London can offer the sort of choice available to the people of Angers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-496</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Cookery: An autumn taste of Tuscany - Philippa Davenport
commends an Italian cookery course to Weekend FT readers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIPPA DAVENPORT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
I DID not enjoy my schooldays much but I would not mind becoming a student
again if it meant attending the Villa Arceno in Tuscany for its one-week
term in October.
The subject on the curriculum is A Taste of Tuscany and the co-hosts and
organisers are Anna Del Conte and Betsy Newell. Their talents, the location
and the provisional programme suggest a lovely blend of food, culture,
comfort and fun.
Betsy is no newcomer to cookery schools. She has been at the helm of her own
in London for the past 10 successful years, and she has owned a house near
Arceno for twice that long so she knows the Chianti Classico area well. Anna
Del Conte is Britain's most respected writer on Italian food, author of the
indispensable Gastronomy of Italy and the best-selling Secrets from an
Italian Kitchen.
The Villa Arceno estate is a beautiful 4,000 acres. It fell into disrepair
and neglect after the war and is only now recovering under the management of
a new consortium of owners. Gradually the buildings and land, the olive
groves, vineyards, woods, parks and gardens are being resuscitated. The
villa itself, built in the 17th century, restored and extended in 1825,
reopened this spring, refurbished as a small luxury class hotel. It is here
that the party will stay and the cookery school will be held.
There is no obligation to attend the classes. Non-cooking partners are free
to shoot pheasant, help harvest and tread the grapes, ride (horses or
mountain bikes), play tennis or swim.
The cookery classes will embrace techniques and the quality of ingredients
as well as regional recipes, their history and development. There will be
talks, tastings, discussions and demonstrations. And everyone will be
encouraged to try their hand at making pasta. There will be advice about
buying pasta and pasta-making machines. Tortellini and rotolo will be made.
The latter is little catherine wheels of pasta lusciously stuffed with
spinach, cheese and prosciutto. Prosciutto? Cue for discussion and
comparative tasting of Parma, San Daniele and other hams.
Traditional polenta recipes will be made using oven, pressure cooker and
old-fashioned stirring methods. The degree of milling needed for different
purposes will be examined, as will the merits of traditional versus
pre-cooked. Demonstrations will include polenta layered and baked with a
four-cheese sauce, and polenta moulded in a ring, the centre of which may be
filled with a wild mushroom sauce.
Autumn vegetables will be stuffed, including red peppers filled with
monkfish. There will be tastings of the new season's nuts and favourite
Tuscan recipes using local chestnuts and chestnut flour.
Game from the estate - wild boar, duck and venison as well as pheasant  -
will provide star turns, including a dish of boar in a medieval sauce to
which chocolate is added. Although boar is now obtainable in Britain, I am
assured that hare or spicily marinated pork make fine alternative candidates
for this treatment.
Lunches, whether taken in the Villa or as a fete champetre by the lake, will
tend to relate to the morning's cookery class. Dinner will usually be taken
in neighbourhood restaurants, some smart, some family affairs, all offering
characteristic Tuscan fare.
Food, although the pivot on which the course turns, is by no means the be
all and end all of things. The idea is to give the visitor a taste of all
things Tuscan, culture as well as cuisine - and the grape. A tour of the
estate's winery is planned and a tasting of wines from the region.
There will be opportunities to explore the history and art of the area with
leisurely afternoons and evenings in Siena, where an art expert will join
the party. One day will be spent in Florence and there will be a visit to
Pienza, a jewel of a Renaissance town famed for some of the best pecorino
cheese in all Italy. A feast of architectural treats and Epicurean delights
for Italophiles.
Just 20 places are available on the trip which will run from October 12-19
(a second one-week course will probably follow). The cost is Pounds 1300 per
person. This is based on sharing a room and does not include aperitifs or
spirits, but is basically an all-inclusive price.
For details and bookings contact: Anna Del Conte, 93 Elm Bank Gardens,
London SW13 ONX. Tel: 081-876- 4509.
PEPPERS STUFFED WITH AUBERGINES &amp; CROUTONS
This recipe is a sneak preview from Anna Del Conte's Entertaining
All'Italiana, to be published by Bantam in September. It will serve six as a
first or main course, when it might be teamed with other stuffed vegetables
or a dish of cannellini beans dressed with garlic, parsley and oil.
Although the recipe is written for immediately consecutive cooking and
eating, Anna points out that most of the tasks can be done well ahead. The
peppers can be grilled, wrapped and stored in the fridge up to three days in
advance, and both croutons and aubergines can be cooked up to two days
ahead. Always, however, delay adding the croutons to the aubergine mixture
until ready to stuff and bake the peppers.
6 meaty peppers, red and yellow; 1 1/2 lb aubergines; 4 slices good white
bread, 1-2 days old, cut into  1/2 inch cubes; vegetable oil and extra
virgin olive oil; 1 garlic clove; 1 dried chilli, seeded and crumbled; 4
anchovy fillets; 2 tablespoons capers, rinsed and dried; 4 tablespoons
chopped parsley; 1 dozen black olives (optional).
Peel the aubergines, cut into  1/2 inch cubes and sweat with salt in a
colander for at least half an hour.
Meanwhile char the peppers over a direct flame or using a very hot grill.
Keep a watch on them and turn them so they blacken evenly.
While keeping an eye on the peppers, heat some vegetable oil and when very
hot fry the bread until golden. Drain well.
When the peppers are cool enough to handle, peel and halve them. Discard
cores, seeds and ribs. Place in an oiled dish.
Rinse and dry the aubergine cubes. Heat 4 tablespoons olive oil and saute
the aubergine until cooked, about 6 minutes, stirring frequently.
Chop the garlic, chilli and anchovy fillets and add to the aubergine with
half the parsley. Cook for 1 minute. Draw off the heat, add the capers and
adjust seasoning.
Add the croutons to the aubergine and fill the peppers with the mixture.
Sprinkle with the remaining parsley, drizzle with 2 tablespoons olive oil
and bake for 10 minutes in an oven heated to 200 degrees C (400 degrees F)
Gas mark 6.
Do not serve this dish straight from the oven; let it rest for half an hour
or so, since stuffed vegetables are much nicer just warm. Scatter with the
olives just before serving.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-497</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Food: I dined on garlic - Eating in France
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GILES MACDONOGH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FINDING MYSELF alone in Aix-en-Provence, I booked dinner at the Clos de la
Violette (Tel: 43.23.30.71). It is reckoned to be the city's best restaurant
and I have no reason to argue with this view; until now my experience of
eating in Provence's prettiest city has been worse than dire.
The central theme of the menu terroir (regional menu) was garlic: first
there was ravioli filled with brousse (ricotta-like curd cheese) and garlic
and accompanied by snails fried in garlic; then there was a slab of salt cod
served on a bed of garlic puree; next came little lamb trotters stuffed with
garlic served with a quite superb potato puree made with olive oil and
poured into a tulip of potato crisp.
Three courses of garlic. I thought; how are they going to manage to get
garlic into the cheese? Where there's a will there's a way: the 'opus' of
brousse was crammed full of it, and there was no point in turning to the
salad for relief - that too had been treated. The desserts, I should add,
were garlic-free.
Fortunately I like garlic; anyone who does not should stay well clear of
Provence. I like Aix, too. The next morning, exhaling similar air to the
other inhabitants of the city, I took a stroll around the old market by the
town hall. Stalls had sprung to life after the short winter recess. There
were the usual piles of Provencal vegetables and mounds of white asparagus
from the Card. A punnet of local strawberries cost me 50p. In the cheese
shops were mounds of brousse. A local fishmonger was telling a housewife how
a slab of conger eel would enhance her bourride, or fish soup.
Fish soup is rather more a feature of the coast. I am a coward when it comes
to Marseille and have often foregone the pleasure of an authentic
bouillabaisse in order to get clear of the port as quickly as I might. Up
the coast from Marseille I ate a good fish soup at the Auberge du Port in
Bandol (Tel: 94.29. 42.63), it was accompanied by the usual rouille (a
liaison of chilli peppers, garlic, potatoes and olive oil), a bowl of grated
cheese and small pieces of toast.
In theory you put the cheese and rouille on top of the toast and pour the
saffron-scented soup over. In the Auberge du Port the soup was already in
the bowl and the only solution was to float little boats of rouille on the
surface.
I am told that one of the pleasures of life in Marseille is that you can buy
sea urchins from street vendors. I adore sea urchins - a delicacy unknown in
Britain. Lunching near Bandol one day, I sat with my host while he prepared
50 or so for the table. Using an instrument which looked like a cross
between a pair of forceps and garden shears, he cut the molluscs in two; the
bit you eat is the star-shaped orange 'coral': the urchin's genitalia.
Sea-urchins are not expensive: in Aix they were selling for about Pounds
1.50 a dozen.
The country between Marseille and Toulon produces a lot of strong red wines
which marry unhappily with the predominantly fish diet of the coast. In most
cases restaurants recommend roses, which have the ability to deal with the
spiciness of a fish soup or bouillabaisse.
Another solution is to cook the fish in red wine. At La Hostellerie Be'rard
(94.90.11.43) in the unspoilt village of La Cadiere d'Azur, just behind the
coast, they prepare an old recipe for salt cod cooked in a reduction of fish
stock and strong, inky-black local wine. The same wine accompanies the fish
like a dream.
Just across the valley from la Cadiere is le Castellet and the
Michelin-starred Castel Lumiere (94.32.62.20). Here Bouzigues oysters are
wrapped in spinach and quickly poached. A main course was local lamb wrapped
in a packet of flaky pastry with nutmeg.
The local lamb presents something of a problem for the uninitiated. Caught
on the hop immediately after shearing, you can be forgiven for mistaking
Provencal sheep for goats. Their flesh too, whiter than most lamb, has a
gamey, muttony character which is light years away from West Country or
Welsh lamb. Lamb as pungent as this requires a different treatment: garlic
in the majority of cases.
Although kid is popular at Easter, goats are generally bred for milk rather
than meat. The best brousse will be made from goats' milk, although a lot of
cows' milk brousse has become available. Goats are also responsible for
Provence's only exported cheese: the Banon. Banons can be creamy or hard and
are generally recognisable by the alcohol-soaked chestnut leaves they are
wrapped in to keep them moist. Some Banons are scented with savory giving
them a faint aroma of the Provencal garrigue, the herb-covered hillsides of
the south.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-498</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Sport: At play with a double-edged blade - Cricket
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERESA MCLEAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   IT IS obvious what cricket has to gain from sponsorship
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
money, one of the game's permanent needs. But what do businesses stand to
gain from sponsoring cricket? That is a much trickier question and produced
some tricky answers when I tried it out on companies which sponsor first
class cricket today or have sponsored it in the past.
Cricket and money have always been bed-fellows, but in the good old days
uncertainty about profit and loss was part of the fun. In the 18th and 19th
centuries a game was only a good game if it was played for a spectacular sum
of money, which was raised by wealthy patrons with an interest in the game.
The interest was primarily financial and these patrons were big time
gamblers.
In his classic The Young Cricketer's Tutor John Nyren recalls the Hambledon
Club in the 1770s and 80s playing matches against All England teams for
massive sums of money: Pounds 500, even Pounds 1,000 a time, of which the
players got only Pounds 5 each if they won a fortune for their patrons,
Pounds 3 if they lost. Such was the 'heart-stirrring' excitement on these
occasions that Hambledon's most generous patron, Sir Horace Mann, spent his
time 'walking about . . . cutting down the daisies with his stick - a habit
with him when he was agitated.'
By the 20th century patrons like Mann were a thing of the past. As The Times
reported tersely in September 1908, 'cricket has ceased to attract the
betting-man, although there are few signs that he did the early game much
harm.' Indeed, without betting patrons to support and enliven it, first
class cricket soon found it hard to pay its way.
Those who are old enough to remember the Gillette Safety Razor Company
launching English one-day cricket and commercial sponsorship in 1963, in the
form of the Gillette Cup, will remember the desperation of county cricket in
the preceding years. Fewer people were going to county matches; clubs were
losing money and appeal, after a post-war revival. Gillette's Pounds 6,500
was a life-saver, though the limited overs competitions it inspired have
been sucking the life-blood out of the county game ever since.
The Gillette Cup was a success - for one-day cricket; for players such as
Ted Dexter with one-day, cavalier appeal; for commercial sponsorship, only
adopted as a last resort by cricket's nervous and straight-laced
establishment, and, one would have thought, for Gillette, whose name quickly
became synonymous with one-day cricket.
Gillette is a big, American, multi-national company and one of its publicity
squad told me that it went into cricket sponsorship to acquire an English
identity that would outdo the crossed swords and traditional English image
of its razor blade rival, Wilkinson. He added with a weary chuckle,'That's
the official line, but you're never really sure what you want out of
advertising or sponsorship.'
Why did Gillette stop its sponsorship in 1980? 'We left because the Test and
County Cricket Board got too greedy for funds and asked for too much money.'
Modern sponsors, then, are not sure when their sponsorship is making them a
profit, only when it is making them a loss. I think Sir Horace Mann would be
cutting down more than daisies if his money had been put into a wager where
it did not matter which team won and he would not have known when he had won
something because he would not have known what he was hoping to win in the
first place.
But that seems to be how modern cricket sponsors like it. They talk about
identity and public profile, not profit. Cornhill Insurance sponsored its
first Test Match in 1978 when, according to a company survey, less than 2
per cent of people had heard of Cornhill. Apparently the figure has risen
enormously with the company's Test Match sponsorship, but Cornhill's
marketing manager said he could not say how many more customers and how much
more money the 'improved name awareness' had brought in; that would be 'too
crude an evaluation.'
Sponsors' aims are long term. Most companies continue their sponsorship for
long spells, at least ten years, usually longer. I was assured by Alan
Smith, Chief Executive of the TCCB, which is in charge of national
sponsorship, that if any of cricket's eight current large sponsors were to
withdraw, there are companies queueing up to replace them. It is the TCCB
which lays down the terms and conditions of sponsorship. Take it or leave
it. When Gillette left National Westminster Bank took its place and has just
extended its sponsorship into its eleventh year.
No-one at NatWest had any doubt that the money and effort required for
sponsorship on this scale were worth while and that its sponsorship was a
success, in spite of hard times in the counting house. Success may be hard
to measure but it is easier if the head of the company concerned is 'a
cricket nut', which is how Lord Alexander, Chairman of NatWest Bank, happily
describes himself.
The more nuts the better. Unlike most things in English first class cricket
at the moment, sponsorship looks good. I dislike myself for saying this, but
I can not help feeling that it all sounds just a bit too good to be true.
Does not the 'happy, friendly, working relationship' which the TCCB enjoys
with cricket's sponsors have an element of danger for the spectator who only
goes to cricket matches to watch, without powerful money to back his or her
views? What is to stop a company offering money for the privilege of laying
down some of the conditions in its sponsorship contract?
Alan Smith did not waste words: 'If we were offered Pounds 20m in return for
letting a sponsor put his name in the middle of the wicket we would refuse,
not for aesthetic but for practical reasons; it would distract the players.'
Cricket without an aesthetic dimension - does that mean logos on the
outfield; stripes, numbers and colours and, before long, sponsors' names on
cricketers' clothes; the thin end of a wedge where only money is valuable?
A crisp official reply. 'We may try out one or two names painted on the
field of play this summer. We don't know yet.'
I sighed sadly.
'Oh, come on. We can't afford to be impractical. If outfield advertising
brings in money to help school cricket, we have to take it.'
I suppose so, and soon we will have logos on cricket shirts too. But with
many a wistful glance to the handsome cricket we inherited from Hambledon in
its prime, when it was the excellence of play that spoke for its sponsor, as
celebrated by Rev Cotton in his noble song 'Cricket':
'The parties are met, and array'd all in white
Famed Elis ne'er boasted so pleasing a sight.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X Photograph Cavalier at the crease, dashing Ted Dexter appealed
to sponsors and fans (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-499</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Sport: Cucumber sandwich set samples the Euro-hoopla -
Croquet
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICKY SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CROQUET is THE game for the 90s (although it can be played by any age
group). It is family oriented, 'green' and 'caring' - it is astonishing how
much the average croquet player cares when he fails to win - and it is the
coming Eurogame.
To appreciate how obvious this is you only have to look at the language.
'Croquet' is a French word which according to Larousse means petit biscuit
sec aux amandes. Under another entry however, it is referred to as: (mot
anglais) jeu qui consiste a faire passer sous des arceaux des boules de bois
avec un mallet. This somewhat careless admission by the French that croquet
is an English word (although the Oxford English Dictionary suggests the word
is 'perhaps northern French, a dialect form of 'crochet' meaning 'hook'')
makes it possible to permit the continentals to play. Having established
that croquet is British, the rest may join in.
There has been a spirited attempt to claim that the word croquet is of Irish
origin, deriving from the Celtic cluiche (pronounced cloo-ic-ee). This
should delight the denizens of Dublin in the year their city holds the title
of Cultural Capital of Europe. No doubt, the EC Ministers who awarded the
title were mindful of Ireland's contribution to croquet when they made their
choice.
They will have known that croquet's most likely route to England was from
the beaches of northern France (where it was played with crooks by peasants)
via Ireland. Here, the son of the ivory turner John Jaques whose name has
become synonymous with English croquet, claimed that he picked up a set of
croquet implements which he brought back to London and decided to copy and
manufacture.
His family were fanatics for inventing or reproducing games including 'Happy
Families', 'Tiddley Winks' and 'Ping Pong' and their company was
instrumental in popularising croquet in Victorian England.
In the mid-nineteenth century, croquet was exported to Australia, New
Zealand and North America and the British contrived to ensure that almost
everyone played to their rules. The exception was the US which kept an early
version of the game. This rather startled members of the Croquet Association
of Great Britain, who visited in the 60s and found the Americans playing to
rules the British had abandoned at the turn of the century.
Now, croquet is booming in the US. Championship games are played on
immaculate lawns in the prestigious surroundings of Palm Beach but the
'backyard' version, a nine wicket (ie hoop) game, continues to be popular.
Recently croquet claimed to be the third fastest growing sport in the US
(after surfing and volleyball). There are signs that the Americans have
astutely recognised the importance of croquet in the European context.
Rumour has it that a full-sized croquet lawn is being laid in the heart of
the Euro-Disney Park, where a version of the famous game played by Alice,
will be annually reconstructed using MEPs as hoops and black puddings as
balls, with prawn cocktail crisps accompanying the Pimms at tea intervals.
Balls will be directed by laser beams to music composed by Jean-Michel
Jarre. There is a historical precedent for this form of musical
entertainment. One of croquet's greatest champions was George Frederic
Handel Elvey, a country parson whose father had been organist at St George's
Chapel, Windsor, hence his son's resounding first name.
Margaret Thatcher, the former British Prime Minister, was a contender for
the part of the Red Queen in the Euro-game and following his recent
revelation that he is a croquet enthusiast (who has even played on snow),
Lord Jenkins of Hillhead - known to the French as 'Le Roi Jean Quinze' - is
a candidate for the role of king.
The French are the reigning Olympic champions. They produced a team of 20 on
the last occasion that croquet was in the Olympics - in Paris in 1900. They
were the only entrants.
Manchester was, of course, chosen as Britain's candidate for the 1998
Olympics because of its convenient proximity to Bowdon Croquet Club where
the prestigious annual croquet invitation event, the President's Cup, is
played. This is an attempt to move the game away from London which has been
the centre of the croquet universe.
Each year competitors have streamed to Hurlingham from all corners of the
earth to take part in the World Croquet Championships (another version of
which is sometimes held at a winery in California). The current champion is,
of course, British; a young man called Robert Fulford who, when he is not
playing croquet, studies mathematics at Durham University.
Croquet's recent progress is largely due to the work of the game's
Development Officer, Chris Hudson, a member of the Bowdon, who has done more
in the last few years to galvanise croquet into taking a serious place in
the sporting world than has been achieved in decades. This has been
accomplished through Sports Council grants and careful planning, resulting
in more domestic competitions designed to encourage garden players (the
cucumber sandwiches and tea-set) to take up the 'official' game, more
schools competitions which have produced the influx of young players such as
Fulford, and more international events.
Croquet has always been an international game. Test matches have been played
between Great Britain, Australia and New Zealand since the 1920s. The US
will join the triumvirate for the next Test, and Japan is also making
progress. Croquet resembles the Japanese national game of Gate Ball and has
become popular particularly among women. Fourteen countries will be at the
World Championships this summer at Hurlingham.
English croquet players visit Italy on a regular basis to teach the Italians
and their pupils are so entusiastico that they have even contributed their
own cup to the World Championship event. They call it the 'Fun Cup' and it
was presented the first year to Jerry Stark of the US for sartorial elegance
(he plays in plus fours held aloft by red braces) and in 1990 to Japanese
competitor Toro Takano, for simply being there.
Last year, the French hosted a tournament in the Loire valley where the food
and wine were excellent and the lawns appalling. No doubt, the effect of the
first had something to do with the judgment on the second.
The latest European entrants are the Spanish and the Swiss. The Santa Clara
Croquet Club at Jerez de al Frontera in Spain, founded in 1979, has around
16 members and a motto: 'No dues, no don'ts'. The Swiss have been keen
garden players for years and are teaming up to play the Italians and the
French for a Coupe des Alpes but the only official club to date is based at
CERN, the European Organisation for Nuclear Research.
The idea that croquet is a daft game for old ladies and colonels stands in
sharp contradiction to the kind of people who currently make up the top 100
players in the official British league. Most are young men in their 20s who
play other sports. Ask them why they play croquet and they will simply
answer that it is a 'good game'.
Association croquet combines the best of snooker and chess. It is an
intellectual exercise in tactics played in the open air, mentally
challenging and mildly energetic. It requires more psychological than
physical stamina and, above all, a great deal of patience. Time moves slowly
in croquet. A player can wait more than an hour for a turn and it has taken
more than a century to try to codify the rules - which are still open to
interpretation, as every croquet player, 'official' or otherwise, is well
aware.
Croquet can involve the kind of incessant quibbling and procrastination
which makes the EC taking 22 years to make a law about jam seem a rather
hurried affair. The history of the game is riddled with infighting, petty
squabbling and 'personality clashes' which are at odds with the outward
'etiquette' of croquet. It is a game known for its style and a degree of
Edwardian elegance and restraint which has all but disappeared from the rest
of the sporting scene. For, whatever their internal rivalries, croquet
players are generally undemonstrative in public. They are not given to
throwing their arms about each other or taking anything stronger with their
tea than a couple of distalgesic. Best of all perhaps, croquet is a game at
which the British excel.
With the exception of a handful of New Zealanders, the British really do
play croquet better than anyone else which only goes to to prove the truth
of the old saw, les Francais inventent, mais les Anglais perfectionnent. Now
THAT should go down well in Europe.
If you want to play croquet contact: The Croquet Association, The Hurlingham
Club, Ranelagh Gardens, London SW6 3PR, Tel 071 736 8411).
Nicky Smith is author of 'Queen of Games, The History of Croquet" Weidenfeld
and Nicolson, Pounds 16.95
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-500</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Sport: Courses with designs on the big players - Golf
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN HOPKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
POINT THE bonnet of your car westwards and drive for a half hour from
central London and you will arrive at some of the best golfing territory in
the world. It is a finger of land rich in pine and birch trees and heather
with a sandy subsoil that absorbs moisture as quickly as it falls. Here are
the Wentworth and Sunningdale golf courses, among others, courses that are
so close to one another it has long been an ambition of mine to take one
club and as many balls as are necessary and play from the clubhouse of one
to the clubhouse of the other. Or, to put it another way, to tee off in
Sandy Lyle's backgarden on the Wentworth estate and hole out in Nick Faldo's
front garden adjoining Sunningdale.
Drive a few miles further west and a few miles further south and you will
reach Wisley golf club, one of the most interesting of the golf courses
being built in England. Wisley is 24 miles from the centre of London. To the
south of the 225-acre property runs the river Wey. To the north stands the
church of Wisley. To the west is National Trust property and to the east the
Royal Horticultural Society gardens.
When it opens in mid August it will have three loops of nine holes designed
by Bobby Trent Jones, the son of the legendary Robert Trent Jones. There
will be 750 members and no visiting societies. To describe the clubhouse as
lavish would be typical British understatement. Costing Pounds 4m, it has
handcut tiles on its roof, an open fireplace, an entrance hall in which
Persian rugs will cover a limestone flagged floor and, elsewhere, woven
carpets from Turkey and specially designed and made chairs.
In an area that is known for its heathland courses, Wisley will be something
of a contrast. Walk around it and the overriding impression is of an
American course, mounded, shaped and sculpted to the last millimetre at a
cost of more than Pounds 5m. There is water on more holes than not - six
lakes have been created and two were there before work started. There are
118 bunkers, 95 tees and 800 sprinkler heads. The enormous practice ground
will have four target greens.
The most significant fact about Wisley, however, is the way it is being
financed. Marlin Estates, a joint venture between the Arlington Group,
British Aerospace's property subsidiary, and the Mannai Group, a concern
with interests in real estate and leisure in Europe and the US, are raising
the estimated Pounds 16.7m from the sale of shares in the golf club. This is
the first time this has happened in Britain, though it is commonplace in
other parts of the world. The first 100 shares cost Pounds 26,275 each and
were oversubscribed. Later this month, the latest tranche of shares will
come on the market. The price will be in excess of the last issue, which
were Pounds 37,330 each.
Marlin are gambling on recouping their investment from the sale of shares.
It may be they will sustain an initial loss if the membership is not fully
subscribed when the course opens in three months.
'We have sold 333 of our 750 shares,' Philip Gay, WGC's managing director,
said last week. 'Although we are offering shares in the club the money is
not being used to build the club. If I don't sell another share the club
will still be finished as per specification and handed over to the members
in August. They will own the freehold and everything down to the last teacup
and oil can. The income from the sale of shares is in a loan repayment
deposit account. I cannot touch it until I have handed over the course to
the members.'
A further 60 miles west of Wisley is the new Castle Combe golf club in the
idyllically pretty village of that name in Wiltshire. The site, within an
Area of Outstanding Natural Beauty, contains a river, hundreds of oak, beech
and ash trees, the earthwork remains of a 12th century motte and bailey
castle and much more besides. You might have caught a glimpse of it in the
film Dr Doolittle, which was made in Castle Combe.
'Many sites become available for golf courses but few have the natural
beauty and ambience of Castle Combe' says Peter Alliss, the TV golf
commentator, whose company has designed the course. 'Without doubt it should
become one of the five best inland courses in the UK.'
Clive Clark, the best of the new British course architects and Alliss's
partner, has laid out the 6,200-yard course with a sympathetic eye to the
riches of the surrounding environment. Traditionalist that I am, I am not
sure I like the huge, 100-yard-long waste bunker from tee to green of one
short hole. I question, too whether it is essential to have three lakes by
the side of the 18th green. Why does almost every finishing hole on every
new course have to have water on it?
Castle Combe differs from Wisley in that it is a course for members. At
6,200 yards it is too short for a full-blown professional championship and
there are no plans to stage championships on it. It is similar to Wisley in
the way it is raising the estimated Pounds 8.5m it cost by offering shares.
The first 55 will go on sale later this month at Pounds 15,000 each.
These days there is a growing backlash against the number of applications
for golf courses around the country. Last week, English Heritage, the
Government's adviser on historic buildings and landscapes, warned that the
golf boom could damage historic landscapes that have taken centuries to
create. Public inquiries are to be held on proposed golf courses at Burleigh
on the Hill in Rutland and Warwick Castle.
Wisley and Castle Combe have avoided such controversies. They are
trailblazers in their own ways, multimillion pound ventures that are as
different from existing golf clubs as a hickory shafted mashie is from a
graphite shafted iron. It will be interesting to see what the future holds
for them.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-501</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Minding Your Own Business: Analysis the hard way - A company
that offers information with less technology
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PRICE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JUST OVER two years ago, Nick Hill faced returning to a precarious life as a
freelance journalist. He and several colleagues had been made redundant from
writing economic commentaries and market reports for an editorial service
closed down by publisher Robert Maxwell.
After the service collapsed, Hill carried out a post-mortem on its failure.
One of the biggest problems had been the cost of distribution of a service
transmitted to customers by computer via telephone lines.
Much to his surprise, many of the clients Hill spoke to, including leading
City of London institution Merrill Lynch and Unigate, the dairy products
group, said they would rather have received their daily package printed on
paper anyway.
When four of them said they would like to receive a new 'hard copy' service,
Hill and his former colleagues formed Hilfe - the German for help - to
provide it.
'The fact that customers wanted their editorial reports on paper or on
computer disk meant that straight away we could establish an alternative
service from a much lower cost base,' says 32-year old Hill, Hilfe's
managing director.
He invested his Pounds 5,000 redundancy while three colleagues gave their
writing services on a part-time basis in return for an equity stake in the
new venture.
A friend who ran a motor cycle messenger group agreed to deliver Hilfe's
material and provided office space in the City - albeit underneath a
recording studio - in return for an equity share in Hilfe.
Hilfe borrowed two computers and an archaic printer - which took 1 1/2 hours
a day to hand feed the editorial reports. Hilfe bought office equipment
cheaply from a government surplus supplier and started with no outstanding
debts.
The economic climate also favoured Hilfe. Companies such as Citicorp and
Credit Suisse led a shakeout of research departments throughout the City -
the area targeted by Hilfe for new business.
Hilfe offers investment risk analysis. The daily package of editorial
briefings covers a wide area. it might include a preview of a G7 conference
or coverage of the Taiwanese insurance industry. There are also regular
items such as stock market reports and economy profiles. All briefings
include comment, analysis and as Hill says, 'taking a line' on an issue. 'If
we were a news service then no-one would buy us. We are selling our opinions
and we live or fall by them.'
Sales were slow at first: 'We had no reputation and companies we approached
were saying that they would try us if we were around in a year's time,' says
Hill, a refrain familiar to many new businesses.
With only two full-time staff, the first year was one of long hours and hard
work. However, by the end of it, the client list boasted 18 names and
turnover reached Pounds 75,000.
Then a minor disaster struck. The office was burgled and the computers
stolen. The next day's reports were bashed out on a reserve machine and
delivered on time, with Hill sleeping in the office that night. Hilfe
recovered its losses, moving to more secure premises shortly afterwards.
Hilfe also benefited from the events of 1989, particularly the reforms in
eastern Europe, which increased demand for independent expert analysis.
'It was important for us to demonstrate that we could respond to these
changes,' says Hill. The start-up costs of an editorial service on eastern
Europe meant that it had to pay for itself in three months. Peter Maxey, a
former ambassador to East Berlin, and another analyst were brought in.
The service has been taken by over half of Hilfe's 35 clients and pushed the
company's annualised turnover to Pounds 175,000.
Hill sees the next 12 months as a period of consolidating and expanding the
service to respond to clients' individual or collective requirements -
whether they be additional analysis of the Finnish timber industry or a more
detailed account of the oil markets.
The company has sacrificed faster growth, refusing to borrow money or bring
in outside investors, but it has managed to keep costs to a minimum, and is
ready to move into profit and grow.
HILFE, 15-21 Cole Street, London SE1 4YH, 071 407 6414
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI Photograph Help at hand, Nick Hill, managing director of
Hilfe (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-502</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Minding Your Own Business: A craft with export appeal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SINCLAIR ROBIESON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AT FIRST glance, you might be hard-put to find a link between the small
north Wales town of Denbigh and Medina in Saudi Arabia, the second most holy
city in Islam where the prophet Mohammed is buried. But connection there is
 -and a colourful one at that.
The link is a company called Craig Bragdy Design, based on a Denbigh trading
estate and founded by Jean and Rhys Powell. It makes ceramic murals and over
the years has built-up a thriving business with Araby - indeed, 98 per cent
of its output goes to the Gulf states, contributing to its annual turnover
of Pounds 450,000.
Earlier this year, it was retained by the Saudi authorities to tile seven
domes of the Mosque of the Prophet in Medina - inside and out. The catch is
that because Medina is closed to non-Moslems, local men will have to oversee
the work.
The Powells accept this, although they prefer to see through their jobs
personally. Other difficulties can arise - Iraq's invasion of Kuwait was one
and that could prove costly to the company.
Kuwait built the world's third-largest telecommunications tower and invited
applications to tile the outside - all 19,000 sq. metres of it. The Powells
made their pitch last summer and, in spite of keen competition, were
confident of success. They still are. As Jean says: 'I am sure that if
Kuwait sorts itself out, we would be in with a very good chance.'
Craig Bragdy Design is a family concern, helped along by two of the Powells'
four sons. Murals are made specifically for the area proposed by the client
and after discussion on the theme a detailed design scheme in colour is
produced. Tile samples are included showing, among other things, textures
and glazes. The murals tend to be hugely colourful. Many have been designed
by Jean herself although the firm has other design staff.
'Our ceramic murals differ from other kinds of murals because we lay out
clay on the floor to the size of the (client's) wall,' says Jean. 'We lay it
out like a piece of pastry, we put our design onto it, and then we cut it up
like a giant jigsaw puzzle. It is not mosaics. It is really an individual
job for particular people, so no-one has a repeat or a mass-produced effort.
And this is what people really like - having something particularly for
them.'
The company started in the 1950s, when the Powells began to make pottery.
They based themselves in a succession of old mills, mainly in north Wales,
which they converted into workshops and living accommodation. Twenty-five
years ago, they decided they wanted some-thing more challenging and turned
to small murals.
Their first was for a Liverpool brewery, for which they received Pounds
27.10s (old money). 'Then we did a lot more work in Liverpool - for the
Catholic Blind Institute and the Dental Hospital and for the Teaching
Hospital and many, many pubs,' says Jean.
'About 12 years ago, there was a cut back in UK building. We wanted to
continue with murals so we looked around. We didn't have very much money so
we couldn't shoot off to America. But I have always been interested in
Middle East design and decoration. We got a job in Kuwait for an oil company
and then we met one or two Kuwaitis and they liked our work. We designed and
made murals for three tower blocks.
'Then we went to the Emirates and opened an office there. We got some really
interesting jobs and more and more work in the area.'
The Powells were making their murals on the spot but: 'We got to the stage
where we had to come back and make them in north Wales. We found we could do
without our office in the Gulf, which was expensive, and we manage to get
work by going to the Middle East two or three times a year.'
The commissions cover a wide spectrum. One involved a mural on the inside of
a dome in Sharjah souk. 'The ruler wanted it to be like the sky at night, so
we did the signs of the zodiac and the pole star. Eight tons of tiles went
out of this little factory in Denbigh.'
The 'little factory' was acquired seven years ago. 'We were able to buy it
just at a point when we had some really big jobs.'
Craig Bragdy Design employs 15 people although an increasing amount of work
is being sub-contracted and extra people are taken on to help out with
specific jobs. But as Jean says: 'It is difficult to find people to work in
Denbigh, particularly the sort of people with an artistic background that we
need.' On the other hand, costs in Denbigh remain relatively low.
Craig Bragdy Design, Colomendy Industrial Estate, Denbigh, Clwyd LL16 4LN.
Tel. 074571-5656.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-503</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Minding Your Own Business: Trials of integration - Computing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARBARA CONWAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Barbara Conway, the respected City journalist and former member of the
Securities and Investment Board, died last weekend, aged 39, after a long
illness. She contributed to the Weekend FT on the computer industry and
continued working while seriously ill. This is her final article.
HAVING LOOKED, in previous columns, at the merits of computer software
packages designed for specific purposes - word-processors, information
managers, spreadsheets etc - some attention should now be given to a form of
computer program which can give all these features, and more, in a slightly
cut-down form but available together and able to work with each other. These
are known as integrated packages and will normally combine the functions
listed above with communications facilities, for connecting to other
computer systems via the telephone system.
The advantages of using an integrated package may be particularly appealing
to computer users with limited memory in their machines and to those who
need to shift pieces of information between programs easily (for example
addresses between a database and word-processor). But the choice needs to be
carefully made. Some integrated packages make nonsense of the reason for
their existence because exchanges between their different sections are every
bit as unwieldy as those between 'dedicated' programs. Others incorporate
enough features to put some dedicated programs to shame. And, as always,
price is no sure guide to the value of a package.
On the budget side of the market, for example, Lotus has a nifty program
called LotusWorks which, as well as the four basic modules of an integrated
package, can provide reasonable business graphics and includes both a
dictionary and a thesaurus with its word-processor. It allows the user to
have up to nine active 'sessions' running off each of its main functions at
the same time and has a neat and easy-to-use menu system to help the user
with each application. It also needs only 512k to be up and running and
operates at very acceptable speed.
The debit side is that getting the different applications to talk to each
other is unnecessarily complicated, involving several import/export
operations, but at a list price of Pounds 145 it is certainly one of the
best-value packages on the market for those willing to put up with this
inconvenience.
Also worth considering at this end of the market are Microsoft's MS-Works,
at the same price, and Logotron's Eight in One at just Pounds 94 with
limited features but a good user-friendly system and all the basic
essentials.
When it comes to the heavyweight side of the market, nothing is quite as
weighty as Open Access III from Software Products International, either in
terms of physical size, price (Pounds 799) or features. It includes a
programming language, a programmable relational database, all the usual
features and an eminently usable, if somewhat idiosyncratic, system of
switching between functions. It is surprisingly easy to get to grips with
even for first-time users thanks to a well thought out tutorial, but at this
kind of price both the spreadsheet and the word processor look just a little
basic.
In much the same league is Enable, from Enable Software at Pounds 742, which
also has an excellent range of features and good integration but is probably
slightly more geared to networks of computers than stand-alone machines in
small businesses. When it comes to idiosyncratic user interfaces,
Ashton-Tate's Framework III (Pounds 630) is probably an outright winner, but
once you get used to it is an extremely powerful package. A feature is the
included programming language FRED. The Framework III approach of using each
application in a separate window or 'frame' is the kind of system users
either love or hate, and I found myself, slightly to my surprise, quite
enthusiastic about it.
Lotus also does a high-level package, priced as Framework, called Symphony
2.2 which contains all necessary features but which I found considerably
less congenial to use, perhaps because it centres so much on its spreadsheet
facility. There is still room in the field for a readily-usable,
full-featured, reasonably standardised heavyweight integrated package but,
for the moment, if you have the money, then Open Access III looks the
leading contender.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-504</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Play your cards right for economy
travel - Advice for travellers who want to know whether they should take
their plastic abroad
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHOULD YOU leave home without your credit card?
The answer depends on where you are thinking of going. Your chances of
getting much use out of a credit card vary widely from nation to nation.
Apart from paying for purchases, which all the well-known cards can now do
in a diverse range of countries, credit and other plastic cards can also top
up your travel insurance and provide you with a useful ready source of cash.
If you do not wander too far from the beaten track, they can be more
convenient than travellers' cheques and in some cases no more expensive.
Additions to the service, including card insurance, have been aimed at
providing a similar level of security.
However, the ease of availability differs starkly from country to country.
The Visa, Mastercard and American Express logos are the same the world over,
but the terms on which you use the cards will depend both on the issuer, and
on the prevailing practice in the country that you are visiting.
You should also be on your guard against another catch - if something goes
wrong while you are on holiday, very little of the information you most need
to know will be instantly available. The odds are that a lot of information
which could be vital if something goes wrong, has been packed around a
credit card bill and then thrown into a bin at some time.
It is worth getting in touch with the organisation which issued your card
before you leave to check exactly what facilities are available. The country
you visit will also make a difference.
For example, Visa cards allow you to withdraw cash from 72,000 automated
teller machines worldwide. But, even in Europe, that does not guarantee easy
access while you stay on the beaten track. Spain accounts for 10,685 of the
global total of Visa ATMs, compared with 3,420 in France, and only 295 in
Germany.
History accounts for these differences. The Spanish economy, developing
slightly later than the other two, made the transition from a cash-oriented
economy straight to charge cards. West Germany, on the other hand, was the
birthplace of the Eurocheque, and German retailers will not find accepting
Visa cards to be so strongly in their interests as it is in other countries.
Around 1.5m Germans hold Visa cards, compared to 8m French.
The charges and limits depend on your choice of UK issuer. Town &amp; Country
building society's Visa card allows you to take up to Pounds 100 a day in
local currency from banks showing the Visa sign, with a handling charge of
1.5 per cent added to your next bill.
Barclays also charges 1.5 per cent for handling, and interest is charged
from your statement date if you do not repay when you return. The annual
percentage rate (APR) is 28.1 per cent. The bank will allow you to withdraw
up to Pounds 500 per day over the counter, and up to Pounds 200 from
machines.
There is a similar pattern for American Express cards. Amex at present has
more than 40,000 ATMs worldwide, with 13,500 in Europe. Most of these use
the facilities of local banks. Thus your American Express card can retrieve
money from 1,282 Credit Lyonnais machines in France, 183 Banca Populare di
Milano machines in Italy, and 2,816 Sistema 4B network machines in Spain,
but from only 30 holes in the wall in Germany, where Amex has an agreement
with Deutsche Verkehrs-Kredit Bank.
American Express will charge a straight two per cent fee for the amount of
each withdrawal. Note that the money withdrawn this way does not come from a
credit card account, but is debited directly from the current account you
nominate to pay your American Express bills. It therefore makes sense to
check your current account balance before you leave, if you are going to use
this method of obtaining cash. However, if you have an interest-bearing
current account, it means you can keep earning interest up to the day you
make your withdrawal, making the transaction more economical than buying
travellers' cheques.
American Express limits British holders of Sterling-denominated cards to
withdraw Pounds 200, calculated at the exchange rate in force on the day of
each withdrawal, within a seven day period. Gold card holders can withdraw
up to Pounds 300 within a week.
Diners Card is usable in 35,000 ATMs worldwide, but is limited to the United
States, Canada, Puerto Rico, Japan and Germany. There is a 4 per cent charge
for each withdrawal. The service is restricted to Dollars 1,000 every 14
days.
Link, known abroad as Plus, is the system used by a number of institutions
in this country, most of them building societies. If you are leaving Europe
you may be surprised by the flexibility it offers you, as it has 46,000 ATMs
in North America, Puerto Rico, Mexico, Ecuador, Guam, the Caribbean,
Australia, New Zealand and Asia. The equivalent of Pounds 250 can be
withdrawn each day. If any extra charges are to be levied on you by a Link
machine, a warning should flash across the screen.
Credit cards also allow a degree of extra insurance, although all the
issuers stress that this should not be regarded as in any way an alternative
to a full travel insurance. Also beware that you will only be covered, in
most instances, for travel that you paid for directly with the card. If the
name of the relevant airline does not appear on the credit card bill, you
may not be covered.
However, the cover you receive for everything that does appear on your bill
could be useful. American Express cover purchase insurance. If you buy
something it is automatically insured against loss, theft, or damage, up to
a limit of Pounds 20,000 for the first 90 days after you bought it.
This is the kind of subtle problem that is worth checking. Barclays offer
purchase insurance for goods valued between Pounds 50 (cheap children's
novelties which break on the flight home are not covered) and Pounds 15,000,
within the first 100 days of purchase.
Credit cards score on travel 'inconvenience' insurance. If you are
impervious to the charms of the Costa Del Heathrow, the chance of
compensation for delay might be appealing. Remember, however, that it will
only apply to scheduled flights paid for using the credit card.
American Express' policy comes into effect once you have been held up for
four hours, either because you have been denied a seat thanks to overbooking
or because of a delay in take-off. After this time has elapsed, restaurant
meals, refreshments and hotel rooms bought using the card will all be free.
Cover is also usually available to pay for necessary goods if your luggage
goes astray.
Travel accident insurance again only applies to travel bought with the card
 -if you are run down by a passing rickshaw, tough - but cover is extensive.
American Express will cover certain injuries up to Pounds 75,000, and
Barclays' Visa up to Pounds 50,000 (Pounds 250,000 for Premier card
holders).
An option for which you will probably have to pay more is insurance against
loss of the card itself. American Express undertakes to give you a
replacement 'within 24 hours', wherever you are, and schemes which
automatically notify all the companies which have issued you with plastic
seem more attractive if you are going overseas.
These will usually, however, cost you more. However, losing cards,
particularly those few pieces of plastic in your wallet which cannot be used
abroad, presents nightmarish vistas. If you do not insure the cards, perhaps
you should leave home without them.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-505</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: A very seductive idea - A look at the
growing trend towards 'chartism'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HARRY HOPKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
READERS of Investors' Chronicle were confronted with an appalling dilemma
during February. 'The Trader,' poring over his graphs, detected signs of the
approach of 'a golden cross' where the FT-SE and short-term moving averages
rise through the long-term trend-line, suggesting a 'major bull market in
coming months.'
Turn the page, however, and veteran fundamentalist, '"Bearbull,' with a
nine-year record of success, announced that he was feeling distinctly queasy
at the rate of advance of the market, and - most unusually - decided not to
deal that week.
So where did that leave the would-be investor? Should he put his trust in
gut-feeling and commonsense - notoriously uncommon - or in the 'scientific'
signals coming from the charts?
Certainly in recent years that once derided American eccentricity - chartism
 -has become all-pervasive. Investors listen to the gnomic utterances of its
proliferating practitioners. How often do we try to suppress a shudder at
some bold announcement that the FT-SE, or some share price, is about to
cross its 'support level'?
The graph lines are statistical abstractions, but as the late Ely Devons, an
economist, shrewdly observed: 'Statistical magic is a mystery to the general
public, and can never be proved wrong. A mistake merely reinforces belief in
the magic.'
The basic idea of chartism has the seductive simplicity of ideas that sweep
the world. Maybe the market is not quite all-knowing, but it knows so much
more than you or I can ever hope to, and much that is currently hidden or
indeed hardly yet thought of. It is the insider of all insiders.
Given all this, it becomes entirely logical that a pioneer American
chartist, John Magee, should have boarded the windows of his small room in
Springfield, Illinois in order not to be distracted from his study of price
patterns by mere events such as food riots or Presidential assassinations.
True, some later practitioners have weakened, sometimes describing their
science as an art - which is as well considering the radically different
interpretations an identical chart may receive.
If Chartism is an art, it still speaks with the authority and precision of a
science. It is the white coats that get us - and the crisp graph formations,
those fascinating trend channels, double tops, heads and shoulders, saucer
bottoms, flags, wedges and boxes.
One picture, they say, is worth 10,000 words; and repeated patterns
undeniably exist, as they do in the weather charts. Equally undeniably, the
clear picture is of the past, not the future. A steady rising trend on a
graph will not last forever.
Do the charts predict when the breakthrough - up or down - will come? Or
like the weather forecasts do they tell us it is going to rain when it is so
damp as to be virtually raining already? The words 'may' and 'could' are
very popular with chartists.
There is also a certain gift for validation by hindsight. A
'head-and-shoulders pattern' is said to be one of the most reliable - in
predicting a fall roughly as far below 'the neckline' as the first shoulder
rose above it. But if the unruly line instead turns up, this area, I see, is
labelled a 'bear trap.' Either way, the chartist can say he was right.
Chartists are undoubtedly eloquent. It is at the point where they descend
from their rarefied world of clean curves, persuasive parabolas, and fragile
fibrillations, in order to translate their findings that the greatest danger
lurks. One finding said that Boots shares had reached a 'very exciting
level' not, perish the thought, because it was selling some new drug, but
because the price-curve was pressing against a long-term barrier, hinting at
a breakthrough into new territory.
The investor might inquire what 'barrier', what 'new territory' - otherwise
we could all end in a fantasy world where pseudo-events such as statistical
breakthroughs not only outnumber real events but eclipse them.
Two months on from the Investors' Chronicle clash of fundamentalist and
chartist, the chartist appeared a clear winner on points: the FT-SE index
having risen from 2298 to 2490. But very many more experts seemed to be
feeling 'distinctly queasy', about the level of the market.
Chartism should surely extend a welcome to empirical testing and proof.
Take, say, 50 leading chartists, let them select 25 suitable shares - an
identical list - and then let them issue predictions for six- and 12-month
periods to be recorded in writing. Revisions will be strictly limited.
A near success rate of less than 50 per cent might dull the 'magic'
discerned by Devons although I very much doubt it. The chart patterns will
continue to fascinate.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-506</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Week Ahead): The brewers' round
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE round of brewers' results opens next week with Allied-Lyons first of the
major groups to report on Tuesday. Full year pre-tax profits are expected to
be down 16 per cent on 1989-90 at around Pounds 475m, reflecting the impact
of the well-publicised Pounds 147m of foreign exchange losses. Analysts will
be looking for evidence from the new chairman and chief executive of a
strong recovery this year.
First half results from Grand Metropolitan on Wednesday may have been hit by
the recession, Gulf war, and decline of the dollar. City forecasts range
from Pounds 389m to Pounds 395m compared with Pounds 409m last time.
Greenall Whitley should provide some clues on Monday to how well pubs have
been weathering the squeeze on consumer spending. Analysts expect interim
profits of Pounds 20.5m, ex-property, a 6 per cent advance.
A subdued picture is expected to emerge when Hanson, the diversified
UK-based conglomerate, unveils its interim figures next Tuesday. Analysts
forecast at best a 4 per cent advance to Pounds 590m-Pounds 595m from the
year-ago profit level of Pounds 570m.
The building products and titanium dioxide businesses will have continued to
struggle but this should be offset by a solid performance from tobacco and
consumer industries. First contributions from Peabody, the US coal miner,
and Cavenham Forest Industries will provide the bulk of the growth.
On Thursday BOC is expected to announce a fall in pre-tax profits for the
six months to March 31. Industrial gases, its main business, are only
partially resistant to the recession and profits will be hit by the weak
dollar. The outcome for the half-year is likely to be in the region of
Pounds 150m to Pounds 155m - down about 10 per cent on 1989/90.
Royal Insurance and General Accident, two of the country's leading general
insurers, are expected to report substantial pre-tax losses for the first
quarter of 1991 next week.
Analysts are expecting losses of between Pounds 58m and Pounds 83m for GA
which reports on Tuesday and between Pounds 59m and Pounds 79m for Royal
which reports on Thursday compared with losses of Pounds 81m and Pounds 79m
last year. But in 1990 results were heavily influenced by claims stemming
from the storms of January 1990. This year has seen no comparable
catastrophe, indicating a very serious deterioration in underlying
underwriting experience.
Marks and Spencer, Britain's most famous retailer, is announcing its results
on Tuesday and some analysts are thinking the previously unthinkable in
predicting that pre-tax profits might fall this year.
Last year, the company made Pounds 604.2m pre-tax and seemed to be
weathering the recession well. But a deteriorating trading environment and
the company's decision to axe 850 jobs have led analysts to fear that
profits may have been hit more than originally feared.
After including an exceptional charge of Pounds 16m relating to the
redundancy programme, pre-tax profits are unlikely to move ahead greatly
from last year's outcome.
Pre-tax profits at J. Sainsbury, the expansive grocery chain, seem set to
top Pounds 500m when the company announces its annual results on Wednesday.
After a strong trading period, analysts expect the company to come in at
around the Pounds 505m mark representing a 22 per cent increase on the
previous year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-507</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Directors' transactions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS MACDONALD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Directors made more share sales than purchases in April, with the ratio of
sales to buys reaching 1.6 to 1, writes Angus MacDonald, of Directus Ltd.
There has been more buying interest in smaller company shares in the last
couple of weeks, and the launch of two new smaller company investment trusts
by Aberforth and Moorgate should help to rekindle demand in this area of the
market.
A series of hefty rights issues by building and construction companies has
helped to halt this sectors's considerable underperformance since the turn
of the year.
The building, timber and roads sector was particularly heavily bought by
directors last autumn, but the situation has now changed and directors'
share sales outweigh buys by 7 to 1 in this area. Beazer share sales
illustrate the point. Seven directors bought Beazer shares in the autumn at
around 95p. The share price has almost doubled subsequently, and two
directors have reduced their holdings in recent weeks.
Several directors of Usher Walker, the printing ink business, have bought
large amounts of shares as can be seen from the list. At the same time, it
was announced that David Williams, who recently resigned from Mosaic
Investment, has purchased 10.2 per cent from Southern Newspapers.
Sir David Alliance, chairman of N Brown, the home shopping concern, followed
the announcement of a placing and open offer with the purchase of over 1m
shares in the company. His family trusts also intend to take up their
entitlement in full.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
DIRECTORS' SHARE TRANSACTIONS IN THEIR OWN COMPANIES (LISTED &amp; USM)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                 No of
Company                      Shares     Value    directors
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
SALES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
  Alexon Group               60,000       337       2
  Assoc. Fisheries           54,356        86       1
  Beazer                     15,875        27       1
  Benson Group            1,075,000       143       2
  BICC                       68,000       290       1*
  Brit Aerospace CRPs       721,233       728       1
  Castle Comm.               40,721        97       2*
  Colorvision               693,960     1,096       2
  Hanson                     10,000        23       1
  Kalon Group            21,000,000    11,182       1
  Logica                    103,000       237       2
  Maunders (John)           120,000       145       2*
  McKechnie                  37,000       104       1*
  Pifco                       6,000        21       1
  Prudential                103,500       243       1*
  Smith DS                  306,788     1,067       4
  Spandex                    70,000       223       2
  UDO Holdings               40,000        98       1
  Victaulic                  11,200        56       1
  Willis Corroon            525,500     1,717       1
  WSP                        45,000        31       1
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
PURCHASES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
  Betacom                    50,000        11       1
  Brown N Group           1,019,080     2,293       1
  Cook (DC) Holdings         75,000        12       1
  Forward Technology        100,000        23       1
  Glaxo                       1,060        11       1
  Hartstone                 328,163       632       1
  Prop Sec Inv Trust         21,960        28       2
  Reece                     280,000        28       2
  SEP Ind Holdings        1,000,000        80       1
  Smith (DS)                  5,000        18       1
  Usher-Walker               80,570       185       9
  Wembley                    30,000        27       1
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Value expressed in pounds 000s. Companies must notify the Stock Exchange
within 5 working days of a share transaction by a director. This list
contains all transactions, including the exercise of options (*) if 100
per cent subsequently sold, with a value over pounds 10,000. Information
released by the Stock Exchange 29 April - 3 May 1991.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Directus Ltd, Edinburgh
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-508</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Playing with your life - The hard sums
behind annuities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS and PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ANNUITIES are not for the squeamish. This becomes clear as soon as the
calculations behind the rates offered by different life insurance offices
are examined - when you take out an annuity, you are effectively placing a
bet with the life insurance office on how long you will live.
An annuity is a contract to pay a given amount each year, while the annuity
holder remains alive. The capital is eaten into, allowing for a particularly
high income.
However, in practice they will not appeal to those under 55, and become
enticing once you have reached the age of 70. You will be in competition
with inflation, which erodes the value of your annuity with each year that
passes.
The other disadvantage is that the life office will keep all the money you
have deposited, even if you die very soon afterwards. You can opt to
guarantee the product for a certain number of years, or to ensure that you
at least receive back the capital, but this is not necessarily a product to
endear you to your heirs.
However, this could be viewed as an advantage. By the time you stop
receiving your annuity, you will have been completely released from the
problems of personal finance.
As the accompanying list shows (see right), annuities come in a bewildering
variety of packages. The law provides that you must buy an annuity with the
bulk of the funds you receive from your pension scheme or plan when you
retire. As the rates being offered vary substantially between different life
offices, it is worth shopping around to find the best deal.
When not bought as part of a pension arrangement your annuity will receive
more favourable tax treatment. Annuity payments are classed as return of
capital with some interest element, and you will only be taxed on the
interest, making the package attractive to higher-rate tax payers.
When taking out an annuity this way, you should be careful with timing, as
well as with your choice of life office. Annuity values tend to fluctuate in
line with UK government gilts, and it is worth locking in while interest
rates are high.
Temporary annuities pay a fixed income for a given period, or during the
purthe shorter. The capital disappears on death and the rates are higher for
older people.
Such annuities thus convert capital into income, and have tax advantages.
They can be used to pre-fund lumpy calls on income, such as school fees,
although Michael Chadwick of Chase de Vere says better rates of return can
be achieved with other products.
Often temporary annuities are linked to other investments, such as a with
profits endowment policy. Part of the income from the annuities is used to
fund the premiums for the policy; the hope is that the endowment will grow
sufficiently to replace the capital invested in the temporary annuity. Other
deals aim to maintain your wealth, making them more useful for inheritance
tax planning.
THE ANNUITIES ON OFFER
SEVERAL ANNUITIES are available. Your choice is as follows:
Temporary Annuities. These have a fixed term, and thus offer larger returns
than annuities which only terminate on death. A typical term would be ten
years.
The best rates available at present on a nine-year annuity for a 70 year old
man paying Pounds 10,000 initially are Pounds 2069.79 from Generali, and
Pounds 2,067.40 from Friends Provident, according to Baronworth Investment
Services.
Immediate Annuities. The basic and best-known form, which keeps paying you
the same amount each year until your death. Best rates according to
Baronworth, keeping assumptions constant from the previous example, are
Pounds 1,647.00 from RNPF Nurses, and Pounds 1,604.64 from Sun Alliance.
Compulsory Purchase Annuities. These are similar to immediate annuities, but
the sum to fund them comes from the proceeds of a pension scheme. You are
obliged by law to buy one out of the bulk of the proceeds of your matured
pension plan, although you do not have to buy the annuity offered by your
pension scheme or provider. Unlike immediate and temporary annuities these
pension-type contracts are treated as income, without a capital content, and
are taxed accordingly.
Joint Life Annuities. These involve annuities on the lives of two people,
and they keep paying out until both have died. There are attractions for
married couples who feel that they are both in good health, but the amounts
paid are much less than for annuities on a single life. For example,
Baronworth quotes the following example: a 75-year-old man paying Pounds
10,000 can receive a Pounds 1,907.04 annuity for the rest of his life. If
the same man spent the same amount on an annuity for himself and his
70-year-old wife, with the same company, the couple would receive Pounds
1,316.04 between them per year.
Index-linked Annuities. These are a particular triumph of actuarial science.
The life office agrees to increase the amount you receive each year by the
rate of increase in the retail prices index. This means that your income is
inflation-proofed, but it will start at a substantially lower level.
Increasing Annuities. These are similar in some ways to index-linked
annuities. However, in these cases the life insurance company will guarantee
a fixed percentage increase in your annuity each year until you die. If you
think inflation is going to be less than the rate of increase offered, then
these may make sense - although bear in mind that you are pitting your wits
against the actuaries and the financial markets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-509</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: National Savings cuts interest rates
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NATIONAL Savings said it will cut the interest rates paid on two accounts in
the next few weeks writes Philip Coggan.
The Investment Account will pay 11 per cent per annum, down from 12.25 per
cent, from May 21. Income Bonds will earn just 11.75 per cent per annum,
down from 13 per cent, from June 20. The rate paid on deposit bonds
(withdrawn from sale in November 1988) has been cut from 13 per cent to
11.75 per cent per annum. The cuts follow the recent fall in base rates.
National Savings also announced a change concerning premium bonds. Anybody
who wins the minimum prize of Pounds 50 will be able to reinvest the money,
with effect from July 1. Normally, the minimum amount you can invest in
premium bonds is Pounds 100, but National Savings said that this minimum had
created problems for people who wanted to reinvest their prizes.
Some companies are hoping next week's expected fall in inflation will
increase demand for products which guarantee fixed interest for savers.
Fixed-rate tax-exempt special saver accounts (Tessas) are still on offer
from Allied Irish Bank and Robert Fleming.
Equatorial Bank, a City-based bank which caters primarily for the Asian
community, offers a fixed-rate deposit account. The compound rate,
guaranteed over one year, is 11.83 per cent. A simple interest rate of 11.5
per cent is available over two years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-510</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Lenders on war footing - A look at
mortgage rate moves
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS and SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NATIONWIDE Anglia's surprise decision this week to cut its mortgage rate by
0.7 of a percentage point has raised hopes that other lenders will follow
suit soon, providing a much-needed boost for the property market.
There is already considerable speculation that there will be a further cut
in the base rate next week. This is because the Retail Price Index, which is
due out on Friday, is expected to show a sharp drop in inflation, from 8.2
per cent to perhaps 6.1 or 6.2 per cent. Such a fall in the RPI could
trigger another half percentage point cut in the base rate, from 12.5 per
cent to 12 per cent.
Nationwide Anglia's new rates come into force today for new borrowers, but
existing borrowers will have to wait until July 1 before their mortgage
bills are cut. The rate for borrowers with mortgages of over Pounds 120,000
will be 11.25 per cent, and for loans of between Pounds 60,000 and Pounds
120,000 the rate will be 11.75 per cent. For mortgages below Pounds 60,000,
the rate will be 12.25 per cent.
The cut may mean bad news for savers, however. Nationwide has admitted that
its savings rates will have to be reduced by the summer but has given no
commitment as to how big the cuts will be.
It is still unclear whether other banks and building societies will also
reduce their rates. A spokesman for the Nationwide said: 'I think it is only
a matter of time before we are joined.' However, many of its competitors
have ruled out a cut in their rates until there has been a further cut in
the base rate.
A spokesman for the Halifax building society, the largest mortgage lender,
said: 'we intend to stay competitive but this move has no real effect until
July 1 which is some way off and it gives us time to consider the market
impact.' It seems likely that they will wait for a base rate cut before
making a move.
The clearing banks reacted similarly and most said that they have no plans
to follow the Nationwide's move immediately unless there is a mortgage rate
war.
A spokesman for Barclays said: 'we will have to wait and see what happens to
base rates. We responded to the last base rate cut with a cut in mortgage
rates.' Midland is not ruling out a mortgage cut but is currently reviewing
its position.
Abbey National, which has already cut its mortgage rate twice since
February, said it had no intention of following suit. 'If base rates come
down we will have to consider changing our mortgage rate but that is very
hypothetical. We are not just going to follow the Nationwide in a knee-jerk
reaction . . . they are gambling on a further Bank of England base rate
cut.'
A spokesman for Alliance &amp; Leicester said 'we have certainly not made a
decision to move down. For the time being the Nationwide move is clearly a
one-off.' However, he admitted that it was important for the Alliance &amp;
Leicester to remain competitive.
Woolwich said: 'we certainly intend to move our mortgage rate down again
when base rates come down.' However, it ruled out any cuts before a base
rate move.
Already some of the smaller lenders have reacted to the Nationwide Anglia's
mortgage rate cut by offering discounts. Town &amp; Country building society is
offering a 0.55 percentage point discount on new mortgages, so the new basic
mortgage rate will be 12.4 per cent.
Citibank Mortgage, a centralised lender, is offering a 1.5 per cent
discount, available until January 1992 for new borrowers taking out loans
from Pounds 10,000-Pounds 150,000. The new rate will be 11.45 per cent which
makes it cheaper than the Nationwide's mortgage for smaller loans.
There is also strong competition to offer discounts for first-time buyers
which the lenders regard as an important way in which to stimulate the
housing market. For example, among the banks, the rate for first-time buyers
with Lloyds will be 11.2 per cent from May 17, an offer which runs until
March 31, 1992. Barclays are offering a rate of 11.45 per cent for
first-time buyers, which is capped until April next year - in other words,
the rate will not move above this level, but is free to move lower.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-511</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Markets: Oh no, postman's knock again - Serious Money
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN, Personal Finance Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE NIGHTMARE is this. I am trapped in a room with no doors or windows, only
a letter box through which junk mail from financial companies pours
unceasingly. It reaches my waist, then my neck. I am finally suffocated by a
bumper package on life insurance.
We are all on somebody's mailing list. The vast majority of banks and
building societies is either tied to, or owns, a life company. A credit card
bill, it seems, is not complete without an accompanying leaflet and
brochure.
It is hard to escape this onslaught. Commercial breaks on television seem
dominated by the financial sector. Open a magazine or Sunday newspaper - and
the chances are a leaflet from an insurance company will fall out.
The TV adverts are primarily about name recognition. Few people, confronted
by an advert for Eagle Star, will say 'Good Lord. It has all become clear. I
will ring up and insure my life tomorrow.' But a financial adviser will find
it easier to sell an Eagle Star product, if the client knows the name.
However, the expense of these campaigns needs to be watched. Nationwide
Anglia, a mutual building society, did not have the cash to notify its
depositors of the abolition of some of its accounts. But it could afford to
finance the TV campaign in which a bearded father reads aloud a pretentious
letter to his son.
The tide of junk mail is mainly directed at selling specific products. Much
of it is depressing. 'What would happen to your wife and family if you died,
Mr Jenkins?' or 'How would you cope if you fall seriously ill?' Absolve your
worries with a monthly premium.
The alternative approach is to promise riches. Save just Pounds 40 a month,
we are told, and in 25 years, we will have a sum equal to the Gross National
Product of Canada.
It is tempting to throw the material straight in the bin, or better still,
take it down the recycling plant, in the hope that it is turned into
something useful.
Before you do, check that the material is not from a company with whom you
already have a relationship. If it is, check again to see if the glossy
brochures relate to a product you already use. Changes in terms and
conditions may be hidden in the small print.
One popular tactic is to trumpet some new service such as free travel
insurance (which you did not ask for) while sheepishly mentioning some
adverse development to the existing service in a later part of the document.
If you are tempted to buy a with the illustrations or projections provided
in the brochure. These are only designed to meet the standards of the
regulators, not the consumer.
If you are being offered a savings-related product, the chances are that the
company will give an illustration of the kind of sum you will receive after
a certain number of years. This will probably be based on an assumed 7 or
10.5 per cent growth rate.
But do not forget inflation. Write back to the company and ask them what the
real value of that sum would be, assuming 5 or 7 per cent annual inflation
respectively. The figure will not sound quite so impressive, especially if
you compare it with the total of the monthly or annual payments you are
being asked to make.
Also ask the company about its charges. Recent Money Management figures
showed the effect of charges for a 29 year old man paying Pounds 30 a month
into a 10 year unit-linked plan.
On growth of 7 per cent a year, a policy without charges would earn a sum of
Pounds 5,161. But someone who bought a policy from the company with the
highest charges in the industry, Swiss Pioneer, would earn just Pounds
3,463. That is less than the total (Pounds 3,600) of his contributions.
The illustration the company will probably give (but only with the cooling
off notice) will be based on figures from the Life Assurance and Unit Trust
Regulatory Organisation. This will show expenses only as a percentage
deduction from the investment return.
Such an illustration is too obscure. Do not be satisfied with it. On such a
policy, the industry average level of charges eats up Pounds 875 of your
money (assuming a 7 per cent annual investment return) and Pounds 1,102
(assuming 10 per cent growth).
Going back to the subject of inflation, 7 per cent annual investment growth
and average industry charges would in nominal terms be worth Pounds 4,286 in
10 years time. Assuming 5 per cent inflation, that would be worth just
Pounds 2,631 in today's money.
The really impressive payouts come over longer periods. The same 29 year old
man paying Pounds 30 a month over 25 years might be enticed by the prospect
of a Pounds 29,689 payout at the end, based on a 10.5 per cent investment
return. That compares, however, with Pounds 40,317 if no charges were
applied and Pounds 35,300 if the lowest charges in the industry (from London
Life) were used.
But if one assumes 7 per cent inflation over 25 years, then the value of
Pounds 29,689 in today's terms is just Pounds 5,470. The policyholder would
have paid in Pounds 4,543, if one applies the same 7 per cent discount to
the annual contribution of Pounds 360. So all that saving earns a real
profit of just Pounds 927.
You may not have the time to waste on analysing your junk mail. But you
should ask these questions before buying one of these products, just as you
should check the mileometer and brakes on a second hand car.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-512</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Markets: The New York barometer registers cloudy - Wall
Street
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE QUALITY of life in New York City, which gloom-mongers suggest has been
deteriorating ever since the Dutch planted their flag at the foot of
Manhattan, is about to take another turn for the worse.
David Dinkins, the mayor, went on television this week to warn that unless
people rallied to solve his budget crisis, the city would be facing
unpleasant cuts in services.
One in four street lights would be extinguished - in a metropolis where
gun-toting teenagers have taken to murdering people for the very coats off
their backs. Numerous homeless shelters would close - in a city which has so
many beggars and deranged wandering its streets that cynics call it the
leading capital of the Third World. Even Central Park zoo would have to
close.
Some of this may be brinkmanship, but there is no doubting that New York's
finances are in serious difficulties as the recession that has swept through
the north east, and on to the rest of the US, undermines its tax base.
New York's fiscal crisis is hardly new, but the spotlight thrown on it this
week by the mayor's appeal does raise some wider questions about the
strength of the US equity market.
For New York is not alone: across the US, cities and states are desperately
trying to balance their budgets, and are doing so by slashing jobs and
services and raising taxes.
Serious cuts in Government spending hardly seem conducive to the sustained
recovery in consumer confidence which economists are hoping will start
moving the US out of recession some time over the next few months. Yet
current equity prices, which are discounting a gradual second half economic
recovery, leading to a much stronger rebound in 1992, allow little for the
possibility that the recovery timescale could be substantially slower than
this.
Why is Wall Street ignoring the fiscal evidence in front of its nose ? One
reason is that New York is not particularly representative of the US as a
whole, since for structural reasons the recession has hit the north east
much harder than other regions. Another is the belief that the Federal
Reserve will keep on cutting interest rates until the economy is bound to
start rallying.
Third, there is a gathering body of statistical evidence to suggest that the
recession may indeed be bottoming and that inflation is sufficiently under
control to allow further scope for Fed easing.
But that evidence is hardly conclusive, and the overstretched nature of the
financial system (banks with huge bad loan portfolios and consumers already
loaded down debt) mean that even if the trough is nigh, the economy could
yet spend months bumping along the bottom.
A fourth reason is simply Wall Street's congenital optimism. Fund managers
who gather in investors' cash, on the strength of their ability to make the
money multiply, have to believe for the sake of their sanity that growth is
just around the corner.
This Panglossian predisposition has been much in evidence over the past two
months, with stocks rallying on the merest sliver of good news, but failing
to react strongly to bad, in the belief that poor statistics will merely
encourage the Fed to stand ready as rescuer of last resort.
Much is being made by the optimists of the equity market's historic
predictive powers. The Dow Jones Industrial Average, it is said, has been an
accurate leading indicator of every economic recovery since before the
Second World War, and that is precisely what it is now.
However, there are sceptics who question whether this still holds true in a
share trading world transformed in the 1980s by the advent of futures
markets, program trading and indexed funds. And even if the Dow is
accurately predicting a recovery, the precise timing remains in doubt and,
in investment, timing is all.
The main corporate news on Wall Street this week was agreement after a
five-month battle on a takeover of NCR, the fifth largest computer
manufacturer in the US, by American Telephone &amp; Telegraph, which hopes the
deal will help it turn around its loss- making computer arm. AT&amp;T had to pay
out Dollars 110 a share to clinch agreement, compared to its initial Dollars
90 hostile offer.
The battle underlined how difficult it is for a target to escape a
determined and deep-pocketed bidder - in spite of all the takeover barriers
erected by companies in the 1980s. But having paid a full price, AT&amp;T now
has to convince a sceptical world that it can break a long-established
pattern of unsuccessful computer mergers.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Monday      2941.64   +2.8
Tuesday     2917.49  -24.15
Wednesday   2930.9   +13.41
Thursday    2971.15  +40.25
Friday      2920.17  -50.98
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-513</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Markets: No business like show business - London Markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARTIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN GRANADA Television bids for a new TV franchise on Wednesday, it will
presumably promise a new soap opera: Golden Square.
Cue music] Roll Titles] Shot One: Exterior, Day. Pan nondescript West-End
square, zoom in to tarnished brass plate reading 'Granada Group. Chief
Executive: Derek Lewis'. As we watch, a sign-writer paints out the second
line . . .
Voice over: 'Golden Square] An everyday story of working people and their
non-executive directors]'
Synopsis: In the pilot episode, Sidney's nephew Alex is forced to face up to
problems at the family firm. Derek, his youthful protege, is knifed by
publisher Peter, and by Siegmund's successors at the firm's merchant bank.
Meanwhile, in space, a satellite bleeps plaintively . . .
Worries that the new TV era will squeeze programme budgets are clearly
wrong. Golden Square, at least, is clearly in the Brideshead Revisited
class. The backers - Granada Group's shareholders - were asked on Friday to
stump up Pounds 163m in a rights issue; they were told their dividends were
being cut by 40 per cent; and the group's profitable bingo operations are
being sold at a price which - to judge from stock market reaction - gives
the purchaser, Bass, a bargain.
Granada's share price, which was 396p as recently as two years ago, fell as
low as 134p in October 1990. It closed a week ago at 203 1/2 . After reports
over the weekend that Derek Lewis, the chief executive, was on his way out,
the stock recovered a bit in the early part of this week, trading around
210p.
You might have thought that all the bad news was in the price. But the art
of soap opera writing is to create moments of horror and fear out of the
most predictable events. On this score, Granada proved its artistic
credentials once again.
It had artfully held back the news of the dividend cut for dramatic effect.
On Friday, when the news finally broke, the share price promptly dropped 13
per cent, from 211p to 184p, and closed the week there. Coming soon: the
search for a new boss; and the rival bids for the north-west TV franchise,
due next week.
In Granada's Coronation Street, action used to take place against a stream
of murmured complaints from Ena Sharples, a formidable old battle-axe. This
week's market developments have also been accompanied by steady grumbling
from an old lady in the corner, without anyone paying attention.
Unwisely, because the elderly person cradling a bad-tempered milk stout has
been the Old Lady of Threadneedle Street herself. On Tuesday, the government
rejected the Bank of England's plea for legislation to sort out the the
local authority swaps mess; and on Thursday the markets paid not much more
attention to a trenchant speech from Robin Leigh-Pemberton about the dangers
of too relaxed an approach to inflation.
Both the government and the markets may come to regret this week's
inattention, the markets in particular. The Governor's underlying message
was blunt: do not think that the drop in next Friday's monthly retail price
index figures is by itself a reason for easing monetary policy.
Since the market had been expecting the publication of those figures to be
the occasion for another half-point cut in bank base rates, the speech was
potentially unsettling. Either Leigh-Pemberton was signalling that there
would be no cut; or he was hinting it might be unwise. Either way, the
market's pleasure in anticipating the cut was at risk.
The speech was overshadowed, however, by Nationwide Anglia's decision to cut
its mortgage lending rates in anticipation of the very drop in interest
rates Leigh-Pemberton was hinting against. And the Governor's warnings were
backed up by Bank of England efforts throughout the week to prop up
short-term interest rates. On Friday, indeed, the Bank lent Pounds 965m to
the money market at a 12 per cent interest rate for 14 days - the clearest
possible signal, dealers said, that there would be no base-rate cut next
week. The money market continued to discount an imminent cut, however.
Similarly, on Friday morning the FT-SE 100 index came within a half a point
of its 2,555.3 intra-day record, briefly touching 2,554.9. It dropped back
later, to at 2,524.3, down 17.5 on the day and up 1.6 on the week.
Those murmurs from the corner contributed to lingering unease throughout the
week, however. As the chart show, 'retail' equity volume  - UK transactions
excluding those between market-makers - has dropped below the industry's
Pounds 1bn break-even level.
The market's edginess was also fed by renewed warnings from company
chairmen. GKN, the engineering group, warned that profits for the first half
of the year would be well below the depressed levels of the second half of
1990. The shares closed the week at 341p, down 12p from the previous Friday.
Sears, the retailer, announced a sharp drop in 1990 profits, holding the
dividend but putting a 'health warning' over future payouts. It said it had
seen no upturn in business yet. The shares closed the week at 89p, down  1/2
p.
And a final cause of uneasiness was the performance of Wall Street. Although
New York's strength on Thursday night sparked Friday morning's rally in
London, the feeling was growing in the City that Wall Street is definitely
overvalued - and that if New York retreats sharply, London will suffer too.
Whatever the uneasiness, investors continued to absorb paper. Morgan
Crucible's rights issue was 89 per cent subscribed, which given the
company's circumstances was a good uptake. The placing of nearly 5 per cent
of Saatchi and Saatchi by Lord Rothschild's St James Place Capital, went
smoothly and left the price unchanged. And on Friday MGN's UK offer for sale
was announced to be 1.07 times subscribed - practical proof of another old
show business principle: always leave 'em asking for more.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Table (Omitted). Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-514</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Markets (At a glance): Two new unit trusts from Prolific
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Prolific, the fund management group, is launching two unit trusts in an
effort to take advantage of the improving conditions in the UK economy. The
Prolific recovery unit trust will aim for capital growth by investing in a
spread of relatively risky shares that have potentially high rewards. The
Prolific UK blue chip unit trust will aim for an above average total return
of capital and income, by investing mainly in companies that are part of the
FTSE 100 index. Much of the balance of the portfolio will be invested in the
second hundred largest companies. The trusts require a minimum investment of
Pounds 500 and will be launched on May 25.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-515</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Markets (At a glance): Templeton Int launches umbrella fund
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Templeton International has launched an umbrella fund, based in Luxembourg,
called Global Strategy. Investors will have a choice between 14 sub-funds,
denominated in US dollars, Deutschemarks and Swiss francs. The minimum
initial investment is Dollars 5,000, and further investments should be at
least Dollars 1,000.
The initial charge is 5.75 per cent for equity funds and between 1 and 4 per
cent for bond funds, with a switching charge of 1 per cent. The annual
management charge on the funds vary between 0.8 per cent and 2 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-516</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Markets (At a glance): Guaranteed income bond 'best buys'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Savers who want to buy guaranteed income bonds may be interested in the
following 'best buys' compiled by Baronworth Investment Services. For
one-year bonds, ACUMA is paying 9.27 per cent on sums of Pounds 1,000-Pounds
4,999, and 9.57 per cent on sums of Pounds 5,000-Pounds 19,999. Among the
three-year bonds, Premium Life is paying 8.6 per cent on Pounds 1,000-Pounds
1,999 while Prosperity Financial Services is offering 9.4 per cent on sums
of Pounds 2,000-Pounds 24,999. For five-year bonds, Cornhill Life is paying
9 per cent on sums of Pounds 1,000-Pounds 1,999, while Consolidated Life is
paying 9.2 per cent on Pounds 2,000-Pounds 4,999.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-517</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Markets (At a glance): Political pointers from the 'misery
index'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Political pundits in the City, trying to guess the date of the next general
election, are examining the 'misery index' which adds the current rate of
inflation to the rate of unemployment. The idea is that the lower the level
of 'misery', the higher the government's chances of winning reelection will
be. It peaked just before Margaret Thatcher's resignation, and is showing
slight signs of going down, but analysts are hedging their bets on the
election date. JA
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-518</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Markets (At a glance): Oil sector begins to bubble
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The oil sector has seen some active dealing on the stock market in recent
weeks, most of it hinging on switches between BP, the largest company in the
sector, and other smaller companies with speculative potential.
The whole sector was shaken by the news on Wednesday that Elf Aquitaine and
Enterprise Oil had made a deal to to accquire Occidental Petroleum's North
Sea assets for Dollars 1.35bn. Enterprise dropped 6p to 551p, having at one
point hit 570p, but switching into its high-yielding convertible stock led
to drops in the share price of the major stocks in the sector. BP dropped
11p to 343p on Wednesday.
Dealers were discounting a loss by BP for the first quarter, which would
have been the first ever in the company's history. The results, published on
Thursday, in fact revealed a net income of Pounds 10m, and shares edged up
3p to 346p on the news.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-519</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Markets: A taxing time but Trafalgar battles on - The Bottom
Line
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HOW WOULD Trafalgar House shareholders react if the final dividend was
skipped later this year? As far as the directors are concerned the scenario
is not worth thinking about. Yet passing the dividend would be the simplest
solution to what is proving to be an intractable problem: the tax bill.
Taxation for the shipping-to-property group has risen to 33 per cent - a
good 10 per cent higher than normal. The group's UK profits are not big
enough to offset tax paid on the dividend against advanced corporation tax
(ACT). But there is no reason for shareholders to panic. If Sir Eric Parker,
chief executive, was prepared to raid reserves last year to pay a dividend
he is unlikely to pass it on in September.
A less painful way out is to buy a few British companies with a healthy
balance sheet. But that could require Trafalgar taking on more debt. Not an
impossible feat for a group with gearing at 54 per cent, but by no means
ideal. The group's favoured solution is to issue convertible loan stock. The
interest paid on the stock would be tax deductable. However, as far as
shareholders are concerned the simplest solution is for Trafalgar to earn
more profits in the UK.
In the short term that looks like a tall order. The results this week could
have been worse, but not much. For the six months to March Trafalgar's
pre-tax profits fell from Pounds 116.9m to Pounds 51.5m. True, there were
unusual circumstances. Its not every year that one of your world cruise
liners has to be re-routed to avoid a war in the Gulf. A recession does not
help either.
Yet the simple point about a conglomerate is that if one sector goes into
the red another should remain in the black. In Trafalgar's case just about
everything went red. The exception being construction. Thanks to a record
Pounds 2.9bn order book the sector's operating profits rose by 40 per cent
to Pounds 38.3m (Pounds 27.4m). (It was so good some analysts questioned the
figures at a meeting with the company. But the order book looks real
enough.)
What potential investors want to know is what chance is there of the red
spots turning black? Sir Eric is cautiously confident that property and
investment, down from Pounds 64.9m to Pounds 19m, is set to recover. So too
is just about every analyst. The only argument is when?
Sir Eric has detected a revival in UK housing. But not many analysts have
seen simular signs. Yet even if he is given the benefit of doubt it still
does not help investors know whether the sector is on the road to recovery.
The key is commercial property - a big earner in the past  - where the
decision to reclassify about Pounds 200m of investment properties as fixed
assets should be read as a warning sign: there is still worse to come. When
the properties are revalued in September there will be the inevitable
write-down. But the reclassification means that any devaluation will go
straight into reserves instead of showing up in the profit and loss account.
Nonetheless, even the pessimist will concede that the outlook for commercial
property will improve. The group is building three big developments. The
Brooklands business park should be on stream within five years when the
sector is expected to be making record profits.
A business park in Chiswick, west London, and office development in
Paddington, central London, should be completed by the end of the decade. On
the shipping front, the company can be forgiven for feeling a little sorry
for itself. It was more heavily exposed to the impact of the Gulf War and
the recession than its rivals.
This was because Cunard, Trafalgar House's cruise shipping operation, places
a higher proportion of its vessels outside the US market. When there is a
war US citizens, who count for around 80 per cent of Cunard's market, tend
not to venture too far from home.
The fall in profits, from Pounds 30.1m to Pounds 7.6m, would have been worse
but for the fact that the Cunard Princess was chartered out for recreation
during the Gulf War. That said, the worst is behind Trafalgar. The group is
reporting signs of recovery in the cruise market. While it may not be soon
enough to affect this year's end results, it should make an impact by 1992.
In the long-term there is more reason to feel bullish about the company. The
group's 9.1 per cent yield, the second highest in the Footsie, is expected
to fall as its shares rise. Its net asset value of Pounds 165m includes out
of date valuations of the QE2 and other five star vessels. Analysts believe
the true asset figure is closer to Pounds 350m.
While Sir Eric has ruled out throwing any immediate sops to shareholders by
demerging he has reason to expect significantly bigger profits, particularly
from commercial property, within the next three to four years. By that time
he should even be able to reduce the tax bill.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Chart (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-520</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / The Long View: Major's options grow fewer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARRY RILEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT SEEMS appropriate that Margaret Thatcher should have chosen Vanity Fair
as a vehicle for unloading some of her frustrations this week. For others,
the memories of pride and the passion have faded almost six months after she
was ousted and John Major took over at Number Ten Downing Street. But now
the political temperature is climbing again as the general election options
begin to pass their expiration dates one by one.
Next Thursday's Monmouth by-election will presumably hammer the final nail
into the coffin of a June poll, but it will be much more difficult for the
Government to pass up the chance of an October or early November election,
however unpromising the opinion polls might look at the time. The downwards
distortion of the headline inflation rate will be at its maximum during the
late summer and autumn, and there should be scope for several more small
cuts in mortgage rates by then. The government will be able to keep
repeating its prediction that the economy will turn upwards around the
middle of the year, with precious few statistics published by October to
allow the claims to be proved one way or the other: the next official
forecast does not have to come out until November, and an earlier election
might spare some Treasury blushes and fudges.
True, unemployment will be rising rapidly through the summer, at perhaps
50,000-60,000 a month, but the jobless figures did little visible damage to
the Tories in 1983 and 1987, and anyway unemployment will almost inevitably
rise until well into 1992 so it has little relevance to election timing.
Clinging on for a full five-year term has proved a losing gamble in the
past. It did not save Sir Alec Douglas-Home in 1964, and sitting tight for a
fifth winter was the undoing of James Callaghan in 1979. But historically it
has proved very difficult for the Labour Party to win power at the polls at
the first attempt, except in the remarkable circumstances of 1945.
Harold Wilson needed two elections in 1964 and 1966 in order to achieve a
working majority, and another two elections in 1974 in order to achieve any
kind of majority at all. Now it appears that Labour will need a national
swing of more than 8 per cent compared with the 1987 result if it is to gain
a Commons majority. Quite possibly it will once again require two general
elections before a clear mandate will be given to either party.
For the first time these uncertainties will need to be managed in the
context of full membership of the European Monetary System. There is much
less scope for taking any strain on sterling on the exchange rate: and if
City nervousness about a Labour victory should put pressure on the pound the
cure - a rise in interest rates - would only put the Conservatives into a
worse mess. However, we could presumably look to our friends in Europe for
support: and there is no evidence that moderate left-wing governments cause
anxieties elsewhere in the EMS.
Moderate is the key word here; the pendulum nature of British politics is
reasserting itself, for example in the choice between top marginal income
tax rates of 40 per cent and 59 per cent, whereas the 50 per cent or so
which might be a reasonable consensus choice in Europe is apparently not on
offer to the British electorate.
Inevitably, after 12 years, Conservative policies have created some hostages
to fortune. Top businessmen's pay rises have created great resentment
without generating the economic miracle which might have legitimised them.
Indeed, market capitalism ought to be much more secure in Britain than it
now is, hiding increasingly behind the oxymoron of the social market.
Margaret Thatcher notably failed to desocialise attitudes to medical
treatment in Britain, as can be seen in the current row over London
hospitals which have discovered that they are uneconomic in a mildly
competitive situation. Few tears are shed when banking and insurance jobs
are shifted out of the capital to more efficient locations but in medicine,
it seems, benefits are measured by the volume of spending rather than
output, and by unions rather than by patients.
John Major can nevertheless claim some modest economic achievements. In the
past six months sterling has held its position within the EMS with
unexpected ease and interest rates have come down by 2 percentage points. By
next week he will be able to point to a fall in inflation, however
contrived, from 10.9 to little more than 6 per cent. The stock market has
climbed some 18 per cent, as measured by the FT-SE 100 Index.
However, the cost of the improvement in monetary stability in terms of lost
jobs and reduced output and consumption has been severe. And the continued
existence of suppressed inflation within the system can be judged by the
persistence of a balance of payments deficit even within an economy which
has shrunk by possibly 3 per cent over the past year: domestic suppliers are
still not competitive with their overseas counterparts even when operating
well below capacity in a slack labour market.
Should the markets fear Labour? The individuals making up those markets are,
of course, personally vulnerable to higher taxes, which will affect their
views, but that is not quite the same thing. On policies the history books
are confusing. The anti-profit controls of the 1970s were actually invented
by the Conservatives. The Labour administration was a big borrower in
1974-79, but its predecessor in 1964-70 actually balanced the budget. Much
of the severe inflation of the mid-70s was the fault of Edward Heath's Tory
Government. However, the reputation of Labour for devaluation sticks more
firmly, in 1967 and in 1976 (when sterling depreciated by approaching a
fifth).
Devaluation, now repackaged as realignment, will be a hidden agenda item in
the coming election, but it will be there nevertheless. It cannot help
Margaret Thatcher's vanity, but it is fair that sterling interest rates
still need to include a risk premium.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-521</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Mammon under a pall: Despite the war Kuwait, and its
absentee citizens are still obsessed by money
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROGER MATTHEWS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ON THE road north from Saudi Arabia towards Kuwait City the sky ahead turns
from the dark purple of a summer thunderstorm to the deep black of
ecological disaster and the mid-afternoon sun becomes as easily viewed as
the midnight moon. A few cars bearing Free Kuwait stickers and loaded high
with possessions are also heading north, but there is little sense of
anticipation and every indication, once through the border, that the
euphoria of liberation has long since dissipated.
At the International Hotel in Kuwait City, opposite the fortified American
embassy, the management insists on guests signing their credit card charge
slips in advance, before handing over the key to a Dollars 200-a-night room
which has no lock. The unstated fear is that the new wave of hotel guests,
many of them nationals from the countries which helped to drive Saddam
Hussein's troops out of Kuwait will, like the occupants from August 2 to
February 26, depart without paying.
It is a precaution that might seem prudent or depressing. Perhaps it merely
provides confirmation that the trauma of occupation did not have much effect
on the primary historic concern of Kuwait: making money. A sense of national
identity is never more fiercely put to the test than by foreign invasion. In
Kuwait, it is the financial drive of the citizens which so far seems to have
survived unscathed. And it is fitting that among the least damaged buildings
in town, down to its crystal ashtrays, white leather settees and original
oil paintings, is the one housing the Central Bank.
Kuwait, during the the 1970s, prided itself on being the smartest, sharpest,
most cosmopolitan and liberal of the Gulf emirates. Nationals privately
mocked the provincial Saudis and were dismissive of Qataris and Bahrainis.
Kuwait's Fund for Future Generations, into which 10 per cent of oil revenues
was automatically diverted, emphasised national foresight while its policy
of building equity stakes in large international companies demonstrated its
political self-confidence. At the dawn of the 1980s Kuwait's annual
investment income was reckoned to have surpassed its oil revenues. At the
then current rates of depletion its hydrocarbons reserves were good for a
couple of hundred years.
The joke used to be that in order to derive full benefit from the
all-embracing welfare state which such affluence spawned, it was necessary
to make one huge sacrifice - to live in Kuwait. But it was an expatriate's
joke. The Kuwaitis knew better, and spent a good part of their year showing
their wisdom by living abroad. Which is where the majority of them were when
Iraq invaded, are today, and where many more are planning to be as
temperatures soar in the next couple of months.
For the non-Kuwaiti visitor it takes a while to adjust to the impression
that there are few, if any, Kuwaitis involved in the actual physical
reconstruction of their country. In part, this could be because an estimated
350,000 of Kuwait's 650,000 citizenry is out of the country, but more
relevant is the assumption among Kuwaitis that generally they do not involve
themselves in manual labour. Thus, for most of the day, the streets of
central Kuwait City are empty, still unswept and littered with the residue
of war. But enter one of the official buildings slowly returning to life and
young men will invariably be found near the entrance, often with guns,
certainly with cigarettes, lolling, laughing and seemingly indifferent to
the squalor around them.
They know that eventually it will be cleaned up, although how quickly is one
of the multitude of issues awaiting resolution in post-occupation Kuwait.
Officially, the Cabinet table is groaning under the weight of the agenda
resting upon it. Almost every question that could be asked of a modern state
is being posed. Should the hereditary monarchy continue, be replaced by, or
share power with an elected assembly? Who is a citizen? What should the size
of population be? Should women be allowed to vote? Should the welfare state
continue? How can the country defend itself? Should foreign troops remain on
Kuwaiti sand? And, depending on those answers, what the country's immediate
and medium financial strategy should be at a time when perhaps three or more
times its normal daily output of oil is going up in smoke.
It is not easy to discover how, by whom and with what urgency these issues
are being approached. The signals are confusing. One evening,
illegally sipping a Chablis bottled while Kuwait was still only a gleam in
Saddam's eye, and looking out over the freshly-filled swimming pool of a
local businessman, the conversation alternated between the responsibility of
the individual in the modern state, the absurdity of expecting anything from
the newly-appointed government, the disappointing performance of property
prices in London and the basic decency of the local Iraqi battalion
commander during the occupation.
The next evening it was alcohol again, this time offered by young men at the
kerbside who from the back of their car dispensed scotch or vodka in
celebration of what they hoped would be an explosion of booze and bars in
the one country in the Gulf which had banned even resident diplomats from
importing liquor. As their friends noisily challenged fate from the back of
high-powered motorcycles, the young men explained that they did not mind too
much about democracy, just about bars.
In the public areas of the International Hotel, the well-fed but disgruntled
business community of Kuwait, including former Ministers, seemed to be in
almost permanent session. Their attitude to the composition of the new
Cabinet made the reaction of the British Labour Party towards Margaret
Thatcher's selections over the past decade seem generous by comparison. But
it was also possible to sense, not too far below the surface, that this view
might be tempered if certain large re-supply contracts were to be
sensitively awarded.
Indeed, official dispensation of national wealth remains the essence of
government in Kuwait. Fewer than 4 per cent of Kuwaitis operate in the
private sector and for the past nine months those outside the country have
been in large part funded by their local embassies. Lack of domestic
investment opportunities, an excess of funds and a belief that the
government would ultimately bail out all but the most extravagant debtors
shaped Kuwaiti attitudes during the 1970s.
For gamblers it was paradise. At the end of that decade it led to the
creation and subsequent spectacular collapse of a secondary stock market
based on Kuwaiti-owned offshore companies which existed in little more than
name and were not required to issue balance sheets. A combination of
reckless greed, government indifference, and a trading system based on
post-dated cheques left an astonishing Dollars 90bn (Pounds 53bn) of
worthless notes in circulation. The effects of the 1982 Souk al-Manakh crash
had still not been fully resolved when Iraq invaded.
The opposition in Kuwait, which even in its present loose, unstructured,
unthreatening form is being harried by the government, fairly points out
that the administration which was responsible for failing to forestall
either the Souk al Manakh disaster or the Iraqi invasion cannot, with entire
confidence, be trusted to oversee the country's reconstruction. Yet for the
foreseeable future, it will be.
The first stage, dismissively referred to by some local businessman as
'faucet-fixing', has almost been completed. The US Army Corps of Engineers,
operating from the 16th floor of the Plaza Hotel without air conditioning,
generously insists on sharing the credit with Kuwaiti engineers for having
restored essential services to the city, but its role is concluding.
In the oilfields to the north and south of Kuwait City the bigger and most
awesome physical part of the battle to return the nation to normality has
been joined. To be in the pitch-black mid-morning darkness of the fields,
amid the roar and shriek of the burning wells, is to experience both the
frightening power of natural forces and the horror that can be ignited by
one man. It is also to appreciate the daily caution and courage needed by
the men seeking to extinguish the fires in circumstances which can change
with the perilous suddenness suffered so devastatingly less than a fortnight
ago by two Financial Times colleagues: Alan Harper, who took the front page
photograph, and David Thomas, the newspaper's Natural Resources Editor.
Scarcely less shockingly impressive is the devastation wreaked by the Allied
forces on the retreating remnants of Saddam's army. On the Mutla ridge,
north of Kuwait City, where the lraqi army was squeezed into a fatal funnel
by its own minefields, military and civilian vehicles lie in brown, burned
lines by the roadside, disturbed only by souvenir hunters, the verges still
littered with discarded military clothing.
Even so, clearing the wreckage will be easier than the subsequent stages of
reconstruction which become progressively more difficult as they have to be
placed within the context of an overall political vision. The Cabinet
remains largely silent on these issues. The Emir, Sheikh Jaber al-Ahmed
al-Sabah, who is assumed by most Kuwaitis to be in failing health, has
promised a more participatory form of government, but his cousin, Prime
Minister Sheikh Saad al-Abdulla al-Sabah has yet to flesh out the plans. In
the coming weeks tens of thousands more Kuwaitis will return home, although
the government expects that they will do so primarily to initiate work on
the refurbishment of their homes, and will then depart again for the summer.
The opportunities for consultation remain restricted.
Perhaps by September more than 60 per cent of Kuwait's nationals will be,
more or less permanently, in residence. How many more will follow could
depend on how the government decides to resolve the issue of non-Kuwaiti
labour. Senior Kuwaitis, including members of the al-Sabah family, argue
that the pre-war population of close to 2m should be scaled down to about
1.3m. This means, as one member of the ruling family put it, 'thinning out'
the Palestinian presence and clearing out the Yemenis, Jordanians and
Sudanese, all of whom were deemed to have collaborated with the occupying
forces or at least supported Iraq's invasion.
The government has admitted that there were serious human rights abuses in
the days immediately after liberation when retribution was taken against
those who had most openly assisted the Iraqis, but claims this has stopped.
Yet reports of torture persist.
International frustration is meanwhile growing. Apart from the oil sector,
the expected bonanza of profitable reconstruction contracts has not been
forthcoming, in spite of a series of western ministerial visits alternately
pleading for business and warning against further abuses of human rights.
What, perhaps, should be slowly dawning on the world's business community is
that the primary concern for the government is not spending what it has, but
exploring every possible avenue for raising funds from others. In particular
Kuwait hopes to persuade Saudi Arabia and other Gulf friends to sell oil on
its behalf until it can again resume exporting.
It is all a far cry from whatever sense of idealism was thought to have
accompanied the Allied military action. The people of Kuwait suffered; many
families still bear the mental and physical scars of occupation. The Kurds
have suffered far, far more. Less than an hour's drive from Kuwait City in
southern Iraq, the people of the impoverished town of Safwan are waiting for
the return of Saddam's police under the umbrella of a UN observer force.
The people of Kuwait were, in immediate human terms, the sole beneficiaries
of an extraordinary international effort. They should not be surprised if
their response is assessed against that sombre background.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-522</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / The Lex Column: Gaming
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The excitements at Granada should not obscure another aspect of yesterday's
announcements: Bass's relentless pursuit of market leadership in all its
businesses. Yesterday it bought its way to the top spot in a bingo duopoly,
and abandoned a trailing position in bookmaking. The decision to sell the
Coral Racing betting shops leaves open the possibility of a duopoly there,
too, if some outsider picks them up and winkles the William Hill chain away
from Brent Walker, where they are none-too-securely perched. The mass-market
gaming business is starting to look enjoyably cosy - from the participants'
side of the fence, at least.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-523</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / The Lex Column: BT
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The regulator's preliminary decision on access charges for BT's competitors
looks consistent with Oftel's intention to mimic competition rather than
stimulate it by tilting the market in favour of new entrants. But one wishes
Oftel and BT would provide a more convincing justification for the charge;
hard facts, for example. The fact that Sir Bryan Carsberg may yet change his
mind is unsatisfactory. The overhang of uncertainty following the Duopoly
Review continues to sit uneasily with the impending sale of the government's
remaining BT stake.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-524</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / The Lex Column: Continental/Pirelli
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The ousting of Mr Horst Urban by his own supervisory board looks like a
remarkable victory for Pirelli. More significantly, though, it might just
prove an important turning point in German attitudes to takeovers.
No one should think the floodgates are about to open. Indeed, if anything,
the immediate lesson lies in the powerful influence of the German banks,
given that Mr Urban's days were obviously numbered once he lost the
confidence of Deutsche Bank. On the other hand, the events of the last 48
hours may send a growing number of German businesses scuttling to their
financial advisers in search of a better bid defence than the traditional
dead bat. But, as the equally spectacular bid for Societe Generale de
Belgique by Mr Carlo De Benedetti showed, that does not automatically ensure
a warmer welcome for outsiders. This is where the European Community's
takeover code could perform a useful role.
It is too early to be sure whether the resumed Conti/Pirelli negotiations
will lead to a full merger, though this seems the probable outcome. It is
quite another matter whether the combined group will be any better able to
tackle the severe problem of overcapacity in the world tyre industry.
Shareholders on both sides have been warned.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-525</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / The Lex Column: Granada
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The most rumoured rights issue in recent history finally hit the screens
yesterday. Granada, though, must have gassed its mole before news could leak
of the accompanying 40 per cent dividend cut and the full extent of the
company's indebtedness. When the whole story was revealed, the shares
tumbled 13 per cent.
It is hard not to feel some sympathy for Mr Lewis, scapegoat for a series of
ill-fated adventures in which others played an equally central part. The
lurid boardroom drama has nevertheless served to obscure the fact that the
timing of Granada's operation was closely linked to the refinancing of
BSkyB. With or without Mr Lewis's scalp, no institutional shareholder could
have contemplated offering its support when the (admittedly faint)
possibility still existed that the terrestrial TV company's Pounds 130m loan
guarantee to its satellite cousin could suddenly be called in.
The new shares have been pitched at such a big discount that one wonders
whether the issue needed to be underwritten at all. Investors, however, must
face up to a period of uncertainty during the TV franchise bid and the hunt
for a new chief executive. With the prop of a high yield now removed, the
prospects thereafter will depend on how much the franchise costs, how
quickly computer services can be turned round, and whether BSkyB fulfils its
promise. That makes it more risky than a straightforward recovery stock.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24 Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-526</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / The Lex Column: Sideways with a vengeance
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FT-SE Index: 2,524.3 (-17.5)
On the face of it, if the UK equity market was going to visit new territory,
it should have happened yesterday - Wall Street up 40 points, another
interest rate cut discounted in the money markets. Instead, after a brief
upward flurry, the FT-SE faded back almost to where it started the week. No
one wants to buy, so the market is going sideways with a vengeance.
From a different angle, the market is remarkably steady. Institutions appear
sanguine about political risk, believing that the downside is limited to
perhaps 7 per cent or 2,400 on the FT-SE: no great reason to sell.
The last time the FT-SE index failed to break through 2,550 was nearly a
month ago. Then it was received wisdom that the corporate reporting season
had been remarkable for its lack of bad news; the market was hitting new
highs in daily customer turnover of more than Pounds 1bn.
After the government's local election setbacks and this week's string of
bearish corporate trading statements to shareholders' meetings, the picture
looks somewhat different. Queasy investors are no doubt asking themselves
how much the profits warnings are already in the price. In practice, the
warnings only help a little to guess the timing of the profits cycle; next
Tuesday's producer price figures will be a better guide to progress.
More worrying for the market should be the sudden decline in turnover.
Nomura estimates that the average level of daily customer business so far
this month is Pounds 787m, against Pounds 916m since 1987. It would break a
long-standing pattern if the market were to continue its rise on
below-average volumes. A mark-down or sell-off seems eminently predictable.
New money will go into bonds.
Such bearishness would be confounded if corporate profitability turned out
better than the current consensus. If evidence strengthens that companies
have much higher operational gearing than in previous cycles, and the upturn
looks like arriving on schedule, then investors might be tempted to break
the seasonal habit of a lifetime and buy in May. It remains a big if, just
the same.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-527</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Arbitrage selling hits
Nikkei in thin trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ARBITRAGE-related selling depressed the Nikkei average, which finished lower
yesterday in spite of the overnight jump on Wall Street and falling bond
yields, writes Emiko Terazono in Tokyo.
The index closed down 163.21 at 26,274.29 - a 0.8 per cent fall on the week
 -after rising 128.71 on Thursday. It hit a day's high of 26,449.06 in the
morning, but drifted down to a low of 26,212.64 on light index selling by
investment trusts.
Volume remained low at 340m shares, up from 330m. Advances marginally
outpaced declines by 474 to 468, with 179 issues unchanged. The Topix index
of all first-section issues rose 1.30 to 1,991.15 and, in London trading,
the ISE/Nikkei 50 index declined by 2.01 to 1,497.32.
Investors continued to trade in small and medium-capital stocks. The
small-capital stock index on the first section rose 0.53 per cent while the
second section index gained 0.45 per cent on strong volume of 25m shares.
The over-the-counter index fell 54.55 to 3,227.98 on profit-taking.
Heavy electrical issues finished higher as interest continued following the
news of the strong April US semiconductor book-to-bill ratio. Hitachi rose
Y20 to Y1,210 and Mitsubishi Electric climbed Y15 to Y780.
Securities houses were sold on afternoon reports that Standard &amp; Poor's, the
US rating agency, was considering a downgrading of bonds issued by the big
four brokerages. Daiwa Securities fell Y30 to Y1,370 and Nomura lost Y20 to
Y2,200.
Nihon Nohyaku, which fell on Thursday after an announcement about stricter
margin requirements, rose Y50 to Y2,470 on renewed speculative interest.
Speculators also sought Kawai Musical, which gained Y62 to Y932, and
Fukusuke, up Y200 at Y4,490.
Taiyo Sanso, an industrial gas manufacturer, fell Y10 to Y1,130, after
hitting a year's high in the morning. The stock has been popular recently
after strong sales of its semiconductor cleaning equipment.
Bandai, the toymaker, rose Y140 to Y7,600 on an upward revision of its
consolidated earnings for the previous year. Active trading of the company's
warrant bonds overnight on the London market also encouraged investors.
In Osaka, the OSE average rose 103.49 to 29,230.41 on volume of 34m shares.
Toyo Tec, a security services operator, fell Y100 to Y4,900 on
profit-taking. The issue had risen recently on reports of increased orders
from banks.
Roundup
MOST PACIFIC Rim markets made gains on the week.
MANILA saw Philippine Long Distance Telephone (PLDT) rise for a second day,
closing up 12.50 pesos at 530, on news that its 18bn peso expansion
programme had been approved. PLDT plans to install 296,400 new telephone
lines in Manila and 147,900 lines in the provinces between 1992 and 1996.
Otherwise trading was dull; the composite index shed 1.06 to 1,117.44, up
5.5 per cent on the week.
NEW ZEALAND closed firm but off its earlier highs, as late profit-taking hit
dual-listed issues. The Barclays index ended 5.37 higher at 1,573.86, up 3
per cent on the week but off its intraday peak of 1,586.20. Turnover slipped
to NZDollars 19m from NZDollars 38m.
Fletcher Challenge fell 1 cent to NZDollars 4.14. After the close it
announced a NZDollars 195m international share placement.
AUSTRALIA was also clipped by late profit-taking. The All Ordinaries index
rose 2.0 to 1,548.3, its fifth consecutive rise and up 2 per cent on the
week. Turnover fell to ADollars 231m from ADollars 307m.
TAIWAN was mixed in nervous trading. The weighted index edged down 3.33 to
6,301.89, but was 7.6 per cent higher on the week. Turnover rose to TDollars
82.5bn from TDollars 76.9bn.
HONG KONG lost most of its early Wall Street-inspired gains on
profit-taking. The Hang Seng index closed at 3,750.20, up 5.74 on the day
but little changed on the week. Turnover grew to HKDollars 1.3bn from
HKDollars 948m.
SEOUL resumed its downwards course, the composite index falling 4.89 to
629.83, a decline on the week of 3 per cent. Turnover shrank to Won62bn from
Won81.5bn.
BANGKOK saw heavy selling of four issues which made their debut yesterday.
The SET index fell 8.11 to 845.88, down 2.6 per cent on the week.
BOMBAY rose, as carry-forward charges for business done in the two weeks to
Thursday were fixed at a lower-than-expected level. The BSE index rose 28.06
to 1,288.35.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-528</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Hopes of lower rates put
bourses in positive mood
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HOPES OF lower interest rates helped bourses return from Thursday's holiday
in a positive mood yesterday, but turnover was light outside Madrid and
Oslo. Brussels was closed, writes Our Markets Staff.
MADRID rose again in active trading, which included large blocks of Banesto
and Banco Zaragozano. The general index gained 3.00 or 1.1 per cent to
282.55, a rise on the week of 1.7 per cent, in turnover of about Pta30bn, up
from Pta11.8bn.
Hopes of a further interest rate cut and a good inflation figure, due on
Tuesday, encouraged investors.
A total of 1.25m shares was traded in Banesto, including a block of 1m
shares, or 1 per cent of the bank's capital, at Pta3,755 a share. La
Corporacion Banesto, the bank's industrial group, said that it was in talks
with AGF of France on co-operation in the insurance sector. The stock rose
Pta55 to Pta3,780. La Union y el Fenix, Banesto's insurance unit, slipped
Pta20 to Pta6,900.
Banco Zaragozano rose Pta25 to Pta3,000 on 1.87m shares, including a block
of 1.79m shares, or 10 per cent of its capital. The activity could be part
of a restructuring, said an analyst, because the bank is owned by the
Albertos, the former husbands of the Koplowitz sisters who announced the
merger of two construction companies earlier this week. There was
speculation that Cofir, the holding company of Mr Carlo de Benedetti, the
Italian financier, which owns 10 per cent of the bank, could be raising its
stake.
PARIS rose after Wall Street's overnight gains, but turnover was light after
the two-day holiday. The CAC 40 index added 20.09 or 1.1 per cent to
1,850.27 - a gain of 1 per cent over the week - amid hopes of a forthcoming
interest rate cut. Turnover was estimated to be similar to Tuesday's
FFr1.4bn.
Elf Aquitaine rose FFr6 to FFr366 on volume of 184,200 shares on the news
that it and Enterprise Oil of the UK would jointly buy Occidental
Petroleum's North Sea assets.
Cetelem, the short-term credit company, gained FFr47 or 6.8 per cent to
FFr740 on hopes of lower interest rates.
FRANKFURT took its direction from Wall Street, but there was a lack of
action on the trading front. Volume fell from DM4.4bn to DM3.4bn. The FAZ
and DAX indices rose by 4.55 to 685.76, and 13.35 to 1,620.63, but fell by
0.8 and 0.7 per cent on the week.
There was a flurry in Continental, the German tyre manufacturer which has
been fighting off advances from Pirelli Spa of Italy. Mr Horst Urban,
Conti's managing board chairman, resigned on Thursday over his opposition to
a merger, leaving the way open for renewed talks.
Conti peaked at DM209 and turnover in the stock rose from DM22m to DM50m on
the day; but, said Mr Jens Wiecking of Merck Finck in Dusseldorf, there was
no follow-through after the morning gains and the shares closed DM6 higher
on the day at DM203, down DM7.50 on the week. The speculation seemed to
spread to Nixdorf, which has had a bad year so far but which rose DM13
yesterday to DM252.
Metallgesellschaft fell another DM12 to DM534, suffering from a high p/e and
a drop in profits. Good results took PWA, the papermaker, up DM5.50 to
DM275.
MILAN was boosted by Pirelli which rose for a second day on news that it was
resuming co-operation talks with Continental of Germany. The Comit index
rose 3.00 to 577.38, down 1.6 per cent on the week, in volume estimated at
close to Thursday's thin L100bn.
Pirelli was fixed L26 or 1.5 per cent higher at L1,701 in spite of a cut in
the 1990 dividend to L70 from L110 and a drop in net profit. The stock rose
to L1,718 after hours.
Italcementi fell L160 to L20,830. After hours, the cement company said that,
in spite of an improvement in 1990 group net profit, there had been a marked
slowdown in the construction sector.
OSLO leapt 2.5 per cent to a second successive 1991 high in heavy volume, on
renewed foreign buying, strong company results and low interest rates. The
all-share index rose 12.53 to 518.70, a jump of 7.2 per cent on the week, in
turnover of NKr820m, up from NKr588m.
ZURICH saw support for banks and insurers as interest rates eased slightly
and on hopes of further cuts later this year. The SBC banks index rose 7.8,
or more than 1 per cent, to 643.3 as the Credit Suisse index gained 3.3 to
545.5, down 1.1 per cent on the week.
AMSTERDAM came off the day's highs in thin trading as many operators took a
long weekend after Thursday's holiday. The CBS tendency index closed 0.7
higher at 94.9, down 0.5 per cent on the week.
STOCKHOLM rose on demand for Astra before its first-quarter results, due on
Monday. The Affarsvarlden General index rose 7.9 to 1,043.9, down 0.6 per
cent on the week. Trading in Astra accounted for SKr184m of a total SKr326m,
down from SKr380m. Its free B shares rose SKr24 to SKr584.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100 - May 10
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes
Open     10 am    11 am    Noon     1 pm     2 pm     3 pm     Close
1128.96  1129.01  1128.87  1129.59  1129.62  1129.85  1129.91  1130.52
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Day's High   1130.64     Day's Low   1128.41
May 9         May 8      May 7       May 3      May 2
1125.62***    1119.87    1125.75     1129.77    1128.32
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value 1000 (26/10/90)  *** Indicative.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-529</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHANNESBURG was steady in quiet trading. The all-gold index closed up 6 at
1,060, helped by steady bullion prices and a retreat in the financial rand.
The industrial index rose 10 to 3,468. The all-share index also added 10 to
2,986.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-530</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / World Stock Markets: Stale Japanese bulls explore pastures
new - Disappointed investors have stopped holding their breath
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JAPANESE investors have been holding their breath for the past few weeks,
waiting for a reduction in official interest rates. But the cut has not
come, the stock market remains sluggish, and the recently expectant
investors are putting their funds elsewhere.
Over the past month, the Tokyo market has been characterised by low volumes
and a narrow trading range, in spite of Japanese institutions' best
intentions to begin the new financial year positively and to leave behind a
bruising fiscal 1990.
While the impact of a cut in the Official Discount Rate (ODR) on real
lending rates is questionable, the ODR still exercises a powerful influence
on the market's outlook. Shares were bought in February and March on the
presumption of a rate reduction.
It was expected that the ODR, now at 6 per cent, would fall to 5.5 per cent;
and, for the past two weeks, brokers have attempted to extract extra hope
and client purchases out of the situation by talking of a cut of 0.75 of a
percentage point.
The argument went that Japan was under severe international pressure to
reduce rates, and that a 0.5 per cent reduction would not be enough to keep
Washington happy.
Until now, the Bank of Japan has been unmoved, as has the Tokyo market.
Volumes have been around a poor 300m shares in recent days, and the Nikkei
average has alternately risen and fallen by small amounts, without any real
signs of buying confidence.
The central bank argues that further heat needs to be removed from an
overwarm economy, and that a cut in rates could prompt a return to the
speculative share-buying binges of 1989. The bank's argument seems to be
supported by the erratic movements of a few stocks, which have apparently
been targeted by still-active speculator groups looking for quick profits in
a dull market.
Among the more volatile movers have been Kawai Musical Instruments, the
world's second largest maker of pianos, and Taiyo Sanso, a semiconductor
cleaning equipment maker, both of which hit 1991 highs during trading
yesterday. Brokers indicate that they are typical of the small to
medium-sized issues chosen by investors more for their volatility potential
than for business-related reasons.
Japanese brokers are hoping that the business results season, which begins
next week, will inspire interest. Mr Paul Heaton, deputy head of research at
WI Carr, says that investors are likely to be more interested in the
forecasts for this year than in last year's results, most of which have
already been released on an informal basis.
'Most companies have already announced the revisions for expected results
for last year, so it will be more important to look at the predicted
profits. For example, companies in the service companies could be looking at
good profit growth,' Mr Heaton adds.
Mr Craig Chudler, investment strategist at UBS Phillips &amp; Drew, says that
the market would have fallen further but for strong arbitrage-related
buying. This has allowed the Nikkei average to settle at around at 26,000,
he says, but essentially it is not a reflection of confidence in the
market's strength.
Individuals and foreign investors were enthusiastic buyers of shares earlier
this year, but their interest has waned. The buying by foreigners followed a
realisation by fund managers, at the end of last year, that they were
underweight in Tokyo.
As for individual investors, officials at the Tokyo exchange and the Finance
Ministry have attempted to lure them back to the market by encouraging
companies to pay higher dividends. The focus on dividends was sharpened by
life insurance companies' threats to sell stock holdings unless yields were
improved.
So far, there has been little evidence of either an increase in dividends or
a sell-off of strategic stock holdings by the life insurance companies. A
survey released this week by the Nihon Keizai Shimbun, the leading Japanese
financial daily, indicates that Japanese executives remain convinced that
shareholders come low on the list of priorities.
The survey of 2,396 listed companies found that 41.3 per cent of executives
want earnings to be used for capital spending, while 30.2 per cent think
that they should be distributed among employees and 19.6 per cent believe
that shareholders should receive the benefits. Meanwhile, 86 per cent of the
respondents said that US companies' focus on high dividends was partly
responsible for their present financial problems.
Some Japanese companies are making an attempt to attract individual
investors by reducing their minimum trading units from 1,000 to 100 shares.
In recent weeks, Asatsu, the advertising agency, Tachikawa Corporation, the
leading maker of blinds and partitions, and Sega Enterprises, an amusement
equipment maker, have announced reductions, and brokers say that many other
companies will follow if the move proves to be successful.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-531</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / London Stock Exchange: Equity futures and options trading
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DERIVATIVES markets ended the week aimlessly showing no strong
inclination to move out of the trading range of the past fortnight.
The June FT-SE 100 index contract finished 2 points lower on time last week
at 2,536. On the day, June was off 25 points.
Depressing the market yesterday was a large rights issue from Granada. The
equity market is showing signs of indigestion and some fund managers are
becoming reluctant to commit themselves to fresh issues.
With US equities weakening and the Bank of England making clear to the money
markets that it does not want an immediate cut in base rates, dealers say
there are few compelling reasons for shares to move higher.
On the other hand, there has been little profit-taking by institutions. In
the futures market there was some institutional selling this week and this
has given derivatives a slightly more bearish tone.
This was reflected in the premium June FT-SE commands to the spot index.
Yesterday, it finished at just 12 points against 21 in the previous session.
This compares with fair value of 15 points.
In traded options, Sears remained an active market following the
disappointing final results. The December 100 calls were the busiest as a a
total of 3,080 lots changed hands.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-532</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Week in the Markets: More surprises from metal stocks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BLACKWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE LONDON Metal Exchange warehouse stock figures again sprang a few
surprises on the market yesterday.
The figures were eagerly awaited as none had been issued earlier in the week
because of the Bank Holiday. Copper stocks soared by 23,900 tonnes to a
seven-year high of 261,775 tonnes, compared with expectations of a rise
between 10,000 and 15,000 tonnes. Zinc stocks were up to a new record of
119,525 tonnes. Nickel stocks soared by 2,982 tonnes to 8,448 tonnes.
Copper has been attracted into LME warehouses by the high premiums for cash
metal over three-month metal. The premium reached Pounds 80 a tonne
yesterday after Pounds 70 a tonne on Thursday and Pounds 50.50 on Wednesday.
The market is in the grip of a technical squeeze in the run-up to next
Wednesday, when options will be declared. 'A lot of metal needed for that
date is being tightly held, forcing the shorts to cover,' explains Mr Robin
Bhar of Carr Kitkat &amp; Aitken. 'It's an old fashioned squeeze, and the shorts
have been caught out.'
He points out that copper on the LME is fetching about 8 cents a lb more
than the spot price on New York's Comex, attracting shipments of copper
across the Atlantic.
This week has seen the price of 'borrowing' (buying cash and selling
forward) copper for one day on the LME reach Pounds 25 a tonne. Early next
week that figure could widen to Pounds 60, according to some observers.
Yesterday cash copper fell to Pounds 1,437.50 a tonne, a fall of Pounds 30
on the week.
The zinc market was faced with a similar squeeze last month, which also led
to a sharp increase in LME warehouse stocks. That rise continued this week,
taking the stocks to a new record. Mr Nick Moore, analyst with Ord Minnett,
fears that copper stocks will continue inexorably upwards in a similar
manner once the squeeze is over.
'The zinc bubble burst, but the stocks are still rising,' says Mr Moore.
These are huge stocks, he believes, which will not be eroded by the market
running into deficit, or by increased demand. Disruption to supplies remains
the only positive possibility, he suggests.
This week, however, saw the end to one supply hiccup when about 1,000
employees at Brunswick Mining &amp; Smelting's big lead-zinc mine in New
Brunswick voted to end a 10-month strike. The smelter will be operating at
half capacity until autumn because large custom contracts have been lost.
Mr Bhar believes the continuing influx of zinc to the LME is symptomatic of
the depression in the automotive and construction industries. Now the
economic weakness in the US and Europe appears to be spreading to the Far
East, as signs emerge that the Japanese economy is slowing down.
Yesterday cash zinc closed at Dollars 1,091 a tonne, a rise of Dollars 2 on
the day but Dollars 43 down on the week.
The rise in nickel stocks surprised the market, and was indicative that
Soviet supplies of the metal from the primarily coal-fired complex at
Norilsk have not been adversely affected by the coal strike, which is now
over. Attention will now focus on labour talks soon to start at Inco,
according to Mr Bhar.
Cash nickel closed yesterday at Dollars 8,630 a tonne, a fall of Dollars 195
on the week.
Aluminium stocks on the LME fell yesterday, and the International Primary
Aluminium Institute showed total producer stocks at the end of March up a
smaller-than-expected 6,000 tonnes. However, the slowdown in producer stock
growth was accounted for by a disruption at Brazil's Albras smelter, which
is now back in production, Mr Moore points out. Cash metal closed yesterday
at Dollars 1,312 a tonne, down Dollars 4 on the week.
Base metal producers continue to believe the recession in the US will end
soon, says Mr Moore, and they do not want to implement costly or politically
difficult cuts. But he likens the situation facing the base metals sector
over the next six months to a boxer entering the ring. 'He knows it will all
be over in just 15 rounds, but what state will he be in at the end?'
Of the soft commodities, cocoa has shown the most movement this week,
sinking slowly towards the 15-year lows seen early last year. The July
contract closed yesterday at Pounds 622, after touching Pounds 617 a tonne
during the day's trading. The fall on the week was Pounds 20.
The main reason for the continuing fall remains the overhang of world
production over consumption, which may be declining but is still enormous.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
LME WAREHOUSE STOCKS
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
(As at Thursday's close)
tonnes
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Aluminium -1600 to 362,125
Copper   +23900 to 261,775
Lead      +2075 to  74,950
Nickel    +2982 to   8,448
Zinc      +4250 to 119,525
Tin        -455 to  16,190
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-533</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / London Stock Exchange: Bank warning unsettles share prices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A WARNING from the Bank of England that it does not want UK base rates to
fall for the next two weeks, together with a batch of somewhat bearish
reports to shareholders from leading British companies, took the heart out
of the UK stock market yesterday. After challenging its all-time peak of
FT-SE 2,545.3 in an early response to the gain of 40 Dow points on New York
overnight, the London market turned down to close with a net fall of 17.5 on
the day.
The Bank of England's warning, conveyed by conventional signals to the
London money markets, stressed that it wanted domestic rates to stay at 12
per cent for the next fourteen days. This period takes in May 17, the date
on which a further fall in Britain's retail price index (RPI) is expected
and consequently the date marked by City analysts as the likely day for a
cut in base rates.
'This (the Bank's move) will be very depressing for some of the interest
rate optimists,' commented Mr Ian Harnett at Strauss Turnbull, although he
added that an interest rate cut remains merely a question of timing. 'We
still think base rates will be down to 11 1/2 per cent within the next
month.'
The early gain of 13.1 to 2,554.9 in the equity market was soon trimmed
after Granada, the leisure and television group, hit the market with a
widely-predicted rights issue call for Pounds 163m, together with a
depressing trading report. The equity market has faced funding calls almost
daily for the past three weeks as the Pounds 2bn rights issue list recorded
in the first quarter of the year has been steadily increased during April
and May. However, investment funds' cash holdings remain relatively high.
The gloom hanging over the market increased as the session progressed and
shareholders attending annual meetings of such leading UK companies as P &amp;
O, Bowater, Hawker Siddeley and Pearson were all given warnings on the
current state of business.
At the session's low point, the Footsie was down by more than 19 points.
However, by the close, the FT-SE Index had steadied at 2,524.3 for a net
loss on the day of 17.5 points. Over the week, which is the first leg of the
two week trading account, the market has moved very erratically as hopes for
an early cut in base rates have ebbed and flowed; by last night, the gain on
the week was a mere 1.4 points.
With its hopes for a reduction in base rates next Friday now severely
jolted, the equity market was looking subdued at the close of trading.
However, there was little significant selling pressure yesterday and
Seaq-recorded turnover of 423m shares was not the highest daily figure even
for a week which has been accompanied by a return to very low trading
levels.
Trading volume has again fallen below last year's daily averages in the face
of bearish views from British industry and a steady erosion of funds' cash
holdings by right issues.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-534</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Money Markets: Lending for 14 days
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE SHORT end of the money market stayed firm in London yesterday, as the
Bank of England sent a strong signal that it does not wish to see an early
cut in bank base rates.
On the previous four Fridays the central bank had underlined the present
rate structure by lending funds to the discount houses at 12 per cent for
seven days.
Yesterday the message was reinforced by lending at 12 per cent for 14 days.
This discouraged hopes that next Friday's UK retail price index for April
will be followed by a rate cut.
Overnight money was firm at around 12 1/2 per cent after the Bank of
England's action, but three-month interbank was little changed at 11 9/16
 11 7/16 per cent, compared with 11 9/16 -11 1/2 , continuing to discount a
cut of  1/2 point in base rates. One-year funds eased to 11 1/16 -10 15/16
from 11 1/8 -11 per cent.
Short sterling futures weakened in subdued trading on Liffe. June delivery
opened slightly lower at 88.90 and moved within a range of 88.86 to 88.93,
before closing at 88.88 against 88.91 previously.
Day-to-day credit was in very short supply on the cash market and the Bank
of England supplied the bulk of its assistance through late lending, keeping
overnight money firm throughout the day, and further reinforcing the message
on rates.
A shortage of Pounds 1,050m was initially forecast, but this was revised to
Pounds 1,150m at noon. Total assistance of Pounds 1,099m was provided.
In early operations the authorities bought Pounds 6m bills outright, by way
of Pounds 1m Treasury bills in band 1 at 11 7/8 per cent and Pounds 5m bank
bills in band 2 at 11 13/16 per cent.
Before lunch another Pounds 128m bills were purchased, by way of Pounds 5m
Treasury bills in band 1 at 11 7/8 per cent; Pounds 23m bank bills in band 1
at 11 7/8 per cent; and Pounds 100m bank bills in band 2 at 11 13/16 per
cent.
In the afternoon the Bank of England did not offer to buy bills from the
market, but invited the discount houses to use their borrowing facilities. A
total of Pounds 965m was then lent to the market at 12 per cent for 14 days.
Bills maturing in official hands, repayment of late assistance and a take-up
of Treasury bills drained Pounds 1,321m, with a rise in the note circulation
absorbing Pounds 530m and bank balances below target Pounds 120m. These
outweighed exchequer transactions adding Pounds 920m to liquidity.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-535</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Foreign Exchanges: Dollar generally weaker
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DOLLAR weakened, but finished above the day's lows in London after data
on US wholesale inflation proved to be in line with market expectations.
Producer prices rose 0.2 per cent in April, the first gain for five months,
but the year-on-year rise of 3.2 per cent was generally as expected and is
not expected to have any impact on the Federal Reserve's monetary policy.
The annual rise of 3.7 per cent in producer prices, excluding food and
energy, was also much as expected, leaving the market to wait until next
week's data for further guidance on the economy.
There has been very little economic news this week but next Tuesday sees
publication of retail inflation figures, via the consumer price index, plus
retail sales and industrial production. US trade figures will be announced
on Friday and by that time the market hopes to have a better idea of where
Fed policy and the dollar are moving.
At the London close the dollar had fallen to DM1.7255 from DM1.7430; to
Y138.75 from Y139.25; to SFr1.4580 from SFr1.4725; and to FFr5.8400 from
FFr5.8925. On Bank of England figures the dollar's index declined to 66.4
from 66.7.
The D-Mark remained in the lower half of the European exchange rate
mechanism, but has already weakened substantially in the last three months
and did not show much further reaction to disappointing figures on German
trade and the balances of payments.
Dealers noted that the widening of Germany's April current account deficit,
to DM5.3bn from DM1.5bn, was partly the result of payments towards the cost
of the allied war against Iraq. There was more concern that rising imports
and falling exports led to a worse than expected trade position. The April
trade surplus rose to DM2.8bn from DM2.6bn, but was below forecasts of
DM3.5bn.
The trade balance is expected to remain in surplus this year, but a current
account deficit is now regarded as a serious danger, after last years's
record surplus of DM75.5bn.
Sterling improved against the dollar and Japanese yen, but lost ground to
the D-Mark. The pound remained the third strongest member of the ERM, below
the Spanish peseta and Italian lira.
There was little reaction to the Bank of England's strong warning to the
London money market that interest rates are not to be cut at present.
Sterling rose 1.50 cents to Dollars 1.7190 and climbed to Y238.50 from
Y237.25. The pound was unchanged at FFr10.0400, but fell to DM2.9650 from
DM2.9700 and to SFr2.5075 from SFr2.5100. Its index gained 0.1 to 91.6.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-536</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / International Company News: Duracell in reduced loss
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DURACELL, the Connecticut- based battery maker taken private in 1988 via a
Kohlberg Kravis Roberts-financed leveraged buyout, yesterday announced a net
loss of Dollars 24.1m for the three months to end-March. This compared with
a Dollars 32.3m deficit in the same period a year earlier.
Operating income for the same three months was up to Dollars 22.2m from
Dollars 18.9m, but the continued interest burden pushed the company into the
red overall. Sales improved to Dollars 290.9m, against Dollars 231.1m.
Duracell is now showing a net profit of Dollars 37.2m for the past nine
months, compared with Dollars 20.5m in the same period of 1989-90.
It said it was pleased with the figures in the light of the recession.
It has seen much of its recent growth come from Europe, recently raised over
Dollars 500m of capital via an equity issue of 34.5m shares. The shares -
sold mainly in the US - were offered at Dollars 15 apiece. Yesterday, they
were unchanged at Dollars 21 3/8.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-537</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / International Company News: Conti board seeks a conciliator
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FISHER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BY NAILING his colours so firmly to the mast of an independent Continental,
Mr Horst Urban, the former chief executive of the German tyre company, was
finally the source of his own undoing.
His blunt, aggressive tactics led to the rejection of the first merger
proposal from Pirelli of Italy, but the supervisory board of the German
tyremaker decided this week that conciliation rather than tenacity was what
was required at this time of crisis in the industry. As a result he stepped
down from his post.
In the eight months since Pirelli's approach, conciliation has not been one
of Mr Urban's notable characteristics.
Bluff and outspoken, the amiable, pipe-smoking, Mr Urban is different, in
many ways engagingly so, from the usual run of smooth-spoken, elegantly
mannered German executives.
He was born in Silesia (now in Poland), 15 miles from what is now the east
German border. In 1945, as Russian troops advanced, he fled with his mother
and two brothers. The young Horst was only nine years old and his father was
a prisoner-of-war in the US.
He remembers trundling a small cart with the family's belongings down the
country roads. He went back briefly after the war and then returned to the
west for good on a British army transporter.
There was no opportunity to attend university.
'I had to leave school early to earn money. The first time I entered a
university was when I gave a lecture.'
Instead, he trained as a tax inspector in Stuttgart, ending up at
Continental by way of IBM, Ford of Germany, and BMW.
Mr Urban reckons his refugee years taught him a lot. They certainly
strengthened his independent streak. He became chief executive of
Continental in 1987, having joined the company in 1974.
Then, it was flat on its back. 'If I'd known in what bad shape Continental
was, I'd probably never have come', he joked. 'I found out soon enough.'
Today, the company is in far better condition, but the industry is rapidly
running out of air.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12 Photograph Horst Urban, became the source of his own undoing
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-538</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / International Company News: AT&amp;T and NCR in pre-merger link
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AMERICAN Telephone and Telegraph is to consolidate its computer operations
into the business of NCR, the Ohio-based computer company, ahead of the
formal merger of the two companies.
After a five-month bid battle, NCR finally agreed to be acquired by AT&amp;T
earlier this week, for Dollars 7.4bn. However, executives of both companies
said they expected the legal formalities, before the merger can be
completed, to take four or five months.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-539</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / International Company News: Pirelli profit fall reflects
troubles in tyre industry
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PIRELLI, the Italian tyres and cables group, suffered a sharp drop in net
profits to L153bn (Dollars 120.18m) last year from L320bn in 1989,
reflecting the difficulties facing the world tyre industry.
Although the group hived off its tyre activities into a separately-quoted
company, Pirelli Tyre Holding (PTH) in 1989, its earnings have been hit by
last month's decision by PTH not to pay a dividend for 1990.
Last year, PTH, which is registered in Holland, paid shareholders a dividend
of Fl 2 a share on its 1989 earn-ings.
As a result of the shortfall, the Pirelli group is cutting its own dividend
by a third to L70 and L90 for ordinary and savings shares respectively from
L110 and L130 the previous year. The dividend cut, which has been widely
expected, is less than some analysts had feared.
Group turnover last year slipped by 2 per cent to L10,130bn from L10,342bn,
largely as a result of exchange rate factors. The company pointed out that
sales in volume terms remained unchanged.
Confirming that its non-tyre activities had performed broadly in line with
1989, Pirelli's earnings at parent company level actually rose marginally to
L123.1bn from L119.6bn in 1989.
Results this year had already been affected by increasingly difficult
economic circumstances, particularly in the tyres sector. The company said
that the present conditions would, in general, continue during 1991, with a
possible improvement in the second half.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-540</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / International Company News: Continental brushes up its image
 -The airline's moves towards regaining financial health
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A jet in the new Continental Airlines white, blue and gold livery was parked
in the humid sunshine at one of the gates of Houston's new international
airport terminal last week.
It was one of the first 12 airliners to be repainted in the Houston-based
carrier's new colours.
Over the next three years, the entire fleet of 350 aircraft will be
repainted and refurbished as part of Continental's efforts to renew its
image and return to financial health.
'We know we are not out of the woods yet, ' said Mr Hollis Harris, the
former Delta Airlines president who replaced Mr Frank Lorenzo as chairman of
Continental last September.
'It's not going to be easy, but I believe this country needs four or five
major carriers in the market place. I believe we will be one of those,' he
told journalists flown in from around the world to see Continental's new
corporate identity.
Since December, Continental has been operating under Chapter 11 of the US
bankruptcy code.
It sought protection from its creditors to enable it to restructure its
heavily indebted balance sheet. It is now in the midst of a complex
financial restructuring exercise.
Mr Harris hopes it will enable the airline, the fifth largest carrier in the
US, to fly out of bankruptcy in the next eight to 12 months.
Many US airline analysts believe Continental has a reasonable chance of
pulling through, although much will depend on the length and depth of the US
recession, the speed and vigour of the recovery in air travel and the
success of the company's financial restructuring.
Mr Harris said when he landed at Continental he was impressed by the
airline's route structure, its staff and its overall potential. 'But the
financial situation was worse than I thought', he explained.
His original plan was to avoid filing for Chapter 11. He felt this would be
bad for staff morale since Continental had already been through a Chapter 11
bankruptcy in 1983 under Mr Lorenzo.
Instead, he put several Continental assets up for sale and his former
airline, Delta, showed interest in buying Continental's extensive Pacific
operations. But with the economy weakening, rising fuel prices and the
impact of the Gulf conflict, Delta decided not to go ahead with a
substantial offer for the Pacific routes.
High fuel prices were also putting pressure on Continental. By December, Mr
Harris said, the company decided there was no alternative but to file for
Chapter 11.
However, Mr Harris adopted a radically different approach to the company's
previous Chapter 11 filing. Instead of launching a sweeping programme of job
cuts and internal restructurings, he adopted a 'business as usual' strategy.
The airline would continue to operate normally, while restructuring its
balance sheet. 'The plan was first to make the airline profitable and then
work to bring in additional capital to expand the airline,' Mr Harris said.
This month Continental reported a deeper first-quarter loss of Dollars 195m.
against a profit of Dollars 21m in the first quarter of last year. But Mr
Harris maintained the company had operated well since the filing, and with
traffic picking up again, he expected the airline to be operating in the
black in July.
But the financial restructuring poses a considerable challenge. The plan is
to convert about Dollars 2bn of unsecured debt into equity to reduce the
overall debt burden, including Dollars 2.5bn of unsecured debt and Dollars
4.5bn of secured debt. Continental is also restructuring its aircraft
operating and capital leases while painting and refurbishing the fleet.
To strengthen further the company's finances, Mr Harris is seeking to raise
an additional Dollars 600m in fresh equity. A further Dollars 150m will be
raised from the sale to American Airlines of Continental's Seattle to Tokyo
route, and the company expects to sell its Chelsea aircraft catering
subsidiary for about Dollars 80m.
It is also planning to sell a 51 per cent stake in its Air Micronesia
operations in the Pacific which is expected to raise Dollars 300m.
a big impact on existing shareholders equity. Mr Harris said all present
shareholders would see their holdings greatly reduced. This would include
Scandinavian Airlines System which has a 16.8 per cent stake in the company
and 18.3 per cent of voting rights. But Mr Harris said he expected SAS to
invest additional funds in the US airline.
Apart from Seattle-Tokyo route and the Air Micronesia transaction,
Continental does not intend to make any significant asset sales. Even in the
proposed Air Micronesia deal, Mr Harris said Continental would continue to
operate the service.
The airline already has plans to grow in the Pacific as well as in Europe.
It already provides more services to Mexico than any other US carrier.
While the airline's biggest burden is its heavy debt, one of its biggest
strengths is its low cost base. This is why Mr Harris said he was committed
not to reduce salaries at Continental. 'Our people are the lowest paid in
the industry. Morale is high. That is helping us in bankruptcy', he
explained.
Although Continental, unlike many airlines, does not have a cost problem, it
does have a revenue problem. At the end of the day, the success or failure
of its recovery strategy will depend on its ability to improve the quality
and yields of its revenues.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12 Photograph The entire fleet of 350 aircraft is to be
refurbished to reflect the new image (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-541</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / World Commodities Prices: Spices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Cassia prices remain unchanged, reports Man-producten. Europe: Vera
A/Korintji A sticks spot at Fl4 a kg ex warehouse, shipment Fl3.80. Korintji
B broken/cleaned Fl2.50, all cif Rotterdam. Nutmegs/mace: rumours continue
over possible renewal of cooperation between Grenada and Indonesian
shippers, so far however officially unconfirmed. An agreement might affect
prices, now at historic lows. Pimento: Mexico Dollars 1,725 c and f May
shipment. Spot Europe hardly any stocks Dollars 1,975 ex-warehouse. Cloves:
Commores offering FFr 9.70 May/June shipment. Madagascar spot Dollars 2,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-542</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Economic Diary
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
TODAY: EC-Gulf Co-operation Council ministerial meeting in Luxembourg.
MONDAY: Central Statistical Office (CSO) publishes figures for credit
business in March; and March final figures for retail sales. European
Parliament plenary session opens in Strasbourg. EC internal market council
meets in Brussels. EC general affairs council starts two-day meeting in
Brussels. Caribbean Community prime ministers and foreign ministers hold
annual meeting in Barbados. EC foreign ministers joint meeting with EFTA
counterparts on plans for EC-EFTA common market, Brussels.
TUESDAY: First quarter figures for UK acquisitions and mergers; and April
provisional producer price index numbers from the CSO. Bank of England
publishes April figures for capital issues and redemptions. US retail sales
(April); consumer price index (April); and industrial production and
capacity use.
WEDNESDAY: US business inventories (March). Italian government's economic
programme to be presented to parliament. Publication of list of applications
for ITV franchises.
THURSDAY: Labour market statistics: unemployment and unfilled vacancies
(April provisional); average earnings indices (March provisional);
employment, hours, productivity and unit wage costs; and industrial
disputes, from Department of Employment. April provisional figures of
vehicle production from the SMMT. March index of output of the production
industries; and first quarter provisional figures for capital expenditure by
the manufacturing industries, from the CSO. Bank of England publishes first
quarter figures for financing of the central government borrowing
requirement; and monetary statistics including M4 sectoral analysis; and
bank and building society sterling lending. US housing starts (April). Shell
interim statement.
FRIDAY: Treasury publishes April public sector borrowing requirment. Retail
prices index and tax and price index for April from the CSO. US merchandise
trade (March). Two-day conference called by President Lech Walesa to discuss
state of Polish economy, Warsaw.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-543</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Quotient receives approach
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN CANE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
QUOTIENT, London-based computer firm specialising in stock processing
software, confirmed yesterday that it had received an approach which might
lead to an offer. At yesterday's closing price of 118p, a rise of 28p on the
day, a full bid would be worth a little more than Pounds 16m.
Mr Tim Simon, Quotient chairman and chief executive, refused yesterday to
identify the potential suitor. Discussions about the approach were in
progress with Quotient's financial adviser, Samuel Montagu, but he could not
say when the company would be able to make a further statement.
The share price has risen by 34 per cent since April 5 when ACT, the
Birmingham-based computer services company, raised its stake from 0.9 per
cent to 13.1 per cent.
ACT sold its Apricot workstation business to Mitsubishi of Japan last year
leaving it with net cash of about Pounds 25m. Mr Roger Foster, ACT chairman,
has made no secret of his intention to use the cash for strategic
acquisitions, especially among companies weakened by the economic downturn.
ACT already has a strong financial services division. Some 20 per cent of
ACT's stock is held by Singer &amp; Friedlander, the merchant bank.
Quotient, which both processes stock and develops software packages for
brokers to use in-house, was badly hit by the fall in the world's stock
markets in the late 1980s and suffered a loss of almost Pounds 1.6m in 1989.
Last year pre-tax profits were a little more than Pounds 1m on sales of
Pounds 22.4m. It is developing an advanced trading system in partnership
with Fujitsu of Japan.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-544</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Ex-Boddington chief hits out at bid for
Devenish
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr John Boddington, former joint managing director of Boddington, yesterday
spoke out against the company's Pounds 127.7m hostile bid for JA Devenish,
the brewery and public house group.
Speaking at Boddington's extraordinary general meeting, he asked Mr Denis
Cassidy, chairman of the pubs, hotels and healthcare group, what he could do
to improve Devenish's existing management.
Without waiting for an answer he went on to ask him: 'Do you not think
Boddington has enough on its plate already with the current expansion, at
premium rates on borrowed money?' To applause from a minority of the
shareholders present he concluded: 'This is Boddington seeking to get bigger
for bigness sake.'
Mr Cassidy rebutted the accusation, replying that Boddington's strategy had
produced excellent results over the past two years. The company pointed out
that Mr Boddington had long been a critic of the board.
While Mr Boddington, who held his post until the mid-1980s, only holds
125,000 shares his intervention was seized upon by Devenish 'as proof of
Boddington's misconceived strategy'.
However, despite opposition to the proposed takeover from a small group of
shareholders Boddington said it had received 48m votes in favour of the bid,
with only 1.5m against.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-545</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Bridgend moves in for Cowan with 17p cash
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BID for control of Cowan de Groot, the toys and industrial hardware
group, intensified as Bridgend Group, a major shareholder, officially
entered the fray with an offer of 17p in cash per ordinary share.
This offer follows an all-share bid made last month by Wilton Group, the
USM-quoted company with interests in property, which is also a major
shareholder of Cowan with a 29.3 per cent stake.
Wilton is offering six ordinary shares for each Cowan share and one Wilton
preference share for each Cowan preference share.
Describing Wilton's offer as 'totally unacceptable,' Bridgend, which has a
10.6 per cent stake, pointed out that Wilton was a heavily geared company
that had not paid a dividend since its present directors were appointed to
the board five years ago.
'We were disturbed by the quality of Wilton's offer,' said Mr Neil List,
chairman of Bridgend.
In 1990 Wilton reported a pre-tax loss of Pounds 1.07m and had borrowings of
Pounds 10.90m against net assets of Pounds 7.28m.
Bridgend further questioned Wilton's stated asset value, indicating that
property values had declined substantially since Wilton made the valuations
for balance sheet purposes in July 1989.
Bridgend calculates that Wilton's offer, on a net asset basis adjusted to
current valuations, comes closer to 4p per Cowan share, rather than the 16
1/2 p stated by Wilton.
Bridgend reported a 74 per cent rise in pre-tax profits for 1990 to Pounds
1.06m from a previous Pounds 608,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-546</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Some MGN allocations to be scaled down
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLARE PEARSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SOME allocations of shares in Mirror Group Newspapers are to be scaled down
with the Pounds 142.5m offer for sale being oversubscribed by a hair's
breadth.
Samuel Montagu, financial adviser to the flotation, said yesterday that
applications for a total of 121.92m shares had been received, making the
offer of 114m shares seven per cent oversubscribed.
The public subscribed for about Pounds 85m worth of the shares sold in the
UK offer. Institutions accounted for the balance of the applications.
Apart from employees who get priority treatment and will have applications
satisfied in full, people who asked for more than 1,500 shares are being
allocated only 90 per cent of those sought.
Everyone else will get all the shares for which they applied.
Only about 10 per cent of applications were for more than 1,500 shares,
advisers said.
A family company of Mr Robert Maxwell, chairman of Mirror Group Newspapers,
has disposed of 49 per cent of the shares in MGN through the UK public offer
and an accompanying Pounds 98m international placing.
Attention will now focus on how the shares, offered at 125p each, will
perform when they make their debut on the stock market next Friday, two
working days earlier than originally scheduled.
Share certificates are due to be posted next Thursday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-547</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Kelt Energy moves on restructuring
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The prospects of restructuring the finances of Kelt Energy, the debt-laden
oil exploration group, appear to have improved following the tabling of
proposals to transfer certain non-producing international assets to a
private Netherlands Antilles-registered company controlled by Mr Hubert
Perrodo, Kelt's chairman.
Effecting the transfer was a pre-condition for continuing the restructuring
negotiations with the group's bankers. A month ago, the eight banks agreed
to Kelt deferring payments of principal and interest on its borrowings,
amounting to more than Pounds 150m.
'We are going to resume negotiations and are trying to resolve matters as
fast as possible,' Mr Perrodo said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-548</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Bass reshuffling its gambling interests
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID CHURCHILL, Leisure Industries Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BASS, the hotels, brewing, and leisure group, is reshuffling its gambling
activities as part of its strategy of seeking to dominate the markets in
which it operates.
The company is paying Pounds 147m for Granada's bingo clubs to give it joint
market leadership with the Rank Organisation. At the same time it is seeking
offers for its Coral Racing betting shop chain, which lags a poor third
behind Ladbroke and Brent Walker/William Hill. It is estimated that it will
fetch at least Pounds 300m.
Bass is paying Pounds 56m cash and taking over debts of Pounds 91m.
The acquisition of Granada's 74 bingo clubs had been expected for some time
following Rank's takeover last year of Mecca Leisure. That made Rank the
largest bingo group with 165 clubs, well ahead of Bass's 91.
Bass claimed the deal did not depend upon clearance by the Office of Fair
Trading. Unlike the Rank/Mecca deal, when the OFT forced Rank to sell some
bingo halls in London, Bass said there was no over-lap between its bingo
halls and Granada's.
It believed the OFT would accept its argument that a merged national chain
would provide more effective competition with Rank.
Granada's bingo operations in the year to September 29 1990 produced pre-tax
profits of Pounds 7m. At the year end net assets were Pounds 81m.
Bass's management is understood to have been concerned for some time at the
problems of operating in the number three slot in the betting shop market.
Of a total UK market of some 10,000 betting shops, Coral has some 900, while
Ladbroke has about 2,000 and Brent Walker/William Hill 1,600.
Although Brent Walker, with the problems of restructuring its debt, may have
to sell William Hill, there seems little chance for Bass to buy the chain
and avoid a monopolies investigation.
Thus it makes sense for Bass to sell the Coral chain if the right price can
be achieved. There is speculation that a management buy out might be in
prospect, given the lack of any other leisure operator with the necessary
funds.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-549</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Arsenal FC launches Pounds 16.5m bond issue
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ARSENAL FOOTBALL Club's Pounds 16.5m debenture bond issue will, if
successful, bring in a record amount of money to a UK football club.
The proceeds will help convert Highbury, its north London stadium, into a
37,000 all-seater stadium by August 1993, at a total cost of about Pounds
22.5m. The present capacity is 44,000, of which 26,000 is standing space.
Yesterday's bond launch was about two weeks ahead of the planned stock
market flotation of Manchester United. Although that should also raise about
Pounds 17m, less than half will be available to the club because it includes
the sale of directors' shares.
Arsenal has taken its cue from Glasgow Rangers, which launched an Pounds
8.5m bond issue last year that has been 85 per cent taken up. The same team
from Noble Grossart, the Edinburgh-based merchant bank, is representing
Arsenal.
Just over 12,000 bonds are being offered at Pounds 1,500 or Pounds 1,100
each, depending on seat position. Fans have first refusal and Arsenal is
making the most of its emotional appeal.
The bondholder will have a named seat for up to 150 years in the new
two-tier North Bank stand, the right to a season ticket, membership of a
bondholders' club and a 'keepsake certificate'.
Arsenal will enjoy the money interest free and without having to pay a
dividend - Manchester United may distribute more than Pounds 1m a year to
shareholders.
The amount of money involved for Gunners fans taking up the bonds is of a
different order to the Pounds 6 per match they have paid to stand this
season.
Their season-ticket seats will cost Pounds 240 or Pounds 195 - according to
bond type - for 1993-94, although they are already facing a rise to Pounds
190 for next season's standing space. Even the cheapest way of paying for
the bond - using a four-year Bank of Scotland loan at 10 per cent interest -
will cost Pounds 32 a month.
Arsenal stressed that the money-raising exercise would protect the resources
available to the team manager, Mr George Graham, to buy players. He has,
however, been relatively frugal, spending a net Pounds 1.2m in the past five
years.
In 1989-90, the club made a pre-tax profit of Pounds 815,000 (Pounds 1.7m)
on sales of Pounds 7.65m (Pounds 6.45m).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-550</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Medeva spends Dollars 77m on springboard
into US
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLIVE COOKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MEDEVA, the fast-growing UK pharmaceutical group, yesterday announced its
first US acquisition. It is paying Dollars 77m, or Pounds 44.9m, for MD
Pharmaceutical, a specialised manufacturer of generic drugs based in Santa
Ana, California.
The acquisition will be funded by an issue of shares through an open offer
to Medeva shareholders, underwritten by Lazard Brothers.
MD, which is privately owned, operates in a highly profitable niche of the
generic (off-patent) drugs market in the US. Its 1990 pre-tax profits were
Dollars 8.3m (Dollars 5.7m) on turnover of Dollars 15.5m (Dollars 12.6m).
Sales in 1991 are likely to be close to Dollars 20m.
Some 80 per cent of MD's turnover comes from methylphenidate, a
prescription-only stimulant used to treat both narcolepsy (sleeping
sickness) in adults and - paradoxically - hyperactivity in children. As a
drug subject to abuse, methylphenidate is controlled by the Drug Enforcement
Agency and MD is one of only two companies permitted to make it.
MD's other products include anti-histamines, anti-depressants, sedatives and
stimulants. Some of these are very similar to drugs made by Medeva in the
UK.
Mr Bernard Taylor, Medeva chairman, said his company was buying MD both as
an attractive business in its own right and because it gave Medeva a
springboard to enter the US market.
Medeva was formed in January 1990 through the merger of Medirace, a
three-year-old research-based company, with Evans Medical, a
long-established manufacturer of vaccines and generic drugs. Last year it
made pre-tax profits of Pounds 4m on sales of Pounds 53m - 85 per cent in
the UK.
The market responded well to the MD deal and Medeva shares closed up 3p at
120p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-551</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: All-round growth for Whitbread Inv
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Net asset value per share at Whitbread Investment Company had risen to
654.26p by the end of March. That compared with 568.1p six months earlier,
and with 583.6p at the end of March 1990.
In the year ended March 31 1991, earnings per share rose from 11.69p to
14.05p, and the dividend is raised from 11.6p to 13.9p, the final being
9.95p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-552</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Textile recession leaves Parkland Pounds
3.6m in red
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE RECESSION in the textile industry claimed another victim yesterday when
Parkland, the Yorkshire-based wool textile group, announced a Pounds 5.64m
downturn to a pre-tax loss of Pounds 3.6m for the year ended March 1 1991.
The group was hit by the dramatic drop in the wool price as well as by the
depressed demand for textiles. The loss equalled 43.3p per share (earnings
23.9p on pre-tax profits of Pounds 2.04m), and the final dividend is cut to
1p (4.5p) for a total of 2.5p (6.7p).
Mr Paul Hanson, deputy chief executive, said the group had experienced a
'very difficult' year. The domestic and export markets were very weak and
the fall in the wool price - which left Parkland with over-priced wool
stocks - was 'the final straw'.
Turnover fell to Pounds 50.71m (Pounds 55.8m) and the group incurred an
operating loss of Pounds 1.14m (profits of Pounds 1.85m). The group paid
Pounds 351,000 (credit of Pounds 193,000) in interest on year-end gearing of
20 per cent.
The loss on wool stocks and rationalisation costs produced an exceptional
charge of Pounds 2.11m. Extraordinary costs of Pounds 159,000 were also
incurred because of the impact of the Gulf war on the Middle East export
business.
The ordinary shares slipped by 2p to 143p on the announcement yesterday. The
'A' shares also fell by 2p to 91p.
Mr Hanson said the group had 'dug deep' in its cost cutting by accelerating
the closure of two clothing factories and one weaving mill as its modernised
plants came on stream. The workforce was reduced from 1,800 to 1,450 during
the year.
He said trading conditions were still tough, but there were some signs of
slight improvement in the knitwear market and the cloth market had 'levelled
off'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-553</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / UK Company News: de Morgan rights
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Shareholders in de Morgan Group, the chartered surveyors, have taken up 71.5
per cent of its deep-discounted Pounds 1.2m rights issue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-554</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Letter: Well covered
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From CATHAL GUIOMARD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Certain recent items about Ireland in the Financial Times confirm its
reputation as a serious newspaper.
I read on March 11 about the alleged substitutability of the new (Irish)
pound and the old penny coins; on April 30 a flattering assessment of the
Irish psyche; on May 1 about potholes in roads; and on May 8 about the ratio
of pubs to population in certain villages.
It's as well you invariably locate Irish news on UK pages, otherwise
non-Irish readers might be jealous of such attention to my country.
Cathal Guiomard,
J J Balmerstrasse 8,
4035 Basel,
Switzerland
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-555</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Letter: Soviets and emigration law
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Sir BERNARD BRAINE MP
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Having recently returned from a British human rights mission to Moscow
it is with regret that I read your report (May 7) of the consideration being
given by the Soviet parliament to the latest draft of the emigration law.
First promised in 1989, successive drafts of the emigration law have failed
to comply with minimum standards of international law. Our own examination
of the fourth draft found it to be seriously lacking and a cause of great
concern.
Under the conditions set by the British government for their attendance at a
human rights conference in Moscow scheduled for September 1991, the Soviet
Union is required to meet its commitments to freedom of emigration and
freedom under the law. The adoption of the emigration law in its current
state would satisfy neither these conditions nor the essential commitments.
Sir Bernard Braine MP
House of Commons
London
SW1A OAA
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-556</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Painful push for peace: Efforts to halt South Africa's
violence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATTI WALDMEIR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Nelson Mandela is an angry man.
In 1964, Mr Mandela, deputy president of the African National Congress
(ANC), told the court trying him for treason that he was prepared to die for
the ideal of 'a democratic and free society in which all persons live
together in harmony and with equal opportunities'. Twenty-seven years later,
the realisation of that dream has been blocked by the township violence
which has resulted in the deaths of more than 1,500 people since August.
That violence led Mr Mandela this week to the brink of severing contacts
with the South African government on the issue of the country's
post-apartheid future. For the moment, that crisis seems to have been
averted, as the ANC and the government have reached outline agreement on
some measures to stop the killing.
But the threat of civil war remains real, and Mr Mandela's anger has yet to
cool. He blames the violence on government, arguing that the police have
failed to intervene in black-against-black fighting which has caused nearly
10,000 deaths since 1984; that murders are not investigated and charges
seldom brought; that police have turned their own guns on ANC supporters,
but rarely on those of the rival Inkatha Freedom party.
'To the whites in general, the life of a black man is cheap,' according to a
top ANC official. His complaint reflects the anger and frustration that
pushed the organisation to threaten to boycott constitutional talks unless
Pretoria acted by Thursday to halt violence.
After six hours of talks on Wednesday with Mr F W de Klerk, the South
African president, Mr Mandela backed down on this threat. Both sides made
concessions on the issues dividing them - the ANC's demands for a ban on
carrying dangerous weapons in public; barring of the use of live ammunition
by police for crowd control; phasing out of single-sex hostels; disbanding
of counter-insurgency units; disciplining of police involved in recent
killings; and an independent commission of inquiry to investigate violence.
The seventh demand in the ultimatum issued by the ANC on April 5 - that the
ministers of defence, and law and order be sacked - was clearly unrealistic,
and treated as such by the government.
The two sides reached what Mr de Klerk called 'broad consensus' on the most
important demands. So-called 'traditional weapons' are to be banned in
public, with the contentious exception of spears. Hostels will be phased out
over time, though some single accommodation will be maintained. Police will
follow a more impartial code of conduct in black areas.
Deadlock has thus been avoided. But the resolution is far from definitive:
the two sides are still fighting over whether spears, too, should be banned,
or under what circumstances they could legitimately be carried; and over who
should convene a planned national conference on violence.
The ANC has, somewhat navely, reserved the right to revive its boycott
threat unless the dispute over spears is resolved satisfactorily within the
next seven days. And even if that new deadline is met, it has indicated it
expects further concessions on the other demands.
Obviously, this brinkmanship will not work forever: but the threat of an ANC
boycott has concentrated the minds of government on the seriousness of the
violence. Mr Mandela is highly emotional on the subject, which has
threatened to destroy his otherwise good rapport with Mr de Klerk; and the
president has committed himself to measures which, if carried out
scrupulously, could reduce violence.
He has forced Chief Mangosuthu Buthelezi, leader of the Inkatha Freedom
Party, to drop his insistence that lethal implements like knobkerries,
pangas and axes be carried as so-called 'traditional weapons' by his
supporters. (The sight of Inkatha supporters brandishing such weapons at
political rallies has often sparked conflict). And he has guaranteed the
impartiality of police in situations where conflict threatens.
Improved policing and the disarming of protagonists, should lead to a large
drop in the number of deaths. For there have been instances to support Mr
Mandela's claim that police stand by while rival supporters battle in the
townships - especially when the battle favours Inkatha. They do so partly
because they are heavily outnumbered by the combatants, and might be killed
if they intervened; but the effect of 30 years of Pretoria's propaganda -
which branded the ANC as South Africa's most important enemy - should not be
underestimated. Many white policemen hate the ANC because it threatens white
supremacy; and black officers fear it because the ANC calls them
collaborators, and has sought to kill or maim them as part of its strategy
for ending apartheid.
Nobody (not even Mr Mandela) believes that Mr de Klerk seeks a continuation
of the violence. But until this week, he has lacked the political will to do
what he can to stop it. The next few weeks will demonstrate whether his
security forces can be dragged into the new South Africa - and whether, once
there, they can halt the violence.
For if broad agreement has been reached between Pretoria and the ANC,
powerful enmity remains between the ANC and Inkatha. Indeed, Mr Mandela's
condemnation of the police is ingenuous: police may spark violence, or fail
to stop it. But supporters of either Inkatha or the ANC itself have actually
done almost all the killing.
Contact between Mr Mandela and Chief Buthelezi were severed last month, and
last Sunday an Inkatha leader threatened to deploy 100,000 heavily armed men
in Soweto in a clear challenge to the ANC. So far, they cannot agree to
attend the same national peace conference. ANC officials stress that local
peace initiatives are going forward, including a joint peace rally tomorrow
in Natal. Unless the rivalry between them can be contained, police can
hardly be expected to stop the violence single-handed.
Nobody can expect a rapid resolution of the crisis. The irascible and
unpredictable Chief Buthelezi will never accept a deal which appears to
sideline Inkatha. Mr de Klerk will no doubt continue to plead that fear of a
right-wing backlash from police constrains him. And Mr Mandela will have to
sell this week's compromise deal on violence to his own increasingly
traumatised constituency, especially at the ANC's planned national
conference in July, where new leaders will be elected.
But finally, South Africa's leaders seem to be gearing themselves up to push
for peace: they have begun to accept that the alternatives is simply too
ghastly to contemplate.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-557</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Letter: Why there are no 'followers'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr P J PACE O'SHEA
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Your columnist Joe Rogaly ('Business: ex cathedra', May 3) states that
the Pope 'is regarded by his followers as infallible on matters of doctrine
and Christian principle'.
I make no comment on the subject matter of the article but I would like to
say, as a Catholic, that the Pope has no 'followers'. There are certain
religions or sects within religions in which the members could be described
as the followers of a leader but that is not the case in the Catholic Church
or, for that matter, in the whole Christian Church. We Catholics and all
those who hold the Christian faith are the followers of Jesus Christ only.
And besides not being the Pope's followers many of us do not accept this
modern doctrine of infallibility. It is not an article of faith.
I should add that encyclicals are not Scripture. They are the views of the
'CEO' and those who share his views, but there is a great variety of
opinions in the universal church.
The arguments and opinions expressed in encyclicals change with the times
and contradict themselves over time.
P J Pace O'Shea,
45 Fellows Road, NW3
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-558</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Letter: Minerals in Antarctica
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Ms VICKY LANCASTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Your leader comment 'Antarctica's frozen future', (May 3), suggested
that, contrary to the agreement of a 50-year prohibition an minerals
exploration, a shorter moratorium of 20 to 30 years only, would allow
'sufficient time for international regulations to be worked out to ensure
that mineral extraction . . . is conducted within generally accepted
environmental norms'.
The reason this is not supported by Greenpeace, or any of the Antarctic
Treaty nations which met in Madrid, is because mineral extraction would not
be possible without irreversible environmental damage to this unique region.
Accidents will always happen, as the history of oil exploration makes very
clear, and as the oil companies themselves would admit. We welcome the fact
that international co-operation between 39 countries, based on the
precautionary principle, has secured Antarctica's future for at least 50
years, and hopefully for much longer.
Vicky Lancaster,
Wildlife Campaign,
Greenpeace UK,
Canonbury Villas, N1
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-559</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Labour party puts on a new face: Policy document contains
cautious strategies and a confident tone in equal measure
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVO DAWNAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
After months shrouded in the rhetorical smokescreen of the poll tax,
Britain's political battlefield finally cleared this week to reveal the true
terrain upon which the parties will fight the coming general election.
To nobody's surprise, it was the old familiar ground. The
tax-cuts-versus-improved-services debate has confirmed that at the next
election voters will once again be asked to choose between the competing
claims of Labour's case for public provision and the Tories'
fiscally-oriented vision of freedom.
What makes the up-coming episode in the electoral soap opera different from
1987 is Labour's claim to a wholescale shift in its strategic vision.
Officials say that the outcome of the most thoroughgoing policy review in
the party's history has ensured that Labour has never been more coherent in
its arguments, consensual in its appeal and prudent in its spending plans.
'The message is that we are the good managers now,' one Labour insider
claimed this week. 'It is up to the Tories to fight their way back on to the
centre ground that we are now occupying. They are the extremists.'
But has Labour really changed? How fair is the hard left's charge that
Labour has surrendered the class struggle to become all but synonymous with
Heathite Toryism, or the intellectuals' gripe that in its lust for electoral
glory the party has voluntarily jettisoned its radical tradition? Above all,
leaving policies aside, is Labour's change of style enough for voters to
entrust it with the keys to Downing Street?
In the atmosphere of election fever now gripping Westminster, merely to hint
at such questions is enough to provoke paroxysms of suppressed fury from the
loyal staff around Mr Neil Kinnock's office. After the grinding years of
internal party reforms, the crackdown on the so-called 'loony left', the
seemingly endless policy review and the uncomfortably sober suits, how, they
ask, can the media that howled at left-wing extremism now complain that
reborn Labour lacks the beef?
Questioned as to the 'big idea' of the new democratic socialism, an aide
close to the Labour leader could only mutter through gritted teeth: 'Just
read the document, it is all in there.'
Yet a careful reading of Labour's latest policy digest - something,
incidentally, not widely available to voters - produces inconclusive
answers.
'Opportunity Britain: Labour's Better Way for the 1990s' is undoubtedly a
more interesting read than its well-meaning title suggests. Above all, its
reasoned language and conciliatory phrasing is in pointed contrast to the
hectoring, didacticism and righteous indignation that permeated 'Britain
Will Win', the 1987 manifesto.
Then, Mr Kinnock's table-thumping introduction insisted: 'No party other
than Labour can possibly win enough seats to form a government' at a time
when his troops were all but level-pegging with the Liberal/Social Democrat
Alliance.
Today, with Labour alongside the Tories, a new and calming positivism
suffuses the text in a succession of uplifting nouns. 'We have confidence in
the strengths and the potential of Britain and its people,' Mr Kinnock
begins. 'Ours is a beautiful country, rich in natural resources and
talents.'
Such linguistic devices are not merely decorative; the measured tones are a
significant part of Labour's message, conjuring a mood of contemplative
maturity throughout the 58-page text as a counterpoint to the 'irrational'
nature of the Tories' market-dictated alternatives.
Where the 1987 manifesto referred to Tory 'bribes,' to 'speculators'
building 'luxury apartments' and to 'the rich', the rhetoric of class hatred
has now gone. The Tories are no longer malicious, merely misguided. Gone too
is Labour's once familiar lexicon of initials, institutions and other macho
symbols of power.
In place, for example, of the 1987 manifesto section on 'Democracy in the
Workplace' with its 15 references to workers and unions, the new document's
discussion of pay contains only two. Moreover, the endlessly repeated key
words are 'rational' and 'productivity'.
Those that claim this is mere camouflage for the old corporatism ever
lurking beneath Labour's public image may, conceivably, have a case. But the
change, at least, indicates the party now explicitly recognises that
electoral success demands a new of theme.
That shift is reflected in Mr Kinnock's definition of Labour's goal in his
introduction. 'The great task which will face a new Labour government,' he
writes, 'is the modernisation of Britain. Modernisation means providing the
stable conditions and the strategic policies to help our industries succeed
in markets at home and abroad.'
Depending on the reader's prejudices, this is either a desirable and
necessary objective or a truism applicable to all parties or, some hardline
Tories might suggest, a coded justification for hands-on government
interference in business.
As the great odyssey into Labour's partnership society gets under way, it
becomes clear that the democratic socialist vision of the road to prosperity
now draws as much from Japan as it does from Scandinavia.
Its goals, too, appear essentially middle-class - the liberation, not of the
unionised worker, but of the individual citizen through prosperity and
opportunity arrived at by collective endeavour. Equality is to do with
opportunity and access to power, a means to liberty but not an end in
itself. But as Mr Kinnock told Mr Brian Walden in a recent television
interview, Labour insists that such objectives cannot fall into place
without involvement by government.
'Not,' he added, by 'fiddling and meddling everywhere and not by being
interventionists in an oppressive sense, but being there as an enabling
government . . . a servant state at the disposal of the people.'
But is that what the policies themselves promise? The answer is a matter of
interpretation. Certainly, behind the new language, the body of the text
provides plenty for the backroom boys at Conservative Central Office in
Smith Square to sink their ideological teeth into.
Under the austere direction of Mr John Smith, the shadow chancellor, Labour
is committed only to raising pensions and restoring the full value of child
benefit. Yet even a rudimentary glance through the text spots a glut of new
quangos - Smith Square with characteristic hyperbole puts the figure in
hundreds - two new cabinet rank posts (women and overseas development) and
numerous junior ministerial posts, commissioners and ombudsmen.
When it comes to the opening economic chapter of the digest, Labour is
inevitably circumscribed by the UK's membership of the European Exchange
Rate Mechanism. After an opening complaint that interest rate reductions
were 'too little, too late' - Labour still has to explain how, given ERM
constraints, they could have been lowered more quickly - the reader is
hurried along to peruse prescriptions for the longer term.
Aside from credit controls and efforts to promote investment, innovation and
research and development through tax allowances, there is the strong
impression of padding out here with such promises as efforts to 'facilitate
the establishment of small businesses by women . . . (and) ethnic
minorities'.
Training and European monetary union, which might have been expected to be
found elsewhere, help to fill the gap.
On health and education, Labour combines conservatism with ambition,
pledging to rein back the Tories' radical reforms while improving services,
always accompanied by the now obligatory nod to careful resource management.
In the minefield of industrial law, Labour treads on tiptoe, restoring some
union rights but maintaining the obligation to conduct strike ballots. In
the equally perilous areas of benefits, social security and the proposed
national minimum wage, the party resorts to blind faith in its assertion
that, combined with tax changes, 'millions of people' will be removed from
the poverty trap.
Where Labour is, arguably, most ambitious is in its constitutional chapter,
promising a radicalism far advanced on that of 1987. The elected,
tax-raising Scottish parliament is still there, but alongside come regional
administrations.
'Labour is determined to pass power downwards and outwards from Westminster
and Whitehall,' the document explains, with the regions taking on many
powers currently housed in London.
Furthermore, unlike in 1987, the old nettle of House of Lords reform is
finally grasped with a new elected second chamber empowered to delay for the
lifetime of a parliament Labour's multi-faceted raft of citizens' rights
legislation. But where the document waxes most eloquent in its reticence is
on the political time-bomb of electoral reform - the issue that increasingly
forms a fault line now running through the party.
The final chapter on international issues bears the skilled diplomatic
handwriting of Mr Gerald Kaufman, the shadow foreign secretary, eschewing
controversy.
So what does the document say about the new model Labour party? The answer
is ambivalent and perhaps reverts to the change in tone. While Opportunity
Britain occasionally gets carried away with its own good intentions, it is
undoubtedly a thoroughly worthy programme, carefully targeted, and created
by a party that yearns for power. Its excesses can be safely put down to the
licence that opposition grants.
Indeed, some of Labour's in-house critics claim that its real weakness is
the tell-tale trace of committee room politics in which everyone's pet
project has received a mention. As such it exposes the very weakness of
consensus politics.
The Labour party is now, arguably, the most conservative force in British
politics - reactionary even in its appeal to a community spirit that many
believe is as nostalgically out of date as red telephone boxes.
Those views are not Tory, but the criticisms voiced by many Labour party
members and sympathisers. Where Labour hints at radicalism - devolution,
citizen power (a borrowing from Mr Paddy Ashdown shared by the Tories) and
House of Lords reform - it does so sotto voce in an emollient language aimed
at excising excitement.
Moreover, while there is real beef in the document, it is mincemeat not
steak, ground to ease digestion for delicate stomachs.
Labour's working-class warriors like Mr Dennis Skinner, the MP for Bolsover,
say the party has gone soft. But this constituency is no longer relevant.
More potent are the arguments of the Fabian and former marxist
intellectuals.
They claim that the party may be missing a vital opportunity to create a
'popular front of the mind' by presenting a truly radical programme to
excite the imagination of a broad anti-Tory coalition. What, exactly, would
this programme be? The prescriptions are vague. But most embrace a broad
swathe of the Liberal Democrat programme including fiercer devolution, a
federalist vision of Europe and, most emphatically, some form of electoral
reform.
That may be to come. Professor Raymond Plant's working party on the issue is
due to release a preliminary report in July. With polls indicating voter
enthusiasm for change, Mr Kinnock may yet be tempted to dangle the
possibility before the electorate.
After the long years hauling his party back from the brink, the Labour
leader can be forgiven for caution now. Opportunity Britain is a testament
to that strategy. So close is Labour to power that a single political banana
skin for the government - the National Health Service reforms are looking
increasingly like one - could be enough to do the trick.
On the other hand, voters may study Labour's new face, thoroughly approve
it, then opt to take the tax cuts instead.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8 Graph (Omitted). Photograph (Omitted). Photograph (Omitted).
Photograph Neil Kinnock 1984,1987,1990 (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-560</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Poll reform seen as boost for Labour
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVO DAWNAY, Political Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LABOUR would sharply improve its chances of winning the coming general
election if it gave public backing to electoral reform, according to new
opinion poll findings.
The policy shift could lift Labour's support by three percentage points
nationally and provoke a 4.5 per cent swing in the Conservatives' southern
heartlands and in more marginal Greater London.
Detailed poll results, gathered by Mori for the Electoral Reform Society,
show that Labour would also pick up one in five Liberal Democrat votes,
passing on a potentially crucial gain in 'three-way' marginal seats.
The survey, conducted between April 19 and 22 with a sample of 1,992 people,
is certain to fuel pressure now mounting within the Labour party for Mr Neil
Kinnock to back reform openly. Its headline figure showed voters turning a
Labour deficit of two percentage points into a one-point lead over the
Tories if the policy commitment was made. Furthermore, the poll showed
supporters of all parties backing some form of proportional representation
by a margin of three-to-one, when 'Don't Knows' were excluded.
Labour party supporters were four-to-one in favour, with 71 per cent of
those claiming to be 'PR knowledgeable' offering their support.
The findings will provoke further controversy within Labour after the
party's conference last year overturned its national executive committee and
ordered a working party to extend an inquiry into PR for European elections,
the proposed Scottish parliament and regional assemblies to Westminster
itself. Labour's leaders have resisted backing a system of proportional
representation for Westminster, the majority on the grounds that political
opponents would claim it showed the party had given up hope of winning an
outright majority on the first passed the post system.
Mr Kinnock has long been careful to remain on the sidelines of the internal
party debate. But with the working party due to produce an interim 'options'
report in July, many believe he may soon take a public stand.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-561</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Battle over Nissan car sales moves to court
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NISSAN UK, the privately owned distributor of Nissan vehicles in Britain,
will seek an injunction on Monday to stop Nissan Motor of Japan from
terminating its exclusive distribution agreement.
The long-running public battle between Nissan UK (NUK) and Nissan Motor
moves to the High Court for the first time on Monday with Nissan UK also
seeking substantial damages from the Japanese car maker.
It is seeking a court order to prevent Nissan Motor from selling its
vehicles in the UK to any company other than NUK. At the end of March Nissan
Motor announced that it had established a new company, Nissan Motor (GB), to
distribute all Nissan products in the UK from January 1 1992.
If Nissan UK gains the injunction, Nissan Motor will be prevented from
selling its vehicles to this new wholly owned subsidiary, which plans to run
a new dealer network replacing Nissan UK's 380-strong chain.
Nissan Motor wants the dispute to be arbitrated in Japan.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-562</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Polaris difficulties
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE NAVY is finding difficulty in maintaining continuous patrols of the UK's
Polaris nuclear deterrent, according to the environmental pressure group
Greenpeace. The Ministry of Defence does not comment on submarine movements.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-563</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Hurd calls for release of hostages
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN'S relations with Iran will remain difficult as long as British
hostages are held in Lebanon, Mr Douglas Hurd, foreign secretary, said
yesterday.
Mr Hurd also told the Scottish Conservative conference in Perth the
government was determined to push ahead with its plan for a United Nations
police force to protect Kurdish refugees in northern Iraq.
He dismissed Baghdad's objections to the UN proposal and added that it was
'difficult to imagine' that the government of Mr Saddam Hussein, the Iraqi
leader, could fulfil all the conditions for the removal of sanctions. 'Only
a new government will enable Iraq to be re-admitted to the community of
nations,' he said.
Mr Hurd's decision to focus on the three British hostages still held in
Lebanon showed his concern to emphasise that the Foreign Office had not
given up hope of securing their release.
Britain looked to Iran to use its 'potentially decisive' influence to secure
their release, Mr Hurd added. 'Relations between Britain and Iran have great
potential, but will remain stunted for as long as Britons are held in
Lebanon.'
Diplomatic relations between London and Tehran were restored in 1990 after a
two-year break. The two governments have not yet exchanged ambassadors, and
Mr Hurd's comments yesterday suggested that Britain could not until the
hostage issue was resolved.
The foreign secretary said he was also demanding the re-lease of two Britons
held in Iraqi jails.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-564</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / SIB wins judgment in investment case
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND HUGHES, Law Courts Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Securities and In-vestments Board has obtained a Pounds 3.6m judgment
against a man it alleged was the 'moving spirit' behind a scheme which
resulted in UK investors losing Pounds 3m. The money had been put into
Hamilton House Associates, a Birkenhead-based investment business.
The High Court granted SIB an indefinite extension of an order freezing the
assets of Mr Neil Bradshaw, who was said to have fled to the US.
Mr Craig Orr, for SIB, told Mr Justice Mummery the new order was needed to
help SIB enforce the Pounds 3.6m judgment, which included interest on the
lost funds. He said none of the money, which had been transferred to the US,
had been repaid, 'and it is unlikely that any of it will'.
Mr Orr said small investors in the UK had given money to Hamilton House
Associates to be invested on their behalf. The company transferred the money
to Consolidated Sterling Deposits of California.
Mr Bradshaw was president of CSD and Hughes Flint, its Californian parent.
Mr Orr said Mr Bradshaw was not formally a director of CSD's UK agent, West
Coast Securities (UK). But that company acted on Mr Bradshaw's instructions.
West Coast had marketed the investments in the UK, using material alleged to
have been misleading and in breach of the Financial Services Act.
The Financial Intermediaries, Managers and Brokers Regulatory Association
(Fimbra) ordered Hamilton House Associates to stop trading in February last
year. About 300 investors had invested in what were marketed as fully
secured and guaranteed bonds.
In April last year it emerged that investors could not redeem their
investments before 1994 and would not receive any interest payments.
In February, SIB obtained injunctions freezing assets of Mr Bradshaw;
Hamilton House; Mr Terence Payne and Mr James Holden, directors of Hamilton
House; West Coast Securities (UK); and Mr Michael Dunning, a West Coast
director.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-565</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / No prosecution over rail crash at Cannon St
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
NO PROSECUTION will be brought in connection with the crash on January 8 at
Cannon Street station in London. Two people were killed and more than 250
injured.
Sir Allan Green, director of public prosecutions, said yesterday there was
'insufficient evidence available to provide a realistic prospect of a
conviction' of the driver or any other person or organisation.
Mr Morris Graham, the driver, said his brakes had failed before the 7.58am
train from Sevenoaks, Kent, crashed into the buffers at the station.
British Rail ruled out brake failure as a cause of the accident.
A public inquiry was told that British Transport Police had failed to secure
the driving cab after the crash to protect evidence of the position of the
controls.
It also heard that parts of some coaches used in the packed commuter train
were more than 60 years old.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-566</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Channel tunnel companies face trial over safety
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FIVE member companies of TML, the Channel tunnel consortium, were committed
for trial yesterday charged with failing to ensure the safety of employees.
Balfour Beatty Construction, Costain Civil Engineering, Tarmac Construction,
Taylor Woodrow Construction and Wimpey Major Projects are accused by the
Health and Safety Executive that between December 12 1989 and January 10
1990 they failed to ensure the safety of employees concerning the movement
of trains.
The charge follows the death in January last year of Mr Keith Lynch, a
grouter from Nottingham, who was hit by wagons pushed by a locomotive in an
underground accident at the Shakespeare Cliff site near Dover.
The committal to Kent Crown Court followed a day-long hearing at Dover.
Reporting restrictions were not lifted.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-567</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Fewer jobless Canadians
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TORONTO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Canada's unemployment rate dropped to 10.2 per cent in April from 10.5 per
cent in March, fuelling hopes that the worst of the recession may have
passed, Bernard Simon writes from Toronto.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-568</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / US-Arab deals will be kept secret
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER RIDDELL, US Editor
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MANY important features of the general understandings reached between the US
and Saudi Arabia and other Gulf states about maintaining an American
military presence in the region will be kept secret because of Arab
sensitivity about too close an identification with Washington.
As he returned to the US yesterday from a visit to the Gulf states, Mr
Richard Cheney, the US defence secretary, said there was now 'broad
agreement on a regional basis for co-operation between the US and the
governments in the area on security matters. There is a significantly
enhanced willingness on the part of many of the governments in the region to
co-operate on security arrangements.'
Many issues have still to be decided in further negotiations, such as the
frequency of joint exercises between the US and Gulf states, the size of
forces involved, the nature of contingency planning, and arrangements for
storing equipment in the region. The US opposes having permanent bases but
wants forces to be involved in big sea, land and air exercises, with troops
rotated regularly.
Even after these matters are resolved, many will remain secret. 'It's still
the Middle East and therefore a certain amount of discretion is required in
terms of what you say publicly,' Mr Cheney said.
Mr Cheney also discussed sales of US conventional arms to Gulf states to
improve their ability to defend themselves.
The US aim is to strengthen local forces and pre-position supplies.
The number of US troops in the region has dropped from a peak of 540,000 in
late February to about 160,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-569</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Tokyo house sales fall
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SALES of new condominiums in the greater Tokyo area fell 46.3 per cent in
April from a year earlier, reviving fears that Japan's property market slump
will intensify in coming months, Robert Thomson writes from Tokyo.
April is generally a strong month for property sales in Japan, but the sales
figures announced yesterday by the Real Estate Economic Institute were the
worst April figures for 19 years.
The proportion of condominiums sold before being built in Tokyo and three
neighbouring prefectures fell to 56.8 per cent, down from 87.7 per cent in
the same month last year, while the year-on-year sales figure was lower for
the sixth month.
Japan's property slump has been uneven, with prices falling 10 per cent for
some condominiums on the fringe of Tokyo and larger falls recorded in Osaka.
The surprisingly poor figures for April will put further pressure on
apartment developers, who have been hit by the increase in interest rates,
declining sales and growing inventories.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-570</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Protesters attack Kohl
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MARSH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CHANCELLOR Helmut Kohl, on a one-day visit to the depressed chemicals area
of east Germany, yesterday tasted the wrath of a small group of
demonstrators when he was hit in the face by eggs in Halle, near Leipzig,
David Marsh reports from Bonn.
Mr Kohl, on his third trip to the east during the past month, told a meeting
of chemical industry workers at the Buna plant south of Halle that the
sector would have to be reduced to a 'competitive core' to allow chances of
survival.
Brushing off attempts by security officials to rush him into the building,
Mr Kohl went ahead insistently to shake hands with well-wishers who had
turned out to see him.
Although his reception from local people was on the whole friendly, Mr Kohl
was made well aware of the concern about mass unemployment in the region,
heavily reliant on largely outdated and heavily polluting chemicals plants.
Agreement was reached yesterday on a 7 per cent wage increase for 180,000
west German printing workers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-571</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / ANC ultimatum on weapons
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATTI WALDMEIR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE African National Congress (ANC) has issued another ultimatum to the
South African government, threatening to suspend talks on a post-apartheid
constitution unless Pretoria agrees to include spears and sticks in its
recent ban on dangerous weapons in public.
On Thursday the ANC allowed an earlier ultimatum to expire without action,
after reaching outline agreement with the government on measures to halt
township violence which has left nearly 10,000 people dead since 1984. These
included a ban on all so-called 'traditional weapons', apart from spears and
sticks.
However it now appears that crisis may have been averted only temporarily.
ANC officials said yesterday they were expecting new proposals from Pretoria
on the issue within seven days. If these were not satisfactory, the
organisation would refuse to participate in talks on the country's political
future.
Chief Mangosuthu Buthelezi, leader of the rival Inkatha Freedom Party, is
understood to be insisting that the carrying of spears be permitted as part
of Zulu culture. But ANC officials argue that all lethal weapons should be
banned to reduce the political temperature in black townships.
Meanwhile, signs of dissent emerged within the organisation over the deal
agreed two days ago between Mr Nelson Mandela, the ANC deputy president, and
President FW de Klerk. It included not only the ban on traditional weapons,
but agreement to phase out single-sex hostels, which have been at the centre
of violence (some single accommodation will remain), and a new code of
conduct for police handling crowds in black areas.
The New Nation, the ANC's newspaper, branded it a failure.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-572</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / Bessmertnykh hopeful on Middle East talks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY and PETER RIDDELL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JERUSALEM, WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Alexander Bessmertnykh, the Soviet foreign minister, yesterday emerged
from brief but unprecedented talks with Israeli leaders saying he believed
there was a 'substantial' chance that efforts to convene Arab-Israeli peace
talks would succeed.
He is due to meet Mr James Baker, the US secretary of state and main leader
of the peace bid, in Cairo tomorrow to review progress on a proposed Middle
East peace conference, to be sponsored by Washington and Moscow, that would
presage direct bilateral talks between Israel and its Arab foes.
Mr Baker was on his way back to the region last night for the fourth time
since the Gulf war ended, in what a senior White House official has
described as 'one last trip' to see whether there is sufficient support to
go ahead with a regional peace conference.
This hint of impatience in comments by a senior national security adviser is
intended to put pressure on both Israel and Arab countries to make
compromises so that such a conference can go ahead.
Like Mr Baker, Mr Bessmertnykh expressed the belief that a genuine prospect
for peace talks still existed, without offering any indication of progress
on the obstacles remaining. 'I have a hope - not yet at the level of full
confidence - but I hope that further contacts will make it possible to move
forwards to peace negotiations,' he told a press conference.
He acknowledged that the key question of who should participate in the
negotiations had yet to be resolved. Moscow backs the Arab demand that the
UN should play a significant role, something rejected by Israel. Israel also
seeks complete exclusion of the Palestine Liberation Organisation and other
limits on Palestinian representation.
Mr Bessmertnykh did not use his visit - the first to Israel by a Soviet
foreign minister - to announce, as Israel had hoped, the restoration of full
diplomatic relations, broken off by Moscow during the 1967 Six Dar War.
But he said that point was 'very, very close' and adopted a much friendlier
tone in talks with Mr Yitzhak Shamir, the Israeli prime minister, and Mr
David Levy, the foreign minister, than he had in remarks before his six-hour
visit.
He made no mention in his public statements of Jewish settlements in the
occupied West Bank and Gaza Strip, which he had objected to sharply the
previous day in Jordan.
Asked whether the Soviet Union might restrict Soviet Jewish emigration to
Israel as a means of pressuring Israel on the peace process, he replied that
both sides had agreed that 'no country will try to put pressure on any other
country.'
Israeli officials said Mr Bessmertnykh told them emigration would continue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-573</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / World News in Brief: Iraq rejects UN force
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Baghdad rejected the idea of a UN force to replace allied troops in northern
Iraq, but US officials said they still hoped to create long-term
international security arrangements for Kurdish refugees.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-574</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / World News in Brief: Soldiers ambushed
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Nine Soviet soldiers were wounded in an ambush by Armenian militants just
inside Azerbaijan, the first military casualties in the latest flare-up of
hostilities between the rival republics.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-575</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BELAGAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910511
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  11 MAY 91 / World News in Brief: 200 teachers' jobs cut
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Tory-controlled Warwickshire County Council is to cut 200 teachers' jobs -
blaming the losses on the 'vagaries' of government policies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-576</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEOAIAAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Associate of Milken indicted
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Alan Rosenthal, a key business associate of Mr Michael Milken and a
former head of the Beverly Hills-based convertible bond department of Drexel
Burham Lambert, has been indicted by a federal grand jury on a variety of
charges, including conspiracy, mail and securities fraud, embezzlement and
providing an illegal guarantee.
The indictment alleges that Mr Rosenthal conspired with Mr Milken, the
former Drexel 'junk bond king', and others, to confer unlawful economic
benefits on a former Drexel client, Mr David Solomon, and to misappropriate
funds from Solomon's clients. It also claims that one of Mr Rosenthal's
con-conspirators was Mr Solomon himself, who ran a high-yield money
management firm, Solomon Asset Management.
If found guilty on all charges, Mr Rosenthal could face a prison sentence of
51 years or Dollars 2.3m in fines. Mr Milken is already serving a prison
sentence after pleading guilty to securities law violations.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-577</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEOAIAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Paris slips up over Corsican autonomy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE FRENCH government slipped up on an embarrassing legal banana skin
yesterday as a result of its latest attempt to give more autonomy to
Corsica, the country's poorest and most violent region.
France's Constitutional Council ruled that part of a recently passed law
giving more power to Corsican regional government and reforming the island's
unrepresentative electoral system, contravenes the French constitution.
The new law, which will now have to be revised, wrongly describes Corsicans
as a distinct people and a component of France, said the council.
The constitution only recognises 'the French people, made up of all French
citizens without distinction of origin, race or religion,' it decreed.
The ruling comes in response to a complaint to the council by the three
opposition parties - the RPR, UDF and UDC - backed by the senate.
They turned to the council after the minority Socialist government last
month won parliamentary adoption of its Corsican reform plan, thanks to the
Communist party's decision to abstain from the vote.
Loyalists, who hold the majority on the island, condemned the law for
jeopardising their French nationality, while separatists argued that it
offered only inadequate autonomy.
Mainland French opposition parties resented what they saw as a concession to
terrorists and warned that formal recognition of the Corsican people might
prompt separatist demands from other disgruntled activists in Brittany,
north-west France, and the Basque country, the Pyrenees.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-578</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEOAIAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World News in Brief: Morocco/Iran links
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Morocco and Iran decided to restore diplomatic relations cut by Tehran in
1979 over a visit to the kingdom by the ousted Shah.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-579</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEOAIAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World News in Brief: Camp tensions rise
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Forty-two Vietnamese boat people were injured when two rival gangs fought
with home-made weapons in a dormitory at their camp in Hong Kong.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-580</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEOAIAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World News in Brief: Ethiopian reshuffle
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Ethiopia's President Mengistu Haile Mariam, seeking to hold talks with
rebels who have made major advances in recent months, announced a new, more
moderate cabinet.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-581</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEOAIAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World News in Brief: 21 die in ambush
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Suspected Moslem separatists ambushed a Philippine police jeep that was
returning from a court hearing, killing 19 policemen and two civilians.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-582</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEOAIAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World News in Brief: Seats for Moslems
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Lebanon took a further step towards healing its divisions when parliament
voted to give Moslems an equal share of seats after almost half a century of
Christian domination.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-583</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEOAIAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World News in Brief: Towns recaptured
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Sierra Leone said it had recaptured nine of 15 towns from Liberian rebels in
fighting along its eastern border.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-584</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAGJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / London Stock Exchange: Political factors return to the
market
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE UK stock market continued on its erratic course yesterday, climbing by
18 points on the FT-SE Index scale as interest rate optimism was encouraged
by some apparent indications of increased political pressures for an early
general election in the UK. Helped also by a firm opening to the new Wall
Street session, London closed virtually at the best of the day, although
trading volume remained disappointing.
The broader background to the equity market remained much the same as for
the past fortnight. Hopes for a further cut in UK base rates continued to
focus around the April retail price index announcement, due at the end of
next week. Uncertainty on the depth and length of the economic recession in
the UK was reflected in the market's cautious response to trading statements
from several UK companies.
The chief corporate hurdle of the day, in the form of a first-quarter
trading statement from British Petroleum, passed off well, with the oil
group's profits better than anticipated in the City of London. There was not
much movement in BP shares, however, and the oil sector settled down to wait
for trading figures due next week from Shell.
Share prices opened higher yesterday morning behind firm performances in
Tokyo and New York and, with many European markets closed yesterday for
Ascension Day, made further progress after the FT-SE June futures contract
came in strongly again and spurred the blue chip stocks ahead.
In the absence of significant buying support from the institutions, the
advance in equities slowed down and not until mid-session did the gain on
the FT-SE Index extend to around 16 points.
The market then paused until Wall Street opened, but pushed ahead again when
the Dow average, after a slow start, recorded a gain of nearly 30 points in
London trading hours.
At its final reading of 2,541.8, the FT-SE Index showed a gain on the day of
18.4. Dealers believe the market is currently trading in a range of FT-SE
2,520 to 2,550 at present, and unlikely to break out of the top end of this
bracket until a further half-point cut in base rates is announced, perhaps
after the RPI statement at the end of next week.
Seaq volume of 409m shares compared with 387.9m on Wednesday and 431.2m on
Tuesday, continuing the fall in average daily volumes since the end of the
first quarter of the year.
The dearth of trading volume again gave the stock index futures market
increased leverage on share prices. Both at the beginning of the session and
late in the day, activity in the Footsie set the pace for the underlying
equity market.
The stock market has another week to run before the end of the current
trading account. The retail price index (RPI) is not due until the last day
of the account and, with the corporate reporting calendar also relatively
light, strategists believe that share prices will continue to find
difficulty in making progress next week.
The possibility that the UK government might choose to hold a general
election in June rather than in the autumn or next year surfaced after the
Labour opposition party appeared to spell out its election priorities.
While the prospect of an early election might increase political pressures
for cuts in base rates, the stock market appeared unconvinced yesterday that
the political mood had changed significantly.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 36
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-585</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAGIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / London Stock Exchange: Relief at BP results
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE WAS widespread relief around the market with BP's first-quarter
trading figures, which narrowly avoided showing what would have been the
first quarterly loss on record. The group disclosed net income of Pounds 10m
compared with the Pounds 344m for the same period last year.
A loss for the period had been expected, with some of the more pessimistic
analysts going for a shortfall of as much as Pounds 70m. Specialists
highighted the good performance of the group's downstream business. Mr Nick
Clayton at Smith New Court said: 'It augurs well for Shell's results, due
next week.'
Mr John Toalster at Societe Generale Strauss Turnbull remained cautious on
BP, pointing out that, on a historic cost basis, the dividend would still be
uncovered. The shares edged up 3 to 346p on turnover of 6.3m.
Also circulating in the market was a suggestion, triggered by a report in
the Spanish press, that BP might be about to buy a big stake in Petromed,
the Spanish refiner. BP said it holds an option to buy 8 to 15 per cent of
Petromed which remains valid until the end of this year.
Automotive troubles
Several automotive issues were unsettled by the combined effects of two more
cash-raising calls, a securities house downgrading of the sector and
cautious views on trading prospects from leading component manufacturers.
GKN fell after Smith New Court cut its estimate of current year profits to
Pounds 100m from Pounds 120m. The investment house pointed out that at the
new level the automotive group would have to dip into reserves to maintain
the dividend rate. Smith also lowered profits expectations for Laird Group,
BBA Group and T &amp; N.
GKN chairman Mr David Lees later informed the annual meeting that profits in
the first half will fall 'well below' those of the second half of last year.
The news thwarted any recovery in shares of GKN, which closed 8 down at
349p.
The second rights issue within a week by an automotive company came from BBA
Group. Shareholders are being asked to put up Pounds 79.1m in order to
reduce gearing. The chairman said non-automotive businesses constituted 64
per cent of operating profits last year, and it is intended to maintain the
dividend rate this year. The shares still dipped 12 to 127p.
T &amp; N shrugged off initial easiness brought on by the Smith New Court
downgrade after the chairman told the annual meeting yesterday he was
confident that 'our continuing commitment will yield substantial benefit
once demand improves'. The shares eventually settled 4 up at 160p.
Motor distributor Pendragon called for cash of Pounds 11m to repay
borrowings and fund development plans, news which left the stock 3 easier at
145p, after touching 140p.
BTR slips back
BTR suffered a delayed reaction to a cautious annual meeting statement. The
shares were only modestly held back initially but dropped sharply in the
afternoon session.
Marketmakers believed that some analysts would cut their forecasts for the
company today. Sir Owen Green, BTR's chairman, said: 'The unsatisfactory
trading levels that we experienced during the second half of last year have
persisted in most areas of our world. As a consequence, the results for the
first four months of this year have fallen short of those for the comparable
1990 period.'
Traders said a single persistent seller did most of the damage and recalled
BTR's downbeat annual meeting statement a year ago, which presaged a period
of share underperformance. One analyst added that the company's suggestions
after yesterday's meeting that it had ruled out wholesale disposals of
business might have disappointed some investors. BTR fell to 396p before
ending at 401p for a net decline of 5. Turnover was a busy 4.4m.
SmithKline Beecham continued to slide on profit-taking that followed
Wednesday's first-quarter figures. Traders said much of the selling came
from New York, where investors preferred Glaxo. SmithKline lost 9 to 800p
and Glaxo climbed 16 to 1121p.
Building issues raced higher, responding to the better outlook for mortgage
interest rates. Redland advanced 15 to 585p after some determined buying by
Hoare Govett; the broker hosted a presentation to institutional clients
yesterday.
Lilley held at 45p; Scottish stockbroking firm Parsons Penny, Lilley's joint
broker along with BZW, is believed to have placed a 12.6m line of shares in
the building group at around 43p. The shares were sold by former directors
of Hatfield Estates, taken over by Lilley just over a year ago. An attempted
placing of the same stake some weeks ago was unsuccessful.
National Power was one of the biggest traded stocks, with 18m shares
changing hands. It closed 3 1/2 higher at 137p and was said to have been
catching up on PowerGen after a period of underperformance. Brokers
connected to the flotation of the two generators will from Monday be allowed
to publish their own profits estimates for the companies. They are expected
to be bullish. PowerGen was a shade up at 142p on 7m.
Other utilities were strongly supported, the Electricity Package adding 60
at Pounds 2125 and the Water Package 48 at Pounds 3083.
British Gas, helped in recent sessions by a number of top broking firms
taking a more positive stance on the shares, rose 5 to 244p on 6.5m after
dealers reported the emergence of an unlikely story that Hanson is preparing
a bid for the utility. 'Hanson does not go for regulated businesses,' said
one Gas specialist.
Revived investment demand found sellers reluctant in ECC stock and the price
advanced quickly in thin trading to end 9 higher at 432p.
The celebrations continued for United Uniform Services which, on Wednesday,
reported greatly improved annual profits as well as a return to the dividend
list. The shares added 4 for a two-day advance of 21 at 109p.
Rentokil, the diversified group with activities in environmental services
and property care, was favoured and appreciated 9 to 286p. Researcher Mr Per
Chrom-Jacobsen of Baring Securities rates the stock a buy.
Sears was unchanged at 90p on turnover of 14m following lower than expected
final results. Once property profits were stripped out, the profits of
Pounds 107.1m compared with Pounds 169.6m last time and estimates of Pounds
110m to Pounds 115m, according to Mr Nick Hawkins of Kleinwort Benson. The
large turnover in the shares was caused by a two-way pull between buying by
income funds and selling by investors worried that the dividend may be in
jeopardy.
Albert Fisher put on 2 to 123p as Corporate Partners, the investment
affiliate of Lazard Freres, said it had bought 3m shares, taking its Fisher
holding to 36m or 6.09 per cent of the equity.
Land Securities advanced 13 to 529p in steady trade. Credit Lyonnais issued
a buy note on the stock, saying it had underperformed by 20 per cent this
year. 'Unless rents collapse . . . compound dividend growth of around 15 per
cent to March 1993 can still be expected,' concluded the broker.
Yorkshire Television outperformed most of the television contracting sector.
Market-makers said sentiment had been helped by press reports of sales of
the company's popular TV series The Darling Buds of May outside the UK. The
company said it anticipated worldwide sales and added yesterday that it was
still in talks with US networks. The shares gained 7 to 295p.
Emap's agreed bid for Radio City left the former 2 off at 229p and the
latter 92 up at 377p. Emap is offering 476p worth of its shares for each
Radio City voting share and 398 1/2 p in shares for each non-voting share.
The offer is worth about Pounds 10.7m.
A substantial review of the electricals sector by Hoare Govett triggered
some keen two-way interest in the area. Hoare's Mr Jim Ross said the
construction products side of the industry (cables, domestic plugs, switches
and fuseboxes) offered the best prospects at present.
The Hoare analyst said demand for electrical construction products is
forecast to grow by 8 per cent next year and 12 per cent in 1993. Hoare's
favourites in this area are BICC, FKI and Volex. BICC edged up 2 to 429p
while Volex moved up 3 to 264p. FKI held at 57p in spite of two big
individual trades. Hoare is bearish on the power and rail equipment market,
and in particular GEC and Hawker Siddeley.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1991
NEW HIGHS (121).
BRITISH FUNDS (12) Treas. 3pc '92, Treas. 8pc '92, Conv. 10pc '96 B, Treas.
2pc I-L '92, Treas. 2pc I-L '96, Treas. 2pc I-L 2003, Treas. 2pc I-L 2006,
Treas. 2pc I-L 2009, Treas. 2pc I-L 2011, Treas. 2pc I-L 2013, Treas. 2pc
I-L 2016, Treas. 2pc I-L 2024, AMERICANS (4) Beth. Steel, Greyhound, Sear
Roebuck, Time Warner, CANADIANS (2) BCE, Bk. Montreal, BANKS (3) Dai Ichi,
Mitsubishi, Mitsubishi Tst. &amp; Bnkg., BREWERS (6) Devenish (JA), Fosters
Brewing, Guinness, Do. 5 3/4 pc Pf., Do. 8 3/4 pc Ln., Macdonald Martin A,
BUILDINGS (4) Berkeley, Boot (Henry), Sheffield Insulations, Smart (J),
STORES (6) Courts, Etam, Jacques Vert, Pentos, Scholl, T &amp; S Stores,
ELECTRICALS (6) Admiral, Domino Print., Forward Grp., Forward Tech., Kewill
Sys., Volex, ELECTRICITY (7) London, Manweb, Midlands, Norweb, PowerGen,
Southern, Yorkshire, ENGINEERING (2) Cook (Wm), Neepsend, FOODS (8)
Cullen's, Greggs, Kwik Save, M &amp; W, Merchant Retail, Morrison (Wm)
Supermarkets, Tate &amp; Lyle, Watson &amp; Philip, INDUSTRIALS (15) Airsprung
Furniture, Bespak, Betterware Cons. Prods., EMC, Electrolux, Haemocell,
Hafslund Nycomed A, Do. B, Huntleigh Tech., Pacific Dunlop, Quotient, Scapa,
Titon, Unichem, Utd. Uniform Serv., INSURANCE (2) Uslife, Utd. Friendly B,
LEISURE (8) Airtours, Central ITV, Hi-Tec Sports, LWT 3 15/16 pc Pfd., Radio
City A, Radio Clyde, Scott. TV, Ulster TV, MOTORS (2) Bletchley Motor,
Kwik-Fit, NEWSPAPERS (1) Bristol Eve. Post, PAPERS (3) Bemrose, CIA, Usher
 Walker, PROPERTY (2) London &amp; Met., Regalian, TEXTILES (1) Yorklyde,
TRANSPORT (1) CSX, TRUSTS (17) Dartmoor, Derby Inc., Dunedin Worldwide,
Fidelity Japan OTC &amp; Reg. Fd., Do. Wrrnts., JF Pacific Wrrnt., Law
Debenture, Mezzanine C &amp; I, Monks, New Throg Inc., New Zealand, Pacific
Assets Wrrnts., River Plate Zero Div. Pf., Sec. Alliance, TR Far East, TR
Tech. Stpd. Pf., Tor, WATER (1) Yorkshire, OILS (2) Ranger Oil, Royal Dutch,
MINES (6) Delta Gold, Doornfontein, Elsburg, Precious Metal Aust.,
Rustenburg, Westn. Mining.
NEW LOWS (15).
ELECTRICALS (2) Holmes Protect., Jones Stroud, ENGINEERING (1) Brasway,
FOODS (1) Budgens, INDUSTRIALS (4) BLP, Bilston &amp; B'sea., Brompton, Dyson (J
&amp; J), NEWSPAPERS (1) Gardner DC, PROPERTY (2) Clayform Props., Waterglade,
TRUSTS (3) Babcock Prebon, Korea Liberal Wrrnts., Worth, MINES (1) Colby.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 36
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-586</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAGHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / London Stock Exchange: Equity futures and options trading
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
STOCK INDEX futures led the share market higher, although prices remained
locked in the broad range established over the past two weeks.
The June FT-SE 100 index contract began firmly, moving to a premium of more
than 20 points to the spot index, which pulled the stock market up.
Later in the session, the futures market moved higher once again as
speculation grew about a bid for a FT-SE stock. An old suggestion that
Hanson may bid for British Gas was mentioned in the market, although most
traders doubted this.
By the close, June was up 21 points at 2,540, while its premium to the spot
index was at 21, against 15 in the previous session. According to brokers'
calculations, June should trade 15 Footsie points above the spot index for
fair value.
In traded options, there was busy dealing in Sears following lower than
expected final results. A total of 4,189 contracts were traded. Some
investors were buying to close positions in June 90 calls. There was also
selling of December 100 calls and 80 puts.
An investor rolled a position in British Telecom options forward from May
330 to August 360 calls. Elsewhere, James Capel was a buyer of 500 National
Power June 110 calls. Land Securities was lifted by a sale of 1,000 October
550 calls.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 36
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-587</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAGGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Appointments: Finance director for Medway Ports
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MEDWAY PORTS AUTHORITY has appointed Ms Philippa Gilham (pictured) as
director of finance - a new post created in anticipation of privatisation.
She was financial controller and southern director with the EPS Group.
*****
CAWOOD, SMITHIE &amp; CO, stockbrokers, has appointed as partners Mr Ashley
Alger, Mr Richard Whiteley, Mr John Newsome, Mr Bill Sutton, Mr Carl Bushby,
and Mr Robert Ash.
*****
Following the move of MATTHEW CLARK's head office from London to Guildford,
Mr Sam Gordon Clark, director fine wines, has resigned to pursue other
interests in the wine trade.
*****
Mr James Wheeler has been appointed managing director of HEWITSON-WALKER,
subsidiary of Nestor-BNA. He replaces founder-director Mr John Walker who
has retired to pursue personal interests.
*****
Joining the board of NEW SCOTLAND INSURANCE GROUP, holding company of
Independent Insurance, are: Mr Philip Condon, Mr Robert McCracken and Mr
Alan Clarke - all are directors and assistant general managers of
Independent Insurance. Mr Alexander Rankin Muir (pictured) has been
appointed chairman of New Scotland Investments, a newly-formed subsidiary.
He is also a director of Swinton CIB, Sceptre Insurance Services, and
Cattle's Holdings.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 36 Photograph (Omitted). Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-588</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAGFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Appointments: Senior executives at TI Group
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
TI GROUP has made two senior executive appointments. Mr David P. Lillycrop
has been promoted to group company secretary. He was deputy group secretary,
and succeeds Mr Denis Saunders who continues on the main board. Mr Lillycrop
joined the group in October 1989 from Quaker Oats where he was company
secretary. Mr Jan Valdinger has joined TI Group as director of corporate
services, with particular responsibility for legal affairs, and merger and
acquisition activity. He was with Standard Chartered Merchant Bank.
*****
COGNOS INC has appointed Mr John McIntyre as vice-president, European
operations, based at Bracknell.
*****
R. MEARS &amp; CO, insurance and reinsurance brokers, has made the following
appointments: Mr Alec R. Page, chairman; Ms Mairi M. Mayhew and Ms Joan M.
Hefford, directors; Mr Darren P. Doherty and Mr Charles C. O'Sullivan,
associate directors.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 36
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-589</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAGEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Appointments: Insurance companies' top posts
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr John Curtis has been appointed chairman and Mr Leslie Goodman chief
executive of Jardine (Lloyd's Underwriting Agents), the members' agency arm
of JARDINE INSURANCE BROKERS GROUP. Mr Mark Dawson becomes deputy chairman.
The appointments follow the resignation of Mr David R. Walker who has been
appointed chief executive of CLAREMOUNT HOLDING and Claremount Underwriting
Agency from June 1. Mr Walker remains a non-executive director of JLUA. Mr
Curtis, a director of Matheson &amp; Co, has been responsible for the Jardine
Group's shipping and property interests for many years. Mr Goodman joins
from Barclays de Zoete Wedd where he was a director. Mr Dawson has been with
JLUA for many years, latterly as managing director.
*****
Mr Nick Cosh has been appointed group finance director of Jardine Insurance
Brokers Group. He was finance director of MAI, where he remains a
non-executive director.
*****
Mr Mojtaba Ghassemian has been appointed senior vice-president of CSC
EUROPE, based in London. He was managing director of CSC Inforem. Both
companies are subsidiaries of Computer Sciences Corporation, US.
*****
Mr Christian Sulger-Buel has been appointed executive director in charge of
international private banking at the London branch of BANQUE PARIBAS in
succession to Mr Alexandre Starker. Mr Sulger-Buel was in the private
banking department in the bank's Paris headquarters.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 36
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-590</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAGDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World Stock Markets (America): Futures-related demand lifts
Dow
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
SEVERAL rounds of futures-related programme buying fuelled a late-afternoon
rally on Wall Street yesterday as US equities shrugged off paltry demand at
the 30-year bond auction and moved broadly higher, writes Karen Zagor in New
York.
At the finish the Dow Jones Industrial Average was 40.25 stronger at
2,971.15, its highest level since standing at 2,999.26 on April 18. The
Standard &amp; Poor's 500 climbed 4.74 to 383.25. Rises outpaced falls by 1,113
to 495 after a moderate volume of 180.2m shares, but an increase from the
previous day's 157m.
The Dow, which has been extremely sensitive to the US Treasury's quarterly
refunding auctions this week, overcame surprisingly weak demand at the
afternoon sale of Dollars 11.75bn in 30-year notes. Investors were
encouraged by the firmness of the bond market, where the treasury's
benchmark 30-year ent in late trading.
Technology issues contributed to the stock market gains, with IBM rising
Dollars 2 to Dollars 105 3/4 .
Mobil Oil, which said it will boost capital spending to Dollars 5bn from
Dollars 4.4bn, gained Dollars  7/8 to Dollars 69 5/8 . Exxon added Dollars 1
3/8 at Dollars 59 5/8 . Occidental Petroleum, one of the most active New
York SE issues for a second consecutive day following an agreement to sell
its North Sea oil interests for Dollars 1.35bn, climbed Dollars  7/8 to
Dollars 21 1/8 .
Ford Motor firmed Dollars  3/8 to Dollars 32 7/8 . At the company's annual
meeting the chairman said he could not rule out further lay-offs in the US.
Chrysler shed Dollars  1/4 to Dollars 13 but General Motors advanced Dollars
1 1/4 to Dollars 38 3/8 .
Wal-Mart moved ahead Dollars 2 1/8 to Dollars 42 after unveiling a 21 per
cent increase in first-quarter net income to Dollars 307m on sales up 37 per
cent to Dollars 9.28bn.
The secondary market also took part in yesterday's rally, with the Nasdaq
composite climbing 5.30 to 497.81.
Intel was one of the most actively traded over-the-counter issues, adding
Dollars 3 at Dollars 54 1/2 on expectations that it will make a line of
personal computers to be sold by Digital Equipment. The latter rose Dollars
 7/8 to Dollars 66 1/8 on the NYSE.
Bizmart forged ahead Dollars 1 3/4 to Dollars 15 in active trading after the
company said it is involved in talks about a possible takeover bid.
Immunex, which rose Dollars 1 7/8 to Dollars 42 3/4 , expects to break even
in 1991 with the help of sales of Leukine, its GM-CSF white blood cell
stimulant product.
Canada
THE SHARP Wall Street rise spurred Toronto forward in further moderate
trading. The composite index closed 22.5 ahead at 3,504.5. Advances led
declines by 314 to 221 after volume of 20.8m shares.
Memotec Data put on CDollars  3/8 to CDollars 9 in spite of turmoil
surrounding the election of its board at next week's annual meeting. Gordon
Capital Corp has issued a proxy circular in an attempt to replace three
nominees to Memotec's board, including the chairman and the president and
chief executive, with three Gordon Capital nominees.
Quadra Logic said clinical trials suggest that its Photofrin anti-cancer
drug can delay the occurrence of tumours in bladder cancer cases. The shares
added CDollars  3/8 at CDollars 10 7/8 after rising CDollars 1 5/8 on
Wednesday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-591</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAGCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Foreign Exchanges: Dollar continues to advance
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DOLLAR stayed firm in quiet foreign exchange trading yesterday. Many
European centres were closed for Ascension Day and there were no important
economic factors.
Immediate reaction was muted to news that US President George Bush is to
undergo medical treatment for his heart condition.
New applications for US unemployment benefit gave some encouragement that
the economy is moving out of recession, with the number of claims falling to
a seasonally adjusted 455,000 in the week to April 27, down 45,000 from the
previous week's 500,000.
The next important news is likely to be today's US producer price index, but
this is not expected to show much change, with the year-on-year wholesale
inflation rate possibly rising to 3.2 from 3.1 per cent. Excluding food and
energy the annual rise is expected to be unchanged at 3.7 per cent.
At the London close the dollar had climbed to DM1.7430 from DM1.7330; to
Y139.25 from Y138.30; to SFr1.4725 from SFr1.4655; and to FFr5.8925 from
FFr5.8650. On Bank of England figures the dollar's index was up 0.5 at 66.7.
Sterling was weaker as the market waited for next week's UK retail price
index.
Wholesale interest rates in London continued to discount a cut of  1/2 point
in bank base rates, although the Bank of England tried to dampen any
enthusiasm about lower rates by keeping conditions tight on the domestic
money market.
Large losses by the ruling UK Conservative party in last week's local
government elections may have reduced some of the pound's political risk. It
had been assumed that the local elections all but ended any chance of a
general election before the autumn, although Mr John Cope, Tory deputy
chairman, speaking in south Wales, said the government has not ruled out the
possibility of going to the country in June.
The result of next Thursday's by-election in Monmouth is likely to be a
factor deciding the timing of an election, according to Mr Cope.
Sterling fell 1.40 cents to Dollars 1.7040. It also declined to DM2.9700
from DM2.9775; to FFr10.0400 from FFr10.0750; to SFr2.5100 from SFr2.5175;
and to Y237.25 from Y237.50. The pound's index lost 0.3 to 91.5. Sterling
rebounded 1.50 cents in New York to end at Dollars 1.7190.
In the European exchange rate mechanism, trading was very quiet because of
the Ascension Day holiday. Sterling remained the third strongest member of
the system, below the Spanish peseta and the Italian lira.
Milan was open for trading, with the Bank of Italy buying DM90m as the lira
rose against the D-Mark at the fixing. The German unit eased to L739.75 from
L740.23, prompting the first intervention to buy D-Marks by the Bank of
Italy at any fixing since April 19.
The D-Mark remained among the weaker members of the ERM, but firmed slightly
to Y79.90 from Y79.80.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-592</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAGBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Commodities and Agriculture: Oil prices rise on series of
mishaps
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBORAH HARGREAVES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OIL PRICES moved higher yesterday as traders bought crude after a series of
accidents at oil refineries in the US and Saudi Arabia.
The price of North Sea Brent crude for June delivery rose by 25 cents to
Dollars 20.10 a barrel in an active market.
Saudi Arabia's Yanbu refinery on the Red Sea coast was operating below its
275,000 barrels a day capacity after the catalytic cracker unit - a key
piece of sophisticated refining equipment - broke down on Wednesday. There
were some indications there could be delays in deliveries.
Prices for unleaded gasoline moved higher in the US after news of a fire at
a Shell refinery in Louisiana. These later dragged up crude prices by about
5 cents to Dollars 21.83 for the June futures contract on the New York
Mercantile Exchange by midsession yesterday.
As traders rushed into the London market, the rally started to feed on
itself and some were puzzled about the strength in price.
'I'm confused,' said Mr Peter Gignoux, director of Lehman Brothers energy
desk, 'refineries are stuck with crude, but short of products and crude
rallies on the back of it.'
Refined products prices were also higher and gasoline moved up to Dollars
255 a tonne in Rotterdam from Dollars 246 a tonne.
Mobil, the US oil company, a joint venture partner in the Saudi Yanbu
refinery, reportedly notified customers of some May delivery delays.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-593</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAGAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Commodities and Agriculture: Fears for US cotton harvest as
torrential rain continues
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NANCY DUNNE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A deluge has been keeping the cotton farmers of the Mississippi Delta
indoors and driving futures prices to their highest levels in years.
In Northern Louisiana, the rain has flooded thousands of homes and farm
acres. Some residents have been driven from their homes and others are
living without clean running water.
The Delta last year produced 4.9m bales of cotton. The forecast this year
was for 6.1m bales, but as the rain has continued, that estimate has been
slipping.
Usually one-half to three-quarters of the 1.5m acres of cotton lands are
planted by this time in Mississippi, Tennessee, Arkansas, Louisiana, Alabama
and Georgia.
In one Mississippi county, Coahoma, only 4 per cent of the 96,000 acres has
been sown so far.
Any planting after May 20 is considered late, according to Mr Terry
Townsend, a spokesman for the International Cotton Advisory Committee in
Washington.
American cotton requires 140 to 160 days of warmth before harvest, or yields
are considerably reduced.
'Even if it stopped raining today, it could take a week to dry out,' Mr
Townsend said. 'But the forecast is for additional rain this weekend. There
is some talk that the crop won't get planted until the last week of May or
the first week of June.'
Problems could arise if the harvest runs into the middle of October, when
the rains generally begin again. At that point, the quality may deteriorate.
With stocks at their lowest point in decades, the New York futures prices
have been jumping both on weather concerns and continued strong demand. The
May contract closed on Wednesday at 92.2 cents, up about 10 cents from a
month ago.
Concern has also focussed on California, which last year produced 2.8m
bales.
An early drought lowered the forecast for this year to 2m bales. Now
continued cool weather has depressed that estimate.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-594</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAF9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Commodities and Agriculture: Japanese poised to enter a
fresh market - As regulatory barriers are lowered in Tokyo, Stefan Wagstyl
considers likely effects
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEFAN WAGSTYL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JAPANESE INVESTORS, who have in the past decade transformed world markets in
securities, property and art, are steadily being set free to invest in
commodities.
The Japanese authorities are gradually lowering the regulatory barriers
which have for a long time restricted Japanese investment in commodity
markets to a trickle.
The Japanese Parliament last month passed a new commodities' regulation law
which for the first time sets out rules for the sale and management of
commodity futures funds in Japan. The growth in commodities fund investment,
from a very small base, may be explosive.
The Ministry of International Trade and Industry or MITI, which sponsored
the new law, expects the accumulated total of Japanese funds to increase
fivefold in the next two or three years - from the current total of slightly
less than Y200bn (Dollars 1.4bn).
'If interest rates around the world decline (improving conditions for
commodity investment) the funds will grow even faster than that', says Mr
Koichi Akaishi, of MITI's commercial affairs office.
Mr Akaishi says that the traditional Japanese view that commodity markets
are too risky for sensible investors is giving way to a more rational
assessment of the balance of risk and return. 'People are learning to accept
risk', Mr Akaishi points out.
Some commodity fund managers are more cautious, warning that high interest
rates could dampen investment more effectively than MITI expects.
They point out that the new commodity law will remain more restrictive than
anything in force in the UK or the US. Important regulatory issues have
still to be decided by the three warring ministries with powers over
commodities investment: MITI; the Ministry of Finance; and the Ministry of
Agriculture.
Japan's giant trading companies, including Mitsubishi and Mitsui, are
leading the way in marketing funds, as are large non-bank finance groups -
including Orix, Japan's largest leasing company, and Sumisho Lease, a
leasing company affiliated to Sumitomo, another big trading concern.
Among others joining the fray are trust banks and securities companies,
which have the great advantage of national branch networks already in place
and selling financial products. A commodity fund association was established
last month with 30 members.
Foreign companies may have little chance marketing products in direct
competition with these powerful Japanese groups.
There is, however, considerable scope for foreign investment advisors to
manage funds collected by a Japanese partner, not least because Japanese
companies themselves have little experience of commodities fund management.
The funds will be invested mostly in instruments traded on US and European
exchanges, since Japanese commodity exchanges suffer from relatively low
volumes and high costs.
Already the leading Japanese fund marketing companies have reached
agreements with foreign managers: Mitsubishi with Baldwin, a US commodities
boutique; Mitsui with with ED &amp; F. Man, the UK-based commodities group; and
Sumisho Lease with Rudolf Wolff, another UK-based concern. Orix is operating
in partnership with Commodities Corporation, a US company in which it bought
a 30 per cent stake in 1989.
Since few of these agreements are likely to be exclusive, other foreign
companies are hoping to strike similar fund management deals. These
companies include Merrill Lynch, Shearson Lehman and Salomon Brothers, all
US investment banks, and Cargill, the giant US commodities trader. MITI says
that it expects to licence about 40-50 sales companies and about ten
investment advisors.
Investors, salesmen and managers alike will need to keep a wary eye on three
ministries overseeing commodities, which have been involved in a prolonged
turf battle over the new industry. MITI has long supported the development
of commodity funds, in response from trading companies and others wanting to
develop the market.
The Ministry of Finance dragged its feet; it was partly concerned about
investor protection and also wanted to make sure that financial companies
had a chance to compete. The agriculture ministry feared losing its
traditional rights over farm products.
The first Japanese company to launch a commodity fund was Mitsubishi in
1988, with an offshore vehicle sold by its London finance subsidiary to
Japanese institutions.
The following year, funds worth Y43.8bn were sold and even more was expected
for 1990.
The scale of the offerings worried the finance ministry. Officials decided
that commodity futures were not commodities at all but financial
instruments. So they insisted that only financial companies - chiefly
securities companies - should be allowed to sell them. In the first half of
1990, funds worth only Y10.2bn were launched, as the finance ministry and
MITI slugged it out.
The new law forms part of an agreement reached late last year by the
ministries. Under pressure from the finance ministry, the minimum investment
unit will be Y100m, thus putting commodity funds out of reach of most
private investors. A ban on sales of funds to individuals is being dropped.
At least 50 per cent of the fund has to be invested in commodity futures. No
more than 30 per cent can be invested in cash and bonds, and nothing in
equities. That is to avoid treading on the toes of securities companies
which monopolise the market in equity investment funds.
The most important undecided issue is whether commodity futures funds will
be permitted to invest in financial futures. Fund managers say that this is
normal practice overseas, since price movements in commodity and financial
markets are inter-related. MITI supports the granting of permission. The
finance ministry has declined to make a decision.
All the funds so far authorised by MITI are closed-end, fixed-term funds
running for four to seven years. The managers are required to put 70 per
cent of the funds collected in a safe interest-bearing investment to ensure
investors get their original capital back. The remaining 30 per cent is
invested in commodities.
MITI would like to see investment in Japan's commodity exchanges, including
the Tokyo Commodity Exchange.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-595</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAF8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Government Bonds: Treasuries shrug off fall in US
unemployment claims
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR and SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK, LONDON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
US TREASURIES traded in a narrowly mixed range yesterday in a market that
was largely untouched by weak bidding at the Treasury's 30-year bond auction
and by a drop in last week's initial claims for state unemployment
insurance.
In late trading, the Treasury's bellwether 30-year bond was  1/32 higher at
96 1/8 , yielding 8.22 per cent after dropping on news of the disappointing
auction. Shorter-dated maturities ended the day unchanged to  1/32 higher.
The revival in bond prices was attributed to optimism about today's release
of April's producer price index.
The Federal Reserve once again refrained from operating in the open market
and Fed funds traded at the 5 per cent level. The Fed's perceived target for
the rate is 5 3/4 per cent. The Fed has not intervened since Monday, when it
arranged three-day matched sales when Fed funds were trading at 5 3/4 per
cent.
During the morning the Labor Department reported that initial unemployment
claims had fallen by 45,000 to 455,000 in the week ended April 27. But the
market shrugged off the signs that the economy may not be deteriorating and
turned its attention to the afternoon's auction of Dollars 11.75bn in
30-year bonds, in the final stage of the record Dollars 37bn quarterly
refunding.
Players had anticipated strong overseas demand in the afternoon auction,
with expectations that the Japanese would be active bidders. But bidding was
exceptionally light, with a bid/cover ratio of 1.48 compared with an average
of 2.03.
AN auction yesterday of Y300bn of 20-year Japanese government bonds carrying
a 6.8 per cent coupon was moderately well received. Although JGB prices
edged up during the day, the market is worried that a flood of new corporate
issues in the next few days may depress prices.
The average price for the new 20-year no 16 JGB was 99.3, yielding 6.88 per
cent, and the lowest accepted price was 99.15, yielding 6.9 per cent.
Traders said that the length of the tail - of 2 basis points - indicated a
moderate demand for the new issue, which was taken up by the main Japanese
securities houses. The Electric Power companies are expected to issue
between Y300bn-Y400bn over the next few days.
The yield on the benchmark no 129 10-year bond opened at 6.7 per cent,
moving to 6.675 per cent before closing at 6.68 per cent in Tokyo.
THE UK government bond market focused yesterday on rumours that the Bank of
England was about to announce a new issue of stock.
Now that the tap stock - the 9 per cent Treasury stock due 2008 - has been
exhausted, the market expects the government to press ahead with its funding
programme, possibly with the issue of a conventional 10-year gilt or an
index-linked stock.
Prices in the gilts market edged up slightly in the morning then slipped to
finish little changed. Traders said the increase in longer-dated gilt prices
was due mainly to the fact that the supply of 9 per cent Treasury stock due
2008 is no longer hanging over the market.
At the shorter end of the market, expectations of a base rate cut soon have
already been discounted.
WHILE many of the European government bond markets were closed yesterday,
interest in Spanish and Italian government bonds remained strong as
investors expect to see interest rate cuts in both markets shortly.
Spanish government bonds rose yesterday with the yield on the 12 1/4 per
cent bond due 2000 falling from 11.65 per cent to 11.62 per cent, while the
yield on the 13.45 per cent bond due 1996 fell from 12.03 per cent to 11.99
per cent.
Traders said that Spain's inverse yield curve has grown steeper in recent
weeks as the long end of the market has outperformed the short end.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24 Table (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-596</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAF7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: India's drug-makers mix a
cocktail - A shift of emphasis to other product lines
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GITA PIRAMEL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FACED with declining profits, a growing number of Indian pharmaceutical
companies is considering drastic diversification, entailing switches from
antibiotics to washing machines and from tranquillisers to sunglasses.
The main driving force behind these changes is draconian government price
controls which, according to the pharmaceuticals industry, have bitten
sharply into profit margins. The controls have not only resulted in
companies moving to different product ranges, but to a shift to the more
lucrative export markets.
As a result, there is concern over supplies of drugs to the domestic market,
where demand is said to be set to rise rapidly.
The moves being considered by the industry are many and various.
Burroughs Wellcome (India) is planning Rs240m (Dollars 11.9m) worth of fresh
capital investment over the next few years. Instead of drugs, it will
concentrate on basic chemicals for the rubber and dyestuff industry.
Cadila, a highly innovative Gujarat-based pharmaceutical group offering a
wide range of formulations, has invested heavily in the production of
mopeds, televisions, microprocessors and computers.
The Tata group is gradually pulling out of the pharmaceutical industry.
Rallis India has reportedly surrendered its drug licence and is
concentrating instead on marketing washing machines and shoes. Another Tata
company, Merind, is in the auction ring.
Other companies are moving away from pharmaceuticals in a less drastic
fashion.
'Agrochemicals, medical equipment, cosmetics and packaging are natural
extensions,' said Mr C. Hattangdi, managing director of Nicholas
Laboratories, which is in the process of merging with Gujarat Glass, a
bottle manufacturer.
Many companies, such as Wockhardt, and Procter &amp; Gamble India, are focusing
on formulations which can be sold over-the-counter and fall outside the
jurisdiction of the Drugs Prices Control Order (DPCO).
Other Indian drug companies are gradually shifting production away from the
domestic market towards exports.
Not only do companies obtain better prices for their bulk drugs from
exports, but they can also apply for export incentives and claim income tax
exemptions for bringing in scarce foreign exchange. These companies report
sturdy bottom lines, tempting others to adopt their strategy.
Government price controls have ensured that drug prices in India are among
the lowest in the world - an important consideration given that almost half
India's 840m people are below the poverty line. A packet of 10 aspirins, for
example, costs a little over Rs2.
The pharmaceutical industry feels that such rigorous controls leave no
margin for profits.
According to the Organisation of Pharmaceutical Producers of India (Oppi),
average profit margins as a percentage of sales have skidded from 15.47 per
cent in 1970 to 4.5 per cent in 1988, though the DPCO permits a profit level
of 8.13 per cent.
'If a middle-class man can pay Rs12 for a litre of milk and Rs50 for a kilo
of edible oil, why does the government assume that he cannot pay slightly
more for medicines?' said Mr Arvind Nair, Oppi's secretary.
Moreover, prices have remained static over the past two years, though input
costs such as labour, raw materials and power have escalated sharply.
'When investment in further production translates into slimmer margins at
the end of the year, it doesn't make sense to expand - with the consequence
that we are not keeping pace with population growth,' said Mr Jasjit Singh,
director of Associated Capsules.
According to industry experts, overall demand for pharmaceutical products
will shortly triple from the current Rs40bn.
'The demand is astronomical. It is a pity that politicians do not realise
that their blatantly perverted policies are killing the industry and are not
in the public interest,' said Mr D. Bose, managing director of Burroughs
Wellcome (India).
Unless both industrialists and politicians hammer out a compromise, serious
shortages of essential medicines are bound to emerge in the near future, and
in some areas that shortage is already apparent - paracetamol production,
for example, cannot keep pace with demand.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-597</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAF6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: TWA may swap debt for cash
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TWA, the heavily-borrowed carrier owned by Mr Carl Icahn, said yesterday
that 'it is exploring the possibility of a cash tender offer for its debt'
next week, writes Nikki Tait.
The company declined to be more specific about what debt - some of which is
traded publicly, and some of which is owned by Mr Icahn himself - it might
try to buy, or how the current negotiations with debtholders and lessors
over the possible restructuring of the group's parlous finances were
progressing. Debtholders advisers, however, were sceptical of matters moving
significantly within a week.
There is, however, little doubt that any such offer would be at a very heavy
discount to the face value of the debt. With suggestions circulating that
TWA might offer 13.5 cents on the dollar for some issues, the airline's 12
per cent junior subordinated debentures due in 2001 rose Dollars  3/4 to
Dollars 13 1/4 , while the issue due in 2008 gained Dollars 1 3/8 at Dollars
13 3/8 .
TWA's announcement came shortly after the airline said that it had reached
an 'interim agreement' with the union representing its machinists, under
which TWA promised not to make any principal or interest payments to
debtholders while the two sides negotiate. These labour talks, it claimed,
could extend for 'several months'.
TWA has defaulted on a variety of debt and long-term lease payments this
year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-598</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAF5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: Monks loses battle for Sears,
Roebuck board seat
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARBARA DURR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR ROBERT MONKS, leader of the battle to reform American corporate
governance, has lost his bid for a seat on the board of Sears, Roebuck, the
giant US retailing and financial services company.
A preliminary count from the company's annual meeting yesterday showed that
the management's slate of three candidates had won. Mr Monks vowed to try
again next year.
Mr Edward Brennan, Sears, Roebuck chairman, claimed Mr Monks' concerns 'were
more with corporate America than with Sears'.
'Our opposition to Mr Monks was based upon our belief that our principal
responsibility to shareholders is to improve our financial performance so
that we might enhance the value of their investment, not to use the Sears
boardroom as a forum for Mr Monks' personal agenda,' he said.
Mr Monks efforts, however, reflect serious shareholder discontent. Mr
Brennan faced many shareholder complaints yesterday, ranging from poor
service in stores to disappointing financial performance.
The chairman admitted the 1990 results were 'unacceptable,' but said they
underscored the improved first-quarter performance this year.
He also pledged that 1991 would be a better year overall given that the
company had deeply cut its costs and that the economy was expected to emerge
from recession. Sears, Roebuck's 1990 net income was Dollars 902m, or
Dollars 2.63 per share, down from Dollars 1.5bn, or Dollars 4.30 in 1989.
Cost-cutting helped first-quarter 1991 net income to grow to Dollars 202.7m,
or 59 cents per share, up 91 per cent from Dollars 106.3m, or 31 cents, from
1990.
Highlighting the first-quarter results, however, was only 'trying to put the
best face on things,' according to Mr Lawrence Spitzer, an individual
shareholder. 'Brennan has his back against the wall,' he said.
Mr Brennan, who is not only chairman and chief executive of Sears, Roebuck,
but also chief of its troubled merchandise group, came under fire from Mr
Monks for concentrating so much decision-making power in his own hands.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-599</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAF4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: US court accepts CNBC bid for
FNN
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE PENULTIMATE battle over Financial News Network (FNN), the business news
media group, ended yesterday when a bankruptcy court judge accepted a bid
from CNBC, the cable television subsidiary of General Electric's NBC unit.
The bid comprised Dollars 145m in cash and Dollars 9.3m in assumed
liabilities.
The decision paves the way to end months of fighting between Dow
Jones/Westinghouse and CNBC over FNN's cable television and business radio
network operations. However, there may still be one more round to fight.
The Dow Jones group, which filed a civil anti-trust suit earlier this week,
is seeking a temporary restraining order in an attempt to prevent the CNBC
acquisition.
Analysts were sceptical about the prospects of the CNBC acquisition being
blocked on anti-trust grounds. Although CNBC operates the only serious
competitor to FNN's 24-hour business channel, the Federal Trade Commission
has already said it would not oppose a CNBC acquisition on anti-trust
grounds.
In February, FNN tentatively accepted a Dollars 90m bid from a joint venture
between Dow Jones and Westinghouse, but it later turned it down in favour of
a Dollars 105m CNBC offer.
The ensuing battle, in which both suitors sweetened their offers several
times, helped push the price to a level which some analysts said was more
than the failed company was worth.
FNN was put on the block in November, and filed for protection from
creditors under Chapter 11 of the federal bankruptcy code earlier this year.
Both sides have a vested interest in acquiring FNN. CNBC was launched less
than two years ago and provides business programmes during the day. The
acquisition is expected to bolster CNBC's subscribers from 18m to more than
30m.
Dow Jones, which owns the Wall Street Journal and the Dow Jones wire
service, has wanted to expand into cable television for some time.
The Dow Jones/Westinghouse partnership had bid Dollars 167.1m for FNN, but
the total cash component of Dollars 135m was less than the CNBC offer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-600</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAF3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: Memotec faces proxy battle
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TORONTO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A LEADING Canadian securities company, apparently with the tacit backing of
telecommunications conglomerate BCE, has launched a proxy battle to unseat
senior management of Memotec Data, the Montreal-based company whose
interests include Canada's overseas telephone monopoly.
Gordon Capital of Toronto said it will seek to replace Memotec's chairman
and president on the board with three of its own nominees at Memotec's
annual meeting next Thursday.
In a proxy solicitation to Memotec shareholders, Gordon criticised Memotec
for expanding into high-technology businesses by using cash generated mainly
from the telephone carrier, Teleglobe Canada. Gordon estimates that
Memotec's computer-related businesses suffered a pre-tax loss of CDollars
14.5m (USDollars 12.60m) in 1990, compared with Teleglobe's earnings of
CDollars 30.1m.
According to Gordon, Memotec 'has cash flow problems that need to be
addressed immediately'. Available cash declined to CDollars 5.7m at the end
of last year from CDollars 113.8m two years earlier. Current liabilities
exceed current assets by more than CDollars 155m.
Memotec's management said yesterday that it 'vigorously contests the
accuracy and validity' of Gordon's conclusions, and that it is confident it
will retain shareholders' support.
BCE has a 31 per cent stake in Memotec. But BCE said yesterday that the
company undertook earlier to use its votes only for its own nominees on the
Memotec board, and that it thus has no choice but to abstain in the vote.
BCE has made no secret however, of its unhappiness with Memotec's recent
performance.
Gordon, which is well known for its aggressive streak, said that its only
direct interest in the outcome of the proxy fight is a CDollars 400,000 fee
for its services.
Memotec's share price has slid in the past three years from CDollars 19 to
just over CDollars 9. Net earnings tumbled to CDollars 8m last year from
CDollars 20.1m in 1989. Its 1990 revenues were CDollars 404m. Teleglobe
accounts for about 60 per cent of its revenues.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-601</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAF2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Fuelling partnerships to explore mutual
interests - How BP is oiling the expensive wheels of progress via alliances
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBORAH HARGREAVES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AFTER DECADES of growing on its own through takeovers and internal
expansion, British Petroleum is rediscovering the value of co-operative
ventures and alliances.
It will finalise soon, for example, a joint initiative with Norway's Statoil
to market and sell gas in the UK, launching a substantial challenge to
British Gas' dominance of the UK industrial gas market.
The deal, which covers other areas such as oil exploration, is part of a
wider understanding between the two companies. BP has dubbed it a strategic
alliance.
Indeed, it says that the Statoil deal could be followed by other strategic
alliances currently under discussion which could come to fruition later this
year.
This approach revives an idea which has been around since multinational oil
companies received concessions to explore for oil across the world in the
1950s, but which was buried as countries nationalised their oil interests
and the industry turned its eyes towards the mega-takeovers of the 1980s.
Under the constraints of today's chastened financial environment, a link-up
with a like-minded company to explore areas of mutual interest can be a
useful and much cheaper alternative to a hostile takeover bid.
'The mind-set of the 1980s has changed,' says Mr David Simon, BP's chief
operating officer and deputy chairman. 'People are understanding that it is
possible to have a common vision and work through a strategy without
worrying about the issue of control. In an alliance, you are pooling your
abilities to create value rather than worrying about who is stronger.'
For BP, with gearing of close to 40 per cent and a capital budget of Dollars
7bn a year (Pounds 4.1bn at the current exchange rate) just to fund
internally-generated projects, there is little room to contemplate a large
acquisition in any case. Mr Simon insists that the company is not forced
into alliances because it is cash-constrained, but that 'this is a sensible
way of growing the business and creating value for shareholders'.
BP's initiative with Statoil grew out of a personal relationship between Mr
Simon and Mr Harold Norvik, Statoil's chairman, both of which share similar
views on the development of EC energy markets in the run-up to the single
market in 1992 and beyond.
The link on gas between the two companies will give BP access to the largest
gas reserves in Europe to supply burgeoning gas demand in the UK and,
possibly, later export to a more liberated EC gas market.
Gas production and sales currently account for 10 per cent of BP's business,
but the company is putting more resources into its development and could see
its exposure to gas doubling over the next couple of years.
Another chief reason behind the move towards strategic alliances is the need
to share the risk of highly capital-intensive exploration projects which are
often located in politically-sensitive regions of the world. BP and Statoil
are looking to explore jointly for oil and gas in West Africa, offshore
China, Vietnam and the Soviet Union.
Under this arrangement, both companies can share the cost and technological
burden of searching for additional oil reserves outside the Middle East, an
objective which is important to both.
Much of the world's oil reserves are in the hands of state-owned companies.
Many of them are in severe need of capital and technological expertise to
maximise output. This could be provided by the large multinationals in
return for access to the oil. Some oil industry observers are expecting a
return to the partnerships of the 1950s which helped develop the reserves in
the first place.
At the beginning of April, BP signed an agreement with Venezuela's national
oil company, Petroleos de Venezuela, to co-operate in oil exploration and
production in the country. This was the fruit of a 10-year relationship
between the two companies which started as a partnership on technology.
Venezuelan oil is very heavy - which means it contains a lot of sulphur -
making it difficult to transport and to burn in power stations. The two
companies developed a technique of mixing water with the oil by a process
called Orimulsion and formed a joint venture to market it in Europe.
By courting the Venezuelans in this way, BP secured a deal to help develop
its reserves and co-operate on refining.
Similarly, research into new technology is a ripe area for link-ups between
large oil companies since they help defray the heavy costs. Statoil and BP
have also gone down a third route in the alliance and have set up a joint
venture research and development project. This will pool resources on some
aspects of technology development and, since BP has the upper hand on
research, Statoil has paid Dollars 20m for its part of the venture.
In another bid to rationalise costs, BP has joined with Texaco, the US oil
company, in upgrading two refineries in Rotterdam by linking them by
pipeline. The agreement pools up-to-date refining equipment owned by each at
the different sites and allows them to close the older parts of the plant.
Speculation about future alliances for BP have centred around the Far East
where demand for oil is growing at a faster rate than anywhere else in the
world.
The company would certainly like to gain more exposure to the Japanese
market, but it is very difficult to penetrate.
It is not a process that can be rushed, Mr Simon stresses. 'It is a way of
looking at the development of markets and political structures which means
you can do business together,' he says.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20 Photograph David Simon, the mind-set of the 1980s has changed
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-602</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAF1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Etam says it will reject full offer from
Oceana
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BOARD of Etam, the women's fashion chain, has said that it will reject a
takeover bid from Oceana Investment Corporation, if the vehicle for a South
African retailing concern goes ahead with a full offer.
Oceana, a vehicle for the Lewis family which runs the Foschini fashion
stores in South Africa, increased its stake in Etam to 25.1 per cent this
week via a tender offer at 185p per share, which was about 11 per cent
oversubscribed. It is still considering its next move.
If it makes a bid, the maximum price is 185p - as it was for the tender
offer - valuing Etam at Pounds 121m.
Etam said the offer had been an unwelcome distraction. 'Tenders were only
received by Oceana in respect of shares representing less than 22 per cent
of those subject to the offer. We believe that this represents a substantial
vote of support for your board.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-603</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAF0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Stakebuilding continues at Pathfinders
Group
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AN INTRIGUING group of shareholders is being assembled at Pathfinders Group,
the USM-quoted entertainment and media recruitment agency which has been
chaired since last September by Mr Stephen Hargrave.
Mr Jon Pither, the former Amari Group chief executive and Glynwed
International director, has bought a 6.3 per cent stake and joined the
board. This follows the acquisition of a 3 per cent interest by Mr John
Donachie, former chairman of Alfred Walker, the commercial property
developer, in March.
Mr Hargrave said yesterday that the purchases were not connected and that Mr
Pither's presence did not necessarily mean that Pathfinders was scouting
acquisitions in metals. 'I think he will play an active part-time role,' he
said. 'He has fantastic connections and a lot of managerial experience. He
will be helping us to source and fund acquisitions.'
Mr Hargrave has a colourful background having worked for Warburg, Save &amp;
Prosper and the Evening Standard. Prior to Pathfinders, he was head of
planning at United Newspapers. He is the author of a novel about 'a
30-year-old stockbroker who gets involved in some shady dealings.'
Mr Pither is currently a director of Suter, the industrial holding company.
He was once on the board of the London Metal Exchange.
Pathfinders shares rose 1p yesterday to 7p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-604</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK Company News: BBA calls for Pounds 79m to cut acquisition
debt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BBA GROUP, the manufacturer serving the automotive, industrial and aviation
markets, yesterday launched a Pounds 79.1m rights issue to reduce
borrowings.
News of the 1-for-4 issue of 72.2m shares at 112p came one week after a
Pounds 119m cash call from T&amp;N, the automotive and industrial group.
The gloomy setting for these rights issues was spelt out yesterday by Mr
David Lees, chairman of GKN, the fellow engineering company, who warned that
profits for the first half of 1991 would be well below the already depressed
second half of last year.
He said GKN has already cut 1,100 jobs in the first four months of this
year. When it released its 1990 figures in March it said it planned to make
at least 1,000 people redundant in the full year.
BBA said that acquisitions to reduce its dependence on the motor sector were
the main reason for increased borrowings. Mr Peter Clappison, finance
director, said that by December net debt had risen to Pounds 196m, or 61 per
cent of shareholders' funds. Applying the rights issue proceeds to those
figures would reduce gearing to 29 per cent. The up-to-date figure after the
issue is expected to be nearer 40 per cent, partly reflecting a seasonal
build-up.
Mr John White, managing director, said that in 1987 the group derived 80 per
cent of its operating profit from motor components. Last year the figure had
fallen to 36 per cent, although they still accounted for 51 per cent of the
Pounds 1.23bn turnover.
Since the beginning of 1989, all but one of BBA's 14 acquisitions were
non-automotive, adding Pounds 106m to group debt.
He said the group was raising funds retrospectively partly because of the
unforeseen speed and depth of the motor industry recession.
BBA has also continued with a strong capital spending programme. Last year's
Pounds 69.8m was 1.6 times depreciation and a further Pounds 60m is planned
for this year.
As with other motor components makers, the installation of labour-saving
machinery coupled with the downturn of demand has led to job cuts. Mr White
said 1,800 jobs had gone since last summer, mostly in the UK and Australia,
reducing the total workforce to just over 23,000.
Group pre-tax profit is expected to fall to Pounds 60m-Pounds 65m this year,
from Pounds 75.1m. A maintained dividend of 7.5p is promised, from forecast
earnings per share of about 11p.
BBA's share price shed 12p to close at 127p yesterday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-605</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Ford UK poised to show heavy loss
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FORD of Britain, the UK car market leader, is expected to report next week
that it fell heavily into loss last year for the first time in almost two
decades.
Ford of Britain has not declared a pre-tax loss since 1971, although it did
incur a small operating loss in 1984. In 1989, it achieved pre-tax profit of
Pounds 483m (Dollars 830.8m) following a record Pounds 673m for 1988.
The downturn is expected to lead to unusually tough wage negotiations in the
autumn when the present two-year agreement ends. Despite deteriorating
finances, Ford wages rose by 13.4 per cent last November as part of its
earlier inflation-linked deal.
Ford's setback contrasts with modest declines at other leading UK car
makers.
Vauxhall, subsidiary of General Motors of the US, increased pre-tax profit
marginally to a record Pounds 239.1m. Operating profits slipped 13 per cent
to Pounds 190.9m.
Rover, formerly BL, saw trading profits fall 14.1 per cent to Pounds 55m,
while pre-tax profits at Peugeot-Talbot, subsidiary of Peugeot of France,
fell 11 per cent to Pounds 109m.
The Ford of Britain group overall plunged into loss partly as a result of
the 1989 takeover of Jaguar, the luxury car maker. The US parent made the
Pounds 1.38bn acquisition through Ford of Britain. Jaguar is now
consolidated into Ford of Britain accounts.
Jaguar is believed to have incurred a pre-tax loss of about Pounds 70m last
year, but Ford of Britain was also pushed into loss by carrying the
financing costs for the expensive takeover.
Ford of Britain's operating performance came under further pressure last
year in the face of:
Falling sales volumes and an erosion of market share;
Lower production;
Rising marketing costs;
The troubled launch of its new-generation Escort/Orion range;
Industrial action.
Ford's new car sales in the UK fell by 16.7 per cent in 1990 to 507,260,
against a drop in the overall market of 12.7 per cent. Its share of the
market fell from 26.5 per cent to 25.3 per cent.
Car output at the Dagenham and Halewood plants dropped 13.8 per cent, to
329,597.
According to Ford in the US, labour disputes in the UK in the first quarter
of last year, chiefly the seven-week closure of its Halewood, Merseyside,
plant, cut pre-tax profits by Dollars 335m (Pounds 196m).
The Halewood dispute was particularly damaging as it coincided with the
build-up to the costly change-over of production systems to the new
Escort/Orion.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-606</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / BP earnings rise 44% in quarter
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBORAH HARGREAVES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH Petroleum first-quarter profits rose 44 per cent on the back of
improved performance by its refining operations.
However, Mr David Simon, chief operating officer and deputy chairman, warned
that the uncertain outlook for oil prices could undermine performance later
this year.
BP's pre-tax profit rose to Pounds 521m on a replacement-cost basis which
strips out gains and losses made on oil stocks. This increased from Pounds
361m in the same quarter last year.
The sharp fall in the oil price in January caused BP to make a Pounds 511m
stock loss, reversing gains of Pounds 472m in the whole of last year. This
left the company's profit at just Pounds 10m on an historical cost basis,
narrowly missing its first ever quarterly loss.
Mr Simon said oil prices had moved from an average of Dollars 32 a barrel in
the final quarter of last year to Dollars 20 a barrel in the first quarter.
He said oil prices now seemed to have settled at the Dollars 20-a-barrel
level.
High refining margins in the first quarter boosted the company's results.
Pre-tax profit for refining and marketing more than doubled to Pounds 385m
in the first quarter from Pounds 115m last year.
This followed an increase in average refining margins in Europe to Dollars 7
a barrel and Dollars 11 a barrel in the Far East after a surge in demand for
jet fuel from troops fighting in the Gulf. These margins have now dropped
back to Dollars 4 a barrel.
The company's exploration and production arm also reported a strong pre-tax
result of Pounds 483m on a replacement-cost basis compared with Pounds 454m
in the same 1990 period. Production rose to 1.42bn barrels a day (b/d) from
1.39bn b/d in the final quarter of 1990 as Alaskan output increased to its
highest level for two years.
Chemicals showed some improvement from the disappointing performance in the
last quarter of 1990 to Pounds 54m, but this was still below the Pounds 63m
made in the first quarter of last year.
The results proved higher than many City forecasts, prompting some analysts
to raise their expectations of the group's performance for the full year to
around Pounds 1.35bn - an increase from last year's Pounds 1.2bn. The
company said it would pay a dividend of 4.2p compared with 3.95p.
Lex, Page 16
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-607</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Shine goes off Polly Peck's fruit machine: Meyna, central to
creditors' cash hopes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NESTLED among the palm trees and orange groves along a highway leading to
the Turkish Mediterranean coast, a line of warehouses and factories
stretches for almost 25 miles outside the port of Mersin.
At first sight, the two main factories of the Meyna group do not command
much attention. The outlets for Polly Peck International's Turkish mainland
subsidiary in the fruit and processing trade are lost in a seemingly endless
parade of garish company and bank signs.
Yet they - and other similar plants dotted around Turkey and northern Cyprus
 -are at the heart of any hopes that Polly Peck's 28,000 creditors have of
recovering the hundreds of millions of pounds they have pumped into the
group. There are signs already that creditors will have to wait years for
Meyna and other Near East operations to make a dent in Polly Peck's debts.
And even then, the wait could turn out to be fruitless.
Creditors were told this week that only about Pounds 500m of their Pounds
1.15bn was likely to be repaid. For the rest, they will have to rely on
future profits or asset sales from the Near East.
Meyna has long been thought by analysts and shareholders to be one of the
group's biggest cash generators. For instance, it was believed to have been
the biggest contributor to the Pounds 107m of reported profits from northern
Cyprus and Turkey in 1989, which made up two-thirds of total group profit.
The administrators this week cast serious doubts on the reliability of Polly
Peck's published figures.
Meyna is shown in reports at Polly Peck's head office to have made profits
of TL195bn (Pounds 47m) in the first half of 1990, on turnover of TL578bn.
The administrators warn that the limited access they have had to local
records indicates that these figures 'may be significantly overstated'.
This accords with the impression of Meyna given by former executives, and by
competitors - that of a medium-sized player from one of the Mediterranean's
less active fruit exporting nations. As one prominent Israeli fruit
exporter, who has observed Meyna closely, says of the reported profits: 'You
simply can't make that sort of money from a fruit business that size.'
The Turkish Mediterranean fruit and vegetable market is not large. The
Association of (Turkish) Mediterranean Exporters reported Dollars 110.4m
(Pounds 65m) in exports last year of fresh fruit, vegetables, and citrus
fruits.
Polly Peck's Turkish fruit and vegetable operations were developed after
1985, following substantial investment.
By the end of 1989, Meyna had 58,000 sq m of plant and two ultra-modern
packing stations. The plant could process 20 tons of fruit an hour and
seemed poised to challenge the Spanish and Italian fruit industries.
By 1988, Meyna was exporting 68,000 tons of fruit and vegetables. However,
problems in the overseas marketing arm handling Meyna's output led to
substantial cuts in exports in 1989, with output falling to 23,000 tons. It
is reckoned to be the fifth or sixth largest exporter in Mersin. Meyna then
turned to the domestic market, with products ranging from fruit concentrates
and cooking oils to plastic containers.
It is also possible to trace Meyna's growing involvement in importing
foodstuffs, including rice, sugar and coffee.
From what is known of these piecemeal businesses, it is hard to construct a
picture of a vibrant business generating substantial sums of cash.
So where will the profits come from to repay Polly Peck's creditors? Not
from Sunzest Trading, the group's original Turkish Cypriot fruit operation.
This is substantially smaller than Meyna.
Nor, on the face of it, from Unipac, the group's cardboard box factory in
northern Cyprus. Unaudited figures for the first six months of 1990 show it
made Pounds 14m profit - well down on the Pounds 1m-a-week profit it was
said to have been making at one stage. Even the Pounds 14m is in doubt. The
administrators have not gained access to the business, due to an injunction
taken out by directors of Unipac. But the administrators say of the
unaudited profits: 'The information available indicates the figures may be
overstated.'
If there is a big question mark over the profit-generating capacity of the
Near East operations, then what chance is there of selling assets to pay
back some of the Pounds 959m invested in northern Cyprus and Turkey by other
Polly Peck group companies?
On the evidence obtained so far, not good. The group was renowned for its
lavish investments in new processing plants. It is uncertain whether these
can be sold at anything like their original cost.
In addition, hundreds of millions of pounds of Polly Peck money has been
ploughed into holiday developments (although the administrators have not
been able to verify Pounds 230m said to have been invested last summer).
These have little resale value as incomplete developments. But it will take
years for these investments to show a return.
Despite this, Mr Michael Jordan, one of the three administrators of Polly
Peck, said yesterday that creditors had little option but to place their
faith in the Near East, and Polly Peck's chairman. For example, it is
through Mr Asil Nadir, the Turkish Cypriot chairman and chief executive,
that the administrators are trying to obtain legal title to assets bought
with Polly Peck money, but not held in the name of group companies.
Any legal attempt to gain control of assets, in a region not recognised by
the UK, would take years and could yield nothing, said Mr Jordan. His blunt
warning: 'If the creditors don't go along with our proposals and prefer to
pull the plug (on Polly Peck), then they may as well say goodbye to northern
Cyprus.'
Observer, Page 14
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17 Illustration Doubts on results, administrators (from left)
Richard Stone, Chris Morris and Michael Jordan (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-608</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Granada chief may quit as price of Pounds 150m cash call
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GRANADA, the leisure and television group, is expected to announce today a
Pounds 150m rights issue and the departure of its chief executive, Mr Derek
Lewis.
The announcement will follow weeks of pressure and speculation that
Granada's financial adviser, S. G. Warburg, was seeking Mr Lewis's
resignation as the price of going ahead with a rights issue designed to
reduce the company's debt.
Several non-executive directors and a range of institutional shareholders
believed top-level management changes were needed following difficult
diversifications into electrical retailing and business services, and
growing levels of borrowing.
Those who were critical included Mr Peter Davis, chairman and chief
executive of Reed International, who is expected to resign from the Granada
board soon after the rights issue has been completed.
Although Mr Lewis will announce his intention to leave, he is expected to
stay until a successor is appointed.
Granada's new financial package is likely to include a dividend cut.
Despite accepting Warburg's arguments that Mr Lewis must go, there is no
sign that Granada plans significant changes in strategy.
Support will continue for the two high-risk ventures that have increased
pressure on Granada's balance sheet - the Pounds 232.4m commitment to
British Sky Broadcasting, the satellite television venture, and the Pounds
200m investment in business services which has only just moved into modest
profit.
Mr Lewis has admitted that Granada was slow to integrate its computer
servicing acquisitions into the main business, which delayed profitability.
Questions are likely to be raised about the apparent decision to sacrifice
Mr Lewis for policies that had the support of the board and are likely to
continue.
The uncertainty comes at a particularly sensitive time. By noon next
Wednesday, Granada Television has to submit its bid for a new 10-year
commercial broadcasting licence.
The Independent Television Commission has not ruled out takeovers of bidders
while franchise bids are being considered. However, once the franchises are
awarded there is a moratorium on takeovers until 1994.
In December Granada announced a 26 per cent drop in pre-tax profits to
Pounds 121m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-609</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Soviet minister issues strong criticism of Jewish
settlements
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JERUSALEM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
STRONG criticism of Jewish settlement in the occupied Arab territories came
yesterday from Mr Alexander Bessmertnykh, the Soviet foreign minister. He
said a US-Soviet sponsored Middle East peace conference could not go ahead
before the issue was confronted.
His comments came on the day Mr Yitzhak Shamir, Israel's prime minister,
said the Soviet Union had to renew full diplomatic relations with Israel
before assuming a role in Middle East peace talks. He said renewed
diplomatic relations were 'a prior condition for the Soviet Union's
participation in the peace process, and we will welcome it'.
Mr Bessmertnykh, speaking in Jordan in advance of a ground-breaking visit to
Israel today, said Moscow did not accept any pre-conditions for its
participation in the process.
He also linked the settlements issue to Soviet Jewish emigration to Israel.
Asked whether Moscow planned to restrict the outflow, he said: 'I do not
exclude anything when we talk about the necessity to stop the construction
of these settlements.'
Mr Bessmertnykh damped hopes that his Jerusalem visit, the first by a Soviet
foreign minister, would bring an announcement of the re-establishment of
full diplomatic relations between the two countries after a 24-year rift.
'We do not accept any conditions for our own participation in the peace
process in the Middle East because our role in that process is natural.'
Speaking after talks with Jordan's King Hussein, the foreign minister said
he could not 'foresee, conceive or accept' holding a peace conference while
settlement building continued in the West Bank and Gaza Strip. 'The Soviet
Union and other countries who are interested in arranging such a conference
are going to deal with that problem straightforwardly and directly as one of
the things to be solved before the conference starts.'
Mr Bessmertnykh's six-hour visit to Israel is part of a Middle East shuttle
that will complement the fourth tour through the region by Mr James Baker,
the US secretary of state, since the end of the Gulf war. Mr Baker is trying
to bring about a regional conference that would open the way to bilateral
Arab-Israeli peace talks.
The two men are scheduled to meet in Cairo at the weekend. During his first
two stops in Jordan and Syria - Moscow's long-standing ally in the Middle
East - Mr Bessmertnykh reiterated continued Soviet support for the Arab
stance and the Palestine Liberation Organisation.
In spite of his criticism of Israel he was careful to stress Moscow backed
Washington's efforts. Perhaps significantly, an expected meeting in Amman
with Mr Yassir Arafat, the PLO leader - who Washington and Israel want
excluded from the process - did not take place.
Apart from the issue of settlements, which the Israeli government has flatly
refused to halt, Mr Bessmertnykh's talks with Mr Shamir will focus on the
Moscow-backed Arab demand that the proposed conference should include the UN
and be more than a one-time formal opening to a series of bilateral
negotiations.
Israel wants to exclude the UN, which it regards as biased, and rejects any
executive role for the full conference largely for the same reason. Mr
Shamir, who believes Moscow has decided in principle to restore full
relations regardless of hesitation over timing, will urge Mr Bessmertnykh to
distance Moscow from the PLO and persuade Syria in particular to soften its
conditions for talks.
Iraq rejects UN force, Page 4
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-610</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Brazil names economy minister
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINA LAMB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   RIO DE JANEIRO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BRAZIL yesterday launched a less abrasive style of economic management by
bringing in a diplomat and former banker, Mr Marcilio Marques Moreira, as
economy minister in place of Ms Zelia Cardoso de Mello.
Ms Cardoso resigned along with the entire team responsible for the country's
drastic stabilisation programme.
But government officials said the changes did not mean the team's policies
had failed or that there would be a new economic package. Instead there
would be a 'more consensual style' and 'more effective management'.
Ms Cardoso was President Fernando Collor de Mello's closest supporter and an
architect of his anti-inflation plan.
Her departure after almost 14 months in office underlines the government's
isolation at home and abroad. Her combative style in negotiations with
creditor banks and with Brazil's congress, businessmen and labour leaders
appeared increasingly to be a liability.
By contrast, Mr Moreira, Brazil's ambassador to Washington, is widely
respected for quiet negotiating skills. He is expected to change the style
of government markedly, though not the substance.
The 59-year-old diplomat faces the daunting task of avoiding a return to
hyperinflation and mending Brazil's fences with the international financial
community over payment of the country's Dollars 122bn (Pounds 71.6bn)
foreign debt.
His close relations with the US Treasury and his reputation among banks
should ease negotiations with the IMF for a Dollars 2bn standby facility and
help smooth troubled relations with Washington before President Collor's US
visit next month.
After Ms Cardoso's resignation on Wednesday night, others to bow out
included Mr Ibrahim Eris, governor of the central bank. He was replaced by
Mr Francisco Gros, who held the post briefly in 1987.
Among others to go were Mr Antonio Kandir, chief economic policy maker; Mr
Joao Maia, national economy secretary; and Mr Eduardo Modiano, head of the
National Development Bank. Mr Eduardo Teixeira, infrastructure minister,
also resigned, while Mr Jorio Dauster, chief debt negotiator, offered his
resignation.
Ms Cardoso, a 37-year-old former economic history professor, is
relinquishing control of the world's ninth largest economy to return to
teaching.
Conflict to consensus, Page 3
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-611</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Tories cool on idea of June election
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SENIOR Conservatives yester-day sought to damp speculation that Mr John
Major is considering a June general election as election fever gripped the
three main parties.
Close colleagues of the prime minister insisted that in 10 Downing Street
the idea of a snap election had gone 'colder than cold' after last week's
local election losses. Barring a 'spectacular' - and unexpected -
Conservative majority in next week's Monmouth by-election, Mr Major had his
sights set firmly on the autumn.
But the Labour party indicated that it would attempt to harry the
Conservatives into an early poll. Senior figures in the shadow cabinet
believe that next month would offer the strongest chance of a Labour
victory.
Mr Major is expected today to tell Scottish Tories of his plans for a white
paper this summer on a 'citizens charter' to promote better public services.
Proposals being considered include performance related pay for public sector
workers and compensation to consumers for bad services.
The refusal of several ministers to close publicly the option of a June
election left an impression that Mr Major is sufficiently anxious to secure
his own mandate to believe that he might win next month.
Ministers also stepped up their attacks on Labour's tax and spending
policies. Following a lead set by Mr Major in the House of Commons, they
charged that Mr Neil Kinnock's plan to abolish the ceiling on national
insurance contributions would hit millions of people in the south of England
whose incomes were barely above the average for the region. A Gallup opinion
poll in today's Daily Telegraph puts the Tories just half a percentage point
ahead of Labour.
Speaking in the Monmouth by-election campaign, Mr John Cope, the deputy
Conservative party chairman, refused to rule out the possibility of a June
poll. At the Scottish Conservative conference in Perth, Mr Michael
Heseltine, environment secretary, offered similarly opaque replies to
questions from journalists.
At one stage Mr Heseltine appeared to increase speculation with a series of
confident predictions of an imminent turnaround in the economy. He cited
this week's fall in mortgage rates and the expected sharp fall in inflation
due to be announced next week as a secure basis for a fourth Conservative
election victory.
Senior ministers are emphasising in private that the party's analysis of the
local election results does not provide a secure enough foundation for an
early election.
The interpretation offered to cabinet colleagues yesterday by Mr Chris
Patten, the party chairman, was that in spite of the loss of more than 900
seats, if a general election had been held last week the Conservatives would
have secured a majority of 20 at Westminster. But Mr Patten is believed to
consider that such a figure is well within the margin of error and to have
advised Mr Major to wait until the autumn.
At the Scottish conference today, the prime minister will develop further
the Conservatives' strategy for attacking Labour. But he may also use his
closing address to take some of the steam out of the speculation on June.
Citizens' charter, Page 10
Taxing question, Page 15
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-612</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / The Lex Column: Gold
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A true contrarian might buy gold at the moment. The price wanders between
its unchanging tramlines, redundancies have carried off nearly all the
City's gold analysts and now even an Oppenheimer has admitted that it is, to
put it mildly, an uninspiring store of wealth.
It is true that Mr Nicholas Oppenheimer's annual Amgold homily finds some
comfort in the stability of the Dollars 350 floor. This is about the level
where mines would close in large numbers, so the resistance does suggest
that hoarded bars are still quite stably held.
He also claims that producers have sold forward so heavily in every recent
rally that they have no production left to mortgage. But this thought is
hardly newly minted, as he implicitly admits when he falls back on the
obvious: get people to wear more.
Easier said than done. Some mines are already finding that the Dollars
2-an-ounce promotion levy is more than their margins will bear, and the rest
are split between a high-class De Beers approach and something nearer the
Gerald Ratner style. De Beers achieves class, but Ratner moves the tonnage -
sometimes in throwaway form, the miner's real dream.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-613</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / The Lex Column: EC insurance
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
UK insurers should sit up. The buzz from Brussels is that the long dormant
insurance accounts directive is poised for adoption by the EC council of
ministers next month. This seemingly obscure bit of legislation will
harmonise requirements for technical reserves and set common rules for
valuing assets and liabilities.
Not for the first time in EC matters the British are staging a belated
rearguard fight. The main grouse is that unrealised investment gains on
non-life business will not be allowed through the profit and loss account.
The Pru and Eagle Star do this at the moment, for example, though smoothed
over a longish period.
Another clause going down badly in London is a demand for detailed segment
information. Companies say they are happy to provide this to national
authorities but not to their competitors.
Last-minute lobbying on these points may or may not succeed. More important
is the fact that the Germans look like winning their battle to avoid any
mention of the market value of assets. This issue gets close to the heart of
the problem - different tax treatment - which the EC is signally failing to
tackle. German companies have no wish to draw attention to their
much-criticised privileges, notably the conservative reserving which enables
the likes of Allianz and Munich Re to understate their profits.
It is the financial firepower they have built up on the strength of this
which spells trouble for the UK insurers after 1992.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-614</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / The Lex Column: Sears
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Sears is one of those British companies that specialises in the management
of decline. Some parts of the business - such as sports clothing,
continental retailing, the Selfridges catalogue - are growing. But much of
the management's time is spent shrinking Charles Clore's shoe-shop legacy as
tidily as possible.
Last year, tidiness was not enough. UK shoe profits probably fell by more
than half and menswear, the other problem sector, incurred a loss.
Meanwhile, the company's ability to make money from property is suffering: a
quarter of the drop in pre-tax profit came from lower disposal surpluses.
The strength of the property portfolio shows up, however, in an unchanged
valuation. That reflects the helpful cushion of an undervalued Selfridges;
but it also reflects the solidity of all those shop-fronts.
In the longer term, however, a giant question mark over the future of high
street shopping lessens the stock's appeal as an asset play, weakened
further by the imminent ERM-induced slowdown in inflation.
Sears itself thinks the high street, gravely threatened only a year or so
ago, has been reprieved by the way the recession has choked off out-of-town
developments. Just as well. With its lure as an income stock threatened by
some heavy hints about dividend policy, and no sign yet of an upturn in
business, the share price needs all the help it can get.
If there are any potential bidders left, they need not worry that the
first-quarter rally has priced Sears out of reach. It is still only 18 per
cent up on its five-year low, touched last autumn; the FT-SE has risen half
as far again.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16 Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-615</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / The Lex Column: The block in BP's profits pipeline
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FT-SE Index: 2,541.8 (+18.4)
For an FT-SE company handsomely to beat profit expectations is quite
something; the disappointment for the market is that it was BP. The oil
sector has scarcely been a model of earnings stability, after all. BP
managed to avoid booking a novel pre-tax historic cost loss in the first
quarter, but only just.
Had the Pounds 4m corporate charge been more typical and had chemicals not
benefited from a marked fall in feedstock prices, the picture would have
been more as expected. It would have been misleading just the same.
In fact, BP's underlying performance was impressive, thanks mainly to its
downstream operations. The boost from refining margins augurs extremely well
for Shell's results next week. The rest of the year will be much tougher -
margins have since narrowed to more normal levels. And the lower corporate
charge might not be repeatable.
The finance division may have produced a timely contribution from its
currency activities, but presumably this could just as easily have gone the
other way. By the same token, chemicals are not showing any signs of the
overdue cyclical recovery.
BP will be strongly cash negative until it can make some disposals, while
its recent discoveries will take a few years to produce a return. The
optimistic view is that it is simply borrowing to finance its expansion
through the decade.
This year's dividend might be uncovered or barely covered, but the shares
are on a hefty 34 per cent yield premium to the market, which seems ample
compensation for the risks. With the oil market still settling after the
Gulf war, though, cautious investors will prefer Shell or want to stay out
of oil shares altogether.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-616</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / The most taxing question
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOE ROGALY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
When the choice before the voters is paying less tax or financing a larger
public sector, less tax wins every time. Or does it? The opinion poll answer
is that most people would rather have better services than tax cuts. The
standard Conservative response is that human nature is not like that - in
the privacy of the voting booth people will forget the pious lies they told
the pollsters and vote for lower taxes.
The argument has been placed before us, fair and square, by the Labour party
this week. It is the current focus of the opposition's relentless,
24-hours-a-day election campaign. It is probably the most pertinent question
about fiscal policy that can be asked of a democratic electorate in which
all the main parties are sitting one or two infinitesimal degrees to the
left or right of centre.
On Wednesday Mr Neil Kinnock, the Labour leader, used one of his current
series of set-piece lectures (designed to establish him as a serious person,
of prime ministerial calibre) to proclaim that 'available revenues should be
used for health and other essential services, not for tax cuts'. Reductions
in the standard rate of income tax from 25 per cent to 20 per cent would,
over the lifetime of a government, mean a Pounds 30bn loss of revenue. In
the same period, maintaining the real value of tax allowances and not
cutting tax rates would generate Pounds 20bn of revenue, assuming a 2 1/2
per cent rate of growth of the economy.
The figures are not incompatible: they both serve merely to illustrate the
same rather obvious point. If you keep the rate of tax constant, and it is
not too high to stifle enterprise, economic growth will see to it that you
get more revenue.
Purists insist that this is merely a sneaky way of raising taxes; they want
fiscal drag to come out of the closet. Yet all is revealed in the red book
that accompanied this year's Budget statement by Mr Norman Lamont, the
chancellor of the exchequer. That assumes negative growth in 1991-92 and 3
to 3 1/4 per cent growth in the following three years. Say there is no
change in tax rates, but that allowances, thresholds and duties are indexed.
Then general government receipts, excluding North Sea oil revenues, increase
from Pounds 225bn in the current financial year to Pounds 279bn in 1994-95.
The figures take no account of probable inflation, but neither do Labour's.
This extra cash is more than covered by projected spending. So Labour's
promise to reduce the 'underfunding' of the health and education services is
in theory already met in existing Treasury forward plans. You can see it all
in Table 2A. 3 of the red book. The actual numbers are certain to be wildly
wrong, since they have been prepared by the Treasury, whose forecasts would
be better if they were based upon readings of the entrails of chickens. But
the principle remains the same. Whichever party forms the next government
will have the same amount of money to spend for a given rate of growth,
unless it either cuts taxes, in which case it may have less, or raises them,
in which case it may have more.
So Mr Kinnock does have a point. If the Conservatives reduce the standard
rate to 20p there will probably be less revenue and less to spend. I say
'probably' because cuts in higher rates of taxation have resulted in a
higher overall yield, but this equation may not apply at the lower levels.
The Dollars 64bn question is, would the growth rate be as high under Labour
as under the Tories? Labour cannot win the argument if the debate goes in
that direction, as a suddenly combative prime minister made clear in the
Commons yesterday. It is, in Mr John Major's phrase, a 'sheer wish fantasy',
to assume that the public will believe that Labour has the better chance of
stimulating growth. Meanwhile the opposition is hammering away at its
campaign to rubbish the Tory promise to cut direct taxation.
It may be making headway. Mr Lamont put no timetable on his 20p target in
his recent speech to the Adam Smith Institute. 'A 20p basic rate remains our
firm objective for the medium term,' he said. Nowadays his thinking
stretches over two parliaments rather than one. Labour is quick to pick up
such nuances. The shadow chancellor, Mr John Smith, has lighted on a
statement by Mr Major, that the tax cut is a 'primary objective' and, canny
Scottish brief that he is, he rubs the phrase home.
The government could be in trouble if people started to believe Labour's
promises to put more money into health and education without increasing the
basic rate of income tax. 'No change' sounds less painful than 'more
taxation'. The Conservatives may have their own solution. They could
increase indirect taxation. My guess is that they would start to whittle
income tax down but raise VAT, this time to 20 per cent. I haven't asked any
of them about this because such a question invites the answer no.
Of course under Labour the effective top rate would go to 59 per cent, as
already announced, but that is supposed to pay for Mr Kinnock's undertaking
to shell out more for child benefit and state pensions. Maybe 59 per cent
sounds terrible, but the Tories' top rate was 60 per cent until April 5
1988. So as the public auction proceeds, Mr Lamont could be obliged to
qualify the 20p commitment.
He is, however, in no hurry to do so. The chancellor is looking as relaxed
as a man of his occasionally lugubrious temperament can; perhaps he really
does see a recovery on the way. He is aware that the striking fall in the
headline inflation rate due to be announced next Friday may be overshadowed
by a less impressive figure for the underlying rate, but would argue that,
after a suitable lag, the drop in headline inflation will have its effect on
wage settlements. Will the true Tory fight-back begin then?
I wonder. There is no set of Conservative ideas, or none that I am aware of,
to put before the voters. It is not difficult to deride Labour's voluminous
proposals as a plateful of warmed-up quangos, and quite easy to demonstrate
that a great many of Mr Kinnock's promises could not be financed by his
proposed taxation strategy, even now. But at least Labour has fresh-looking
centrist policies to offer. The Conservatives are banking on a series of
good-news announcements, a popular prime minister, and a general impression
that there was a change of government last November. Their proposed
'citizen's charter', promising to hold public bodies accountable for good
service, differs little from what is likely to feature in the Labour and
Liberal Democrat manifestos.
Here is a piece of free advice for Mr Major: talk to your chancellor. I
fancy that he has dreams, perhaps not unlike your own, of the day when a
system of tax credits and a negative income tax might support or replace the
present cumbersome social security structure. I suspect that these are
stimulated more by what my colleague Mr Samuel Brittan writes than by the
'citizen's income' proposed by the Liberal Democrats. It certainly has
nothing in common with Labour's minimum wage.
Dreams need working up into practical policies, and I am sure that the
careful Mr Lamont has no intention of putting his mind to the tricky matter
of unifying the tax and social security systems until the election is safely
out of the way. He would no doubt move at a prudent pace even then. Any
worthwhile scheme is sure to cost more than the present arrangements. Yet
there is - is there not? - a potential manifesto proposal in all this that
could regain the initiative from the wily firm of Kinnock and Smith. Merely
dissociating the party from the unpopular elements of Thatcherism is not a
sufficient condition for Tory victory.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15 Illustration (Omitted). Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-617</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / A spreading saffron sea: The rise of Hindu revivalism in the
run-up to India's general election
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID HOUSEGO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
As welcoming garlands of marigolds are placed around his neck, he looks -
with his smiling, smooth-skinned face and balding head - the very symbol of
benign, avuncular rule. At this small town meeting at Panna in the central
Indian province of Madhya Pradesh, the message of Mr L K Advani, leader of
the Hindu revivalist Bharatiya Janata Party (BJP), is the same one that he
has been carrying across India.
In previous elections, Mr Advani tells his audience, the party sought votes
merely to increase its political bargaining power. But in the coming general
election - polling takes place May 20-26 - every vote is critical because
the BJP is now within reach of helping to form the next government.
The rapid growth of Hindu revivalism has been the main phenomenon of Indian
politics over the past two years; it is a dominant election issue in many
parts of the country. In the 1984 general election, the BJP won only two
seats in the lower house; today it is challenging Congress to become the
largest single party in the next parliament.
The BJP is the only party still gaining ground in the run-up to the election
 -spreading a sea of saffron (the Hindu colour) as it makes inroads into its
political opponents' key states, such as Uttar Pradesh in the north and
Gujarat in the west.
Mr Advani hopes to keep the momentum going. But many Indians view with alarm
the prospect of a Hindu rashtra - a government dominated by the revivalist
movement, which could spark a confrontation with Moslems.
An experienced parliamentarian known for his courtesy, Mr Advani, 63, is a
reassuring voice for a Hindu community that feels unnerved by a sense of
national failure. He offers an appealing vision of resurgent nationalism to
people weakened by caste and regional conflicts, threatened by the
assertiveness of India's 100m Moslems - some 12 per cent of the population -
and disgusted by the corruption of political life.
While Mr Advani applies soothing words, he allows his radical followers to
use the cruder language of religious hatred. 'Moslems are like a lemon
dropped into cream. They turn it sour,' Sadhvi Ritambhara, a Hindu preacher,
and member of the Vishwa Hindu Parishad, a sister organisation of the BJP,
tells her audiences. 'What do we do with the lemon?' she asks. 'We cut it
up, squeeze out the pips and throw them away.'
Hindu-Moslem riots over the past year - most stemming from the controversy
over plans by Hindu militants to build a temple at Ayodhya on the site of an
existing mosque - have been the worst since independence in 1947, resulting
in the death of more than 2,000 people. The BJP is using the Ayodhya affair
as the main plank in its election campaign.
Although the BJP will fall well short of obtaining a majority of seats in
the new parliament, it could double its existing strength to about 150 seats
 -thus giving it a powerful role in a divided lower house and leaving it
well-positioned to take power at a later date.
The Hindu revivalists' success could also increase the leverage on other
parties, such as the Congress, to bow to BJP pressure over the 'privileged'
treatment of Moslems. India's secular tradition could thus be under threat.
'We are living in times which may witness secularism in its last throes,'
says Professor S Gopal, a distinguished historian.
The BJP seems to have benefited from the unexpected coalescence of four main
factors that have their roots in the competition for scare resources in a
country with a huge population.
First, there is growing Hindu hostility towards Moslems. Moslems are seen to
be more loyal to Islam than to India, refusing to be assimilated, and
insisting on their own cultural identity. 'The ghetto mentality has gripped
the Moslem masses,' says Mr Gobind Acharya, the BJP secretary-general.
Many Hindus have never forgiven Moslems for dividing the Indian subcontinent
at the time of independence to form the state of Pakistan. Jawaharlal Nehru,
India's first prime minister, believed that to remove the fears of the
Moslem minority that remained, and to achieve a secular state in which the
communities lived in harmony, a policy of positive discrimination towards
Moslems was necessary.
Forty years on such concessions - allowing Moslems their own marriage law
and their own educational institutions, plus special status for the
Moslem-dominated state of Kashmir, - are seen by the BJP as 'pampering
Moslems' and being part of a policy of 'pseudo-secularism' that makes Hindus
'second-class citizens in their own country'.
Second, the BJP has benefited from a backlash among the upper castes against
former Prime Minister V P Singh's programme of job reservation in central
government for the lower castes. This caused widespread violence and
unwittingly launched a caste war. In contrast, the BJP's appeal to Hindu
unity has struck a sympathetic chord with Brahmins and other upper castes
who would be most hit by the programme.
Third, the BJP with its populist ideology of national reconstruction is seen
to have filled a vacuum left by the intellectual bankruptcy of the Congress
party and the collapse of marxism in India. Finally, the BJP appeals to
voters disenchanted by politicians and the corruption of political life. As
a party laying claim to ideals of national resurgence, the BJP has a
relatively clean reputation.
As Hindu revivalism has spread, so it has drawn recruits from castes,
classes and regions that once spurned it. Traditionally, its base has been
among the urban poor and trading classes - those most affected by the
strains of modernisation and by Hindu-Moslem tensions.
But of late it has made substantial gains among the wealthier middle and
business classes, in rural areas, in the southern states and even among
Harijans (untouchables), for whom the appeal of the BJP is that it rejects
the doctrine of untouchability.
This growth in support has enabled the party to field a broader choice of
candidates. Mr T N Chatuverdi, the former auditor-general, has been drawn
in, as well as Mr Victor Bannerjee, the actor from the film A Passage to
India.
In previous elections the BJP was forced to ally with other parties. Now, Mr
Advani is convinced that it can make a single-handed bid for power. His
decision has been backed by the leaders of the Rashtriya Swayamsevak Sangh
(RSS), the militant Hindu organisation that fathered the BJP.
For the first time, the RSS is committing its full strength and that of its
organisations - including youth and labour wings - towards winning an
election. Because these are disciplined movements, they give the BJP an edge
over other looser-organised parties.
India's Moslems have never felt so threatened.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15 Photograph Victory sign, a confident L K Advani, leader of
India's BJP (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-618</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Observer: Donkey work
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Brokers Beeson Gregory have been handed a document by Hungary's
privatisation body, the State Property Agency, in which it proudly announces
it is 'developing a system of management of asses under its control'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-619</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Observer: Costly Polly
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The heroic attempt to save Polly Peck International is fast becoming one of
the most expensive insolvency operations ever mounted.
In the first six months alone, the exercise has cost the group's creditors
Pounds 5.5m. It is money they can ill afford to lose, given the gloomiest
forecasts that they might end up seeing only about Pounds 230m of their
Pounds 1.1bn returned.
Not all of it has gone to the fat cats of the insolvency industry, this time
hailing from Coopers &amp; Lybrand Deloitte, its insolvency arm Cork Gully, and
Touche Ross. About Pounds 2.5m has been soaked up in legal and professional
fees (much of it to fight a complex legal battle in northern Cyprus). Much
more will have gone on the aeroplane tickets and hotel bills needed to keep
teams of accountants and lawyers busily buzzing around the world.
There is still some way to go to overtake the Pounds 15m running tally on
the year-old insolvency saga at British &amp; Commonwealth. But B&amp;C's
administrators over at Ernst &amp; Young have at least realised some Pounds 400m
for creditors. Urbane, ubiquitous Michael Jordan at Cork Gully is telling
Polly Peck's creditors they will have to wait years for any substantial
returns.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-620</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Observer: Sospan fach
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Like all ITV companies, the Welsh HTV sees its future on the line next
Wednesday - the limit for new franchise bids. If it puts the wrong number in
its envelope, then Nos Da]
One of the main architects of this bizarre way of awarding broadcasting
licences was Professor Brian Griffiths, head of Thatcher's Downing Street
policy unit.
So how saucy of him to turn up - in his new guise of Lord Griffiths of
Fforestfach - on HTV Wales's board. If his stay is unusually short, he has
only himself to blame.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-621</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Observer: Polished off
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Meanwhile the name Mitsui is to disappear from Japanese banking, 308 years
after the Mitsui family opened its first exchange house. Mitsui Taiyo Kobe
Bank, formed last year from a merger of the Mitsui and Taiyo Kobe
institutions, is to retitle itself Sakura - or Cherry Blossom - Bank.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-622</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Observer: Under cover
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
What lesson might be drawn from linking a Pounds 750,000 gift to Cambridge
University by Mitsui Marine and Fire Insurance yesterday, with Japanese
banks' worldwide expansion in the early 1980s?
The answer is that the international financial markets may soon be
undergoing the same sort of onslaught from hitherto domestically centred
Japanese insurance giants.
Mitsui's gift is a complete set of microfilmed publications of the 1868-1912
Meiji period, giving the university the biggest collection of Meiji papers
in Europe. But why Mitsui's generosity?
Takeru Ishikawa, its chairman, concedes that, while the gift marks his
company's change of name from Taisho Marine and Fire, that fact alone
conceals the intention behind the name-change. It's a marketing move to
heighten the company's identity, not least abroad where it is seeking to
broaden its business beyond its existing base in overseas-operating Japanese
companies.
Will more of its domestic counterparts follow Mitsui into the world arena?
Surely, says Ishikawa, although it doesn't necessarily mean renewed downward
pressure on already depressed international insurance premium rates. That
will depend, for instance, on whether a continued withdrawal of US insurers
helps to stabilise premiums.
Even so, considering what the Japanese banks did to banking margins when
they set out building market share, it's hard to be optimistic.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-623</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Observer: Talking point
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A new party game in Ireland is suggesting venues that might break the
deadlock on the second strand of the talks on north-south relations. The
Irish government wants them to be held somewhere in Ireland itself.
Unionists, against travelling to the south while the 'foreign' government
has a constitutional claim over the north, want the Dublin government to
cross to their capital - London.
More serious compromises dreamed up so far include the Isle of Man. More
imaginative are a video conference so neither side need leave home ground,
and a circling aircraft.
My pick is a hot air balloon.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-624</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Observer: Maggie landings
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Fanciful suggestions that Margaret Thatcher could soon wing in to take
control of BAA have caused chuckles on the organisation's flight deck.
The top brass of the former British Airports Authority - still sensitive to
accusations that it commands one of the cosier, privatised mono- polies left
in the erstwhile prime minister's airstream - sees the idea as a huge joke.
But someone will have to step in as chairman when Sir Norman Payne, a
brusque but affable 70, retires before long. After 14 years, his departure
time is expected to be confirmed at the BAA annual meeting in July and head-
hunters are on the prowl.
The new team will face some weighty challenges, not least of which will be
the fall-out from the first Monopolies and Mergers Commission review since
BAA was privatised. It is due to be completed next month. There are also
plans for a 15-year, Pounds 1bn airport investment programme.
With Payne gone, day-to-day running of the business will be taken over by
Sir John Egan, the former Jaguar man brought in last year as chief
executive. Originally Egan was expected to assume Payne's all-powerful
mantle, but BAA has decided to revert to the tradition of a part-time,
non-executive chairman.
So Payne's replacement, whoever he or she is, will not be expected to play a
hands-on role. Can anyone seriously imagine Captain Thatcher keeping her
fingers off the joystick?
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-625</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Leading Article: Time to move on the Rock
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Felipe Gonzalez, the Spanish prime minister, was right when, during a
visit to London this week, he described Britain's only remaining colony in
Europe, Gibraltar, as an anachronism. That judgment is all the more true
since the centuries-old dispute about sovereignty over the Rock is now the
only real obstacle to a genuine improvement in relations between two
countries which, in nearly every other field, are daily drawing closer.
Britain's stewardship could once be justified by the argument that it was
protecting the Rock's 25,000 inhabitants against the dictatorship of General
Franco. However, now that Spain has become a democracy and both Britain and
Spain are partners within the European Community, colonial disputes harking
back to the War of the Spanish Succession are both irrelevant and
embarrassing.
Irrelevant, but for one important proviso. Britain would find little
difficulty in divesting itself of its troublesome heritage, if it had not
given a number of firm political assurances to Gibraltar. The 1713 Treaty of
Utrecht, which gave Britain sovereignty over Gibraltar, stated that if this
sovereignty were ever to be transferred by London, Spain would have first
refusal.
Yet two and a half centuries later, Britain promised in the preamble to
Gibraltar's 1969 constitution that it would never agree to any transfer of
sovereignty against the 'freely and democratically expressed wishes' of the
people of Gibraltar.
Commitment reiterated
Though Britain and Spain have since agreed that the issue of sovereignty
could be raised in annual discussions between them, the British commitment
to the people of the Rock has been reiterated regularly. Unfortunately, it
has also been used by the British government as a pretext for
soft-pedalling. London has even turned a blind eye to Gibraltar's blockage
of a four-year-old agreement between Britain and Spain on the joint use of
the Rock's airport. Indeed, Mr Gonzalez clearly touched a sore point when he
said in an interview with this newspaper that for the British, discussions
with Spain about Gibraltar are like an annual visit to the dentist, while
for Spain it was like a permanent stone in its shoe. Small as it is, the
Rock, which is linked to Spain by an isthmus, is understandably regarded by
Spaniards as part of their country.
Growing irritation
If anything, Spain's irritation has been growing recently because it
considers that the Gibraltarians want to have their cake and eat it; to take
advantage both of their special fiscal regime within the European Community
and their right to freedom of movement and establishment in Spain. The
Rock's rapid development as an offshore financial centre has led to Spanish
accusations that it is becoming a haven for tax dodgers and money
launderers. Thanks largely to tax exemptions, Gibraltar has become the
largest single source of investment in Spanish real estate, with a large
number of Gibraltarians either living or owning property in Spain.
Mr Gonzalez is not asking for the moon. He knows that no quick solutions are
possible and that only a gradual evolution of public opinion in Gibraltar
can lead its people to have a change of heart. Nor is he insisting on an
immediate all-or-nothing solution. A number of intermediate schemes have
been proposed by Madrid, ranging from a British-Spanish condominium over
Gibraltar to a lease-back system on the Hong Kong model. In all cases, Spain
is prepared to accept a large measure of autonomy for the Rock.
Without going into the merits of these alternative schemes, it is
nevertheless reasonable to expect the British government to make a bigger
effort than it has done to work out a step-by-step approach which will
satisfy Spain. Certainly, the desires of the Gibraltarians have to be taken
into account, but not only their wishes. At stake too, are the interests of
Britain and Spain, which cannot allow their bilateral relations either to
stagnate or deteriorate while they are both deeply involved in achieving
greater European unity.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-626</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Fast-track at the end of the line: A vital US congressional
vote which could determine the fate of the Uruguay Round of trade talks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MONTAGNON and NANCY DUNNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Soon - at the latest by the end of the month and probably sooner - the army
of trade negotiators who have been struggling to complete the Uruguay Round
of multilateral trade negotiations in Geneva will know whether their
four-and-a-half-year effort has been a total waste of time.
The US Congress is gearing up to vote on a two-year extension of the
administration's 'fast-track' authority to negotiate trade agreements.
Without that authority the administration's hands would be effectively tied,
and there would be no hope of completing the Uruguay Round, which has been
limping along since the Brussels trade ministerial meeting in December broke
up in deadlock.
As the deadline draws near amid some of the most ferocious lobbying Capitol
Hill has ever seen, most political pundits in Washington believe the
extension will be narrowly granted. But it will be far from a categoric
victory for supporters of free multilateral trade and an uncertain reprieve
for the most ambitious attempt to reform the world trading system since the
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (Gatt) was founded in 1947.
Under the fast-track rule, Congress agrees to refrain from amending any
trade agreements struck by the administration when implementing legislation
is brought to Capitol Hill. Instead of picking holes in the agreement and
discarding clauses that it does not like, it is committed simply to voting
the whole package in or out on the basis of a single vote.
It is thus a way of making sure that concessions granted by the US in trade
talks actually stick. Without the fast-track authority, the 100 or so other
countries who are involved in the Uruguay Round would not regard Washington
as a reliable negotiating partner and would refuse to bargain. So important
is the authority to Mrs Carla Hills, US trade representative, that she has
abstained from all foreign travel until the congressional vote is through.
Obsessed though Uruguay Round negotiators have become with the fast-track,
the debate in Washington has, however, had little to do with the Gatt.
Instead the focus has been almost exclusively on parallel plans for the US
to negotiate a free trade pact with Mexico for which the administration says
fast-track authority is also vital. Even in this context, the discussion in
Congress has had less to do with trade per se than with a panoply of other
issues such as jobs, the environment and investment.
With hindsight, it is not surprising that Mexico has assumed the importance
that it has. Unless their livelihood is in textiles or farming, most
Americans have only a vague idea of what the Gatt and the Uruguay Round are
all about, but they are all too acutely aware of what the proposed deal with
Mexico could mean.
It has sparked worries about the diversion of investment to plants south of
the border where labour costs are a seventh of those in the US, about
workers' rights there, and about environmental protection since Mexico's
laws are laxer than those of the US. Some say the AFL-CIO trade union
federation has exploited these worries to try to make the fast-track vote a
test of attitudes to organised labour. Congressmen are worried that if they
vote for extension, they may lose union financial support.
Overlaying the debate are the traditional concerns of domestic US politics -
the worry of northern smoke-stack states that they may lose their economic
clout, and the desire of Congress to assert itself over President George
Bush, with whom the Mexican agreement is closely identified.
Mr Niel Ritchie of the Institute for Agriculture and Trade Policy, a leading
player of the lobby opposing fast-track, wants to convince Democrats that it
is smart politics to 'stop playing footsie with Bush' and take control over
the negotiating process. The Mexican pact is unpopular because 'people in
the US don't want the government doing deals under the cloak of darkness.
For solutions to be politically workable they have to be made by the people
they affect'.
It is on issues such as these, rather than the actual state of play in the
Geneva negotiations, that the fast-track vote, and thus the immediate fate
of the Uruguay Round now depends. There are few clues offered by the debate
so far to US attitudes towards the Gatt itself.
Only since May 1, when the administration released an action plan containing
concessions on environmental and job issues, has the tide begun to swing in
the administration's favour.
'We've stopped the momentum of opposition and rolled it back. We're moving
ahead, but we're not yet winning,' says Mr Harry Freeman of the MTN
Coalition, a big business group which supports both the Uruguay Round and
the Mexican plan.
Administration officials believe the Senate would agree to an extension of
fast-track, but the vote is much closer in the House of Representatives -
and either can reject the extension request by a simple majority. Both Mr
Dan Rostenkowski, chairman of the House ways and means committee, and Mr
Lloyd Bentsen, chairman of the Senate finance committee, whose support is
vital, are in favour of extension. Mr Richard Gephardt, the House Democratic
majority leader and a supporter of unilateralist trade policy, yesterday
gave conditional support to the fast-track request, but warned 'if the
administration . . . trades away American jobs or tolerates pollution or
abuse of workers, we can and we will amend (the final agreement) or reject
it'.
Adding to the complexity are compromise proposals in both houses, which
would split the fast-track vote and allow the Uruguay Round to go ahead but
permit amendments on the Mexican agreement in a few important areas:
environment, rules of origin, health and safety standards, and dispute
settlement. The opponents of the Gatt - mostly farm groups and textile
interests - are trying to prevent a split because they know the Mexico pact
is more controversial.
The compromise, proposed by Senator Donald Riegle and Congressman Sander
Levin, both from Michigan, has appeal to the undecided. It will be difficult
to get through the Senate, but stands more chance in the House.
Mr Levin argues that the May 1 action plan is 'responsive but inadequate'.
He says: 'With Gatt you have 100-plus nations and you don't have integration
of economies. Here you have integration and negotiation with one nation so
you have a much higher objective and some added issues and risks. Because of
the disparities in the economies of Mexico and the US, there are major unmet
concerns ly.
'If they fail, we are left with weighing steel and autos with tomatoes. I
don't want to be put in that position. Congress needs a significant role
where you have significant problems. Being consulted is not enough.'
The decision by the AFL-CIO to focus the debate on Mexico has muddied the
waters by providing cover for congressmen whose instinct may be
protectionist but who are reluctant to speak out against free trade. The
AFL-CIO's concern, though, is not primarily with the Gatt.
Even if it loses the fast-track debate, labour will have won a victory of
sorts, says Mr Mark Anderson, AFL-CIO international economist, because the
terms of the debate have changed. Environment, labour rights, wage rate
disparities and job losses have been put on the agenda.
'Before these issues were being studiously ignored and, indeed, rejected by
the Bush administration. Now the issue is whether or not they will be
addressed in a useful fashion. Instead of spouting simplistic free-trade or
protectionist rhetoric, the coalition made trade issues as complicated as
they really are in real life.'
None the less, many in the pro-Gatt lobby believe the Uruguay Round has
gained by default, through being largely left out of the debate. While
politicians can satisfy one side of their constituency by admitting to
doubts over Mexico, they can refrain from offending their liberal supporters
by indicating support in principle for the Gatt. 'Compared with the Mexican
agreement, the Uruguay Round has come up smelling like a rose,' says Mr
Jeffrey Schott of the Washington-based Institute for International
Economics.
The danger, if a fast-track extension is agreed, is that this sentiment will
lead to over-confidence in Geneva about what sort of Uruguay Round agreement
would pass through Congress at the end of the day. 'The Uruguay Round is
not, at this time at least, very controversial,' says Mr Hal Malmgren, a US
trade consultant.
'The opposing forces who are interested in not having too much trade
liberalisation seem to have decided to narrow the focus to just Mexico. That
does not, however, mean that, later, an agreement in the Uruguay Round will
meet an enthusiastic reception.'
Pressure is growing in Geneva for the Round to be completed before the end
of the year so that the implementing legislation can be laid before Congress
before the 1992 presidential election campaign gets under way. With Europe
still reluctant to offer substantial new concessions on farm reform, some
trade diplomats believe that the heat will be turned on the US in an effort
to persuade it to scale down its ambitions in this sector.
This school of thought is encouraged by hints that the new US secretary of
agriculture, Mr Ed Madigan, is more conciliatory than his predecessor, Mr
Clayton Yeutter, towards Brussels on farm reform. Yet trade insiders in
Washington warn that the overall package will still have to contain a
critical mass of benefits for Congress to pass the deal. Almost certainly
this will have to include a strong package of farm reforms, not least
because, without that, other countries, notably farm exporting nations in
Latin America, will decline to deliver vital concessions on liberalising
trade in services.
Even while the fast-track debate has been raging, however, the forces for
unilateralism in US trade policy have been gathering pace. Car makers, led
by Mr Lee Iacocca of Chrysler, have sought protection against Japanese
competition, The US semiconductor industry has complained about Japan
withholding access to new technology, the aerospace sector has been lobbying
for an intensification of the dispute over Airbus subsidies, and Mrs Hills
has lodged new complaints against Japan on construction and against China on
intellectual property.
It is against this backdrop that any Uruguay Round agreement will be viewed.
One frequently-voiced argument in Washington is that the bilateral issues
which divide the US are largely outside the scope of the Gatt, but the
Uruguay Round is intended to bring some of them, such as services and
intellectual property, into its fold, and thereby restrain the US
determination to go-it-alone in sorting out its commercial problems.
According to Mr Bill Archey, head of trade policy at the US Chamber of
Commerce, the fast-track debate underlines the way in which Congress is
determined to take a strong role in trade matters. Having passed the 1988
Trade Act, US politicians turned their attention to other matters and gave
Mrs Hills very much a free hand. Now their are anxious once again to rein in
the administration.
This is not died-in-the-wool protectionism, Washington trade experts say,
but more a concern about competitiveness and ensuring that overseas markets
are opened up. In this context the US is coming to recognise that it is no
longer strong enough to hold the multilateral trading system together by
making the most concessions. There must be an offsetting gain for everything
it gives away.
So Congress is still likely to scrutinise any final Uruguay Round agreement
more closely than ever before and the administration will not be able to
push through concessions 'unless,' as Mr Archey says, 'they beget something
tangible for business.' That still looks like being the subject of another
contentious debate.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14 Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-627</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / The Property Market: A contrast in measurement
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AT THE risk of confirming Mark Twain's jibe about lies, damn lies and
statistics, Hillier Parker, the chartered surveyor, has come up with some
figures which suggest that property did not under-perform equities during
the 1980s, after all, writes Vanessa Houlder.
The market deluded itself, it says, by contrasting equities, which use
geared capital, with property that has no gearing. 'One is therefore
comparing apples with oranges,' it says
'We believe that the perceived problem of under-performance of property only
really arises from the different implicit financial structuring of the total
return indices for property and equities,' says Mr Alan Patterson, author of
the report.
To make his point, he adjusted the performance of a property index to
include a hypothetical debt component. The result is that the returns
achieved by property over a 10-year period are almost identical to those of
equities. (If, however, the chart had been brought up to date, equities
would be well in the lead).
Hillier Parker has chosen a level of gearing well above that of equities for
this exercise, on the grounds that each form of investment is geared to its
appropriate level. The property gearing ranged between 40 per cent and 45
per cent, so the investment income should service the current income
payments, compared with equities' gearing of between 30 and 40 per cent.
Hillier Parker claims that this method is no more an artificial contrivance
than constructing an index assuming 100 per cent equity capital. The
difference, however, is that institutions show no inclination to gear up
their property holdings. So it seems that the traditional way of comparing
equities and gilts has more validity where they are concerned.
Investors could interpret the results as making a case for introducing
gearing to a property portfolio. The disadvantage is that this destroys a
key traditional virtue of property, which is its lower volatility compared
with equities. A more surprising conclusion is that the counter-cylical
nature of property and equities actually increases when the property is
geared.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12 Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-628</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / The Property Market: Valuation values come in for scrutiny
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A SURVEYOR, it seems, is someone who knows the price of everything and the
value of nothing. As property companies see their balance sheets crumble,
they are arguing that the valuers' reliance on market evidence ignores the
true worth of their portfolios.
Critics say the pitifully low turnover levels this year consist largely of
forced sales and are thus a misleading guide to the remainder of the market.
'In the past, valuers may have overvalued,' says Sir Nigel Mobbs, of Slough
Estates, 'and the pendulum has now swung rather too far the other way.'
Disillusioned investors want changes to the philosophy underpinning
valuations.
Donald Gordon, chairman of Capital &amp; Counties, is sceptical about the
current 'open market' basis of valuation. 'There is no justification for
using, as the prime measure of performance, a system which produces such
volatility as we have seen in recent years in the values ascribed to
long-term property investments - values based essentially on short-term
perceptions and interpretations of prevailing economic mood, sentiment and
the interest rate cycles at random balance sheet dates,' he says.
Instead, he would like investment property to be assessed in terms of
expected earnings, discounted using a 'pragmatic' rate of return related to
a more stable weighted average.
His complaint has stirred controversy and exposed Capital &amp; Counties to the
criticism that, following a 13 per cent fall in its investment portfolio in
1990, it is simply making excuses for a poor year.
Even those who sympathise with CapCo's argument are shy of advocating a
switch away from a market-based valuation system in precisely the year when
the property market has collapsed. 'The property business didn't scream when
values were high,' says Mr John Parry, managing director of Hammerson. 'I
have felt for some years that it should be changed but this is not the time
for it to be changed. It should be changed when times are good.'
Not all advocates of change, however, risk the accusation that they want to
flatter their own balance sheets. Mr Nick French, a lecturer in land
management at Reading University, is an enthusiastic proponent of property
valuation using discounted cash flow methods.
Instead of relying uncritically on market evidence, he believes valuers
should be asking: 'Is it realistic? Shouldn't we be looking at other
scenarios?' he says.
Mr French also argues that the adoption of discounted cash flow techniques
would make it easier to compare the performance of property with those of
equities and gilts. As a result, it might help property win a larger share
of institutional money.
Argument about valuation principles is hardly novel. Discounted cash flow
methods were the norm before 1960 when the ravages of inflation and the
uncertainties of rent reviews forced a change.
There was debate after the collapse of the property market in 1973, which
was the catalyst for serious criticism of valuations. Indeed, bankers' blind
faith in flawed valuations was held partly to blame for the collapse in the
property and secondary banking sectors.
At that time too, property companies balked at the open market method of
valuation. British Land's 1975-6 accounts valued some of its long-term
investment property on its 'current actual and estimated income' because
'the valuers stated that they were unable to assess open market value in
view of the unlikelihood that the property could be sold at a price
reflecting true worth.'
This type of argument provokes unease from those who think the market,
however quirky and volatile, is the only true judge of value. 'At the end of
the day, the value of the property is what someone will pay for it. You can
not get away from that,' says Andrew Cherry, who is chairman of the Royal
Institution of Chartered Surveyors assets valuation standards committee.
Indeed, the argument that prices in the property market are irrationally low
risks the accusation of wishful thinking. When erosion of planning controls
has led to unprecedented oversupply, it may be suspect to assume that yields
will remain inside their traditional range. At times like this, judging the
'right' level of yields is so difficult, the market may be the best arbiter.
Defenders of the surveying profession, however, reckon they could - with
greater research - become credible judges of future rental values.
The criticism about valuation methods is just one several strains facing
valuers. The subjective nature of their profession came under intense
scrutiny last November, when a takeover battle revealed that one firm of
valuers believed Scott's Restaurants was worth nearly three times as much as
did a rival firm.
Another sign of pressure is the heavy toll taken on surveyors' professional
indemnity policies, because of alleged over-valuation of property in the
late 1980s bull market.
Nonetheless, the problems should not be exaggerated. The accuracy of
valuations was found to be remarkably high in 1989 when the Investment
Property Databank tested 2,500 valuations against the sale prices they later
achieved.
Admittedly, the test is likely to be less reassuring when it is repeated
this summer. There is plenty of anecdotal evidence that valuers have found
it hard to keep pace with the ferocity of the downturn in the market and the
virtual evaporation of turnover. However, in the exceptionally volatile
market that has exposed these weaknesses, it is unclear whether an
alternative approach to valuations would be much less controversial.
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
CAPITAL GROWTH (%)
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
                      Retail   Office   Industrial   All Properties
Year to March 91      -11.8     -16.4     -11.0          -13.6
Quarter to Mar 91      -2.5      -4.6      -2.4           -3.4
Month of March 91      -1.0      -1.2      -0.7           -1.0
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Investment Property Databank
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-629</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAFAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Parliament and Politics: War Crimes Act receives assent
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE War Crimes Act, the first measure to have been forced through by a
Conservative government by the use of the Parliament Acts after having twice
been rejected by the House of Lords, received the Royal Assent yesterday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-630</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAE9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Parliament and Politics: Kinnock outlines Costa relationship
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Neil Kinnock released a statement outlining his four-year acquaintance
with fashion entrepreneur Mr Charilaos Costa after it emerged that the fraud
squad is investigating
the collapse of the businessman's company, CHS Holdings.
The statement said the Labour leader had met Mr Costa socially on several
occasions and Mr Costa had donated money to Labour during the 1987 election.
No donations had been made to either Mr or Mrs Kinnock personally.
While Mr Kinnock was aware that Mr Costa's company in Islwyn was in the
hands of the official receiver, he was not aware of the concerns of the
fraud squad, nor of any allegations about missing funds until yesterday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-631</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAE8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Parliament and Politics: Ashdown presses PM on disasters
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE prime minister pledged yesterday to seek a better way of coordinating
international relief in disasters like those afflicting Bangladesh and parts
of Africa.
With MPs pressing for a debate on the cyclone in Bangladesh, Mr Major said
he would do what he could to bring about a better system of international
response.
Mr Paddy Ashdown, leader of the Liberal Democrats, protested that while
Britain's leading response to the Bangladesh cyclone was laudable, the
government and the press continued to 'ignore the incalculably greater scale
of the disaster now unfolding in Africa'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-632</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAE7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Parliament and Politics: Major considers plan to improve
public services - Citizens' Charter
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN Major hopes to set out this summer his plans for improving public
services via a 'citizen's charter' which could see the introduction of
performance-related pay for many civil servants, Whitehall officials said
yesterday.
Wide-ranging proposals are being considered by the Downing Street policy
unit following the submission of ideas by government departments. Ideas
include paying compensation to consumers if services  - such as rail travel
 -are un-satisfactory or giving bonuses for improving quality.
The provision of education, health services and state benefits are believed
to be of particular concern to Mr Major. One official said the proposals
were 'in the spirit' of the government's existing health service reforms.
Details of the schemes have yet to be finalised, however, and could be
watered-down before publication. In particular, any proposals for rewarding
high performance teachers could clash with the government decision in April
to set up a independent teachers' pay and conditions review body.
Mr Major, as a former chancellor, is thought to be particularly attracted to
the possible economic benefits of performance related pay.
Labour has proposed similar schemes for enhancing citizen's rights across a
range of public sector services, including the possibility of compensation
for aggrieved consumers.
The government's plans, to be published in a white paper, could also be
extended to include privatised companies, such as British Telecom, which are
subject to the control of regulatory authorities.
Officials denied, however, it was an admission that privatisation had not
improved the service offered by former nationalised industries.
Mr Major offered his 'citizen's charter' to Conservative party activists in
a speech in Southport in March as part of his plans for extending the
policies of his predecessor, Mrs Thatcher.
Officials said yesterday his plans were more than just a likely manifesto
commitment. Legislation could be introduced in the Queens speech this Autumn
if necessary. Mr Major is likely to reiterate his enthusiasm for the scheme
when he addresses the Scottish Tory conference in Perth today.
Many public services are controlled by local authorities. They could be
given incentives, via the system of central government grants, to
re-negotiate contracts with private contractors so as to incorporate rights
of consumers.
The government will also want to be sure any changes to pay contracts of
civil servants will not lead to inordinate increases in public spending. It
may also decide performance measures are too bureaucratic, particularly when
it comes to measuring the output of teachers or health service workers.
One suggestion for council workers, such as refuse collectors, was that
performance could be measured according to complaints received.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-633</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAE6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Parliament and Politics: Wheeling out old stagers and
upstagers - Campaigning in the run up to next week's Monmouth by-election
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Upstaging the chancellor of the exchequer is no mean feat for any
politician. Mr Roger Evans, the Tory candidate in the Monmouth by-election,
managed it easily at his Wednesday morning press conference this week.
Mr Evans' unabashed defence of freedom to choose private health and
education, and his description of socialism as 'founded on robbery' and
'immoral', are colourfully reminiscent of the conviction politics of the
early 1980s. They do not sit so well with a Tory party infused with Mr John
Major's call for a 'classless society.'
His style is articulate and uncompromising, rather than re-assuring. His
doorstep canvassing is of the brisk: 'Can-I-count-on-your-support?
Splendid-pleased-to-have-met-you' variety.
Mr Evans' task is defending the 9,500 Tory majority with which the late Sir
John Stradling Thomas held the largely rural seat on the Welsh border in
1987. The vote this coming Thursday is critical for all three main parties.
A Tory by-election victory would be the first for more than two years, while
for the Liberal Democrats, success would offer the ideal springboard in the
run up to the election.
The minimum for Labour seems to be coming ahead of the Liberal Democrats, to
halt their momentum. In a general election, despite strong Labour areas in
towns such as Chepstow and Abergavenny, Monmouth might well not have been
one of the prime target seats.
The campaign has been dominated by the health service, with Labour making
mileage from claims that two local hospitals are under pressure to go along
the path to self-governing status - 'opting out'.
Like the word 'local' for the Liberal Democrats, 'opt out' has now become
the sine qua non for Labour campaigning. The theme for yesterday's press
conference was transport, but both Mr Huw Edwards, the Labour candidate, and
Mr John Prescott, the shadow transport secretary, referred to the NHS in
their prepared statements. Mr Neil Kinnock, the Labour leader, due in the
constituency today, will also emphasise the issue.
Despite Labour's efforts, the NHS does not - so far - seem likely to be the
sole determinant of the Monmouth result. Unlike recent by-election upsets in
safe Tory seats of Eastbourne and Ribble Valley, there is no equivalent to
Mrs Thatcher's premiership or the poll tax as the issue to focus anger
against the government.
As a result, though there are traditional Tory supporters expressing worries
about hospital wards closing and the lack of housing for young people in
many of the constituency's beautiful villages, they often conclude that they
will still vote Tory rather than not.
The recession and the difficulties facing farmers have, however, produced
some disaffected Tories. The rare sight of Labour posters, as well as
Liberal Democrat signs in some of the fields is evidence of how far the
farming community feels it has been pushed.
The fear for the opposition candidates is that they will cancel each other
out, and split the anti-Tory vote.
Mr Edwards, a Brighton polytechnic lecturer, has seemed more confident
talking to the voters than to the media. Twice, in press conferences earlier
this week, the silence before his answer grew embarrassing, though that may
owe less to his being heavily 'minded' by party officials, than to the fact
that this is his first election.
Mrs Frances David, the Liberal Democrat candidate, seems happiest
concentrating on specific, local issues such as Welsh water prices and the
police station in Monmouth.
With all the three main parties believing that there is still everything to
play for, scores of political heavyweights and hundreds of workers will be
flooding into the constituency over the weekend.
Labour's latest estimate is that Mr Edwards is some 5 or 6 per cent behind
the Tories, while the Liberal Democrats are stuck on their 20 per cent share
of the vote in last week's local elections in the area.
Mr Paddy Ashdown, the Liberal Democrat leader, in the constituency hoping to
light the blue touch paper for a third-party surge, said the contest was
'open' but did not assert that Mrs David was the challenger to Mr Evans.
This side of the weekend the Tory majority looks shaky but not doomed. The
next few days' campaigning will be decisive.
The principal candidates are: Mrs David (LibDem), Mr Edwards (L), Mr Evans
(C), Mr M Witherden (Green/Plaid Cymru).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10 Photograph Road to victory? - Labour's candidate Huw Edwards
takes his message to the streets (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-634</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAE5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Parliament and Politics: Hunt announces NT investment
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr David Hunt, the Welsh secretary, announced that Northern Telecom is to
make a 'large investment' at its telephone equipment plant in Cwmcarn, just
outside the Monmouth constituency, safeguarding 600 jobs. He expressed
'delight' that regional selective assistance had helped produce the project,
though he could not put a figure on the project.
Northern Telecom would not comment on the amount to be spent on the factory,
suggesting that the announcement had been rushed forward. It is believed the
sum will run into tens of millions of pounds and could lead to the creation
of another 200 or so jobs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-635</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAE4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Parliament and Politics: Reform of NHS back on political
centre stage - Health
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVO DAWNAY, Political Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ANGRY exchanges between the prime minister and Mr Neil Kinnock at Commons
question time yesterday brought the government's National Health Service
reforms back to centre stage.
Claiming to have evidence that queue jumping was 'the order of the day', the
Labour leader repeatedly challenged Mr John Major to admit that 'the
clinical needs of patients are coming second to commercial considerations.'
To back his charges, Mr Kinnock quoted from a letter by Dr Kenneth Grant,
district general manager for the City and Hackney Health Authority, to
clinical directors at Bart's hospital on general practitioner fund holders
(GBFHs). 'The reality of GPs holding their own budgets is that 'equity has
gone out of the window',' he said.
Denying the claim, Mr Major referred to another letter to a newspaper from a
Mr Ray Rowden, whom he said was a member of both West Lambeth Health
Authority and the Labour party. He quoted Mr Rowden as offering backing for
the changes in resource allocation and dismissing Labour's support for the
outgoing system as 'spurious.'
'Decisions before were arrived at by those that screamed loudest,' Mr Major
quoted the letter as saying.
Labour believes that, with the two parties level pegging in the national
opinion polls, concern about the impact of the changes could prove a crucial
factor in the coming general election.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-636</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Parliament and Politics: Consultation on car move - National
Insurance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVOR OWEN, Parliamentary Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EMPLOYERS would be consulted before the introduction of new regulations
requiring them to pay national insurance contributions in respect of company
cars provided for employees, Mr Nicholas Scott, minister of state for social
security, assured the Commons last night.
He said the new impost, which also applies to free fuel provided for
employees, would not become payable until June of next year.
MPs gave a general welcome to the Social Security (Contributions) bill
authorising the new charges, which will yield Pounds 550m in respect of
cars, and Pounds 60m in respect of fuel in 1991-92. Mr Scott said it was
estimated that in the current year over 2m employees would receive the
benefit of a company car as part of their remuneration package.
Welcoming the bill, Mr Graham Allen for Labour suggested there was scope for
extending tax charged on the 'company car perk'.
The bill was given an unopposed second reading, and completed all its
stages. It now goes to the House of Lords.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-637</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Parliament and Politics: Lang moves toward a more pragmatic
party - Scottish Conservatives' Conference
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON and PHILIP STEPHENS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR IAN LANG, the Scottish secretary, yesterday attempted to shift the
Scottish Conservative party from its past emphasis on ideology towards a
more practical emphasis on meeting ordinary people's needs.
Mr Lang, a close associate of Mr John Major, the prime minister, told
Scottish Tories at their annual conference in Perth that 'perhaps too often
in the past we have expressed our policies in abstract or ideological terms
when we should have been relating them more clearly to every day issues.'
Echoing Mr Major, he spoke of citizens' rights in the areas of housing,
education, health and the environment.
The party, he said, had its ideals such as belief in the free market, sound
money and a property-owning democracy.
'But we are also the party that cares about quality and excellence and
opportunity. We are the common sense party, the party of good government.'
However the Tories had to demonstrate its care and common sense. 'We must do
more to explain our policies - to consult, to listen, to respond to people's
anxieties.'
Referring to the marked revival in Tory support in Scotland since Mr Major
succeeded Mrs Margaret Thatcher, he said that in the past few months there
had been a 'new buoyancy and vitality and enthusiasm amongst our supporters'
in Scotland.
Mr Major will use his closing address to the Perth conference tonight to
emphasise that a Conservative government under his leadership will satisfy
Scottish aspirations to strengthen their sense of national identity.
Environment secretary Mr Michael Heseltine won a standing ovation from the
conference yesterday, after a wide-ranging speech in which he claimed that
the Tories had proved themselves the only party which could effectively
safeguard the environment.
The enthusiastic if less than warm reception from the conference came after
his prediction that the government was firmly on course for a fourth
election victory.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-638</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Parliament and Politics: Labour Pounds 20bn plan angers
Tories - Public spending
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS and EMMA TUCKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LABOUR'S plan to inject Pounds 20bn into spending on key public services
over the lifetime of a parliament was yesterday attacked by the
Conservatives as a precursor to a 'disastrous' combination of extra taxes
and extra borrowing.
Mr David Mellor, chief secretary to the Treasury, signalled that the
spending pledge, made earlier this week by Mr Neil Kinnock, the Labour
leader, would be a key target in the Conservatives' offensive over coming
weeks.
Mr Chris Patten, the party chairman, joined the attack with a demand that
labour spell out exactly the assumptions on which it was based.
The pledge came under attack in the Commons as the prime minister,
retaliating to Labour taunts over health service reforms, described Labour's
plans as 'sheer wish fantasy'.
'The extra Pounds 20bn of public spending that Labour promises, is spending
they could never deliver out of growth they have never previously produced,
when they have been in government,' said Mr Major.
He warned that new taxes under Labour would hit some teachers, policemen,
junior doctors, registrars and senior house officers who could not be
described as 'rich'.
'In London and the South East, Pounds 20,000 was less than the average
white-collar wage last year and will certainly be substantially less this
year,' said Mr Major.
Mr Mellor also echoed Mr Major in singling out Labour's commitment to raise
the ceiling on National Insurance Contributions as a serious threat to the
living standards of those on middle incomes.
He said the government was already committed to add Pounds 25bn to public
spending between 1992 and 1994. That meant either Mr Kinnock had
deliberately 'underbid' the Conservatives or the Pounds 20bn he had
mentioned was in addition to the government's plans.
Mr Kinnock wrote to the prime minister last night saying the annual growth
rate under the Labour government of 1974-79 had averaged 2.0 per cent. In
the last 12 years of Conservative government it had averaged 1.75 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-639</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Leonard Mather, top roles in banking: Obituary
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR LEONARD MATHER, a prominent clearing banker who played a central role in
helping to resolve the secondary-banking crisis of the 1970s, has died aged
81.
Mr Mather was chief general manager and subsequently vice-chairman of
Midland Bank when the liberalisation of the UK banking system was producing
rapid changes and new stresses in the financial markets.
At Midland, he is remembered as a commanding, inspiring figure who sought
high standards and reshaped the bank to become more responsive to its
customers. But his time there was later marred by the top-level rivalry that
was to divide and weaken Midland for a decade.
Mr Mather left Midland late in 1974 to become chairman of United Dominions
Trust - one of the secondary banks worst affected by the crisis - which the
Bank of England was supporting with Pounds 500m. He steered UDT back to
financial health until it was sold to Trustee Savings Bank shortly before
his retirement in 1981.
Mr Mather was born in Liverpool in 1909, and embarked on a lifetime banking
career when he joined Midland's local branch as a 17-year-old clerk.
His steady rise through the ranks took him to the position of chief general
manager in 1968. He remained a director of Midland until 1984.
A bluff figure who was proud of his northern origins, Mr Mather brought a
directness and dash of colour to a profession that was still inward-looking
and resistant to change.
His talent for communication made him an excellent salesman for the bank and
a popular after-dinner speaker.
Mr Mather was the author of several books about banking which became
standard texts for aspiring bankers in the 1950s and 1960s. He became
president of the Institute of Bankers in 1969 and was subsequently made a
lifetime vice-president and honorary fellow.
He is survived by his wife Muriel whom he married in 1937.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-640</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Charities watchdog tells Oxfam to keep out of politics
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NEIL BUCKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TRUSTEES of the charity Oxfam were told yesterday to stop mixing political
campaigning with charity work. They were warned that they may in future have
to reimburse funds which are wrongly used for political purposes.
A report by the Charity Commission, after a year-long inquiry prompted by
concerns over an Oxfam campaign about South Africa, concluded that the
trustees had occasionally exceeded the charity's objectives and had stepped
outside the law restricting charities from undertaking political activities.
Mr David Forrest, secretary of the commission, said in a letter to Mrs Mary
Cherry, chairman of Oxfam's trustees: 'The commissioners require the
trustees to accept that some of their current campaigning work is political
and not charitable. The unacceptable political activities of the charity
must cease.'
The commissioners said they had considered asking the trustees to reimburse
money that had been wrongly used for political purposes, but decided the
trustees had acted in good faith. They warned that they would not hesitate
to seek reimbursement in future.
'The trustees do not appear to differentiate between stating a possible
solution to a problem in reasoned fashion and campaigning to have that
solution adopted,' Mr Forrest said.
He said the commissioners could not accept Oxfam's arguments that its
political activities used up only a small part of its resources.
Mrs Cherry said the report would have serious implications for all UK-based
charities whose work involved an element of political campaigning. Oxfam was
committed to working within the law, Mrs Cherry added.
However, she said: 'Our primary object of relieving distress and suffering
cannot be achieved without advocacy on behalf of the people we are trying to
help'.
The Charity Commissioners first received complaints in December 1989 and
January 1990 about an Oxfam campaign on the Khmer Rouge and Cambodia.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-641</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Cautious bidding at Christie's: Saleroom
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CHRISTIE'S leading spring sale of Impressionist and Modern art in New York
on Wednesday went the same way as Sotheby's on Tuesday - with cautious
bidding and a total well below expectation.
The auction brought in Dollars 23.14m (Pounds 13.5m), but with 29 per cent
by value unsold. The comparable auction last May totalled Dollars 269.4m.
The collapse in demand for expensive Impressionist and Modern art is
reflected in the shortage of important works appearing on the market. There
was nothing of outstanding quality on offer. The top price was the Dollars
2.2m - above estimate - paid by a private US collector for Les Barricades
Mysterieuses, a brooding evening landscape by the Surrealist artist
Magritte.
Surrealism is riding the recession better than most other Modern movements.
La Ville Endormie, shrouded nudes in a classical landscape by the Surrealist
Paul Delvaux, sold within forecast for Dollars 1.375m.
A Monet view of the fort at Antibes sold to another private US buyer for
Dollars 1.87m, below its estimate of Dollars 2m to Dollars 3m. A year ago a
painting of this quality would have been expected to achieve at least
Dollars 5m.
A further picture to sell below forecast was Femme a sa Toilette by Degas,
which made Dollars 1.76m.
Challenging 20th century works seem more popular than standard Impressionist
paintings. Gli Archeologi, a neo-classical canvas by De Chirico, almost
doubled its low estimate at Dollars 1.65m.
The main disappointments centred on Chagall, including the failure of La
Nuit d'Orgeval, with an estimate of Dollars 4m-Dollars 5m, to find a buyer.
The Japanese were the main supporters of Chagall and they have deserted the
market, as have the dealers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9 Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-642</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Jobs may be shed at Independent
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Independent and The Independent on Sunday are starting a cost-cutting
campaign that could lead to the loss of between 40 and 50 jobs.
One of the main options under consideration is integration of the daily and
Sunday papers into a seven-day operation while keeping the two titles in
being. Alternatives include raising new money or bringing in new investors.
Options will be considered at a board meeting of Newspaper Publishing, the
holding company, next Wednesday.
Mr Andreas Whittam Smith, editor and chief executive of The Independent,
insists there is no possibility of closing or disposing of The Independent
on Sunday.
'It is our title, and there is no question of it being sold,' he said
yesterday.
He is in no doubt, however, that action on costs is required because of the
depth of the advertising recession.
The management has indicated that any redundancies will be voluntary.
Even before the Gulf war, display advertising on the two titles was 20 per
cent down on an annual basis with a similar decline for classified space.
Although there was a modest recovery when the war ended, April was a poor
month and there is still no sign of growth.
In spite of the recession The Independent has remained in modest profit
since the start of its financial year in October. But the company is
suffering heavy losses at The Independent on Sunday, which was launched just
over a year ago. 'The arithmetic is remorseless,' Mr Whittam Smith said.
Unions at Independent Television News have been warned that staffing levels
are under review as part of this year's budgeting process. Mr Bob Phillis,
chief executive of the television news organisation, said there could be
redundancies among the 900 staff. It is unlikely that the number involved
will be decided before next month's board meeting.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-643</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Retail margins on food higher than in Germany
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN THORNHILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
QUESTIONS about the structure of the UK grocery industry will be raised by a
study showing that a sample basket of supermarket groceries costs 12 per
cent more before tax in the UK than in Germany.
According to a report by KPMG Management Consulting, the German basket of
goods was 5 per cent cheaper than a comparable range of UK products even
after the standard rate of food tax had been added. There is no equivalent
food tax in the UK.
Mr Hew Dalrymple, head of KPMG's food and drink strategy group, said the
findings destroyed the myth that UK food costs were among the lowest in
Europe and suggested that discount food retailers might have considerable
potential to expand in the UK.
The comparative basket contained 11 products ranging from staple foods such
as flour, white bread, butter, cheese and bacon to more exotic fare such as
frozen cheese-and-tomato pizza. The UK supermarket basket cost Pounds 26.36;
the German equivalent Pounds 23.53 before tax. The cost of the UK basket was
split between the manufacturers' selling price of Pounds 19.17 and the
retailer's margin of Pounds 7.19. The comparable split in Germany was Pounds
18.96 and Pounds 4.57.
The survey, which also covered Denmark and Sweden, found that prices varied
widely among products depending on the efficiency of local manufacturing and
patterns of consumption. Prices of bacon and salami were substantially lower
in Germany and Denmark because of the efficiency of local production. Frozen
pizzas and chips were cheaper in the UK and Sweden because of high
consumption.
Mr Dalrymple said that price competition in the UK market would increase
over the next three to five years as the big multiples completed their
expansion programmes.
'Once the market has fully grown you will only be able to grow further by
capturing other people's market shares, leading to more competition which
will be good for the consumer,' he said. 'In Germany there is a thriving
discount sector, and that clearly puts pressure on the multiples in terms of
their mark-up.' Mr Dalrymple said the study showed UK corner shops gave good
value compared with their German counterparts.
The same basket of goods cost Pounds 29.31 at an independent grocer in the
UK compared with Pounds 29.87 before tax in Germany.
Report from Food and Drink Strategy Group, KPMG Management Consulting, 8
Salisbury Sq, London EC4Y 8BB.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9 Table (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-644</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Developer is accused over damage to listed building
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL CHEESERIGHT, Midlands Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NOTTINGHAM City Council has accused Grosvenor Square Properties, the
development subsidiary of AB Ports, of unauthorised alteration and
demolition work at a listed building in the city centre.
Nottingham Magistrates' Court has sent the case to the Crown Court.
Council lawyers are considering a second action to require Grosvenor Square
Properties to reinstate the parts of the building it is alleged to have
demolished.
The action is being taken under sections seven, eight and nine of the
Planning (Listed Buildings and Conservation Areas) Act 1990. It is alleged
demolition and alteration were carried out in the building 'in a manner
which affects its character as a building of special or historical
interest'.
The case concerns a scheme to turn an old department store into small shop
units. One frontage of the old store consists of three 18th century
cottages.
The dispute illustrates the more stringent attitude of local authorities to
conservation issues. Save Britain's Heritage, a pressure group concerned
with protecting historic buildings, said: 'Years ago councils were wary of
doing anything. Now they realise they can take tough measures.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-645</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Spastics chiefs asked to go
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE SPASTICS Society yesterday announced the immediate resignation of its
chief executive and finance director.
Mr Ken Young and Mr Martyn Dunleavy were asked to resign after a 10-day
inquiry by the society's audit committee.
The society's chairman, Mr Derek Ashcroft, said in a statement that the
investigation showed that the two men had 'solicited business in the field
of community care for a private concern with which they were connected.
'This was without the knowledge or consent of the society and a clear breach
of their duties to the society and their service contracts.'
Mr Ashcroft said the resignations were 'all the more regrettable' because
the society had been through an 'unprecedented period of success' under Mr
Young.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-646</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK News (Employment): Civil Service move is opposed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CIVIL SERVICE unions believe their members could suffer financially
following a decision by the government to end service-wide standards on
staff appraisals.
They fear the initiative, one of three planned by the Treasury as part of a
loosening of controls over personnel matters, will lead to fewer civil
servants being given performance-pay rises.
Ms Jenny Thurston, deputy general secretary of the IPMS civil service union,
yesterday described the initiatives as an attack on the employment rights of
more than 500,000 civil servants.
The Treasury wants to allow departments more freedom in appraising staff,
choosing people for redundancies and deciding on promotion procedures. It is
withdrawing existing instructions on these issues and replacing them with
less prescriptive guidance.
The IPMS is the most vociferous of the unions in its opposition to the
changes, although others are also concerned of their effect on members.
Ms Thurston said the changes would open the way to a plethora of different
standards and practices, especially among smaller departments and agencies.
The loosening of rules on staff appraisals worries unions because the
appraisals are used in determining pay and promotion.
Ms Thurston said loosening controls would make it easier for departments to
ensure that performance pay standards were much tougher and more difficult
to attain.
Mr John Ellis, general secretary of the CPSA, the largest Civil Service
union, said he believed there was pressure to reduce the number of civil
servants winning performance pay awards. Withdrawal of guidance on selecting
job losses could presage an end to the 'last-in-first-out' principle.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-647</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Aids compensation award
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT RICE, Legal Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE HIGH Court yesterday approved payments totalling Pounds 1.5m to children
among the 1,200 haemophiliacs who contracted the Aids virus after receiving
infected blood products during National Health Service treatment.
Mr Justice Ognall approved compensation of Pounds 21,500 each for 34
children who were infected with the virus and 13 children who had an
infected parent or guardian who died will share in payments of Pounds 60,500
to each family.
The hearing followed last week's agreement between the government and the
haemophiliacs and their families on how an additional out-of-court offer of
Pounds 42m should be distributed.
Of the 1,200 haemophiliacs infected with the virus, about 210 have developed
Aids and more than 140 have died.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-648</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK News (Employment): BT union alters tactics on pay
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DIANE SUMMERS, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE National Communications Union, which represents 140,000 engineering and
clerical staff within BT, has abandoned its tactic of putting in a single
annual pay claim and will now negotiate separately with BT's individual
businesses.
The move is tacit recognition by the union of the difficulty of maintaining
its traditional line that all pay bargaining should be conducted centrally.
The decision was taken ahead of this year's pay negotiations which are
likely to be particularly tough because of falling inflation.
It has also been influenced by the continued devolvement, and in some cases
sale, of what BT sees as 'non-core' activities which fragmented pay
bargaining.
The first meeting on 1991 pay has already taken place between the union and
the largest of the companies, BT plc.
The NCU has submitted a claim for a 'substantial increase' in pay and
allowances and more holidays.
A pay settlement of 8 per cent has already been reached between the NCU and
management at Fulcrum Products, the former BT-owned components manufacturer.
Mr Tony Young, NCU general secretary, writing in the latest issue of the
union's journal, says the recession and falling inflation will make
negotiations difficult this year.
'We also need to recognise the range of businesses with which the union has
to negotiate,' he added.
The NCU was now involved in 16 sets of pay negotiations with widely
differing circumstances in many of the businesses. This was further
complicated by settlement dates stretching through from April to October,
said Mr Young.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-649</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Blue Arrow trial
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Blue Arrow trial was adjourned yesterday after a member of the jury fell
ill. No evidence was heard. The trial will continue on Monday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-650</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Alcan jobs to go
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH Alcan yesterday announced that 80 jobs would go by the end of the
year at its smelter and power station at Lynemouth, Northumberland.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-651</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Rise in number of BTEC students
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE number of students registering for Business and Technician Council
(BTEC) courses has risen by 7 per cent in the past year. BTEC is the largest
validating body of vocational courses in England and Wales, with more than
500,000 students enrolled.
The increase was particularly strong for courses in computing (up 37 per
cent) and service and leisure (14 per cent). Registrations for engineering
courses declined by 5 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-652</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Wallace Smith head remanded on bail
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Duncan Smith, chairman of Wallace Smith Trust, the collapsed London
banking and finance group, was yesterday remanded on Pounds 250,000 bail
until July 11.
He was freed at Guildhall magistrates' court after having been in custody
since his arrest last week, when he was charged with fraudulent trading.
The court required two sureties, each of Pounds 100,000, and a security
deposit of Pounds 50,000. Other bail conditions were that he surrenders his
passport, reports to the police three times a week and does not contact
witnesses or visit the offices of Wallace Smith Trust.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-653</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Stalemate on venue for Ulster talks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TALKS on Northern Ireland's future were yesterday postponed until Monday as
the province's main political parties failed yet again to reach agreement on
the venue for entry by the government of the Irish Republic into the
negotiations, writes Ralph Atkins.
Mr Peter Brooke, Northern Ireland secretary, expressed frustration after the
third successive day of bilateral meetings with unionist and nationalist
politicians and called on the participants to 'reflect on their positions
over the weekend'.
Mr Gerry Collins, Irish foreign minister, is to meet Mr Brooke in London
today to discuss the stalemate.
The continuing intransigence on a logistical detail has intensified the
gloom surrounding the talks process, which began two weeks ago.
The first 'round table', or plenary, discussions had been due to take place
on Tuesday. But discussions remain at the 'talks-about-talks' stage.
Mr Brooke's sense of disappointment was shared by participants at the talks,
but it appears little headway has been made in resolving differences between
the parties.
As he left the Stormont parliament buildings in Belfast, Mr Brooke said that
if agreement could not be reached 'then I think we would have to pause', but
he appeared confident that the 'loose ends' would be tidied up.
He added: 'I retain confidence that, because of the purposefulness with
which people have been discussing what they want to talk about when we sit
down in plenary, that we will find a way through.'
Unionists want the talks involving Dublin to be held in London. The
nationalist Social Democratic and Labour Party and the Irish government
would prefer a venue in Ireland. Continental European locations appear to
have been ruled out for logistical reasons.
Asked if he had underestimated the symbolism of the venue, Mr Brooke
replied: 'It may have been that I misread the situation as involving
slightly more flexibility than there was.'
Observer, Page 14
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-654</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / BAA seeks review of airport charges
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BAA, the airports operator, is seeking a new five-year pricing formula for
aircraft landing and parking fees. It wants a formula that will enable it to
recoup revenue losses from the abolition of European Community duty-free
sales in 1992 and from additional airport security costs.
The Monopolies and Mergers Commission is conducting its first five-yearly
review since BAA's privatisation of the company's three airports in the
south-east of England
Like other privatised industries regulated by government bodies, BAA is
worried that the recent Ofgas decision to impose a tough five-year pricing
formula on British Gas could set a precedent. Ofgas has limited annual
British Gas price rises to 5 percentage points below the inflation rate.
It is expected the MMC review, which will recommend a new five-year pricing
formula for BAA from next April, will be completed at the end of June with
the report published in August. The Civil Aviation Authority, which
regulates BAA's airport activities, is expected to decide on the new pricing
formula in October.
Under the current formula BAA can increase its annual landing and parking
fees by up to 1 percentage point below the rate of inflation. These fees
make up about 40 per cent of the annual income of BAA's three south-east
England airports.
BAA can also recoup 75 per cent of additional security costs incurred
because of government regulations introduced in 1989-90. The company says it
takes two years to recover these additional costs which amount to Pounds 14m
a year. BAA's overall security and safety costs are approaching Pounds 100m
a year.
BAA is particularly worried by the EC's proposal to abolish duty-free sales
in the single European market, which the company believes would result in an
annual revenue loss of Pounds 50m. Duty-free sales have traditionally
cross-subsidised other airport charges.
The company is also concerned by the implications of the EC's plans to
abolish frontier barriers within the community after 1992. It says this
would lead to heavy costs to adapt airport immigration and customs areas.
BAA argues that any new pricing formula must also take into account the
company's 15-year investment programme to increase and improve airport
capacity in the south-east.
Observer, Page 14
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-655</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Institute of Economic Affairs Conference on Regulation: BT
network charges backed by Oftel
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir Bryan Carsberg, director-general of Oftel, the telecommunications
industry regulatory authority, is unlikely to yield to complaints from
potential new entrants into the industry that British Telecom being allowed
to charge too much for enabling them to interconnect with its network.
The issue of the price it will cost new competitors to inerconnect with BT's
network is at the heart of the government's plans to open the
telecommunications market to greater competition.
Without access to BT's network to complement their own networks, new
competitors will not be able to provide a comprehensive service. BT has said
competitors should pay for interconnection to help the company cover the
cost of installing and maintaining its network.
Sir Bryan told an Institute of Economic Affairs conference on the future of
regulation that he had received a large number of submissions on the issue.
Many complained that the prices charged by BT would deter competitors from
entering the market. Sir Bryan indicated that he would not compromise on the
principle of charging for interconnection.
Those objecting to the charge would have to show that it was fair for BT to
carry the financial burden of the network while others did not, he said.
He pointed out that Mercury Communications, the Cable &amp; Wireless subsidiary,
already paid an interconnection charge, while cable television companies
planning to operate local telecommunications services would be able to
charge for interconnection with their local networks.
Sir Bryan said that none of the details of the interconnection arrangements
had been set in concrete.
He would carefully study detailed suggestions over the next few weeks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-656</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK News (Employment): Ucatt may delay ballot for leader
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DIANE SUMMERS and JOHN GAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BALLOT for a new general secretary of the Ucatt construction union could
be postponed following the election of a leftwing majority to the union's
executive council.
The new executive will decide on Monday whether to press ahead next month
with the postal ballot for a successor to the general secretary, Mr Albert
Williams, who is due to retire.
There was some uncertainty within the union yesterday about what the
executive council changes would mean. It is still possible that one of the
three candidates elected on a leftwing stand could form an alliance with the
two existing 'establishment' members.
The changes and uncertainty, together with the allegations of ballot-rigging
and other irregularities which have plagued Ucatt for years, come at a bad
time for the union as far as construction pay talks are concerned. An
initial offer of 4.7 has been rejected by the union, and it is not clear
whether the negotiators will still have a mandate.
The switch in political control of Ucatt could significantly affect voting
patterns at the Trades Union Congress in Glasgow in September.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-657</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Institute of Economic Affairs Conference on Regulation:
Byatt likely to support calls for water meters
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR IAN BYATT, director-general of Ofwat, the water industry regulator,
yesterday gave the strongest hint yet that he plans to recommend a form of
water metering as the main conclusion of his review of paying for water.
Mr Byatt said tariffs for water should be reformed to reflect more
accurately the amount people use. That would reduce the proportion of water
bills accounted for by a standing charge to cover connection to the water
system.
A change in the way people pay for water is part of Mr Byatt's increasingly
ambitious plans to reform the industry. He also intends to review the costs
of capital for water companies and the rate of return they are expected to
make. These are vital factors in setting price controls.
He told the conference consumer choice should be an important objective of
pricing policy. The opportunity to economise on an increasingly expensive
commodity would become more important for people on low incomes, while there
should be no restriction on people using a lot of water if they were
prepared to pay for it.
Mr Byatt will this autumn make recommendations on how the price structure
and method of charging for water should be reformed.
Standing charges are currently linked to the rateable value of property.
Ofwat is planning a series of surveys of consumer preferences and
expectations which Mr Byatt said could have far reaching implications for
the structure of the industry.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-658</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / MoD to sell military research airfields
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WHITE, Defence Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PLANS to sell two airfields used for military research
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
at Farnborough, Hampshire, and at Bedford - were confirmed by the Ministry
of Defence yesterday.
They would become 'available for disposal' as a result of a decision to
concentrate research flying activities at Boscombe Down, Wiltshire.
Preliminary studies indicated that the Bedford site might be used for
commercial non-passenger traffic. Options for Farnborough, which hosts the
UK's International Air Show, ranged from business and commercial aviation to
'more extensive development'.
The MoD said it would honour its commitments to keep the Farnborough show.
The Society of British Aerospace Companies, responsible for the exhibition,
said it assumed the show would remain at Farnborough 'through to the turn of
the century'.
Mr Kenneth Carlisle, junior defence procurement minister, announcing the
move in a written Commons reply, said the transfer to Boscombe Down was
expected to take 'a number of years'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-659</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK News (Employment): Water bargaining change is agreed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SMITH, Labour Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
YORKSHIRE WATER has won union approval for a 'single-table' bargaining
arrangement through which three sets of pay negotiations, with craft, manual
and staff workers, will be replaced by one.
The change is part of a small but growing trend towards simplified pay
bargaining in British industry.
It is the latest in a series of initiatives which water companies have made
in their relationships with employees since privatisation 18 months ago. The
commitment by the nine unions to 'single-table' bargaining is part of a deal
which will see pay rise by 9.5 per cent from April 1.
That is higher than the average level of settlements in British industry and
exceeds the inflation rate which, for the year to April, is likely to have
been considerably below 7 per cent.
'Single-table' bargaining is seen by employers as a means of cutting
management negotiating time and reducing demarcations and frictions between
groups of workers.
Yorkshire Water plans harmonisation of conditions for its 4,000 employees,
and the unions will press for all workers to move towards 35-hour weeks. The
working week varies now between 35 hours and 38 hours.
The company is also setting up 'single-table', area-based, consultative
forums as the basis for local talks between managements and workforces.
Mr Richard Holmes, regional organiser of the General, Municipal and
Boilermakers Union and secretary of the manual unions, said the unions had
been taken aback originally by the 'single-table' proposals, but could now
see benefits.
Yorkshire's move follows an initiative at Northumbrian Water which saw union
powers in pay bargaining reduced.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-660</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Institute of Economic Affairs Conference on Regulation:
Monopolies probe for Manchester airport
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Civil Aviation Authority will soon refer Manchester airport to the
Monopolies and Mergers Commission in the first stage in a five-yearly review
of pricing at the airport.
Sir Christopher Tugendhat, the CAA's chairman, said the referral, within the
next six months, would be part of a general inquiry into Manchester airport.
It had built up a substantial monopoly in the north with a throughput of
passengers three times as high as at Glasgow airport.
Sir Christopher said the growing use of Manchester meant the government
would need to consider whether another runway should be built shortly after
the turn of the century.
He told the conference airport regulation would become much tougher with the
CAA's consideration over the next few months of what price cap to impose on
airline charges at airports in the London area.
He said: 'The work we have had to do on airport regulation so far has been
relatively straightforward, but I fear this honeymoon is coming to an end.'
Sir Christopher hinted that whatever price cap was decided on, Heathrow
airport would not be allowed to alter its charges to favour long-haul
services at the expense of domestic services.
He said that would threaten services between Heathrow and regional airports.
It would also put at risk the future of UK airlines which depended heavily
on domestic routes while leaving British Airways unaffected, and could
inhibit regional development.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-661</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Banks condemn Treasury stance on swaps advice
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BANKS WHICH have lost Pounds 550m on invalid swap agreements with local
authorities yesterday strongly rejected suggestions by the Treasury that
adequate legal advice had not been taken before entering into the
agreements.
The swaps, ruled illegal by the House of Lords earlier this year, involved
the exchange of interest obligations, mostly from fixed-rate to
floating-rate, by local authorities seeking to improve their financial
management or taking a view on interest-rate movements.
Mr Lars Evander, head of the foreign bankers section of the British Bankers'
Association (BBA), said the level of legal risk in the UK had prompted his
bank, Svenska Handelsbanken, to switch most of its non-sterling swaps
business to Hong Kong, where the legal environment was more satisfactory, a
move which appears to support claims that the swaps issue has damaged
London's status as a financial centre.
The government decided earlier this week not to intervene in the tangle of
invalid transactions between the banks and the local authorities. Many of
the 80 banks involved plan to go back to court to attempt to recover about
Pounds 125m of their losses through restitution - the return of all payments
made to local authorities under swap contracts.
'The banking industry did take all possible steps to satisfy itself that
local authorities were able to undertake swaps,' said Mr Humphrey
Norrington, chairman of the BBA's steering committee on swaps.
Measures included legal advice and the use of standard documentation, as
well as additional assurances from local authorities.
The Treasury acknowledged that most banks 'entered the agreements in good
faith', but an official said they should have been aware of the 'limited
legal capacity' of the councils and taken extra care to protect their legal
position.
Mr Evander said the episode 'shows the UK legislative system is not suited
for innovative financial markets.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-662</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Institute of Economic Affairs Conference on Regulation:
Regulators gather
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A gathering of regulators: Ian Byatt (left), Sir Christopher Tugendhat, Sir
Gordon Borrie, Sir Bryan Carsberg, Prof Stephen Littlechild and David
Glencross, who met yesterday at the Institute of Economic Affairs conference
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8 Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-663</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Recovery in tourism is expected
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID CHURCHILL, Leisure Industries Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TOURIST arrivals to the UK in 1991 are forecast to recover sharply after the
steep decline earlier this year caused by the Gulf war.
The British Tourist Authority said incoming tourist numbers had already
increased significantly after falling 18 per cent in the first two months of
this year from the levels of the corresponding period of 1990.
It forecast 18m overseas visitors to the UK this year, marginally ahead of
the record 17.9m last year, with their expenditure reaching Pounds 7.8bn
against Pounds 7.7bn last year.
'Tourism is a resilient industry and it is already bouncing back,' Mr
William Davis, chairman of the BTA, told a London conference yesterday.
The BTA says the recovery is driven by increased numbers of tourists from
western Europe, especially the Netherlands, Italy and Spain. Numbers from
the US are also recovering but the Japanese and Far East market is taking
longer to pick up. Mr Davis forecast there could be more than than 22m
overseas visitors to the UK by 1995.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-664</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World Trade News: European gear makers prepare a US fighting
fund
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL CHEESERIGHT, Midlands Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EUROPEAN gear manufacturers are mobilising their resources to fend off
likely protectionist moves by the American Gear Manufacturers Association.
Mr Michael Opperman, retiring chairman of the British Gear Association and
president of Eurotrans, which groups together the European manufacturers,
said in Birmingham yesterday that an initial fighting fund of Dollars 50,000
(Pounds 29,000) was being set up to finance lobbying and political activity
in the US.
This would be co-ordinated by Mr Alan Carter, vice-chairman of the British
Gear Association, on behalf of European manufacturers.
The US manufacturers are expected, after a meeting in June, to petition the
Department of Commerce for relief from imports. While it is known that the
American Gear Manufacturers Association will exclude automotive gears from
their petition, it is not clear what relief they will seek.
As a minimum, it is assumed that they will want US government aid for extra
research and training, and an extension of the Buy America policy to cover
all defence expenditure on gears. While Eurotrans would acquiesce if relief
was restricted to these minimum demands, it is bitterly opposed to any wider
protective move or any move which would interfere with gear supplies to the
marine and aerospace industries.
Uncertainty about the intentions of the US stems from the fact that the
American manufacturers are themselves divided on the sort of protection they
should seek. They could demand an agreement with foreign suppliers for
voluntary restraint, the imposition of mandatory quotas or higher import
duties.
US and European manufacturers met in February to discuss the matter, but
apparently did not achieve more than a clearing of the air.
Mr Opperman also held out the possibility of a US anti-dumping action
against Europe. 'There is evidence that some German companies may have been
dumping in America,' he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-665</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World Trade News: Bush defends status of China - Why it is
likely to stay a most-favoured nation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NANCY DUNNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN ONE of his recent rambling discourses with the press, President George
Bush transmitted a succinct message to Congress. Despite congressional anger
over Chinese human rights abuses, persecution in Tibet, and the growing
bilateral trade deficit, he is not prepared to take away China's
most-favoured nation (MFN) trade benefits.
The president insisted he had not yet made a decision on China's MFN status,
which comes up for renewal on June 3. However, he left little doubt what he
would do, insisting that 'reasoned relations' with Peking had 'paid off in
spades' when China threw its support behind the allied coalition in United
Nations votes on the Gulf war.
A country with MFN status is accorded the standard tariff treatment the US
extends to almost all its trade partners. Among the exceptions are the
Soviet Union and 'international outlaws' such as Iran, Iraq and South
Africa. China was given MFN status in 1980 when it basked in the sunshine of
widespread US approval for its economic reforms.
It is clear President Bush is not relishing the inevitable battle, not least
because he and Congress have already spilled much blood over the two-year
extension of the fast-track negotiating authority for the Uruguay Round of
trade talks and the North American Free Trade Agreement (Nafta).
But there is so much at stake for business interests and foreign policy that
it is a struggle the president is almost certain to wage.
Congressional opposition to China's MFN status has been building since
Chinese soldiers killed hundreds of pro-democracy demonstrators in Peking's
Tiananmen Square in 1988. While some of the concern may be real, there is no
denying the political advantage for Democrats who use the issue to portray
the president as 'a moral wimp'.
Congressman Joseph Kennedy, a Massachusetts Democrat, accuses him of being
unwilling 'to stand up to China'. Congressman Tom Lantos, a California
Democrat, complains about China's use of slave labour for some of its
exports and about its weapons exports to dangerous customers.
Senator Daniel Patrick Moynihan, a New York Democrat, has, with the support
of Senator George Mitchell, the majority leader, re-introduced a bill to
revoke China's MFN status. For China to be denied MFN status, a majority in
both houses would have to pass a resolution of disapproval 90 days after the
president issued the extension. It could then be vetoed by the president, in
which case Congress would have to muster two-thirds in both houses to
override the veto.
The greater threat to China's MFN status, according to Mr Peter Lo, Hong
Kong minister of economic and trade affairs in Washington, is a bill
granting China 'conditional' MFN. The bill was introduced by Congresswomen
Nancy Pelosi, head of the Congressional Working Group on China.
'We believe the magnitude of congressional support would be larger for
conditional MFN than for outright revocation,' said Mr Lo, who warns that
such legislation would be disastrous for Hong Kong.
The conditional legislation would give China MFN status for a year but it
would require an improved human rights record, an accounting for and release
of political prisoners, an end to religious persecution in China and Tibet
and harassment of Chinese students in the US, and freedom of the press in
China.
According to Mr Lo, these conditions would be anathema to China.
For Hong Kong, which now handles 70 to 80 per cent of China's exports, the
trade damage resulting from the loss of MFN would be between Dollars 9bn and
Dollars 12bn and 40,000 jobs.
Mrs Pelosi insists that China would yield to her conditions rather than lose
market share. 'While the Chinese leadership does not like capitalism, it
does love money,' she said.
The Bush administration has acknowledged real frustration with China over
human rights. Mr Robert Kimmitt, a US under-secretary of state, has just
returned from Peking where he warned that human rights would be considered
when MFN was up for renewal.
The administration is also disturbed that China's trade surplus has grown
from Dollars 3.5bn in 1988 to Dollars 10.4bn last year and may reach Dollars
15bn this year.
But it is more likely the administration will deal with China as it does its
other trading partners - with threats and sanctions - in an attempt to
preserve a mutually beneficial trading relationship and the president's
dream of a 'new world order'.
The loss of most-favoured nation status for China would mean 'a devastating
blow to the economy and confidence of Hong Hong' as well as millions of
dollars in losses for US banks and businesses, says a delegation of the
American Chamber of Commerce in Hong Kong.
The group is among the hundreds of lobbyists on Capitol Hill trying to
ensure that MFN status remains a cornerstone of US and China's trade
relations.
 ----------------------------------------------
TOP 10 US EXPORTS  TO CHINA (1990)
 ----------------------------------------------
Commodity                  (Dollars millions)
 ----------------------------------------------
Aircraft                         609
Fertilisers                      544
Wheat                            497
Cotton                           277
Wood                             175
Polycarboxylic acids             145
Aerospace parts                  140
Machinery parts                  114
Data processing machinery        113
Machines                          97
 ----------------------------------------------
TOTAL US Exports               4,807
 ----------------------------------------------
Source: US Dept of Commerce Statistics
 ----------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6 Photograph China's premier Li Peng, impervious to pressure
(Omitted). Photograph Bush, is under attack from his opponents in Congress
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-666</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World Trade News: White House recruits key Democrat to
'fast-track'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NANCY DUNNE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE prospect for continued negotiations in the Uruguay Round yesterday
looked brighter after Congressman Richard Gephardt, the US House majority
leader, said he would support President George Bush's request for
'fast-track' negotiating authority.
The congressman's support was considered crucial in the administration's
embattled effort to get a two-year extension of the 'fast-track' authority,
which allows it to negotiate trade treaties the Congress cannot amend.
Mr Gephardt said: 'Almost everyone agrees that the Gatt Treaty should be
handled expeditiously and without amendments because we recognise that an
agreement reached among 107 nations is not amenable to renegotiation.'
However, strong opposition has surfaced to giving the president fast-track
authority to negotiate a North American Free Trade agreement. Until
yesterday, the administration was considered likely to win approval from the
Senate, but the result in the House was too close to predict.
Mr Gephardt's support was accompanied by an attack on the Reagan and Bush
administrations for 'their failure to recognise the world as it is, instead
of how their ideologies say it should be.'
He insisted the House would renegotiate Nafta if it did not protect US jobs,
Mexican workers and the environment.
Fast-track progress, Page 14
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-667</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Amnesty reports 10,000 detained in Punjab
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID HOUSEGO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW DELHI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MORE THAN 10,000 Sikhs are being held in the Indian state of Punjab under
sweeping anti-terrorist laws and without any chance of being brought to
trial, according to Amnesty International, the human rights group.
In a critical report on human rights abuses by Indian security forces,
Amnesty says that suspected government opponents are routinely tortured in
police stations and detention centres. It accuses the police of staging fake
'encounters' with Sikh militants in which hundreds of Sikhs have been
killed.
Amnesty has been denied permission to visit the Punjab by three successive
Indian governments. Its report, published today, in which it recommends an
end to arbitrary arrests, torture and extra-judicial killings, is thus based
on sworn statements from victims, court records and investigations, and
newspaper reports.
Amnesty's condemnation of the Indian government's handling of the Sikh
separatist movement comes only a few days after an equally damning report by
Asia Watch, the US human rights group, on abuses by Indian security forces
in Kashmir.
Asia Watch, which visited Kashmir with government approval, says that it has
collected testimony on 200 extra- judicial killings by security forces since
the beginning of 1990, as well as many instances of torture. Asia Watch says
that government forces have engaged in the summary execution of suspected
militants, house-to-house searches, during which whole families were seized,
and the wanton destruction of civilian property.
Both Amnesty and Asia Watch strongly condemn the tactics of Sikh and
Kashmiri militants. Amnesty says that according to official statistics
issued in July 1990, armed groups in Punjab had killed 4,000 people,
including 500 police officers, since May 1987. It says that since July 1990
the numbers of political killings of all kinds have increased.
In Kashmir, Asia Watch says that militants have flagrantly violated
international humanitarian law by killing , kidnapping and assaulting
civilians.
It says that Moslem militant organisations have issued death threats and
have assassinated members of the militant minority Hindu community.
Hindu revivalism, page 15
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-668</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Iraq rejects UN police force to protect Kurds
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER RIDDELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IRAQ HAS rejected the idea of a United Nations police force to replace
allied troops now in the northern part of the country protecting the Kurds,
Mr Javier Perez de Cuellar, the United Nations secretary-general, said
yesterday.
Speaking at the White House as he met President George Bush, Mr Perez de
Cuellar said he had just received 'a very clear rejection from the Iraqi
government. They do not want a United Nations police presence.'
He noted that both the US and the UN wanted to get all US forces out of Iraq
soon, but warned that everyone involved might have to be patient.
On Wednesday, Mr Bush said he hoped the UN could do in northern Iraq what it
was doing in the south where a peacekeeping force has replaced US and other
allied troops, though this is limited to a nine-mile wide demilitarised zone
along the Iraq/Kuwait border.
The US has backed the UK proposal for a UN civilian police force in northern
Iraq to help protect displaced Kurds. This would be civilian rather than the
military force in the south. Mr Perez de Cuellar said he had not made up his
mind on the proposal.
The US believes such a UN force to take over from US and allied troops could
be set up without either Baghdad's permission or further UN action. But Mr
John Bolton, assistant secretary for international organisations, said last
night that Mr Perez de Cuellar's 'thought on a peacekeeping force was that
another resolution was necessary. That's something we're going to have to
discuss further.'
Meanwhile, Iraq has moved special forces into the northern town of Dahuk, a
provincial capital which US marines are poised to add to the 'safe haven'
for Kurdish refugees, a marine officer said yesterday .
The new presence could complicate any plan to send in US troops and coax
hundreds of thousands of Kurdish refugees out of the mountains on the
Iraqi-Turkish border back to their homes.
The officer's estimate of Iraqi troop deployments in Dahuk, 50km from the
border, was in stark contrast to that of the allied command, which earlier
said Iraqi forces were withdrawing from the town and had dwindled to around
100.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4 Photograph UN chief, has ureged patience (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-669</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Pinochet to begin arms tour
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LESLIE CRAWFORD
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SANTIAGO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GENERAL Augusto Pinochet, commander-in-chief of the Chilean army, was
expected to depart on a tour today to visit arms makers in Europe, Israel
and South Africa.
Defence Minister Patricio Rojas said Gen Pinochet had been granted leave of
absence until June 5 'to visit foreign defence companies that supply the
Chilean army', but he did not disclose details of the general's itinerary.
Unofficially, it is believed Chile's former dictator will visit France,
Switzerland and possibly Britain, as well as Israel and South Africa. The
Chilean government is trying to keep the controversial tour as low-key as
possible. Gen Pinochet's last European visit was in 1975, to attend Gen
Franco's funeral in Spain.
Most democratic governments then regarded him as a pariah; he received only
a handful of invitations from fellow Latin American strongmen during his
16-year rule, which ended in March 1990.
Gen Pinochet, accustomed to blaming his vile reputation abroad on 'Communist
propaganda', has been taken aback by the hostility which greeted his
announced visit to the UK.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-670</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / US plans controls for foreign banks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER RIDDELL, US Editor
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE US Federal Reserve and federal regulators would have new wide-ranging
controls over the entry and operations of foreign banks, under legislation
prepared in response to the scandals involving Banca Nationale del Lavoro's
Atlanta branch and Bank of Credit and Commerce International's American
operations.
The bill, drafted by the Fed's governors and introduced yesterday by leaders
of the Senate banking committee, would allow the Fed to screen the entry of
foreign banks into the US, to examine all foreign bank operations, to revoke
a foreign bank's licence to operate a US branch and prevent hidden ownership
interests by requiring the reporting of loans secured by the stock of a US
bank.
At present, foreign banks can choose state supervisors as the primary
regulators of their US branches. Supervisory weaknesses have allowed a few
banks to use the absence of federal oversight to engage in illegal
activities. BCCI secretly took ownership interests in US banks and last year
a US subsidiary was found guilty of running a money-laundering operation.
BNL's Atlanta branch made Dollars 3bn (Pounds 1.7bn) of loan commitments to
Iraq between 1987 and 1989 which were partly used for buying weapons
equipment, leading to the start of criminal proceeedings earlier this year.
At present 81 per cent of foreign banks choose state supervisors for their
US branches and the legislation would require foreign banks to obtain
federal approval.
Most other countries, including Britain, require approval by the central
bank for operations by overseas-owned banks.
In detail, the legislation would require prior federal approval before a
foreign bank can begin operating in the US, and set clear standards for
permitting and denying foreign banks to enter the US, including access to
information about the foreign bank to enforce compliance with US laws and
requiring that the foreign bank be subject to consolidated regulation and
supervision in its home country.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-671</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Private TV and radio for Malta
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GODFREY GRIMA
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   VALLETTA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Malta is to have private radio and television broadcasting after a gap of 16
years under legislation approved by parliament this week, writes Godfrey
Grima in Valletta. The legislation sanctions the creation of 10 radio
stations, a television cable operation and several non-profit-making
community radios.
Radio and television stations were nationalised by the former Socialist
premier, Mr Dom Mintoff, in 1975. Broadcasting in Malta has become
increasingly politicised.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-672</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Eurosport to try again
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Eurosport consortium said yesterday it hoped to have the satellite
sports channel back on the air before the end of this month, writes Raymond
Snoddy. Eurosport and TF1, the French channel, decided yesterday to try to
create a new financial structure.
The channel went off the air on Tuesday after refinancing was not completed
in time. The decision to try again was influenced by a supportive statement
by the European Commission. Earlier, Brussels ruled that the original
structure of the consortium - a 50-50 joint venture by 17 of Europe's public
service broadcasters and News International - was anti-competitive.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-673</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Armenia is warned to curb guerrillas
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN LLOYD
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SOVIET military chiefs yesterday warned the pro-independence government of
the Soviet republic of Armenia to curb guerrilla attacks on Soviet personnel
by Armenian armed bands, writes John Lloyd in Moscow.
Mr Arshot Manuchurian, the republic's interior minister, responded by saying
he could not control the guerrillas, who were retaliating against 'bloody
acts' by Soviet soldiers.
Soviet and Azerbaijani troops fired on and occupied two more villages
yesterday; a third avoided an attack by surrendering its weapons.
The military's warning is aimed at what Soviet forces have identified as a
widespread formation of guerrilla groups along the republic's border with
Azerbaijan, with which it is locked in conflict over control of the
Armenian-inhabited enclave of Nagorno Karabakh, in Azerbaijan.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2 Photograph Armenian guerrillas bury their dead after a clash
with Soviet troops (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-674</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Stock and Currency Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 -----------------------------------
STERLING
 -----------------------------------
New York:
Dollars 1.719 (1.72)
London:
Dollars 1.704 (1.718)
DM  2.97 (2.9775)
FFr  10.04 (10.075)
SFr  2.51 (2.5175)
Y  237.25 (237.5)
Pound index  91.5 (91.8)
 -----------------------------------
GOLD
 -----------------------------------
New York: Comex Jun
Dollars 359.3 (358.5)
London:
Dollars 356.75 (357.3)
 -----------------------------------
N SEA OIL (ARGUS)
 -----------------------------------
Brent Jun
Dollars 20.175 (19.875)
 -----------------------------------
DOLLAR
 -----------------------------------
Tokyo open: Y138.35
New York
DM  1.7305 (1.732)
FFr  5.855 (5.86)
SFr  1.462 (1.4635)
Y  138.05 (138.32)
London:
DM  1.743 (1.733)
FFr  5.8925 (5.865)
SFr  1.4725 (1.4655)
Y  139.25 (138.3)
Dollar index  66.7 (66.2)
 -----------------------------------
US CLOSING RATES
 -----------------------------------
Fed Funds 5% (5 5/8)
3-mo Treasury Bills:
yield: 5.63% (5.64)
Long Bond:
96 3/16  (96 1/16)
yield: 8.21% (8.22)
 -----------------------------------
STOCK INDICES
 -----------------------------------
FT-SE 100:
2,541.8 (+18.4)
FT Ordinary:
1,996.2 (+12.1)
FT-A All-Share:
1,226.05 (+0.7%)
FT-A World Index:
144.42 (+0.2%)
New York
DJ Ind. Av.
2,971.15 (+40.25)
S&amp;P Comp
383.25 (+4.74)
Tokyo: Nikkei
26,438.5 (+128.71)
 -----------------------------------
LONDON MONEY
 -----------------------------------
3-month interbank:
closing 11 17/32% (11 1/2)
Liffe long gilt future:
Jun 91 31/32   (91 29/32)
 -----------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-675</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World News in Brief: Concert pianist dies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Renowned Austrian-born American concert pianist Rudolf Serkin, died aged 88
in Vermont, New England.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-676</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World News in Brief: Bush back in hospital
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
US president George Bush returned to hospital for more tests on an
overactive thyroid gland that doctors say led to his heart condition.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-677</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World News in Brief: Armed police patrols
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Armed police will be on duty in London from July, Scotland Yard said. Up to
five crews of three officers will provide rapid response to incidents
requiring armed police. However the number of officers authorised to use
firearms will be cut by 1,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-678</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / OFT seeks power to probe cartels
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER, Industrial Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A DEMAND for tougher powers to investigate and impose penalties on cartels
came yesterday from Sir Gordon Borrie, director-general of the Office of
Fair Trading.
It was the second time this week that Sir Gordon had criticised the
government's approach to competition policy.
On Tuesday he told a parliamentary select committee that the policy of Mr
Peter Lilley, the trade and industry secretary who has referred bids by
state-owned groups to the Monopolies and Mergers Commission, was in
disarray.
Sir Gordon wants to be allowed to impose fines of up to 10 per cent of
turnover on companies operating cartels.
He also wants the government to broaden the OFT's powers to investigate
cartels which operate within Britain. This would allow the OFT to match
within the UK the European Commission's power to investigate cartels
involving trade within the EC.
Sir Gordon told a conference on regulation organised by the Institute of
Economic Affairs: 'My officials accompany their counterparts from the EC
when they mount raids in Britain and come back telling me how useful wider
investigative powers would be.'
He said it was unfortunate there was no sign of legislation on the issue
even though the government had committed itself to such a measure in a White
Paper on competition policy in July 1989.
Sir Gordon hopes that a commitment to strengthen the OFT's powers to
investigate cartels will be included in a forthcoming speech by Mr Lilley in
which he plans to clarify the government's approach to competition policy.
Sir Gordon told the conference that the pace of regulatory reform over the
past 12 years - with the creation of powerful regulatory bodies to oversee
privatised telecommunications, gas, electricity and water utilities - had
created a patchwork of agencies and regulatory instruments.
He raised doubts about the effectiveness of self-regulatory bodies under the
Financial Services Act. The procedure under which he reported to the trade
and industry secretary was a 'special, awkward and peculiar regime'.
He said there was a risk regulations designed to protect investors were
counter-productive because they imposed heavy costs on a dwindling number of
independent financial advisers.
Regulators confer, Page 8
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-679</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Major to meet BMA on health reforms
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN PIKE, Social Affairs Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE prime minister yesterday agreed to meet leaders of Britain's doctors as
the government faced political uproar over the effects of its health
reforms.
Last month Mr John Major refused to meet British Medical Association leaders
and rejected their claims that the National Health Service needed more
money. The announcement that he will now see the doctors came as Mr William
Waldegrave, the health secretary, failed to calm the BMA's fears about the
direction the reforms are taking.
Dr Jeremy Lee-Potter, chairman of the BMA council, left a meeting with Mr
Waldegrave yesterday saying he was 'not reassured'. Mr Waldegrave, he said,
appeared to be 'ideologically wedded' to central aspects of last month's
reforms which were already damaging the NHS. When the doctors' leaders meet
Mr Major, they will express concern about the reforms and call for health
funding to be increased to the generally higher levels of other western
nations.
'I think that the prime minister has to listen in the end,' Dr Lee-Potter
said. 'I do not believe our health care system can carry on being funded at
three-quarters of the level of our neighbours in Europe.'
The NHS reforms - introduced only five weeks ago - have already confronted
the government with three potentially damaging controversies.
Two of the new self-governing hospital trusts have ann-ounced up to 1,000
job losses because of financial problems; the Universities Funding Council
and Committee of Vice-Chancellors and Principals has expressed fears that
the reforms may damage medical education; and concern is mounting that
patients of some general practitioners will receive preferential treatment
in a two-tier hospital system.
Mr Waldegrave last night told the Royal College of General Practitioners the
government was ready to modify the GP fund-holding scheme, under which
participating family doctors have budgets and purchase hospital treatment on
behalf of their patients, in the light of experience this year.
'I fully understand that there are legitimate anxieties about the operation
of the scheme among GPs and consultants alike,' said the health secretary.
There might, he said, need to be 'some ground rules agreed' about what a
fund-holder could ask a hospital to provide.
During his meeting with the BMA, however, Mr Waldegrave failed to dispel
concern that hospitals were offering fund-holding GPs preferential treatment
for their patients in order to win contracts.
Mr Waldegrave accepted after the meeting that in non-urgent cases, GP
fund-holders might be able negotiate favourable arrangements for their
patients, provided these did not put a hospital's other contracts at risk.
He believed the solution was to enlarge the fund-holding scheme and give all
patients the advantages of such arrangements.
The health secretary's meeting was followed last night by an announcement by
Riverside Health Authority, which runs London's Charing Cross and
Westminster teaching hospitals, that it had approved 435 job losses.
Claims that fund-holding was producing a two-tier system of health care also
surfaced at prime minister's question time in the Commons with Mr Neil
Kinnock, opposition leader, saying that the clinical needs of patients were
coming second to commercial considerations. Earlier yesterday, Labour
launched a campaign to oppose plans for 120 more hospitals and other
services to become self-governing trusts next year.
Parliament, Page 10
Tories cool, Page 16
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-680</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / US acts to halve cost of international phone calls
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGO DIXON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MEASURES to halve the price of US international telephone calls were
unveiled by communications authorities in Washington yesterday, in a move
which would save the country's consumers about Dollars 3.5bn (Pounds 2bn) a
year.
The action by the Federal Communications Commission, the industry regulator,
could have a strong impact on the income foreign telecoms utilities receive
from the US and is likely to press them to cut their own prices for outgoing
international calls.
The FCC's main target is the complex accounting rate system determining how
phone companies share international call revenue.
An accounting rate is the amount US phone companies pay their foreign
counterparts for delivering calls to their destinations. The current system
penalises any country which cuts its international prices.
The Financial Times last year showed that consumers across the world were
being overcharged by more than Dollars 10bn a year for international calls.
The FCC yesterday directed US telephone companies such as AT&amp;T, MCI and US
Sprint to negotiate lower accounting rates with their foreign counterparts.
It wants the companies to focus on Europe and Asia, where it believes rates
could be cut by half.
The FCC also proposed further regulatory action if there has been
insufficient progress towards lowering accounting rates by the beginning of
1993. This could include the US cutting accounting rates unilaterally.
Mr Alfred Sikes, chairman of the FCC, said: 'International communications
should be a means of strengthening mutual responsibility and understanding
and furthering important goals including expanded liberalised world trade.
'It should not be a process through which American international callers
are, in effect, burdened with involuntary excessive costs.'
The commission's action follows similar moves by the UK's Office of
Telecommunications and the launch of a European Commission inquiry.
International charges are to be addressed by the Organisation for Economic
Co-operation and Development in Paris next week.
Although FCC officials argued that the action was tough, some commentators
doubted whether it would be sufficient to achieve the commission's
objectives.
One pointed out that foreign telephone companies could simply refuse to
re-negotiate lower accounting rates.
However, the FCC officals believe that the threat of unilateral action will
strengthen the negotiating position of US telephone companies.
They argue that foreign telephone companies are likely to lower rates rather
than force the issue to a conflict.
Technology, Page 11
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-681</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Yugoslavia gives army wide powers to avert civil war
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURA SILBER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BELGRADE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
YUGOSLAVIA yesterday inched back from the brink of civil war and military
rule when the eight-member federal presidency agreed to give the army
sweeping powers to end ethnic clashes in the republic of Croatia.
In a desperate effort to reach consensus after months of bitter
disagreement, the collective presidency also agreed to form a commission to
investigate the roots of the crisis. This is the first time the presidency
has publicly acknowledged the ethnic nature of Yugoslavia's worst political
crisis since the Second World War.
The eleventh-hour compromise - made against the background of army threats
to impose a state of emergency without the presidency's consent  - could buy
the authorities a short period to restore stability after the clashes
between Serbs and Croats which in the past week have led to the deaths of 18
people.
A statement from the presidency orders Serbs and Croats in Croatia to hand
over their weapons to the federal army authorities, prohibits the movement
of any armed civilian units in unstable regions of the republic, and insists
on the demobilisation of all citizens and police reservists in Croatia. It
seems unlikely, however, given the deep distrust between Yugoslavia's two
biggest ethnic groups, that either Serbs or Croats will comply with the
order to hand over their weapons.
Mr Franjo Tudjman, president of Croatia, said it was 'absolutely out of the
question that Croatia's police reservists would demobilise'. In Belgrade,
the federal capital and capital of the Republic of Serbia, thousands of
demonstrators at what was originally a peace rally finished by calling for
the establishment of a Serbian army.
The presidential agreement gives the army and federal police control over
the predominantly Serbian territory of Krajina, in eastern Croatia. Krajina
comprises about a third of Croatia's territory. But in a concession to
Croatia, the statement recognised the inviolability of its borders, as
sought by Croatian leaders.
Serbian leaders in Krajina have since August refused to allow Croatian
police into the region, claiming that the police resemble the 'Ustashe', the
Nazi-backed Croat government set up during the Second World War.
Concern about the fate of Serbs in an independent Croatia has been
manipulated by Serbia's communist authorities in order to gain support for
their dispute with Croatia's pro-independence leaders.
The commission being set up under the agreement will include 'legitimate'
representatives from Croatia and the republic's Serbian minority.
However, its composition has already been criticised by Mr Tudjman. He said
negotiations with Serbs could only include 'the legitimately elected
representatives to the Croatia parliament . . . (this) absolutely excludes
Serbian leaders in rebel-held Knin (in the Krajina) who came to power
through violence and terror'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-682</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / FT Law Report: Director must come to court
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RACHEL DAVIES, Barrister
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN RE SEAGULL MANUFACTURING CO LTD
Chancery Division: Mr Justice Mummery: April 30 1991
A DIRECTOR of an insolvent company in compulsory liquidation can be ordered
by the court to attend for public examination as to the company's affairs,
irrespective of his nationality and notwithstanding that he resides out of
the jurisdiction; and, at the court's discretion, he can be served with the
public examination order at his foreign residence.
Mr Justice Mummery so held when allowing an appeal by the Official Receiver
from Mr Registrar Pimm's decision setting aside an order for public
examination of Mr Colin John Slinn, director of Seagull Manufacturing Co
Ltd, and an order for service of a copy of that order on Mr Slinn in
Alderney.
HIS LORDSHIP said that Seagull, an English private company, carried on the
business of computer utility organisation from a registered office in
Dorchester.
Mr Slinn was a director from January 27 1986 to July 3 1988 and was the
tenant of the Dorchester premises. He did not deny that he was a British
subject, but he claimed that from January 1979 until July 1986 he resided
and was domiciled in the Isle of Man, and that since July 1986 he had been
resident and domiciled in Alderney, Channel Islands.
Seagull was being wound up by the court on the ground of public interest,
following a Department of Trade and Industry enquiry. It was alleged that
Seagull was insolvent. The estimated claims exceeded Pounds 2m.
Since April 4 1990, when the compulsory winding-up order was made, the
Official Receiver had unsuccessfully attempted to persuade Mr Slinn to
submit a statement of affairs and to co-operate by providing information
required in the winding-up.
On July 17 1990, on the application of the Official Receiver, Mr Registrar
Buckley (1) ordered Mr Slinn to attend the Royal Courts of Justice on
September 25 for public examination; and (2) ordered service of a copy of
the public examination order at Mr Slinn's address in Alderney.
On September 25 Mr Registrar Pimm set aside both orders on the ground that
they were made without jurisdiction, since Mr Slinn was in Alderney at the
material time.
The Official Receiver appealed on the ground that on their true
construction, section 133 of the Insolvency Act 1986 and rule 12.2 of the
Insolvency Rules 1986 empowered the court to order attendance of a British
subject who had been an officer of an English company in compulsory
winding-up, and to give leave to serve a public examination order on him,
notwithstanding his residence abroad.
Section 133 provided that in a winding-up by the court the Official Receiver
might apply for public examination of 'any person who (a) is or has been an
officer of the company'. Rule 4.211(1) of the Insolvency Rules provided that
after a public examination order was made 'a copy of the court's order shall
. . . be served on that person'.
Rule 12.12(3) provided that for purposes of insolvency proceedings, the
court might order service of process or court order 'on a person who is not
in England and Wales'.' Insolvency proceedings' meant any proceedings under
the Act or the Rules (rule 13.7).
There was a general rule of statutory construction that English legislation
was primarily territorial in effect.
In applying the territoriality rule the court must enquire as to the person
in respect of whom Parliament was legislating. In Clark v Oceanic
Contractors (1983) 2 AC 130, 152C Lord Wilberforce formulated the relevant
question as 'Who is within the legislative grasp or intendment of the
statute under consideration?'
In re Tucker (1990) Ch 148 the Court of Appeal held that section 25 of the
Bankruptcy Act 1914, which empowered the court to require attendance of the
debtor or 'any person' for private examination, did not assert a
jurisdiction over British subjects resident abroad. Lord Justice Dillon
rejected a contention that 'any person' in section 25 meant any person in
the world, or any British subject anywhere in the world.
Ultimately, however, the question as to who were the persons with respect to
whom Parliament was presumed to be legislating must turn on the language,
context and purpose of section 133.
The 1986 Act provisions for private examination of a bankrupt were in
sections 366 and 367. Section 367(3) provided that the court might order
examination in or outside the UK of 'any person who if within the
jurisdiction would be liable to be summoned under section 366'. In Tucker
Lord Justice Dillon said of equivalent wording in section 25(6) of the 1914
Act that it 'carries inevitably the connotation' that if the person was not
in England he was not liable to be brought before the court.
There was little doubt that on the authority of Tucker sections 366 and 367
were subject to the same territorial qualification as section 25 of the 1914
Act.
Sections 236 and 237 of the 1986 Act conferred a similar power to order
private examination of a company officer.
It was submitted for Mr Slinn that in the light of those provisions it was
unlikely that Parliament intended section 133 to apply to a person out of
the jurisdiction.
The section 133 public examination provisions were not territorially limited
in the same way as the private examination provisions of sections 236, 237,
366 and 367.
The private examination provisions were different from the section 133
provisions in two important respects.
First, the power to summon persons for private examination extended to a
much wider class than for public examination.
The power to summon for private examination applied not only to any officer
of the company or the bankrupt, but also to any person who might have in his
possession property of the company or bankrupt, or might be indebted to the
company or bankrupt. It even extended to any person who might be able to
give information concerning the company or bankrupt.
The second important difference was that the private examination sections
contained express provisions which conclusively and inevitably connoted that
if the person was not in England he was not liable to be brought before the
English court. Such provision was conspicuously absent from section 133.
It was more appropriate to compare the section 133 provisions with public
examination provisions relating to bankrupts, than with private examination
provisions.
The relevant provisions for public examination of a bankrupt were now
contained in section 290 of the 1986 Act. The power to order public
examination of the bankrupt was not confined to British subjects or other
persons present or resident in England (see definition of 'debtor', section
265).
The public examination provisions relating to bankrupts were similar in
three respects to the section 133 provisions.
First, the court might only order public examination of the bankrupt.
Similarly in the case of a winding up, under section 133 the court might
only order public examination of a person who had voluntarily participated
in a specified capacity in the affairs of the company.
Second, the court had no discretion to refuse to direct a public examination
in the case of a bankrupt or a winding-up, if the application was duly made
in accordance with the relevant sub-section (sections 290(3) and 133(3)).
Third, neither the provisions relating to public examination of a bankrupt
nor those relating to public examination in a winding-up contained any
provision similar to that in section 25(6) of the 1914 Act, now in sections
367(3) and 237(3) of the 1986 Act.
Section 133 on its true construction plainly implied that it applied to all
who fell within a class of persons specified in section 133(1), whether or
not they were British subjects, and whether or not they were within the
jurisdiction at the relevant time.
Parliament had legislated for public examination of persons who had acted in
one capacity or another in relation to the affairs of a company which was
either liable to be, or was being, wound up by the English court under
English law.
One would expect such persons to be 'within the legislative grasp, or
intendment' of section 133, whether or not they were in England and whether
or not they could be served with a summons in England.
The appeal was allowed. Mr Registrar Buckley's orders were restored.
For the Official Receiver: Nigel Davis (Treasury solicitor).
For Mr Slinn: Robin Hollington (Vance Harris, Crowborough).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 36
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-683</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Optimism about inflation
boosts Madrid
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE SPANISH market broke out of its narrow trading range of the previous few
days, with a gain of 1.1 per cent in moderate trading. Most bourses were
closed yesterday for Ascension Day, writes Our Markets Staff.
MADRID firmed in response to rises on Wall Street and on hopes that next
week's inflation figure would show only a small rise. The general index
gained 3.0 to 282.55 in turnover of Pta13bn, up from Pta11bn.
A rumour that Banesto was looking to sell a stake in Petromed, its oil arm,
to BP at about Pta9,000 a share lifted Petromed Pta180 to Pta7,830. Cepsa, a
rival oil company, gained Pta50 to Pta2,240 in heavy volume of 232,291
shares.
The banking, oil and construction sectors were strong. Popular added Pta250
to Pta11,150 and Banesto gained Pta65 to Pta3,725.
MILAN closed little changed in technical trading before the end of the
trading month on May 15. The Comit index eased 0.5 to 574.38 in volume
estimated at less than Wednesday's meagre L109bn.
Pirelli Spa was one of the few big movers, rising L50 or 3 per cent to
L1,675 on news that the board of Continental, the German tyremaker, was
meeting at short notice to discuss possible co-operation with the Italian
company.
Alleanza, Generali's life insurance unit, also rose 3 per cent or L1,600 to
L53,100 after reporting a 26.7 per cent rise in 1990 net profit to L131.2bn
as well as a scrip issue.
HELSINKI rose 0.9 per cent with two large transactions dominating otherwise
quiet trading. Kesko, the wholesaler, gained FM0.50 to FM40 with 222,300
shares traded, while Interbank B shares slipped FM0.10 to FM12.90 on 148,000
shares. The Hex index added 10.09 to 1,089.62 as turnover eased to FM24m
from FM44.5m.
ATHENS's general index fell 34.53 or 3.1 per cent to 1,063.70, while the
banking index lost 61.48 or 4.9 per cent to 1,205.24. ISTANBUL's 75-share
index fell 86.89 or 2.3 per cent to 3,608.01.
Johannesburg was closed yesterday.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100 - May 9
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes*
Open     10 am    11 am    Noon     1 pm     2 pm     3 pm     Close
1125.14  1124.97  1124.90  1124.09  1124.36  1125.17  1126.10  1125.62*
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
           Day's High   1126.36     Day's Low   1123.52
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
May 8      May 7      May 3       May 2      May 1
1119.87    1125.75    1129.77     1128.32    1110.32
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value 1000 (26/10/90)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
*Indicative.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-684</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Nikkei rises on
arbitrage buying
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Tokyo
ARBITRAGE buying pushed share prices higher for the first time in four days
in trading dominated by the expiration of May options, writes Emiko Terazono
in Tokyo.
The Nikkei average ended 128.71 ahead at 26,438.50 after a day's low of
26,290.36 and a high of 26,470.36. Volume expanded to 330m shares from 270m,
but most of it was arbitrage-related.
Advances led declines by 522 to 392, with 201 issues unchanged. The Topix
index of all first section stocks put on 2.81 to 1,989.85, but in London the
ISE/Nikkei 50 index eased 0.47 to 1,503.03.
Investors again focused on second-liners for quick profits, while rumours of
new regulations on over-the-counter trading aroused interest in medium-sized
and small stocks listed on regional stock exchanges.
Mr Hiroyuki Maki at County NatWest Securities said this new interest could
grow. 'Speculative interest has shifted away from the first section
following the 5 per cent disclosure rule on shareholdings,' he said.
The overnight gain on Wall Street and the strong US book-to-bill ratio
sparked buying in electricals and precision machinery makers. Nikon added
Y40 at Y1,430. Dainippon Screen, a semiconductor maker, advanced Y40 to
Y1,740.
Nihon Nohyaku, the agrochemical group which has risen recently on rumours of
speculative buying, receded Y120 to Y2,420. The Tokyo Stock Exchange raised
the margin requirement on the stock from 30 per cent to 50 per cent to
counter its volatility.
Issues expected to benefit from Japan Railway's capital investment were
recommended by Japanese brokerages. Nippon Densetsu, a track and signals
installation company, moved ahead Y70 to Y2,010 and Totetsu Kogyo, a track
maker, added Y120 at Y1,380.
Nissan Motor fell Y17 to Y768 on reports that its pre-tax profits for the
current year would decline 38 per cent. Other automobile issues also lost
ground.
Shibusawa Warehouse gained Y100 to Y1,180 on favourable profit projections
thanks to rising real estate earnings. Takuma, a boiler maker, rose
initially on reports that it had developed a system which reduces poisonous
dioxine from garbage incinerators, but ended a net Y20 down at Y1,240 after
late profit-taking.
In Osaka, the OSE average shed 58.40 to 29,126.92 on volume of 23.5m shares.
Investors sought small-capital issues with good earnings forecasts.
Tachibana Shokai, a retailer for Mitsubishi Electric, rose Y110 to Y3,560 on
expectations that strong growth in the electronic information equipment
business would boost profits.
Issues listed in Nagoya were sought. U. Store, a supermarket chain, climbed
Y160 to Y2,770 and Eidensha, an electric appliance retailer, firmed Y50 to
Y1,500.
Roundup
MANY Pacific Rim markets failed to hold on to early gains yesterday.
AUSTRALIA was knocked off the day's high by disappointing April unemployment
data. The All Ordinaries index lost an early gain of nine points to close up
just 0.6 at 1,546.3. Turnover increased to ADollars 307m from ADollars 294m.
Bundaberg Sugar gained 6 cents to ADollars 3.84. After the close, Tate &amp;
Lyle said it was extending its offer for the company by three weeks.
Leighton lost 4 cents to ADollars 1.30 on news of a one-for-four rights
issue and a placement of new shares.
MANILA ended mixed as profit-taking curtailed a strong performance.
Philippine Long Distance Telephone led the market higher, closing up 20
pesos at 517.50 pesos after gaining Dollars 1.13 to Dollars 19.36 on the
American Stock Exchange. The composite index advanced 5.07 to 1,118.50 in
turnover of 239.3m pesos, up from 108.6m.
TAIWAN was boosted by reports of Japanese institutional buying, targeted at
banks and property shares. The weighted index climbed 132.57 or 2.2 per cent
to 6,305.22 in turnover of TDollars 76.9bn, against TDollars 95.9bn. Plastic
issues rose on reports that China had agreed to Formosa Plastics Group's
proposal to set up a petrochemical complex in the Chinese province of
Fujian.
NEW ZEALAND resumed its rally on renewed foreign demand after Wednesday's
profit-taking. The Barclays index moved up 11.95 to 1,568.49 as block sales
raised turnover to NZDollars 38m from NZDollars 20m. A block of 13.6m Asian
Properties shares - 18 per cent of the investment company's capital - was
traded at 97 cents apiece.
SEOUL rebounded after its recent weakness, though anti-government protests
kept investors on the sidelines. The composite stock index closed at 634.72,
up 3.60 on steady turnover of Won81.5bn.
BANGKOK rose on speculative buying of stocks similar to four new issues due
to be floated today. The SET index gained 5.32 to 853.99 in thin trading
worth 3.53bn baht.
SINGAPORE fell back from an early climb. The Straits Times Industrial index
closed up 2.59 at 1,525.74 after volume of 46.15m shares (41.57m).
KUALA LUMPUR surrendered part of an early rise, the composite index ending
3.02 up at 584.96 after 32.7m shares traded (29.6m).
HONG KONG's Hang Seng index eased 3.34 to 3,744.46 in turnover down to
HKDollars 948m from HKDollars 1.15bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-685</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World Stock Markets: Sky-high Caracas attracts some
criticism - The need to make Venezuela more attractive to foreign investors
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOE AMNN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALTHOUGH Caracas had the highest growth of the world's stock markets last
year - 555 per cent in dollar terms, according to the IFC - the Venezuelan
stock market still has some serious disadvantages as far as foreign
investors are concerned, says the head of a UK regional investment fund.
Mr Audley Twiston Davies, chief executive of Latin American Securities, a
joint venture between Foreign and Colonial Management and a Brazilian
investment bank, said recently that trading in Caracas was restricted, thin
and potentially unfair to minority shareholders.
During a conference on privatisation held in Caracas, he noted that 'an
attractive market' should be 'efficient, regulated to prevent insider
trading, have adequate information available on the market and good
liquidity. Venezuela scores rather badly on all those'.
Mr Twiston Davies, whose fund has placed several hundred million dollars on
Latin America's five leading stock markets, also noted that the Caracas
exchange's regulatory body is ineffective, and that a 50 per cent tax on
capital gains is too high, especially in comparison with Mexico and Brazil.
Venezuela has much to offer foreign investors, he added, but 'the truth must
be told about the stock market, even though this may hurt'.
He suggested that privatisation of government-owned companies in Venezuela
might broaden the Caracas stock exchange and make it more attractive to
foreign investors.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-686</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World Stock Markets: Calm returns after volatile months -
Taiwan led emerging market gains in April
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JACQUELINE MOORE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CALM returned to most of the world's emerging markets in April, after two
months of diverse and wide movements in the country indices. Only four of
the 17 developing markets covered by the International Finance Corporation,
part of the World Bank, showed double-digit percentage changes on the month
in dollar terms.
Of these four, Taiwan and Mexico moved sharply higher, while Turkey and
Greece were the worst performers.
Mr Peter Bristowe of Hoare Govett comments: 'Taiwan has had a good run, but
there have been ups and downs within that. The market could now be at the
peak of its rally, because calls on liquidity are growing.' He cites the
announcement this week of the flotation of part of the government's stake in
Chinese Petroleum, and a government bond issue to raise TDollars 45bn
(USDollars 1.65bn).
Last month's optimism was based on the government's plans to raise
infrastructure spending over the next few years, and the potential
establishment of direct trading links between Taiwan and mainland China,
says Mr Bristowe.
April's other winner, Mexico, has been rising steadily for most of this
year. Baring Securities provided a long list of reasons in its Latin
American summary in mid-April. 'Factors contributing to the market's strong
performance,' said Baring, 'include improved company financial results, the
fall in interest rates, the massive inflow of foreign investment, the
imminent bank privatisations and the sale of the remaining shares in Telmex,
combined with widespread optimism about the country's economic prospects.'
Optimism about the free trade agreement with the US and strong demand for
shares of oil company Telmex in the New York and Mexican markets also lifted
the index. Telmex has risen 91 per cent over the first four months of 1991.
The picture was less bright in Europe. Turkey continued to be the year's
most depressed emerging market.
Mr Kaya Didman of Turk Economi Bank in Istanbul says there are several
reasons for the decline. In the last 2 1/2 months, he says, short-term
interest rates have risen sharply, with overnight rates of 100 per cent,
against about 60 per cent in the previous 10 to 12 months. This is an
indication of the country's severe cash shortage, which has forced the banks
 -the main institutional investors in Turkey - to sell equities.
There has also been a fast depreciation of the Turkish lira against the
dollar and other major currencies, causing retail investors to turn to the
foreign exchange market. The sharp fluctuations in the exchange rate, in
turn, have produced volatile movements in the stock market.
Investors have also been beset by economic and political worries, says Mr
Didman, although he points out that the fundamentals look good, with
corporate earnings growth of 10 per cent expected this year.
The decline in Greece came as no surprise. The New York-based Kleiman
International Consultants in its latest Emerging Markets Briefing says:
'After the 'casino euphoria' of the past year, investors have come to
recognise that the country's deep-seated economic difficulties will not be
resolved so quickly or easily and setbacks are inevitable.'
THE Sao Paulo Bovespa index in Brazil jumped 5.3 per cent by midday
yesterday to 74,014, up 3,728. The rise followed the naming of a new economy
minister.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-687</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Money Markets: Short rates firm
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SHORT TERM interest rates were firm in London yesterday after the Bank of
England's operations on the money market, but three-month interbank
continued to discount a cut of  1/2 point in bank base rates, while longer
rates declined.
The Bank of England bought bills for repurchase by the market around the end
of the month, indicating caution about an early reduction in base rates, but
the market still regards next Friday as a possible date for a cut following
publication of the UK retail price index for April.
Apart from the repurchase agreement the authorities also indicated caution,
and kept the short end firm, by not supplying enough assistance to take out
the day's full underlying credit shortage.
Overnight money traded around 12 3/4 per cent after the authorities had
intervened in the market, with three-month money quoted at 11 9/16 -11 1/2
per cent against 11 9/16 -11 7/16 . One-year funds fell to 11 1/8 -11 from
11 3/16 -11 1/16 per cent.
Prices of short sterling futures were firmer on Liffe. June delivery opened
slightly higher at 88.89 and closed at 88.91 compared with 88.98 previously.
Credit remained in very short supply on the London money market. The Bank of
England initially forecast a shortage of Pounds 1,650m, but revised this to
Pounds 1,700m at noon and back to Pounds 1,650m in the afternoon. Total
assistance of Pounds 1,548m was provided.
An early round of help was offered and at that time the authorities bought
Pounds 743m bills, including Pounds 193m outright, by way of Pounds 15m bank
bills in band 1 at 11 7/8 per cent; Pounds 6m Treasury bills in band 2 at 11
13/16 per cent; and Pounds 172m bank bills in band 2 at 11 13/16 per cent.
Another Pounds 550m bills were purchased for resale to the market in equal
amounts on May 29, 30 and 31 at rates of 11 29/32 -11 15/16 per cent.
Before lunch a further Pounds 428m bills were bought outright, via Pounds
43m bank bills in band 1 at 11 7/8 per cent; Pounds 163m Treasury bills in
band 2 at 11 13/16 per cent; and Pounds 222m bank bills in band 2 at 11
13/16 per cent. In the afternoon Pounds 222m bank bills were purchased in
band 1 at 11 7/8 per cent. Late assistance of around Pounds 155m was also
provided.
Bills maturing in official hands, repayment of late assistance and a take-up
of Treasury bills drained Pounds 806m, with exchequer transactions absorbing
Pounds 690m, a rise in the note circulation Pounds 40m and bank balances
below target Pounds 115m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-688</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / World Commodities Prices: Fruit &amp; Vegetables
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mangoes at 75p-Pounds 1.00 each (Pounds 1.00-1.50) are this week's best
fruit buy, reports the FFVIB. Avocados from Spain and South Africa at 35-50p
each (35-50p), and Cape Golden Delicious apples at 35-45p a lb (55-65p) are
all plentiful. English asparagus at Pounds 1.30-1.40 a lb (Pounds 1.30-1.40)
is superb quality this week, along with the Spania variety at Pounds
1.25-1.40 a lb (Pounds 1.25-1.40). Cherry tomatoes at Pounds 1.30-1.50
(Pounds 1.30-1.75) and beef varieties at 75p-Pounds 1.20 a lb (Pounds
1.00-1.25) are both abundant. Cucumber at 40-60p each (55-70p), Round
lettuce at 20-35p each (25-35p) and Iceberg lettuce at 60-85p each (60-85p)
are all good salad buys.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-689</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Commodities and Agriculture: Mining and smelting strike ends
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ABOUT 1,000 employees of Brunswick Mining &amp; Smelting's big zinc-lead mine in
New Brunswick finally voted to end a 10-month strike and the company has
begun recalling them.
In the region of 400 workers at the nearby smelter accepted a new contract
last week.
The Noranda subsidiary said average wages will rise from CDollars 15.38 an
hour to CDollars 19.38 during three years, and fringe benefits are improved.
The smelter will operate at about half capacity until autumn because large
custom contracts have been lost.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-690</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Commodities and Agriculture: Greece experiences record olive
oil shortfall
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KERIN HOPE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ATHENS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A GREEK farmer's prosperity is no longer judged by the number of olive trees
he owns, but in an average year, exports of table olives and olive oil still
account for almost one-quarter of the farm sector's foreign earnings.
In the past few months, however, the situation has been dramatically
reversed.
Instead of sending up to 100,000 tonnes of olive oil abroad, mostly as bulk
sales to Italy, Greece was forced to import about 40,000 tonnes to cover a
record shortfall caused by last year's disastrous drought.
Most came from Spain, with smaller quantities from Tunisia and Morocco.
There has been little publicity over the imports, which are blended with
stronger-tasting Greek oil in an attempt to disguise their origin.
'Greek consumers go to a lot of trouble to find good-quality olive oil. They
often prefer to bring back a few months' supply from a village rather than
buy it in the supermarket. Using foreign oil is almost sacrilege,' says an
olive oil merchant from the Peloponnese.
The Peloponnese and the island of Crete contribute two-thirds of total olive
oil production, amounting to about 320,000 tonnes in a normal year. Last
winter only 195,000 tonnes were produced, a drop of nearly 40 per cent.
Producer prices doubled to about Dr1,000 (Dollars 5.2) per kilogram.
The drought is blamed for a 10 per cent fall in gross agricultural product
in 1990, with cereals and olives the worst affected crops. Winter rainfall
was down to half the usual amount.
Fruit and vegetable production suffered less, though in many areas
irrigation had to be cut back.
Overall drought losses to farmers were estimated at Dr200bn (Dollars
1.05bn).
The table olive crop declined from 80,000 tonnes to about 50,000 tonnes,
leaving virtually no margin for exports.
Only 3,000 tonnes of oil have been sold abroad this year. Exports of table
olives usually bring in Dollars 80m annually, while oil earns more than
Dollars 200m.
The best quality oil comes from a few areas where the olives are picked by
hand while still slightly unripe, rather than beaten off the tree or left to
drop into nets.
These districts were among those most badly hit by the drought. In Laconia,
a Peloponnese province where most trees are hand picked, overall production
was down by close to 60 per cent.
'The crop was so small that careful picking made hardly any difference. We'd
actually have a shortage here if we didn't have a reserve left from last
year,' says Mr Constantine Panteleakis, the district's agricultural
director.
With the introduction in recent years of new varieties and improved
cultivation methods, the Greek olive crop is less subject to fluctuations in
alternate years, caused by the trees' biennial production cycle.
While the number of olive trees remains stable at about 125m in accordance
with European Community regulations, average production has risen by about
15 per cent during the past decade.
Although rainfall was heavy in the past winter and considerable amounts of
snow fell in mainland Greece, ground water levels are still believed to be
50 per cent below the 15-year average in much of the country.
'Olive trees are still at risk, because last year's severe drought came
after two very dry winters. Even before that, the frosts in 1987 had damaged
a large number of trees', says Mr Nicholas Craze of Harvest Commodities,
which tracks Greek agricultural production.
A good crop is, however, expected this year, with olive oil production
surpassing 360,000 tonnes according to early forecasts.
'It's too early to be sure because the trees are still coming into flower
but we think the Cretan crop should be well above average', says Mr Manolis
Daskalakis, a grower outside Heraklion in central Crete.
The Agriculture Ministry is forecasting a bumper cereals harvest this year
following sharply reduced production in 1990, when Greece was struck by its
worst drought this century.
Snowfalls and heavy winter rain in central and north eastern Greece, the
main grain-growing regions, have put moisture back in soil dried out by
three consecutive years of less than average rainfall.
Durum wheat output is expected to reach 1.7m tonnes, up from only 1m tonnes
last year. Soft wheat should reach 900,000 tonnes, compared with 680,000
tonnes last year. Overall wheat production declined by 30 per cent in 1990.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-691</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Commodities and Agriculture: Indians press for ban on chrome
ore export
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KUNAL BOSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CALCUTTA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
INDIAN producers of charge chrome have decided to resume the campaign for a
total ban on ore export, although the country has one of the largest
reserves of chrome ore (chromite).
Their earlier efforts resulted in the government restricting the export of
certain grades of ore. The producers are aware that the government, faced
with the worst foreign exchange crisis in memory, will be in no mood to
accept the suggestion of a total ban. They are expected to concentrate on
getting lump ore and ores with chromium content of more than 42 per cent
removed from the export list.
The country has total proven reserves of more than 150m tonnes, with about
100m tonnes at depths of less than 100 metres.
Producers want the government to direct mining companies to raise only
enough ore for domestic requirements. What they, however, have not taken
into account is that mining can become uneconomical if the level of activity
is drastically reduced.
India exports nearly 300,000 tonnes of chrome ore a year out of total
raisings of about 1m tonnes, mostly to Japan and Europe.
There is a value addition of more than 100 per cent when the ore is
processed into charge chrome.
Depressed international and domestic market conditions mean that the charge
chrome units are not able to utilise even 50 per cent of their installed
capacity. Most of the marginal units have already gone out of business.
Indian Metals and Ferro Alloys, Indian Charge Chrome and Ferro Alloys
Corporation - all big exporters - are struggling.
More than 90 per cent of Indian chrome ore is found in the Sukinda belt of
Orissa. Tatas, India's largest industrial house, and Orissa Minerals
Corporation (OMC) , a state undertaking, between them have leasehold more
than 90 per cent of established ore deposits in India. The charge chrome
producers complain that because of this monopoly situation, the prices of
ore charged by mine owners have no relation to the cost of raisings , but
rather to what the processors can bear.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-692</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / Commodities and Agriculture: Brazilian tin factory closure
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTORIA GRIFFITH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAO PAOLO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ESTANBRAS, the Brazilian tin group, is closing its Minas Gerais factory
because the government has forbidden the company to export its product.
The factory, which went into operation last year, was capable of producing
100 tonnes of tin each month. Since domestic demand is very small, the
prohibition on exports soon left the group with few customers.
In an attempt to push Brazil's small-time miners out of the country's tin
reserves, the government last December prohibited the export of tin taken
from illegal mines. Estanbras purchases its tin from 'garimpeiros' who do
not possess mining rights.
'The prohibition of exports by companies without mining rights means big
groups like Paranapanema may soon hold a monopoly on the sector,' said Jose
Nivaldo Gomes Cordeiro, director of Estanbras.
The group has sent away its 80 employees. Thousands contracted are out of
work.
Mr Cordeiro said there is hope that Estanbras will re-open the plant, if it
succeeds in negotiations with the government to obtain mining rights for the
area.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-693</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Capital Markets: Fox attempts to build on
property futures - The launch of a derivative in an area where others have
failed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
YESTERDAY'S launch of a UK property futures market by the London Futures and
Options Exchange (Fox) marks an attempt to create the world's first
successful such market - previous attempts in Chicago, France and Sidney
having failed.
The market allows developers and banks to reduce their exposure to market
movements; traders to speculate without buying and selling buildings; and
investors to switch their funds in and out of property more easily. Also,
houseowners and developers can hedge against fluctuations in mortgage rates.
Fox is introducing four separate but interrelated contracts, covering
commercial property, commercial rents, residential property and mortgage
interest rates.
They are based on a clutch of property indices: the IPD monthly capital
value and rent growth index (based on the valuation of 47 institutional
property funds), the Nationwide Anglia house price index, and the London Fox
mortgage interest rate index.
Someone hoping to make money from the new market has to take a view on the
accuracy of the consensus of where the indices are heading, which will be
reflected in the price of the futures. A trader will, for instance, profit
from buying futures, if prices rise by more than was expected when the
contract was taken out.
One of the main attractions (and risks) of using the futures market is that
contracts are highly geared, so only a small down-payment is needed to gain
exposure to the market. Another attraction is that transaction costs are far
lower than in the direct property market: Fox calculates average costs of
0.07 per cent for t for property.
Fox has appointed eight designated brokers, including Dean Witter, Goldman
Sachs, James Capel and Prudential-Bache. The contracts are traded
electronically, so the broker types the customer's order into the trading
screen. It is then automatically passed on to Fox's matching, allocation,
confirmation and clearing systems.
The contracts, which expire every three months during a three-year period,
are settled in cash. Their settlement is guaranteed by the International
Commodities Clearing House.
Fox's initiative has attracted intense interest and scepticism in roughly
equal measures. Marketing seminars about the futures launch have been well
attended, but many potential users say they would prefer to see the market
establish itself rather than commit funds straight away.
One difficulty for Fox is getting the message across. It is not easy to
market a new financial technique to an industry as large and diffuse as
property, which has not been eager to adopt financial innovations in the
past.
Fox has complained that institutions are as deaf to the virtues of a new
risk avoidance strategy as they are risk averse to new markets. Moreover,
surveyors, whose clients are potential users of property futures, appear to
be unfamiliar and uncomfortable with the futures market. 'A lot of them have
said they are going to wait and see,' says Mr Jon Payne, business
development director of Fox.
London Fox may also be handicapped by the mood of caution in the property
industry. Few developments are planned and investors appear to lack
enthusiasm to expand the range of their operations.
That said, it is possible that the uncertain climate in the property
industry will give the property futures market just the kickstart it needs.
The recent collapse in property values may have helped the cause of the
property futures by undermining the market's past claim of stability.
The usual consensus in the industry (which has led to worries that it would
be a one-way market) has been shattered - for the moment. For example, at a
seminar held by Fox, the number of investment surveyors who reckoned that
the market value would increase by the end of the year was nicely matched by
the number who thought it would fall.
The large divergence of views should help create a healthy distribution of
buyers and sellers. Fox may also be helped by the illiquidity in the market
at present. An institution that believes the property market has hit bottom
may wish to lock into existing prices with futures, rather than risk a rapid
price rise.
However, the main criticism about the contracts is that they measure the
average performance of the property market, which blurs the considerable
difference in behaviour between different sectors and regions. Some
institutions, such as Scottish Amicable, say that only when this problem is
resolved will it be interested in property futures.
The possibility of using more narrowly-focused indices was dismissed because
of the likely lack of liquidity. Instead, Fox hopes that financial
institutions will help by offering tailor-made policies for individual
portfolios, whose aggregate risk can be offset using the futures market.
As the market kicks off, Fox is anxious to see how much momentum can be
built in the market's early stages. None the less, a slow start will not be
disastrous, thanks to the relatively low costs of screen-based trading. 'The
start-up period will not take one day or one month,' says Mr Payne. 'We can
manage three years quite easily.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25 Photograph The Fox base at Commodity Quay, property prices
have created their own derivative (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-694</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Capital Markets: Prices indicate values to
bottom out in spring
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER, Property Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE decline in commercial property values is expected to bottom out next
spring, according to the prices posted in the first day of the London
Futures and Options Exchange property futures market, writes Vanessa
Houlder, Property Correspondent.
Prices indicated that the Investment Property Databank capital value index
would fall 2.5 per cent between March 1991 and March 1992, but then rise
steadily.
Volume was three-quarters of that expected. There was little business in the
commercial rental values, house price and residential mortgage rate
contracts. By the end of the day contracts valued at Pounds 15m had changed
hands.
Mr Jon Payne, business development director, said he was 'pretty happy'. But
Mr Tim Bolton-Carter of James Capel, a designated broker for the market,
said that trading had been 'a little disappointing'. Business was
concentrated in the commercial value contracts, which accounted for 126 of
the 152 lots traded. Most of the activity was in the contracts relating to
the coming year.
Fox said trading was by a range of brokers, end users and traders dealing on
their own account. One broker said that the slow trading reflected the
conservative nature of the property profession.
The thinly-traded commercial rental value contracts implied a decline of
nearly 3.5 per cent in the next year.
Futures on the Nationwide Anglia house price index also showed a bearish
trend to September this year, although they predicted a rise in house prices
by December.
Mortgage futures prices indicated an average building society mortgage rate
of just less than 12 per cent in December this year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-695</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Capital Markets: Pierson expands in UK options
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN FIDLER, Euromarkets Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PIERSON GROUP, the Dutch merchant bank owned by ABN Amro, is making further
inroads into the UK futures and options business. It is taking over
Citioptions, the options clearing house owned by Citicorp, and becoming a
minority shareholder in a new London-based futures and options broker.
Pierson, through its London subsidiary, International Clearing Services,
last year acquired the clearing business of LIT Futures to add to that of
Anglo-Dutch Options which it already owned.
The move thus gives it a leading position in options clearing at the London
Traded Options Market, ahead of the market's planned merger with the London
International Financial Futures Exchange.
It will take a 30 per cent holding in the new broker, Monument Derivatives,
with a further 30 per cent being held by Cygnus, a UK investment consortium
owned by 48 international companies and institutions. The remaining 40 per
cent is being held by management, led by Mr Martin Burton, a former director
of Citicorp Scrimgeour Vickers.
The broker will work on an agency basis and will not take positions for its
book.
According to Mr Burton, the existence of clearers such as Pierson, backed by
a highly-rated bank, makes it possible for small groups to establish
derivatives businesses with the strong capital base of the clearer providing
essential support for the transaction. This could help to unwind the trend
towards larger, more integrated houses seen in the 1980s.
Monument will be a member of the London Stock Exchange and the LTOM, and
will apply for Liffe membership.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-696</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Bonds: Nissan Capital America in Y20bn
five-year issue
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONE new issue emerged in the Eurobond market yesterday as the market came to
a virtual standstill due to the Ascension Day holiday in continental Europe.
The sole deal, a Y20bn issue of five-year bonds for Nissan Capital America,
a subsidiary of the Japanese car manufacturer, was targeted at Japanese
investors and will not be actively traded.
There is strong demand for corporate debt from yield-hungry Japanese
investors, and the Eurobond market is the cheapest route for borrowers,
bankers said.
But a benchmark issue for the World Bank, which traders expect to emerge
next week, is likely to be placed mainly in continental Europe, where the
emphasis is strongly on credit quality. European funds are starting to shift
from underweight positions in Japanese assets to neutral or overweight,
often as they shift out of overweight positions at home. Traders say many
fund managers are positive on both the currency and the prospect of interest
rate cuts in Japan.
Under its borrowing programme, the World Bank has Y50bn left to raise before
the end of its financial year on July 1. Nomura is set to lead the deal,
under the rotation system. Dealers expect the Bank to launch a 10-year deal,
but say it is uncertain whether to issue a new offering due 2001 or to add a
tranche to an existing Y30bn issue of 6 3/4 per cent bonds due 2000.
A World Bank official declined to comment on specific market rumours, but
confirmed the bank was looking at the market.
Meanwhile, activity is expected remain subdued today as most continental
European investors have taken a long weekend. However, a sterling
mortgage-backed offering is said to be on the way.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-697</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Capital Markets: IFC head backs call for
private funding
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MEXICO CITY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE head of the International Finance Corporation, Sir William Ryrie, has
strongly backed recent proposals that international development agencies
channel more of their resources to the private sector and less to public
sector projects.
In a speech given to the Pacific Basin Economic Council held in Guadalajara,
Mexico, Mr Ryrie called for 'a major shift towards market funding and
private investment' in developing countries. He also urged that
international development agencies concentrate less on 'providing large
amounts of capital to governments and more towards facilitating the markets
to provide resources for productive private investment'.
Mr Ryrie's remarks are at odds with the position of the World Bank, which
believes that its money is best spent on public-sector infrastructure
projects, thereby creating an 'enabling environment' for the private sector.
The Guadalajara speech also looks set to rekindle the debate over whether
the Inter-American Development Bank (IADB) should start lending more to the
private sector. Chile supports such a change in its lending rules. Mexico,
however, is strongly opposed, believing that the change would damage Latin
America's under-financed public sector, and lead to a fall in the IADB
credit rating.
Mr Ryrie argued that market-orientated economic policies in south-east Asia
and much of Latin America have already helped integrate their countries in
the world economy.
For example, noted Mr Ryrie, foreign direct investment into developing
countries has jumped from a nadir of Dollars 9bn to Dollars 10bn in the
early 1980s to an estimated Dollars 20bn in 1989. Foreign investment in
Thailand and Indonesia has increased tenfold since 1986.
In addition, in the past five years many developing countries for the first
time have been substantial recipients of portfolio investment. Since the IFC
set up the Korea fund in 1984, some 150 other country funds have been
launched, helping fuel emerging markets.
In the past year, private sector companies in Latin America - mainly in
Mexico and Venezuela - have raised over Dollars 800m of debt and equity in
the international markets. Private companies in Korea, Indonesia and
Malaysia have issued securities worth Dollars 1.1bn.
Many of these issues were co-managed by the IFC. Mr Ryrie hopes that other
international agencies will learn from the IFC's 'business-orientated,
risk-taking approach to project financing' and use it as a model for their
own lending.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24 Photograph William Ryrie, wants shift to market funding
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-698</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: United Engineers turns in 35%
first-quarter surge
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
UNITED Engineers, the Malaysian cement, construction and engineering group,
yesterday unveiled strong first-quarter results. The company lifted pre-tax
profits for the first quarter by 35 per cent to MDollars 35m (USDollars
12.6m) from MDollars 24m during the same period last year.
Turnover advanced to MDollars 99m, up from MDollars 88m previously, while
quarterly net profit rose 17 per cent to MDollars 20m to give earnings of
4.4 Malaysian cents a share, compared with 3.7 cents earlier.
Other companies within the group, Time Engineering, Cement Industries (Cima)
and Kinta Kellas, all reported a surge in pre-tax profit during the same
period.
Both Time and Kinta Kellas reversed their previous operating losses for
gains of MDollars 0.3m and MDollars 8m, respectively, on MDollars 44m and
MDollars 14m in turnover. At Cima, operating profit rose 41 per cent to
MDollars 8m on sales of MDollars 37m.
Net profits, which soared by 73 per cent and more among the three companies,
were MDollars 6m for Time, MDollars 5m for Kinta Kellas, and MDollars 11m
for Cima.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-699</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: Motorola plans Indian offshoot
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KUNAL BOSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CALCUTTA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MOTOROLA, the US electronics group, is seeking New Delhi approval to set up
an export-oriented company with a string of manufacturing units.
The proposed Indian subsidiary will make semiconductors, portable and mobile
telecom systems, cellular mobile radio equipment and radio paging systems.
Motorola, which intends to expand its presence in India, will be setting up
a software export centre at Bangalore which will largely cater for the
requirements of Motorola group.
It is also participating in several joint ventures in India to make a data
communication equipment.
The Indian partners in the first two ventures will be Blue Star and Meltron.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-700</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: Japanese retailer in Time Warner
cinemas link-up
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TIME WARNER, the US media and entertainment company, yesterday announced the
formation of a Y1bn (Dollars 7.24m) joint venture company with a Japanese
retailer, Nichii, to develop the country's first multi-screen cinema
complexes.
The companies have agreed that the equally-owned joint venture company,
Warner MyCal, will develop and manage up to 30 cinema complexes in shopping
centres run by the ambitious Osaka-based retailer, which has longer-term
hopes to create entertainment software.
Japanese land prices have been a serious problem for foreign companies
attempting to establish large-scale operations in Japan, and the Nichii
partnership will give Time Warner access to valuable sites in suburban
Japan.
Nichii is attempting to overhaul its image as a provincial supermarket
operator by developing shopping complexes with fitness centres and fashion
boutiques. By linking with Warner, the Japanese company hopes that a little
bit of Hollywood glamour will rub off on to its reputation.
Mr Robert Daly, chairman of Warner Bros, suggested that the deal represented
a 'great milestone in Japan for American business and the international
entertainment industry,' and would 'make going to the movies even more fun
for Japanese people'.
The companies reckoned the average American visits a cinema four times a
year, while in Japan the figure is 1.2 visits a year. Part of the problem,
they said, is that Japan has only 1,700 movie screens, compared with 23,000
in the US.
Warner will design the complexes and operate the theatres, which will be
similar to those built by the company in Europe and Australia, while Nichii
will supervise the construction on some of its 150 outlets and, if
necessary, acquire new sites.
Mr Toshimine Kobayashi, president of Nichii and the chairman of Warner
MyCal, said the new complexes would increase patronage and offer 'lifestyle
alternatives' to the young. He also suggested that tofu flakes, which his
company produces, could be sold in the cinemas along with, or in place of,
popcorn.
The complexes will have from six to 12 screens, and the partners plan to
show films well after the traditional 6pm final screening in suburban Japan.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-701</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: Sara Lee snaps up Linter
Textiles
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARK WESTFIELD
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
LINTER Textiles Corporation, Australia's largest clothing and textiles
group, once owned by entrepreneur Mr Abraham Goldberg, has been snapped up
by Sara Lee of the US after the collapse of the proposed sale to Merrill
Lynch Partners.
Mr Lindsay Maxsted, Linter receiver and manager of KPMG Peat Marwick, had
been trying to close the sale to Merrill Lynch since February. The deal had
all but collapsed last week with Merrill Lynch having trouble raising the
finance to complete when Sara Lee suddenly came in with a higher offer.
Merrill Lynch had managed to bring down the price of the 10 Linter
businesses from ADollars 230m (Dollars 179.60m) to ADollars 215m before its
bid ran into difficulty. The sale price to Sara Lee was undisclosed, but is
understood to be ADollars 220m.
Sara Lee, which produces hosiery, underwear and knitwear as well as food
products, made an unsuccessful attempt early this year to buy just the
Hilton Hosiery business out of Linter.
The US company already has a substantial presence in Australia with its
Kitchens of Sara Lee foods business and ownership of the drugs and household
products group Nicholas Kiwi. It can now include Linter's well-known brands,
which include Bradmill Textiles, Formfit, Hilton, King G, Kortex, Pelaco and
Stubbies.
Contracts for the sale were signed yesterday, and final settlement is
expected on May 31. The deal requires the approval of the Victorian Supreme
Court and the Foreign Investment Review Board.
When tenders were called for the businesses late last year, Linter was
estimated to earn about ADollars 55m before interest and tax for this
financial year. This forecast has been revised downwards as the Australian
economy goes into recession.
The group will also be adversely affected by the federal government's
decision in March to eliminate quota protection for the textiles and
clothing industry next year, two years earlier than foreshadowed in the
government's seven-year textiles, clothing and footwear plan.
In his statement yesterday, Mr Maxsted said Sara Lee had indicated it would
continue the Linter business as 'operating entities'.
'Towards this end, Sara Lee is prepared to make significant investment to
expand key businesses in the Linter group,' Mr Maxsted said.
Creditors are expecting a pay out of between 40 cents and 46 cents in the
dollar.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-702</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: Disney unveils Dollars 3bn
resort scheme
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE EXPANSION plans of Walt Disney, the US entertainment group, took on a
new dimension this week when the company unveiled a preliminary 'master
plan' for a Dollars 3bn resort next to its existing Disneyland centre in
Anaheim, Los Angeles, writes Nikki Tait.
The plan envisages a theme park - the Westcot Center - located on the
current Disneyland parking lot.
This would, in 'Disneyspeak', 'provide dramatic showcases of foreign lands
and themed pavilions that explore the wonders of the human body, our natural
environment and the universe beyond.'
Disney also suggests building three new hotels as part of the 470-acre
resort, together with a six-acre man-made lake, and an array of retail and
dining outlets.
However, it will not make any decision on whether to press ahead with the
scheme until the end of the year. It released plans last year to build a
Dollars 2bn project - a cross between a theme park, a water park and a
resort - at Long Beach, about 15 miles away, but, even then, it was known to
be considering the Anaheim site as another possibility.
As a result, there have been suggestions Disney is effectively creating
rivalry between two areas to attract its custom, although the possibility
that the company would build at both locations has also been mooted.
Disney said only that it was 'excited by the potential of each project' and
was doing feasibility work at both sites.
The decision would depend on 'several factors, including continued creative
development by Disney, government approvals and support, theme park and
resort economics and community support'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-703</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: Exports surge helps Angostura to
advance 22%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES CANUTE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KINGSTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ANGOSTURA Bitters, the Trinidadian distillers, recorded a TTDollars 15.9m
(USDollars 3.75m) net profit for the year ending December 1990, 22 per cent
higher than for the same period of 1989, writes James Canute in Kingston.
The company's turnover increased 2 per cent to TTDollars 163.6m, with export
earnings, mainly from rum, up 20 per cent to TTDollars 40m.
The board has recommended a final dividend of 13.34 cents per stock unit.
Mr Thomas Gatcliffe, chairman, said sales had not been affected as badly as
anticipated by the attempted coup in Trinidad in July.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-704</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: Wal-Mart rises against trend
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WAL-MART, the fast-growing Arkansas-based discount chain, yesterday posted a
22.7 per cent increase in earnings per share in the first quarter of 1991.
The result was in contrast to the continuing gloom in much of the US retail
sector.
The company said sales in the three months to the end of April jumped from
Dollars 6.77m to Dollars 9.28m, a rise of 37 per cent.
This, however, partly reflected acquisitions - in particular, the recent
purchase of McLane, a Texas-based concern, which accounted for Dollars
543.7m-worth of sales in the period. Without McLane, Wal-Mart said the sales
advance would have stood at 29 per cent. It described the underlying
like-for-like sales growth as 'good'.
In profit terms, Wal-Mart reported an improvement from Dollars 253m in the
first quarter of 1990, to Dollars 307m this time. This came despite an
increase in interest charges from Dollars 36.9m to Dollars 54.8m. Earnings
per share rose from 22 to 27 cents.
Mr David Glass, chief executive, said integration of the McLane business and
the Wholesale Club chain, both recent purchases, were going well.
Wal-Mart, which started as one general store in Arkansas 30 years ago, has
grown to be one of the largest retailers in the US. It comprises 1,591
Wal-Mart stores, 178 Sam's Clubs - which target the bottom end of the
discount market - and four Hypermart units.
Many of the US retail chains reported April sales figures yesterday, showing
year-on-year revenues increasing by significantly less than inflation.
The poor results, however, were partly due to the change in Easter dates. In
1990, Easter fell in April, whereas this relatively active shopping period
came in March this year.
Woolworth, for example, reported an 8 per cent sales decline for the four
weeks to May 4 this year, compared with the same period a year earlier.
However, the retailer said that for March and April overall, sales were
modestly higher - 0.5 per cent - than in 1991.
At Sears, April sales were up by 0.5 per cent on the previous year, but
like-for-like sales slipped by around 0.5 per cent.
J. C. Penney reported a 3.9 per cent gain, or 2.4 per cent on a
like-for-like basis. At K-mart, the figure rose by 4.6 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-705</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: State blocks Californian
electricity merger plan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
STATE regulators have blocked the proposed merger of two Californian
electricity companies. The deal would have created the largest
investor-owned power utility in the US.
SCEcorp, the parent of Southern California Edison, which provides power in
the Los Angeles area, has been trying since 1988 to take over San Diego Gas
and Electric, in a deal valued at more than Dollars 2.8bn. It is unclear
whether or not SCEcorp will appeal against the regulators' veto.
The unanimous ruling by the California Public Utilities Commission (PUC)
follows its consideration of a 1,300-page report, published last February,
which said the benefits of the merger would be outweighed by its negative
impact on competition.
The decision comes in the wake of several recent mergers in the widely
fragmented power generation sector. Analysts have suggested this could be
the start of a wave of takeover bids which would allow utilities to reap
economies through pooling.
The Californian PUC said it had ruled against the merger because the
utilities had not proven that the deal would provide long-term net benefits
for customers. It also feared the deal would have adverse effects on
competition among utilities which transmit power or which sell in the open
market the excess electricity they have generated.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-706</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: Tetra Pak extends offer for
Alfa-Laval
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TETRA Pak, the Swiss liquid packaging concern, is extending its SKr16.25bn
(Dollars 2.63bn) bid for Alfa-Laval, the Swedish dairy and food processing
equipment company.
It is now giving until August 2 instead of May 17 for acceptances. This is
necessary due to delays in finalising the acquisition because the European
Commission has decided to investigate whether the planned merger was
compatible with EC competition rules.
Tetra Pak said that a final EC decision is expected not later than July 19
and that it reserves the right to close the acceptance period no sooner than
on the tenth business day after EC approval.
It said the deal will not be completed until it is satisfied all the
conditions for the bid's implementation have been met.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-707</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: Continental board may ask chief
executive to quit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FISHER and HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT, MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CONTINENTAL'S supervisory board meeting, called to discuss the request by
Pirelli of Italy for renewed merger talks, ended last night with reports
that Mr Horst Urban, chief executive of the German tyre company, had been
asked to step down.
More details also came from Milan about the strength of support behind the
Italian company.
Continental had no comment on the result of the meeting, or whether Mr Urban
was resigning. A report in the daily newspaper Frankfurter Allgemeine
Zeitung, made available in advance of publication, said the supervisory
board had opposed Mr Urban's continued rejection of Pirelli's merger
approach.
His pugnacious defence of Continental's independence has given the bid
tussle with Pirelli a drama which German mergers and acquisitions do not
normally attain. This reached a peak in March when an extraordinary general
meeting of Continental shareholders voted to remove its 5 per cent
limitation on voting rights.
Pirelli, claiming the support of a majority of Continental shareholders, has
since reaffirmed its desire for further contacts with the German company.
Continental and its UK merchant bank adviser, Morgan Grenfell, has
questioned Pirelli's assertion that it has majority support. They argue that
the voting at the EGM showed it had around 36 per cent.
Yesterday, Mr Umberto Zanni, chairman of Riunione Adriatica di Sicurta,
Italy's second biggest private sector insurer, said it owned 2.5 per cent of
Continental's stock. This raises to more than 21 per cent the proportion of
Continental's shares clearly identified as being in control of Pirelli and
its allies.
Mr Zanni also confirmed that Allianz, the German insurer which owns RAS, has
a line of Continental shares which is believed to be 5 per cent. Allianz,
whose finance director, Mr Friedrich Schiefer, is on Continental's
supervisory board, has sometimes been identified as a supporter of
Continental.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-708</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: Saffa bids for box-board
supremacy - The plans of Italy's Bonomi family
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AFTER an absence of some years, the name of Bonomi, one of northern Italy's
leading business families, has been edging back into the headlines after a
string of deals by Saffa, the quoted packaging group 52 per cent owned by Mr
Carlo Bonomi.
Does this signal the first signs of a comeback by what was once a household
name in Italian business circles? 'Definitely not,' says Mr Bonomi. But
while denying that Saffa is the vehicle for his return to the mainstream of
Italian business, he makes no secret of the fact that he would like the
group, already Europe's third biggest producer of box-board, to expand much
further.
It is the concentration on box-board, the material from which cigarette
packets and much of the packaging for food products is made, that lay behind
last February's complex deal between Milan-based Saffa and Torras Hostench,
the Spanish industrial holding group controlled by the Kuwait Investment
Office.
In one of the biggest asset swaps in Spanish industrial history, the two
companies exchanged a variety of paper-industry interests, giving Torras
Hostench control of the Spanish paper market as a result.
In return for the speciality papers business of Sarrio, the Spanish paper
maker of which Saffa had only just gained control, Mr Bonomi's company
received 4 per cent of Ebro, the sugar and foods division of Torras
Hostench, 9.9 per cent of Torras Papel, its paper division, 6 per cent of
Prima Immobiliaria, Spain's richest property group, a large box-board
production plant and Pta10bn (Dollars 94.33m) in cash.
The move surprised analysts, who had followed with approval Saffa's
step-by-step courtship of Sarrio, one of Spain's biggest paper groups, which
had led to majority control last December.
The decision to part company triggered particular surprise as Saffa had only
recently merged its own speciality paper interests - which form its second
main line of business after box-board - with those of the Spanish company,
which had assumed overall control of the sector.
Mr Bonomi says he understands the market's astonishment. But he rejects
speculation that the disposal of the special papers business, coming so soon
after Saffa gained control of Sarrio, was a purely opportunistic step in
response to an unusually generous offer from the Kuwaitis.
Rather, the decision reflected Saffa's policy of concentrating on box-board
following the collapse of much wider plans with Feldmuhle Nobel, the German
paper group which also had a stake in Sarrio, to set up two joint ventures
covering special papers and box-board.
Under the strategy worked out between Saffa and Feldmuhle, the Germans would
have taken management control of the two companies' pooled interests in
special papers, while Saffa would have been responsible for their joint
box-board activities. However, the plan was abandoned when Stora, the
Swedish paper group, acquired Feldmuhle.
Left on its own, Saffa lacked the resources for the heavy capital
investments necessary to keep ahead in both businesses, leading to the
decision to shed special papers business, Mr Bonomi explains.
By providing an additional plant, the Spanish deal has already allowed Saffa
to consolidate its position.
Although Saffa, including associated companies, only produces around 740,000
tonnes a year, Mr Bonomi highlights the fact that it is the second biggest
user in Europe, after Mayr-Melnhof of Austria, of an extremely high
proportion of recycled paper.
Some 99 per cent of Saffa's output is based on recycled products, he notes.
That has become increasingly important as a marketing tool, especially with
big consumer goods producers, which have grown increasingly sensitive to
environmental concerns in recent years.
Mr Bonomi does not expect Saffa to make any further big acquisitions on the
box-board side, following the Spanish realignment. However, further small
purchases in some southern European markets are not to be ruled out, he
hints.
Meanwhile, the company will push ahead with its strategy of expanding beyond
box-board into value-added services like converting, the business -
traditionally done by specialists - of cutting and printing raw box-board to
a customer's specifications.
Packaging machinery is another area for future growth, particularly as
medium-sized Italian engineering companies, many clustered around Bologna,
are among the world's leaders in the field.
Saffa has already made a number of acquisitions. However, equipment
manufacturing still accounts for only about L100bn of the group's sales of
L1,050bn (Dollars 818m) last year, with speciality papers making up L400bn
and box-board around L500bn.
The disposal of the specialist papers business means those figures will
change sharply this year, notes Mr Bonomi. The workforce has already shrunk
to about 2,700. In 1989, the group made L40.3bn after tax. Figures for 1990
will not be released until May.
Meanwhile, Saffa is also aiming to work its property interests harder thanks
to the opening provided by the Sarrio deal into the Spanish property market.
Mr Bonomi aims to combine the group's Italian and Spanish property
activities, which include one of the biggest vineyards in Sardinia, into a
new subsidiary, which will supervise growth in the property field.
That in itself would mark something of a return to first principles for the
Bonomi family, much of whose wealth has been based on Italian property
interests.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21 Photograph Carlo Bonomi, makes no secret of expansion wish
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-709</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: Italian insurer advances 1.2% to
L137.9bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
RIUNIONE Adriatica di Sicurta (RAS), Italy's second biggest private-sector
insurer, which is controlled by Allianz of Germany, improved group net
profits by 1.2 per cent to L137.9bn (Dollars 108.32m) last year, writes Haig
Simonian in Milan.
Group premium income rose by 7.7 per cent to L5,849bn. Premiums at parent
company level went up by 12.7 per cent to L2,844.7bn.
As in 1989, RAS's results are deceptive in that they fail to reflect the
steadily deteriorating underwriting position at many of Italy's big
insurance companies owing to rising claims following a period of strong
growth in the number of policies written, notably on the motor side.
Mr Umberto Zanni, chairman, said underwriting losses rose to L180bn last
year from around L130bn-L140bn in 1989. By contrast, underwriting used to be
profitable as recently as the mid-1980s, but had deteriorated steadily
since, he noted. 'In 1990, the Italian market was the worst in the world'.
As in 1989, RAS had achieved its earnings through investment income, and
especially one-off capital gains on its extensive investment and property
portfolio.
Consequently, the company would once again be making a substantial transfer
of L53.2bn to extraordinary reserves, while keeping the dividend unchanged
at L300 and L360 for ordinary and savings shares respectively.
Mr Zanni said he hoped underwriting earnings would show improvement this
year.
San Paolo Finance, the investment banking arm of Istituto Bancario San Paolo
di Torino, raised net profits by 97 per cent to L20.9bn last year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-710</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / International Company News: Japanese securities houses face
downgrading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN FIDLER, Euromarkets Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE FOUR big Japanese securities houses have had their debt ratings placed
under review for possible downgrading by Standard &amp; Poor's, one of the two
big US rating agencies.
The move puts at risk Nomura Securities' top AAA long-term debt rating,
although its top short-term A1+ rating is not under review. The current
long-term debt ratings of Daiwa Securities and Nikko Securities are both AA,
while that of Yamaichi is AA-. The A1+ short-term debt ratings of all three
are also under review.
The agency said the review arose because of its concern about the future
profitability of the Japanese securities firms amid the deregulation of the
Japanese financial markets. This could threaten their market share and
profitability across the range of their business.
It also cited a less buoyant domestic market. Earnings reported for the
half-year to end-September were weak, while the full-year earnings, yet to
be reported, were unlikely to show much further improvement.
On top of that, the firms' ability to reduce expenses was hampered by their
high proportion of fixed costs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-711</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Kunick calls for Pounds 17.6m as profits
decline
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID CHURCHILL, Leisure Industries Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
KUNICK, the amusement machine and nursing homes group, is seeking Pounds
17.6m via a rights issue to help reduce gearing and to enable further
development of its core activities, although no acquisitions are planned.
The issue, underwritten by Samuel Montagu, is on a 2-for-9 basis at 33p per
share - a sharp discount on yesterday's closing price of 41 1/4 p, down 1
1/4 p on the day.
The details were announced along with the group's results for the half year
ended March 31 1991. These showed that pre-tax profits for the period had
fallen from Pounds 8m to Pounds 7.3m on turnover up from Pounds 50.69m to
Pounds 57.94m.
The main cause of the profits downturn was a sharp increase in interest
charges to Pounds 1.63m (Pounds 176,000).
Trading profits for the six months rose from Pounds 8.2m to Pounds 8.89m in
spite of what Mr Russell Smith, Kunick's chairman, yesterday described as
'extremely difficult trad-ing conditions in all divis-ions.'
The nursing homes operated by Kunick in the UK and France were now all fully
operational, but the sale of special serviced apartments in London for the
elderly and retirement housing in Harrogate continued to be held up by the
slump in the property market.
Mr Smith said that in spite of the depressed state of the pub trade, the
performance of the amusement machine business was strong.
In France, the amusement machine division was recovering after a difficult
first half.
The directors are adjusting the level of the interim and final dividends to
'reflect more accurately the pattern of annual profits.'
Therefore, they are raising the interim dividend from 0.6p to 0.8p and
intend to pay a final of at least 1.2p, keeping the total for the 12 months
at the same level as the previous year's 2p.
COMMENT
Kunick's figures were a shade disappointing to the company's strong City
following but not so bad for them to lose faith in the company's strategy of
turning amusement machine profits into the longer-term investment of nursing
homes for the elderly. Tight management control has kept the company on
course and the rights issue seems a sensible move, bringing gearing down to
about 36 per cent, and enabling management to develop some of its more
profitable activities. But the acquisition trail of the past looks likely to
be on hold for another year or so yet. Full year figures are being scaled
down to about Pounds 17m, putting the shares on a prospective p/e of under
10.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-712</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Kewill makes German purchase
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Kewill has bought Weigang MCS of Germany for an initial DM1.2m (Pounds
400,000) cash; subject to profit achievement an additional payment of up to
DM1.3m may become due.
Weigang develops and distributes manufacturing systems software throughout
Germany, and Kewill said the purchase quickened the pace of its development
in Europe.
Since the interim figures, which showed pre-tax profits up 34 per cent,
trading at Kewill had continued satisfactorily.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-713</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK Company News: King &amp; Shaxson falls to Pounds 1.8m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The year to April 30 ended with lower net profits at King &amp; Shaxson
Holdings, the discount house group. The outcome was Pounds 1.8m after
providing for rebate, tax and transfer to contingency reserves, against
Pounds 2m previously.
Shareholders' funds and minority interests amounted to Pounds 18.89m. The
Pounds 1m subordinated unsecured loan stock 1986-91, issued by Smith St
Aubyn (Holdings), was redeemed at par on March 31.
The final dividend is 7.75p for a same-again total of 10.25p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-714</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Anglo Irish Bank improves to IPounds 3.2m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Profits before tax of the Anglo Irish Bank Corporation advanced from IPounds
2.9m to IPounds 3.2m (Pounds 2.88m) for the half year ended March 31.
Tax of IPounds 927,000 (IPounds 810,000) left available profits at IPounds
2.3m (IPounds 2.09m), equal to earnings of 3.82p (3.47p) per share. The
interim dividend is unchanged at 1.36p.
Advances for the half year rose 47 per cent to IPounds 421.1m (IPounds
286.1m) and deposits by 44 per cent to IPounds 599.5m (IPounds 415.2m).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-715</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK Company News: City of Oxford Inv asset value at 40.1p
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Net asset value at the end of the year to March 31 1991 was 40.1p at City of
Oxford Investment Trust. This compared with 47.8p at the end of the previous
12 months.
Dividends and interest fell from Pounds 1.52m to Pounds 1.47m; other income
added Pounds 28,860 (Pounds 3,733). After interest and management expenses
of Pounds 204,697 (Pounds 209,412) revenue before tax came to Pounds 1.29m
(Pounds 1.31m).
Earnings per ordinary income share were 4.74p (4.85p). Directors recommended
a final dividend of 1.4625p, making a total of 4.5p. Last year's total came
to 4p, plus a special payment of 0.5p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-716</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Revenue higher at Albany Investment
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Albany Investment Trust saw net asset value increase by 3.56p to 105.49p
over the year to end-February. Net revenue improved 8.5 per cent from Pounds
377,000 to Pounds 409,000.
Earnings per share came out at 4.08p (3.76p). A recommended final dividend
of 2.5p makes a total for the year of 3.7p (3.4p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-717</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Highcroft Inv Trust advances to Pounds
0.76m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Highcroft Investment Trust, which holds properties and securities, lifted
pre-tax profits from Pounds 692,000 to Pounds 759,000 in the year to
December 31.
Earnings emerged at 9.49p (8.64p) and the final dividend is a proposed 2.4p
for a total of 3.9p (3.35p). Gross income came to Pounds 904,000 (Pounds
814,000).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-718</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Decline goes on at MMT Computing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KATRINA LOWE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A FURTHER downturn at MMT Computing in the six months to February 28 saw
taxable profits decline 38 per cent from Pounds 1.01m to Pounds 626,000.
This followed the previous full-year result of Pounds 1.87m, a fall of 13
per cent, writes Katrina Lowe.
The USM-quoted computer systems consultancy described the period as the most
difficult it had ever encountered. It had been forced to make redundancies
but the figure was less than 10.
It was still burdened with two leases on unused space at its previous
premises. The link with French computer group Axime, holder of a 20 per cent
stake in MMT, had produced no work. That situation had not changed in the
current half.
Of the two young subsidiaries, MMT Computing (AS) made its first
contribution 'at a very respectable level' but MMT Computing (Training)
incurred a loss; it looked likely, however, to report a profit for the
second half.
On prospects for the full year, Mr Mike Tilbrook, chairman, said: 'Analysts
have forecast profits of about Pounds 1.2m and the company has a history of
beating these forecasts.'
The interim dividend is maintained at 1p on earnings per share of 3.4p
(5.7p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-719</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Pendragon Pounds 11m rights issue funds
purchase
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PENDRAGON, the motor distributor demerged from Williams Holdings, has
launched an Pounds 11m rights issue to fund the acquisition of Portmann, the
Manchester-based Mercedes-Benz car dealership.
The offer, of one share at 115p for every two held, has been underwritten by
Schroders. The shares rose 7p to close at 155p yesterday.
Proceeds will be used to buy Portmann for about Pounds 4.75m and to fund a
'war chest' for future acquisitions.
Since its demerger from Williams in 1989 Pendragon has expanded its
franchises through a programme of acquisitions.
Mr Trevor Finn, chief executive, said the group was hopeful of taking
advantage of Nissan's decision to terminate its franchise with Nissan UK.
'We believe there will be a number of opportunities to buy franchises if
Nissan goes ahead with its decision to end its agreement with Nissan UK.
There are also a number of small franchisers who are in real difficulty.'
The group is looking at Europe and plans to add Japanese franchises to its
portfolio.
Since the beginning of the year it has bought a Saab dealership in
Birmingham, the Porsche dealership for Manchester and now the Portmann
Mercedes-Benz dealership. It has 27 franchises in 22 locations.
Year-end borrowings of Pounds 4.29m (Pounds 9.9m) have been reduced further
to Pounds 1.5m, with gearing just under 10 per cent.
After the rights issue and acquisition Pendragon will have Pounds 3m cash
and net assets of Pounds 32.4m, on a pro forma basis.
Portmann has been sold by a subsidiary of Hartwell, the Oxford-based motor
distributor which last year was taken over by the Saudi Arabian Jameel
organisation.
In the nine months to November 30 Portmann made pre-tax profits of Pounds
900,000 on turnover of Pounds 13m, with no borrowings.
In 1990 Pendragon made Pounds 5.1m on turnover of Pounds 174.4m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-720</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Recession forces API into loss
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SEVERE recessionary conditions across a range of markets pushed API Group,
formerly Associated Paper Industries, into loss in the six months ended
March 30.
Including Pounds 570,000 (Pounds 90,000) of exceptional charges, relating
mostly to provisions for re-organisation and redundancy costs, the pre-tax
loss totalled Pounds 849,000 on turnover of Pounds 29.55m. On a
like-for-like basis, interim profits in 1990 amounted to Pounds 817,000 on
turnover of Pounds 31.81m.
Despite this, the company is maintaining its interim dividend at 2.75p. The
shares dipped 1p to 107p.
Mr Peter Armitage, chairman, said that 'the single greatest adverse
influence' on the results was Henry &amp; Leigh Slater, the coated and laminated
board unit, 'whose customers have been susceptible to the combined effects
of the recession and the Gulf war'.
'We are not despondent,' Mr Armitage said. The group, which recently lost
its managing director following a disagreement over strategy, now has three
divisions, encompassing image enhancement products, converted film and paper
products and heating and ventilating systems.
API is responding to the economic climate by lowering its cost base,
necessitating 50-60 lay-offs, and by accelerating its just-in-time
programme. It is also in the process of recruiting a new chief executive and
two new non-executive directors.
There was a Pounds 131,000 extraordinary item for the costs of improving
emission control at the group's Dry Print business in the US. Mr Armitage
said that the company was 'opening negotiations' with Dry Print's previous
owner for the recovery of some of this money.
Losses per share were 2.7p, against earnings of 2.5p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-721</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BEJAXACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910510
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  10 MAY 91 / UK Company News: Exceptional but hardly extraordinary - The
reactions to the ASB's draft proposals for P&amp;L accounts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WALLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT IS NEARLY a month since the Accounting Standards Board published its
working draft on the restructuring of company profit and loss accounts.
First comments on the draft rules had to be submitted by Tuesday and the
Board is now considering what modifications will have to be made before the
proposals are reissued as a formal exposure draft.
The original document envisaged a radical reworking of the profit and loss
account.
If adopted lock, stock and barrel as a formal financial reporting standard,
as the ASB's rules are to be known, companies would have to provide far
greater details of the source of income and expenditure than at present.
They would also have to publish a prominent statement showing movements on
reserves.
Furthermore, they would not enjoy the same flexibility over non-recurring
items as they do now. The distinction between extraordinary or exceptional
would in effect be removed, and almost all unusual costs or revenues would
have to be taken 'above the line', affecting earnings per share.
Companies would also have to provide details of so-called discretionary
expenditure, such as advertising and research and development.
According to Prof David Tweedie, ASB chairman, the responses received by the
Tuesday deadline were broadly in favour of the Board's plans.
However there is much muttering in the accountancy world about the
complexity of the proposals, a feeling shared by the technical committee of
the 100 Group of top UK finance directors which met earlier this week to
formulate its response to the ASB's initiative.
Their worries focus on the appearance of the new P&amp;L account. There would be
no fewer than eight columns, showing income and expenditure coming from
businesses bought during the year, businesses sold, and businesses owned
throughout the year, plus a total figure, for each of this year and the
prior year.
There are also worries about the complicated language of the draft rules. It
is highly theoretical in tone and even technically literate accountants
admit to being baffled at such concepts as 'components of comprehensive
income'.
Despite these objections, a spirit of compromise is in the air. There is
none of the fierce confrontation between industry and standards-setters
which characterised the 1989 debate over the draft rules on accounting for
goodwill, issued by the Accounting Standards Committee, the ASB's
predecessor.
There is broad agreement among accountants, industrialists and institutional
investors that fundamental reforms are required.
'Most of what the ASB is proposing is directly relevant to their declared
objective of getting a better measure of a company's achieved performance,'
says Mr Nigel Stapleton, chairman of the 100 Group's technical committee and
finance director of Reed International.
'We support the principle of greater disclosure which underlies much of what
the ASB is doing. We do, however, have some reservations about the details
of the working draft.
'The 100 Group believes that the document provides a basis for discussion,
but there are some areas where it is not completely to clear to us that the
issues have been fully worked out. We hope that in a number of respects the
exposure draft looks quite different to this working document.'
Stapleton argues that there should be greater flexibility over the
presentation of the new P&amp;L account. In principle he has no objection to the
rule requiring a detailed analysis of income and expenditure. His doubts
centre on the usefulness of such information once it goes beyond a certain
level of detail.
He says that what details there are should be relegated to the notes to the
accounts, rather than clutter up the face of the P&amp;L account. He thinks that
this should retain a degree of simplicity for the sake of greater
usefulness.
In addition he has doubts about the thinking behind the requirement to
publish discretionary expenditure.
The proposals which have attracted most attention from brokers and other
analysts are those relating to extraordinaries and exceptionals.
Stapleton is in favour of a general tightening up of the rules. However he
adds: 'It is going a bit too far to forget about the distinction altogether
as it would denigrate the earnings per share figure as a reasonable proxy of
a company's basic performance.'
The reason for the interest is clear, the two items account for a
substantial part of UK companies total profits. If the costs of
restructuring a business after a takeover, or the proceeds of a disposal,
are all taken above the line reported profits will look very different.
Just how different is evident from a number of pieces of research published
in the last month. P-E International, a consultancy firm, has calculated
that overall balance of extraordinary charges in the UK's top 250 companies
amounts to a negative Pounds 2.9bn in the last financial year. Under the ASB
proposals this would all be set off against reported earnings.
At Goldman Sachs, the US investment house, Dr Sushil Wadwhani has calculated
that companies in the FT-500 Index record extraordinary items in three out
of five years on average, scotching the notion that extraordinary items are
really that unusual. He suggests that share prices may be depressed as a
result and argues that the new rules would reduce productivity growth.
The essence of his argument is that the stock market is fixated on reported
earnings per share. Companies would be reluctant to incur necessary
restructuring expenditure because the costs would have to be taken above the
line.
The authors of Company Reporting, a monthly review of financial reporting
practice, have looked at the latest accounts of 700 quoted UK companies. Of
these, 53 per cent have classified certain items as extraordinary, that is
taken below the line. More than half the items related to reorganisation and
business disposals.
'If the changes mooted by the ASB result in a new accounting standard, it
will have a resounding impact on financial reporting.'*
The scene is set for some behind-the-scenes horse-trading. The more the
formal exposure draft resembles last month's document, the more resounding
the impact on UK financial reporting.
If there are no changes at all, the finance directors are likely to be less
polite than they are being this week.
*Company Reporting May 1991, published by Company Reporting Ltd., 68 Dundas
St., Edinburgh EH3 6QZ. Tel: 031-558-1400.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19 Photograph David Tweedie, responses broadly in favour
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
